We need that assistance now. For us to fail to provide the necessary support for the contras would be to risk the permanent loss of Nicaragua to the west, the permanent relegation of Nicaragua to the Soviet bloc. I must stress that neither the democratic resistance nor our administration seeks a purely military solution. Instead, the freedom fighters seek leverage to bring the Communists to the table and negotiate a political and democratic peace. So far, the Communists have been intransigent because they believed they could afford to be; each day the military situation in Nicaragua has been twisting another degree in their favor. But when the Senate approves our aid package, the forces of freedom in Nicaragua will be given a chance, a good chance.

Today 90 percent live in democracies, or in systems moving toward democracy. As far as 5 years -- few, I should say, as 5 years ago many considered El Salvador lost to communism; others claimed there was no hope for Honduras and Guatemala.

Well, today those nations are democracies. Today, indeed, democracy in Latin America constitutes a swelling and life-giving tide. With our help, it can still flood its powerful, cleansing way into Nicaragua, sweeping aside the Communist wall that has been holding it out, enabling the people to hold free elections and experience genuine liberty. With our help and our prayers, my friends, I just have to believe that we're called to offer both.

However, I have serious reservations concerning section 5 of the act, which permits the award of attorneys' fees in any case that was pending on July 4, 1984, including suits that have already been concluded. The retroactive application of the act to cases that are no longer pending permits the Congress to displace the judicial function by interfering with a final judgment. To do so disturbs the settled expectations of the parties and the traditional finality that our society has accorded court decisions. Moreover, it is not clear what rational basis there is for imposing attorneys' fees in cases that have already been settled or finally adjudicated. However, given the underlying merits of the act generally, I am signing this measure, notwithstanding the constitutional problems it presents.

Thank you very much, and greetings to Secretary Weinberger and General Abrahamson. I hope you haven't said everything I'm going to say. I'm grateful to have this opportunity to speak with you and to thank you for all you're doing to keep America in the forefront of scientific and technological change. Our country's security today relies as much on the genius and creativity of scientists as it does on the courage and dedication of those in the military services. It also relies on those with the wisdom to recognize innovation when they see it and to shepherd change over the obstacles and through the maze. It takes a special person, endowed with vision and tenacity, to overcome political and bureaucratic inertia; and many of you here today are just this kind of special people. And I want you to know that your President and your country are grateful. And if I'm not being too presumptuous, I think history will remember you, too.

There are three stages of reaction to any new idea, as Arthur C. Clarke, a brilliant writer with a fine scientific mind, once noted. First, ``It's crazy; don't waste my time.'' Second, ``It's possible, but it's not worth doing.'' And finally, ``I always said it was a good idea.'' [Laughter] When I notice how much support tax simplification seems to have attracted as of late, I can't help but think of Clarke's observation. Well, one sometimes has to live with opposition to proposals such as changing the tax code, but when the same kind of skepticism stands in the way of the national security of our country, it can be perilous.

Clearly, intelligent and well-meaning individuals can be trapped by a mindset, a way of thinking that prevents them from seeing beyond what has already been done and makes them uncomfortable with what is unfamiliar. And this mindset is perhaps our greatest obstacle in regard to SDI.

Many of our citizens are still unaware that today we are absolutely defenseless against the fastest, most destructive weapons man has ever created: ballistic missiles. Yet there are still those who want to cut off, or severely cut back, our ability to investigate the feasibility of such defenses. Congressional action on the defense authorization bill is coinciding with increasing diplomatic activity with the Soviet Union. Yet, at the same time, we're in the midst of a budget fight which could take away the very leverage we need to deal with the Soviets successfully.

Back in 1983 I challenged America's scientific community to develop an alternative to our total reliance on the threat of nuclear retaliation, an alternative based on protecting innocent people rather than avenging them, an alternative that would be judged effective by how many lives it could save rather than how many lives it could destroy. All of you know that during the past three decades deterrence has been based on our ability to use offensive weapons to retaliate against any attack. Once an American President even had to make the excruciating decision to use such weapons in our defense. Isn't it time that we took steps that will permit us to do something about nuclear weapons rather than simply continue to live with them in fear? And this is what our SDI research is all about. And there can be no better time than today, the 41st anniversary of Hiroshima, to rededicate ourselves to finding a safer way to keep the peace.

Many people believe the answer lies not in SDI, but only in reaching arms control agreements. Trust and understanding alone, it is said, will lead to arms control. But let's not kid ourselves, it's realism, not just trust, that is going to make it possible for adversaries like the Soviet Union and the United States to reach effective arms reduction agreements. Our SDI program has provided an historic opportunity, one that enhances the prospects for reducing the number of nuclear weapons.

Technology can make it possible for both sides, realistically, without compromising their own security, to reduce their arsenals. And the fear that one side might cheat -- might have a number of missiles above the agreed upon limit -- could be offset by effective defenses. Clearly, by making offensive nuclear missiles less reliable, we make agreements to reduce their number more attainable. Particularly is that true where one side now is an economic basket case because of the massive arms buildup that it's been conducting over the last few decades -- the Soviet Union.

Well, today we continue to negotiate with the Soviets, and they're negotiating with us. In fact, their recent proposals -- in stark contrast to those gloomy predictions -- are somewhat more forthcoming than those of the past. We're giving serious consideration to what the Soviets have recently laid upon the table in response to our own concrete reduction proposals. Also, we're looking toward the next summit between General Secretary Gorbachev and me, as we agreed upon last November, where nuclear arms reduction will be one of several significant issues to be discussed.

Forecasting is not useful, but let me just say again: I am optimistic. It is demonstrably in the interest of both our countries to reduce the resources that we commit to weapons. If the Soviet Union wants arms reduction -- strategic, chemical, or conventional -- the United States stands ready to commit itself to a fair and verifiable agreement.

As for SDI, let me again affirm, we are willing to explore how to share its benefits with the Soviet Union, which itself has long been involved in strategic defense programs. This will help to demonstrate what I have been emphasizing all along: that we seek no unilateral advantage through the SDI.

Many of the vocal opponents of SDI, some of them with impressive scientific credentials, claim our goal is impossible; it can't be done, they say. Well, I think it's becoming increasingly apparent to everyone that those claiming it can't be done have clouded vision. Sometimes smoke gets in your eyes, and sometimes politics gets in your eyes. If this project is as big a waste of time and money as some have claimed, why have the Soviets been involved in strategic defense themselves for so long, and why are they so anxious that we stop?

I understand that General Abrahamson has already briefed you on the progress we've made. I want to take this opportunity to congratulate the general and his team. They're all first string and doing a terrific job. Jack Swigert, an astronaut, an American hero of the first order -- well, I think I'm getting ahead of myself there. I should continue with what I was saying and say that I'm more than happy with the strides made in our ability to track and intercept missiles before they reach their targets. The goal we seek is a system that can intercept deadly ballistic missiles in all phases of their flight, including, and in particular, the boost phase -- right where they're coming out of the silos. Our research is aimed at finding a way of protecting people, not missiles. And that's my highest priority and will remain so. And to accomplish this, we're proceeding as fast as we can toward developing a full range of promising technologies. I know there are those who are getting a bit antsy, but to deploy systems of limited effectiveness now would deter limited funds and -- or divert them -- and delay our main research.

American hero of the first order, who once said, ``I was privileged to be one of the few who viewed our Earth from the Moon, and that vision taught me that technology and commitment can overcome any challenge.'' Well, Jack tragically died of cancer and was cut short from the great contributions he would have made to his country and to mankind. He was the kind of individual who made this the great land of freedom and enterprise that it is. His can-do spirit is alive and well in America today.

We and the other free people of the world are on the edge of a giant leap into the next century. That turning point in 13\1/2\ years, will not only mark the end of a century but the beginning of a new millennium, and the free people of the world are ready for it. Our research on effective defenses helps to point the way to a safer future. The best minds from some allied countries are already working with us in this noble endeavor, and we believe that others will join this effort before too long. In SDI, as elsewhere, we've put technology that almost boggles the mind to work, increasing our productivity and expanding the limits of human potential. The relationship between freedom and human progress has never been more apparent.

But our freedom and security, as we are sorely aware, depend on more than technology. Both diplomacy and our internal debate are at a critical juncture, and your active support is imperative. Together, we must make it plain that this is the worst time to undermine vital defense programs and take away America's needed negotiating leverage. If we cut back on our own forces unilaterally, we will leave our adversaries no incentive to reduce their own weapons. And we'll leave the next generations not a safer, more stable world but a far more dangerous one. The future is literally in our hands. And it is SDI that is helping us to regain control over our own destiny.

I want to thank you all again for all you are doing to keep our country out in front, to keep her secure and free, and don't let up. And God bless you. I'll just leave you with this thought, once again: When the time has come and the research is complete, yes, we're going to deploy.

I appreciate this opportunity to express my thanks for all that you're doing to meet one of the most serious challenges our country faces. The use of illegal drugs and abuse of alcohol can no longer be shrugged off as somebody else's business. Today it's everybody's business -- every man, woman, and child who loves his country, community, and family. It's time to stand up and be counted, and this you are doing. So, it's a pleasure to be here with individuals who are doing just that. The usual format for speeches such as this is opening with a bit of humor to get things moving. Today, if you will excuse me, I think the gravity of the problem we're discussing precludes humor. Drug and alcohol abuse are taking the lives of people we love. What can be more important than putting a stop to that?

On the casualty list you'll find the poor, the middle class, the rich and famous; hundreds, even thousands, per year -- dead. Who has not felt the heartache of hearing the news of a friend or family member, someone who had so much to live for but is now gone forever? Who has not felt the frustration of watching helplessly as loved ones or dear friends slide to personal ruin? Len Bias and Don Rogers, gifted athletes who had so much more to achieve, are only two of the most recent fatalities. One doesn't have to be a conservative to appreciate that the vitality and resilience of America flows from the strength of the American family. How many wives and husbands weep at night knowing their spouse is drifting toward disaster?

Today we must all be as one family in tackling this problem. The young fellow down the street using marijuana must no longer be a problem just for his own mother and father. The fellow at the next desk at work who gets stoned and at times is groggy on the job must no longer be just the boss's headache. The young coed, popping pills or snorting coke, must no longer be excused for just doing her thing. If we care, we'll be firm with these members of the American family. And if we care, we must act. And that doesn't mean, as you've been told, put them in jail -- that means help free them from drugs.

Having quoted Nancy, I just want to say how proud I am that she has been an outspoken crusader on this serious national problem. We couldn't be more pleased that others, at long last, are joining the fight. When it comes to curing this plague that ravages our land and infects our loved ones, there are no Democrats or Republicans, just Americans. Nancy, over these last 5 years, has shown how much one individual with commitment can accomplish. She was out in Oakland speaking to some young people about drugs, and she mentioned that perhaps -- and said this in answer to a question -- that the most important thing young people could do to fight drugs is ``just say no.'' Well, today Just Say No is a national organization with 10,000 chapters across this country.

Nancy, with her tireless efforts, I think, has contributed to an overwhelming change in consciousness that is taking place in America. The flippant attitude about drugs is changing. Even in my old business, the film business, there seem to be hopeful signs that they are now recognizing their responsibility to do something about this. Historically, the film industry has been a responsible force in our society, something well understood by those in the corporate office, as well as those of us in front of the cameras. I would hope that in the months ahead we will hear public expressions of support for those in the entertainment world who use their enormous influence, especially on the young, to oppose drugs. This is especially true of rock stars, who should be encouraged to have courage and to give a public thumbs down to drugs. As a matter of fact, you would be interested to know that among that musical group or groups, right now, there are some who are trying to plan and organize drug-free rock concerts.

Sports figures have a tremendous influence. I hope that every athlete will reflect on the impressions he or she gives as a role model to young, adoring fans. All those in the sports world should understand what a great force for good they can be. And you know, in that area, that would be a return, because I was a sports announcer at the beginning of my career -- broadcasting major league baseball and the big university football and so forth -- and you might be interested to know that back in that era, no sports figure would endorse cigarettes or beer. Drugs weren't a problem at that time because they knew they were role models and felt that they had an obligation to be the right kind of role model for all of our young people. So, we are asking for that to be returned. And I want to thank Dr. Bowen and his team over at HHS for the leadership they are providing on this issue. One example is the enlistment of major league ballplayers, like Mike Schmidt of the Philadelphia Phillies, to participate in an education program against cocaine, the killer drug.

And a special word of thanks to Dr. Macdonald of the Alcohol, Drug Abuse, and Mental Health Administration who is a real champion in our crusade. Mac was actually active with Nancy's campaign long before joining our administration. The number of crusaders is growing. We mean to create an antidrug environment in this country, an environment that will strengthen those who are making the right decisions and will cast the scowl of disapproval on those who would use drugs and misuse alcohol.

Early on in the administration, we focused on interdiction and eradication, on hitting the growers, the transporters, and the sellers. Well, our assault on supply has had some notable success and will continue. But what we've launched in the last few days has been what I think is the real answer, an offensive against demand. This, in the long run, is the answer. Let's take the customers away from the drug peddlers. It is clear that our domestic drug demand fuels international drug trafficking and cuts at the social, political, and economic fabric of friendly countries.

I am announcing that in September I will be calling back for special consultations our Ambassadors from other countries which may face major drug production, transportation, or consumption problems. I'll outline the steps that we're taking to strike at the heart of this monster by curbing domestic demand so they can take the message back with them to the countries where they serve. Together, all countries must send the message: No drug networks will remain alive. We mean to have a drug-free country, and the world should know we mean business. There're already reasons for optimism. In our Armed Forces in general, drug use has been cut by 67 percent since 1980. The daily use of marijuana among our high school students is down, as is the use of a variety of drugs for high school and college students.

The sum total of this can be looked at as a good first step. One of the joys of my Presidency is getting to meet and know this generation of American youth. I think it's one of the finest we've ever had. If he hadn't said it first, back at the beginning of World War II when someone asked General George Marshall what was our secret weapon, and he said, ``The best blankety-blank kids in the world.'' [Laughter] Well, I think it would well be that this generation will lead America out of the swamps of illegal drugs. Drug use is a pervasive problem that afflicts all ages, all races, and all income levels. Today's young people, with their energy and ideals, with their commitment to a better future, could well have a greater impact on the rest of us than any generation before. I say we should give them every bit of support that we can.

Earlier this week I announced six goals for us to focus our attention on, goals that will end America's drug epidemic. And the first is a drug-free workplace. It's particularly vital that those in sensitive occupations have clear minds. But we're looking for a drug-free workplace for every working person, in government and out. Number two is drug-free schools, from grade schools through universities. Local authorities, parents, and educators can do it; and the time is now. This fall everyone should be made aware from day one that drugs on campus, used or sold by anyone, are a thing of the past and that strong action will back up that pronouncement. Our third goal is tackling the health dangers stemming from drug abuse. Research can find better treatments, more effective prevention, and better methods of drug testing. Our fourth goal is nothing less than a total international commitment to defeat this evil. And now that other countries know we're attacking the demand side, this should be made much easier. Fifth, we plan to strengthen our enforcement effort; that means building upon what we've already done, including, where appropriate, increasing the support that is given by the United States military in this effort. The sixth goal, and the one that is essential if the others are to have a chance for success, is increasing the public's awareness and involvement in the fight against drugs.

Well, we must determine how we, as free people, will conduct our lives, what our standards are, what behavior we will and will not tolerate. The time has come to decide on this issue and act, each of us. I want to thank all of you for the magnificent work you are doing, and will continue to do, to ensure that America meets this challenge.

President today announced his intention to nominate Frank C. Carlucci to be a member of the General Advisory Committee of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. He would succeed William Robert Graham, and upon confirmation he will be designated Chairman.

Yesterday the President reaffirmed strong administration support of a 750 million barrel Strategic Petroleum Reserve. The Strategic Petroleum Reserve was created to maintain adequate strategic and economic protection against oil supply disruptions. It moderates the economic impacts of oil price increases and supply shortages, reduces the pressures for allocation and price controls in the event of a supply disruption, reduces the likelihood of panic buying, and provides more time for diplomacy to work in special situations.

Reaffirmation of our goal of a 750 million barrel Strategic Petroleum Reserve demonstrates the President's continued leadership and commitment to our allies that holding strategic stocks is the best defense against the effects of rapid price escalation or supply interruptions. The President, in reaching his decision, also called upon other oil-consuming nations to take similar actions, stressing that strategic stockpiles are the best defense against world oil supply disruption.

The publication of the Regulatory Program of the United States Government is the second in an annual series begun last year as part of our effort to improve the management of regulatory activity within the Executive branch. A major goal of this publication is to provide the public and the Congress with a greater opportunity to learn about and evaluate our regulatory priorities and procedures.

Regulatory Program describes the 523 most significant regulatory activities planned for the year ending March 31, 1987. Over the coming months and years, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget will report periodically on the agencies' progress in carrying out these initiatives.

Federal regulation is one of the most important and costly activities of government, yet it has been managed even less systematically than government spending. Last year, I established the Regulatory Program to complement the other programs I put in place during 1981 to improve the quality and responsiveness of our regulatory efforts.

We have too little information on the benefits provided by the regulations we promulgate each year and even less information on the benefits of those already in effect. By developing better information on benefits, we can improve the setting of priorities that truly meet the Nation's needs. The Program will help us do that.

Moreover, we have only rough estimates of the total costs of regulations -- ranging between $50 billion and $150 billion each year. While the American people pay such regulatory costs, they tend to be hidden in the prices consumers pay for goods and services. These costs could grow even larger, as there will be a tendency to maintain government programs through regulatory means when funding is not available.

Today, more than ever, it is essential for us to coordinate regulatory activity among the agencies, to increase accountability for regulatory programs, and to ensure that the most significant regulatory activities are given priority and are properly managed. Only through a coordinated executive review can regulatory activities provide the greatest real benefits to society as a whole.

Of course, this Regulatory Program by itself cannot ensure that all regulation will be well-conceived and beneficial to society. It can, however, highlight important regulatory activities under consideration. Thus, this Regulatory Program is an important addition to our wide-ranging efforts of regulatory oversight and review -- designed to make government regulation the servant, not the master, of the American people.

Monday, the White House senior staff, led by the President and the Vice President, will begin voluntary drug testing to set the example and lead the way toward the President's goal of a drug-free workplace. The President has made it clear that he is seeking a drug-free workplace for all Americans. He believes that all Federal employees deserve a drug-free environment and that Federal employees should set the example for State and local governments and the private sector to follow in identifying users of illegal drugs. This is an essential step in helping users free themselves of the drug habit.

The President. The Berlin Wall is an affront to the human spirit. It symbolizes the failings of totalitarian regimes and their inability to crush the innate human striving for freedom. Its very existence reminds us of the need to defend our democratic way of life and to continue our work for freedom and peace. The wall also reminds us of the continued, forced division of Europe, of Germany, and of Berlin. Dismantling the wall would be a major step towards improvement of East-West relations. Its continued existence will remain a burden on our relations with those regimes responsible for it.

The President. I would like to see the wall come down today, and I call upon those responsible to dismantle it. No regime can attain genuine legitimacy in the eyes of its own people if those people are treated as prisoners by their own government.

Soviet proposals as a signal that the Soviets have begun to make a serious effort. I have responded in a constructive spirit. The arms control process is gaining momentum. The ball is now in their court. If they respond constructively, we can make important progress.

My highest priority is reaching a balanced and verifiable agreement on deep, stabilizing reductions of nuclear arms. This is an attainable goal. I am ready to work with the Soviets and Mr. Gorbachev to achieve this. Separately, NATO, through the decision readied at Montebello in October 1983, is proceeding to unilaterally reduce its nuclear inventory to reach the lowest inventory consistent with credible deterrence.

In both of these fora our proposals contain fair and reciprocal measures for verification, including onsite inspection. At the CDE the East has recently been more responsive to our concerns. In MBFR, however, the Soviets have so far failed to respond seriously, especially with respect to following up on Mr. Gorbachev's January 15 endorsement of ``reasonable'' verification measures. Nonetheless, we continue to hope that the Soviets will return to us with a constructive response.

NATO is continuing to study General Secretary Gorbachev's proposal for a new conventional arms control approach encompassing all the territory from the Atlantic to the Urals. NATO has also launched a study designed to examine conventional arms control in Europe in its totality and find the best way to achieve a stable, verifiable balance of conventional forces at a lower level. We will continue to pursue with the Soviets these proposals designed to strengthen security and peace in Europe.

The President. The United States is committed to ending the unnatural division of Europe. We support the goal of reunification of Germany through peaceful means and in accordance with the democratically expressed will of the German people.

The President. There should be no doubt of our enduring commitment to Berlin and to its future. We have sustained this commitment for over 40 years, and it will continue to be the centerpiece of our European policy. We have demonstrated on numerous occasions our readiness to stand firm in defense of Berlin. At the same time, we are continually striving to establish a normalization of conditions in and around the city.

The President. I would disagree with your use of the word ``dissension.'' In fact, our relations with the Federal Republic are excellent. Let's look at the examples you mentioned. On SDI, we have concluded an agreement with the FRG on cooperation in SDI research, and our Department of Defense has just awarded the largest overseas SDI research contract yet to a West German firm.

On Libya, while we have had some differences of views on our counterattack against Libyan terrorism, your government agrees on the need to work together with the United States and other governments to fight terrorism, which threatens all civilized nations. On trade issues, we and the FRG are united in our desire to combat protectionism, avert the threat of a trade war, and work together to reach mutually acceptable trade arrangements. So, I don't see ``dissension'' in our relationship -- just the opposite. We have a longstanding close and deep relationship with the FRG and ties of great friendship and regard for the German people.

Kohl. That close relationship is based, first and foremost, on the warm relations between our two countries and peoples. The FRG and the United States share the preeminent goals of economic and political freedom for all, of liberty for the individual, and of pursuit of a just and stable peace throughout the world. The Chancellor and I agree on the philosophy underlying many of the policies he advocates in Bonn and I pursue here -- for example, on the importance of the private sector and on the need to preserve basic human and family values, as well as our common security.

November, General Secretary Gorbachev and I agreed to meet again in the United States in 1986, and he invited me to the Soviet Union in 1987. We have made suggestions to the Soviets about this year's summit to which they should now respond. While no dates have been set, Secretary [of State] Shultz and Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze will meet September 19 and 20 here in Washington to discuss details, and we are working on the assumption that there will be a summit this year as agreed. At the Geneva summit we also agreed to intensify the dialog between our two countries at all levels. Since then there's been a lot of discussion as well as a number of meetings on the whole range of issues: arms reduction, humanitarian questions, bilateral matters, regional affairs. This process, mostly at the expert level, has been useful and will continue.

Shakespeare's reminder that ``the world is full of ornament'' and the ``outward shows'' are ``least themselves'' has always had a special relevance for the political world, but it was especially so last week here in Washington. The United States Senate began hearings on the nominations of William Rehnquist and Antonin Scalia, men I've named to the position of Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and Associate Justice of the Court. These hearings are a healthy process, mandated by the Constitution. Even though they produce a lot of outward show and ornament, they provide the American people with an opportunity to evaluate for themselves the quality of a President's appointments.

To be sure, there were many serious allegations by political opponents of Justice Rehnquist and Judge Scalia. One Democratic Senator announced he would vote against Justice Rehnquist even before the hearings started. There were dark hints about what might be found in documents Judge Rehnquist wrote while a Justice Department official many years ago. To deal with these unfounded charges, I took the unusual step of permitting the Senate committee to see the documents themselves. Of course, there was nothing there but legal analyses and other routine communications. The hysterical charges of coverup and stonewalling were revealed for what they were: political posturing. I was sorry to have to release these documents, but Supreme Court nominations are so important that I did not want my nominees to enter upon their responsibilities under any cloud. And so, I was delighted that when all was said and done our nominees emerged unscathed from last week's hearings.

Rehnquist, recognized even during his early years as a brilliant mind, graduated first in his class from Stanford Law School. He clerked for the Supreme Court, an early mark of distinction in any legal career. He then returned to Arizona to practice law, coming back to Washington some years later to serve as an Assistant Attorney General in the Department of Justice. Most important, for the past 15 years he has served as a Justice of the Supreme Court with extraordinary diligence and craftsmanship. His opinions are renowned for their clarity of reasoning and precision of expression. And when his colleagues on the Supreme Court learned that I would nominate Justice Rehnquist to preside as Chief Justice, they were unanimous in expressing pleasure and approval. It's hard to imagine higher praise for anyone in the legal profession than that.

Turning to Judge Antonin Scalia, he's regarded in the legal profession as a superb jurist, a first-class intellect, and a warm and persuasive person. He has served in the Department of Justice, taught law at the University of Chicago and the University of Virginia, and served since 1982 as a judge on the U.S. Court of Appeals here in the District of Columbia. The American Bar Association gave Judge Scalia, as they gave Justice Rehnquist, their highest rating. I might add that as the father of nine children Judge Scalia holds family values in high esteem. And I was especially delighted with his nomination, because Judge Scalia is the first Italian-American in history to be named to the Supreme Court.

Beyond their undoubted legal qualifications, Justice Rehnquist and Judge Scalia embody a certain approach to the law, an approach that as your President I consider it my duty to endorse, indeed to insist upon.

The background here is important. You see, during the last few election campaigns, one of the principal points I made to the American people was the need for a real change in the makeup of the Federal judiciary. I pointed out that too many judges were taking upon themselves the prerogatives of elected officials. Instead of interpreting the law according to the intent of the Constitution and the Congress, they were simply using the courts to strike down laws that displeased them politically or philosophically. I argued the need for judges who would interpret law, not make it. The people, through their elected representatives, make our laws; and the people deserve to have these laws enforced as they were written.

President announced today that Taiwan has agreed to eliminate, effective October 1, 1986, the duty-paying schedule currently being used to calculate customs duties. In addition, all products of U.S. origin imported into Taiwan will be immediately removed from the duty-paying schedule and will enjoy the benefits of transaction value prior to the formal elimination of the duty-paying list. This action follows a week of intensive consultations with Taiwan in Washington under the auspices of the American Institute in Taiwan. On August 1 the President determined under section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974 that Taiwan's use of a duty-paying system to calculate customs duties was a violation of a U.S.-Taiwanese trade agreement and directed the U.S. Trade Representative to propose appropriate retaliatory measures.

Once the duty-paying list has been formally eliminated on October 1, 1986, the U.S. Trade Representative will terminate the pending section 301 unfair trade practices case on customs valuations against Taiwan. The President commends Taiwan for its cooperation and continued commitment to fair and open trade. Taiwan's elimination of the duty-paying list will create greater certainty for U.S. exporters, who will now be able to plan their export programs with the knowledge that their shipments will be valued on the basis of the international standard of transaction value.

She is an educator by profession, and she taught in European schools after having completed English language studies at Oxford University in England. Mrs. Clark has been active in many charitable organizations and serves on the board of directors of several performing arts organizations.

It has to do with an old fellow who had the piece of creek-bottom land, never had done anything with it. Then he got ambitious and started in, and he got the brush all cleared, and he hauled the rocks away, and then he started fertilizing and cultivating and planting. And finally, he had really a beautiful garden spot there. And one Sunday morning after the church service, he was so proud that he asked the minister if he wouldn't stop by and see what he'd done. Well, after church, the minister did come by and the first thing he saw was the corn, and he said, ``I've never seen corn so tall. My, how the Lord has blessed this land.'' And then he saw some melons, and he said, ``I've never seen melons that large.'' He said, ``Oh, the Lord has just -- bless the Lord. This is just so wonderful.'' Well, he went on that way through everything, squash and beans and everything else. The old boy was getting pretty fidgety as the minister kept giving the Lord the credit.

I've always liked that story because it makes a good point. God gave us this great and good land, but it's up to us to make it flourish -- to preserve its freedom, to see it grow and become a nation of greatness. In a few minutes, I'll be talking to those people out in the grandstand about the future of American farming. I thought I'd talk to you for a moment about the future more generally, because you've got more future than most of us have. And I thought I might begin my remarks about the future by talking about the past, in particular the part of the American story that I've witnessed in my own lifetime.

Great Depression. And I know you've known of recessions since, but I can assure you -- to those of us who went through the Great Depression -- there was never anything like it. The unemployment rate was virtually a fourth or more of the work force in America, and I approached college and knew that I was going to have to work my way through. We were poor, but, you know, you weren't so aware of it because the Government didn't keep coming around and telling you you were. So, I had to work my way through college. And I was kind of lucky -- I had a summer job all the way, lifeguarding -- to get some money to start back to school and then I had jobs on the campus. As a matter of fact, one of the better jobs I've ever had was on the campus. I washed dishes in the girls' dormitory. [Laughter] All around me, it was a tragic time -- your friends, their parents out of work. America's future looked grim.

Just think of all we take for granted today that didn't even use to exist -- things like television, computers, and space flights. You're looking at a fellow who can actually remember what a thrill it was to hear that Charles Lindbergh had landed in Paris, flying that little single-engine plane across the Atlantic all by himself -- the first time it had been done. Well, this same fellow also happens to remember what it was like to gather around the TV set and watch the first Americans walk on the Moon. Imagine it -- from Charles Lindbergh to Moon landings in a single lifetime. I can remember my first ride in an automobile -- and they wonder why I'm an optimist.

You stand on the verge of a new age. Today freedom is on the march throughout the world. Just 10 years ago, for example, there were few democracies in Latin America. Now, 90 percent of the people in Latin America live in democracies or countries that are well on their way in that direction.

Peace itself is moving to a surer footing, with arms talks and the research on our Strategic Defense Initiative. Our economy is growing as America leads the world in a technological revolution -- a revolution ranging from tiny microchips to voyages through the outer reaches of the solar system, from home computers to agricultural breakthroughs like new disease-resistant crops. And for those of you who are going into farming, the future's especially bright as the world population continues to grow, creating new markets.

All this awaits you. Of course, you will face challenges. Every generation has to face challenges as it comes of age. But you need only to be true to the values that made our nation great. I know when you're young -- and believe it or not, your parents and the others that are older, they remember very clearly what it was like and how they felt, the same as you do. But there's a tendency to throw aside old values as belonging to an earlier generation. Don't discard those values that have proven, over the period of time, their value. Just believe in those values that made our nation great and keep them: faith, family, hard work, and, above all, freedom.

But I want you to know that I've taken advantage of you because I appreciated having this time with you, and I tried to stretch it out a little bit. But I just want to, again, thank you -- all of you; and God bless you.

Well, to provide further help to farmers in the Southeast, I have asked Agriculture Secretary Lyng to create a Federal drought assistance task force, a task force that will help provide long-term support to those so affected by this drought. Dick Lyng will extend to those farmers the assistance and encouragement that they so need. Here in the Midwest there's no drought.

There are problems all the same. Storage is scarce. Certain types of interest remain high. Prices for some farm goods are falling. Farm communities find machinery dealers in trouble and banks under pressure.

Well, let me be clear: We're talking about more than statistics like crop yields and land prices. We're talking about a way of life -- a way of life nurtured and sustained by the soil -- the oldest way of life that Americans know. And, my friends, America has too much at stake in her farms -- too much history, too much pride -- not to help in hard times.

I give you my promise: The Nation will see the farmers through. There are three fundamental ways that we're working to help: supporting farm income, cutting farm costs, and expanding farm exports. Our income programs are intended to see farmers and farm communities through the years we're in now, some of the hardest of the hard times. But, ultimately, we want to get government out of farming so that our farmers can achieve complete economic independence. Right now, while some of our farmers are hurting, government has a responsibility to lend a hand, especially since government-imposed embargoes and inflation did so much of the damage in the first place. Through target prices, support loans, and other programs, our administration has provided more support to our nation's farmers this year than did the administrations of the last five Presidents all put together.

Because this year alone, we'll spend more on farm support programs -- some $26 billion or more -- than the total amount the last administration provided in all of its 4 years. Consider our new conservation reserve program. This year we, in effect, leased some 4 million acres of marginal farmland -- fragile land that was undergoing rapid erosion. By the end of next year, that figure will rise to nearly 10 million, and when the program is complete to almost 45 million acres.

That's 45 million acres out of production and protecting the environment -- 45 million acres conserved for future generations, not used to force crop prices down in our time. As I mentioned a moment ago, with bumper harvests here in the Midwest, storage is scarce and some producers fear lack of space in elevators or farm bins will make their crops ineligible for price supports. Well, I've directed Secretary of Agriculture Lyng to make certain that grain unable to make it into usual storage, even grain that is simply stored on the ground, remains eligible for price support loans. Farmers need these harvest loans, and we intend to see they get them, regardless of problems with storage that are beyond their control.

Turning now to farm costs, you'll remember that back when inflation and interest rates were running at historic highs, virtually every farming necessity cost more -- the seed the farmer planted, the fuel he put in his tractor, the tractor itself, and the loan he took out to pay for everything to begin with. Well, today farm costs are still too high. I know in particular that interest rates on farm loans are running several points above those on most other kinds of loans. But with taxes lower, the economy growing, and inflation below 2 percent, farm costs have started down. As a matter of fact, inflation for the last year has been 1.7, but in the last few months it's actually been lower than zero. Now, down is exactly where we're going to keep farm costs going. One of the measures that'll help most in this regard is our historic tax reform, now nearing final approval by the Congress. The Senate-approved reform is expected to lower or eliminate Federal income taxes for the majority of Americans. But just as significant, it should discourage those who make their money elsewhere from using agriculture as a tax dodge and driving farm costs up. It's time we gave farming back to farmers.

And this brings me to our efforts to expand your markets, perhaps the most important aspect of what we're doing to help move toward a farm economy of genuine profitability. The economic expansion we've created is contributing to the expansion of the world economy as a whole, increasing the world's ability to purchase American farm goods. We've worked with our trading partners to moderate the value of the dollar, and we're fighting protectionist legislation in Congress that would lead to retaliation, and usually that retaliation is directed against America's farmers. Yes, there is such a thing as unfair trade, but you don't fix it by inviting our trading partners to take a snipe at American agriculture. But perhaps our most dramatic initiative to expand farm exports involves the decision I made earlier this month.

August 1st, we announced that under the export enhancement program, we would enable the Soviet Union to complete its purchase of some 4 million metric tons of American grain at competitive prices. Now, for some, this has been difficult to understand. After all, the Soviets are our adversaries, and I've never been accused of being naive about that. The truth is, I didn't make this decision for them; I made it for the American farmer. If that grain isn't sold to the Soviets, most of it will be stockpiled, costing the taxpayers and depressing grain prices here at home. So, the grain will be sold at the same price the Soviets would pay to buy it from one of our foreign competitors.

Yes, times are still hard, but they've begun to get better. And maybe that's the most important message I have to give to you today, the message of hope. You know, back in those towns where I was a boy -- towns like Tampico and Dixon -- and, you know, because my father was always looking for a better job, I'd be honest with you if I added in there a brief time in Chicago, time in Galesburg, time in Monmouth, Illinois, back to Tampico, and then to Dixon. But in a lot of those towns you couldn't walk to the end of main street without glimpsing the farmland beyond, the pastures with their livestock, the fields planted with corn. No matter where you lived in towns like Tampico, you weren't far from plowed ground.

And think of all that's happened since. New breeds of livestock and strains of crops, new machinery and management techniques, per-acre production of virtually every farm crop you can think of is up. The farming spirit of neighbor helping neighbor remains strong, as Operation Haylift and the Illinois farmers who have participated in it make clear. And the kind of farm that holds a place of such esteem in our hearts and history -- the family farm -- remains strong. Times may be hard, but American farms -- family farms -- will pull through. They'll pull through because of growing markets -- in just the next 3 years, the number of people on Earth will grow more than enough to populate another America -- and because, my friends, American farmers are the most innovative, productive, hardworking, and efficient on Earth. And that's why I'm proud to be their President and to stand with them -- and with all of you today.

But it's great to be back home in Illinois. And it's great to be here with so many old friends: Governor Thompson; Lieutenant Governor George Ryan; State GOP chairman, Don Adams; and county GOP chairman, my longtime friend, Don Totten. And, of course the Illinois Republican delegation to the House of Representatives. I think they must be one of the finest groups of Representatives this country has ever had. And proof of it is that they're not here because there's some very important business going on in the House -- and they're all there, and I'm glad they are.

They do have one serious drawback, however: There simply aren't enough of them. I need more of the kind of support that they give me in the House. And we're going to do something about that this November, aren't we? And I know this sounds optimistic, but don't you think it's time that Minority Leader Bob Michel got a chance to try his hand at being majority leader -- Speaker of the House of Representatives? Speaking of support in Congress, I need a gutsy, determined fighter like Judy Koehler supporting me in the Senate. And while we're on the subject of guts, Cook County needs a tough, principled man like Jim O'Grady in the sheriff's office. He'll keep this city safe for law-abiding citizens and not so safe for those who don't abide by the law.

There was a time, and not so long ago, back in 1980, when the American people had to answer that question with a big, resounding ``No!'' The complete mismanagement of the party then in power had made an invalid of the once powerful giant of the American economy. After years of neglect, our proud military had fallen into disrepair and the mighty United States had become a whipping boy for penny-ante dictators and fanatics. A chorus of doom and gloom rose up from our opponents saying our best days were behind us and ringing down the curtain on America.

But you can be sure the American people never lost faith in our country. They knew that America's best days were ahead of her, that the future was bright. And all they had to do was to clear out those people in Washington who were making such a mess of things. As usual, the American people were right. We came in and cut taxes, squashed inflation, unburdened the economy of needless regulations, heralding one of the longest peacetime expansions in history. Today there are actually 30,000 pages less in the Federal regulations than there were those few years ago. We built up our military, and around the world we spoke out loudly and clearly for freedom.

America is once again strong and united. Our economy is a powerhouse of economic growth and job creation, and we've regained our rightful place as leader of the free world. Now, there's one change that makes me particularly proud: We have restored pride in the uniform of the military of the United States of America. Today's recruits -- and they're all volunteers -- are the most educated and some of the most highly motivated -- simply the finest young men and women who have ever served their country. Indeed, we have a higher percentage of high school graduates in the military than we have ever had in our entire history, even with our wartime drafts. If we ever have to send them in harm's way, I'm going to make sure they have the very best possible equipment that America can produce.

I've come here today to tell you that this election in 1986 will be a crucial moment of decision for our country. Will liberal policies return us to the days of malaise? Or will America continue down the road to progress? The answer to that question depends on one thing: electing Governors like Jim Thompson and Senators like Judy Koehler who'll work to build America strong and proud.

I don't have to tell you how important it is to have Jim Thompson of Illinois supporting our efforts to slim down the Federal bureaucracy and bring government back where it belongs: closer to the people. There are many people in Washington who have forgotten -- or who want to forget this nation is a federation of sovereign States, and that is our basic strength.

I don't have to tell you about Jim Thompson's qualifications. The people of Illinois have kept Jim Thompson Governor longer than any other in this State's history, and for a very good reason. Jim Thompson is a leader. When he came into office in 1977, he, too, confronted the wreckage of liberal Democratic policies, but he immediately cut overspending and scaled back on the size of government. He led the fight on another issue that's close to my heart -- tax reform, giving the hard-working people of this State a long, overdue break from the tax collector; and he completely wiped several other taxes off the books. He got the Illinois economy moving again, attracting new businesses and creating new jobs; and today more people are working in Illinois than ever before.

But there's only one President, and if he has to fight an obstructionist leadership in both Houses of Congress, it could dangerously stalemate our country. We can't let America be paralyzed by a hostile Congress. We have too much yet to accomplish, and that's why I need someone like Judy Koehler that I can count on in the Senate, because she's a fighter for Illinois, a fighter for America. Now, I know the pundits say that Judy is the underdog in this race, but I've never put too much stock in what the pundits say. I remember back in 1980 -- it was just about 6 months before the Republican Convention. They asked the Washington Press Club who they thought would be elected President that year. And all the candidates were listed except one, who received so few votes from the Press Club that his name didn't even appear in the papers. Well, I decided to hang around and give it a try anyway. [Laughter] So, Judy, from one underdog to another: Just hang around here and let's see what happens. Forget the pundits; it's the people who count. And I bet you when they see more of this feisty, principled lady in action, they're going to say: A woman Senator from Illinois is a very good idea.

Now, maybe you've noticed that I've been very careful to refer to the ``liberal leadership'' of the Democratic Party. That's because I believe the liberals who have taken control of the Democratic Party don't represent the vast majority of honest, hard-working Democrats. That reminds me of my brief career as the drum major in the Dixon YMCA Boys' Band. And during one Decoration Day parade, I was up there in the front leading the band, and I was supposed to follow the man on the white horse. But all of a sudden he turned and rode back down the parade, I guess to see that everything was coming along right, and I kept on leading the band. But then the music began to sound rather faint, and I took a look over my shoulder. The parade had turned a corner without me, and I was all by myself, walking right out of a musical career. So, I can sympathize with the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. There they are, still on that same old leftward course while the country has made a right turn.

And that's another reason why I'm glad to have this chance to be with Jim O'Grady again. I had Jim to the White House last winter, and I encouraged him to run. Jim's capable and effective -- a man who can bring integrity to government, someone our children can be proud of and look up to. And Jim is a symbol of a realignment that is going on in this country -- of people who feel they've been deserted by their party leaders, who can take party loyalty only so far and then just have to vote their true beliefs. When he was at the White House, Jim said to me, ``The great Democratic Party of my father's and grandfather's time just doesn't exist anymore. Mr.

I know how tough it can be to change parties. I was working for Republican candidates for some time before I changed my registration. But for anyone who's concerned about, and thinking about doing, that, I think Winston Churchill -- when he changed parties, was a member of Parliament in England. And he answered a question as to why. He said, ``Some men change principle for party, and some change party for principle.'' All I'm asking of the people of Illinois is to remember that the Governors, Representatives, and Senators you elect will determine the future of America. Will we push on down the road to pride, progress, and prosperity, or will we turn our backs on our destiny and retreat back into the failures of the past? I know which way the American people will choose. They're going forward with hope and faith in their hearts, forward to a future as big as our dreams.

I'm just going to close with one little statistic here. I know that statistics aren't the most entertaining of things to say, but right now, with a few people beginning to rumble a little and worry that maybe things are going to fall off the track here, would you be interested to know that today 61.2 percent of all the people, male and female, in the United States, 16 years of age or over are employed -- 1,650,000 more of them in the last 7 months; 201,000 just last month. I think that's a pretty good indication that we must be on the right track.

The President. As you know and have been told, I do have a short statement here. Before we begin, I thought I'd mention that one reason for our visit to Illinois, especially this morning at the State fair, was to bring a special message to America's farmers, one of concern and hope. Amid general prosperity that has brought record employment, rising incomes, and the lowest inflation in more than 20 years, some sectors of our farm economy are hurting, and their anguish is a concern to all Americans.

I think you all know that I've always felt the nine most terrifying words in the English language are: I'm from the Government, and I'm here to help. A great many of the current problems on the farm were caused by government-imposed embargoes and inflation, not to mention government's long history of conflicting and haphazard policies. Our ultimate goal, of course, is economic independence for agriculture, and through steps like the tax reform bill, we seek to return farming to real farmers. But until we make that transition, the Government must act compassionately and responsibly. In order to see farmers through these tough times, our administration has committed record amounts of assistance, spending more in this year alone than any previous administration spent during its entire tenure. No area of the budget, including defense, has grown as fast as our support for agriculture.

Earlier this month we announced our decisions on grain exports, and this morning we announced a drought assistance task force and, with regard to storage problems, the availability of price-support loans for all the grain in this year's crop.

The message in all this is very simple: America's farmers should know that our commitment to helping them is unshakable. And as long as I am in Washington, their concerns are going to be heard and acted upon.

One other brief point: Tomorrow the Senate will cast a crucial vote. The question is that of assistance to the freedom fighters who are trying to bring democracy to Nicaragua, where a Communist regime, a client State of the Soviet Union, has taken over. The question before the Senate is: Will it vote for democracy in Central America and the security of our own borders, or will it vote to passively sit by while the Soviets make permanent their military beachhead on the mainland of North America.

Thank you, Mr. President. Sir, Soviet and American negotiators just completed 2 days of top-level talks in Moscow. Did they narrow any differences on arms control, perhaps paving the way for a summit later this year? And how did the Soviets react to your offer to delay the deployment of a Strategic Defense Initiative in return for an agreement to deploy it later?

The President. Well, that isn't exactly what we've proposed to the Soviet Union about delaying our Strategic Defense Initiative. And I'm not going to discuss what was in my letter, and no one who has been guessing at it has guessed right yet. But the General Secretary did not reveal his letter to me, and I'm not going to reveal mine to him. But we don't have an answer or a reply yet from our negotiators over there, and I'm waiting for their report to see where we stand. But we have no word as yet.

Mr. President, your recent speech on South Africa met with what one account called ``a bipartisan chorus of boos on Capitol Hill.'' It neither silenced your critics nor satisfied members of your own party who are pressing for a more forceful U.S. approach to that problem. At this point, are you willing to ignore those calls for firmer U.S. action and possibly see Congress seize the initiative in setting policy toward South Africa?

The President. Well, I don't think that it's a case of whether it's firm action or not. I think the simple case is that punitive sanctions that would affect the economy there would not only be disruptive to surrounding states that are virtually linked to South Africa's economy but would also be very punitive to the people that we want to help. And whether the Members of the Congress were ready to accept what I said in that speech -- I can tell you that in communication with some of the most prominent of the black leaders, individuals who are leaders of groups of several million, 4\1/2\ million in one religious group, and are all solidly opposed to the sanctions. And the one group that is in support of them in South Africa is a group that very definitely has been the most radical and wants the disruption that would come from massive unemployment and hunger and desperation of the people; because it is their belief that they could then rise out of all of that disruption and seize control.

And this has been transmitted to me personally by some of these other leaders, like Buthelezi of the largest tribal group in all of South Africa, the Zulus. And there are others. There are religious leaders. Another one, another Bishop -- you never hear of him -- I don't know whether I pronounce his name right, but it's, I think, Moreno or Marnarama.

And all of them are deathly opposed to sanctions. So, I just think that up on the Hill there, well-intentioned though they may be, they're asking for something that would not be helpful. On the other hand, I think there are evidences that maybe ourselves and some of our allies could be invited to meet with their government representatives and see if we couldn't bring about some coming together of these responsible leaders of the black community.

Well, if I could follow it up, sir: If you're unwilling at this point to define what a reasonable timetable is for the abolition of apartheid, does the situation, in fact, reach a point at some stage where the United States is pushed to go beyond friendly persuasion to prod the South Africans for change?

The President. Well, I think that's something that you face if and when that time comes. Yes, we're impatient. And, yes, we feel as strongly about apartheid as anyone does, and it should be done away with. On the other hand, President Botha himself has said the same thing, and that his goal is to eliminate apartheid.

I'm Hugh Hill, from WLS - TV in Chicago. You came here today on behalf of Republican candidates. And 2 years ago you had a landslide victory in Illinois, and yet the man you campaigned with over and over, Senator Percy, lost. And I'd like to ask you this: What value do you place on a Presidential trip, particularly in an off year, with the exception of drawing crowds to these fundraisers?

The President. Well, I don't know. If there is a dissatisfaction with some candidate, I don't think that someone else's coattails can do that individual any good. But there is another facet you haven't even mentioned. May sound crass, but you can also help them raise the funds they need for campaigning. And so far, I've been rather successful in that area.

Mr. President, you've said that you would support voluntary drug testing in the workplace and, perhaps, mandatory drug testing for those with sensitive government jobs. I'd like to ask, sir, how any form of drug testing, voluntary or not, which is subject to peer pressure can be truly voluntary? And also, what that does to our constitutional rights of not to incriminate ourselves and the presumption against self-incrimination and the constitutional guarantee and the presumption of innocence?

The President. Well, I think I made it plain on one count: They won't be incriminating themselves. Because what I have said is that in voluntary testing these individuals that might turn up and that are found to be drug addicts -- I would say that there should be no threat of losing their job or of any punishment. There should be an offer of help, that we would stand by ready to help them take the treatment that would free them from this habit. So, it's not a case of saying that we're now going to find a way to, as you say, have people incriminate themselves so that they can be fired or anything else.

I just have to believe that the time has come, as it did once around the turn of the century in this country, and again, cocaine was the villain. We had a great drug epidemic around the turn of the century, and it really was eliminated simply by the ranks of the people -- suddenly said, ``Enough already.'' And then, whether it was peer pressure, whether it was friend helping friend or whatever, that disappeared for a very long time. Well, now we have the thing back again. We have done all -- and are doing -- and are going to continue to do all that we can to intercept the drugs. And you might be interested to know that since we've been here we have increased by 10 times over the seizure of narcotics with our drug enforcement.

Mr. President, at least once a week the mayor of Chicago, Harold Washington, says that your tax and fiscal policies are destroying cities like Chicago. And he points out that, despite having laid off several thousand employees over the past few years, the city is still projecting a $65 million budget gap for next year, and he blames that on your policies. He says it could force the layoff of essential service employees, like police and fire, or a tax increase. Is he correct?

The President. No, as a matter of fact, several hundred million dollars come here in grants, and a good share of that -- at least half, if not more -- is for rapid transit. And we have tried, as a matter of fact, in a number of the helpful grants and so forth that the Federal Government has been giving to States and local communities. Speaking from experience as a Governor, I can tell you that in many of those instances the administrative overhead of the so-called compassionate programs that were to help the needy amounted to more than the money that was actually reaching the needy, in some instances costing $2 to deliver $1 to a needy person.

Now, what we've tried to do is take the redtape off these grants, to put them together, and to allow the local communities more power to determine how the money will be used. I found as a Governor that many times I had to look at a program, and I had to follow the Federal rules and regulations for the administering of the program. And this made for great waste and fraud, well, I call it waste fraud. And if we had been allowed to do what we felt was best for our people and our State, we could have managed the program at far less cost. So, since I've been in Washington, we have tried to put things together in block grants, take off the restrictions, and allow them to use it to the best of their ability.

My name, by the way, is Mike Flannery with Channel 2 News here in Chicago. The mayor says that the net result of your programs have been large tax increases in Chicago. And from where he sits, he says it looks like your tax breaks at the Federal level amount to a shell game, forcing larger corresponding tax increases at the local level. Do you think that's a fair assessment?

The President. No, it isn't a fair assessment. Because in some instances what we set out to do did involve local and State governments with regard to taxes, in the sense that the Federal Government had so usurped the tax sources that local and State governments -- there wasn't anything left where they could turn to without disruption of their economies and certainly distress to their people.

So, we thought that if we could reduce that Federal burden that this would then open areas to where a local government or a State government that had a need for additional revenues could take those revenues. The Federal Government had simply monopolized and grabbed off all the resources, and then the Federal Government turned and said: Oh, you poor people back there, you haven't got the money to do things. You'll have to take our programs. We'll do them for you.

Mr. President, after you announced your decision to subsidize grain sales to the Soviet Union, Secretary of State Shultz was extremely critical. And I'd like you to reply to his criticism. He said the Soviet Union must be chortling at having sales to them subsidized and scratching their heads about a system that says we're going to fix it up so that American taxpayers make it possible for Soviet housewives to buy American-produced food at a price lower than an American housewife. Now, that's Secretary Shultz; what do you have to say about that?

The President. Well, you fellows all caught Secretary Shultz -- he'd been away, and you caught him before he'd had a chance to talk to us and find out what it was we really had done. Now, we're not out as a matter of policy to continue subsidizing the Soviet Union. The Soviet Union has a long-term grain agreement with us, and it calls for a purchase of four metric tons of grain this year. They have not yet bought that.

This measure that I employed was in the bill that the Congress passed. And what we did was say for this one crop, and for this one season, that we would offer this subsidy to the farmers. We didn't do it for the Soviet Union. We did it for our farmers, who are, as you know -- and we hope temporarily -- but in a real bind, a very severe one. This amounted to a subsidy for them, but allowed the Soviet Union to buy that 4 million.

The President. No, we're trying to help in a situation that I believe was originally created by the Federal Government, when the Federal Government, back in the days of the Depression, started invading the farm community. And with all its various programs, it has brought on most of the problems that bother the farmers today.

Mr. President, Bruce DuMont from WTTW Television in Chicago. Yesterday you offered strong words of encouragement to those who would like to see the Berlin Wall torn down. I am wondering if at some point in the future you might be willing to go beyond rhetoric and perhaps put it on a future agenda for negotiation with the Soviet Union?

The President. Oh, I would have no hesitation, whatsoever, in a summit meeting to discuss this with the General Secretary. I think it's a wall that never should have been built. And I happen to believe that at the time that they started to put it up -- and they started with wire, barbed wire, instead of a wall -- that if the United States had taken the action it should have -- because that was a total violation of the Four Powers agreement for Berlin -- that if we'd gone in there and knocked down that wire then, I don't think there'd be a wall today. Because I don't think they wanted to start a war over that.

The President. Oh, I don't think anyone is intending to do anything of that kind. But we know that they've done a kind of a lucrative business in letting people come through that wall, if the price was right, and rejoin their families and friends in West Germany. And isn't it strange that all of these situations where other people build walls to keep an enemy out, and there's only one part of the world and one philosophy where they have to build walls to keep their people in. Maybe they're going to recognize that there is something wrong with that soon.

One of the blacks who very much is in favor of sanctions and is very critical of your policy is Desmond Tutu, who is a bishop of the church and the Nobel Peace Prize winner. Are you saying that he's one of those radical blacks who wants upheaval?

Of course there are individuals that may be all over, individuals that think that's the thing to do, that there's no other answer now except just punish, never mind trying to find a solution to the problem. And so, I agree that was careless of me. No, I was not linking him in with the particular group that I had in mind.

If I might follow up, sir: You also, in your first answer, talked about a possible meeting -- Western governments invited to talk to the South African Government and to blacks. Could you tell us a little bit more about where that stands? And also where does it stand now, the question of your appointing an Ambassador to South Africa and also the possibility of a special envoy?

The President. Well, we have made no decision yet on the Ambassador, nor have we made up our minds whether we want to send an envoy or not. But at the risk of violating something that I said, or I thought that I wouldn't do, I am going to say one thing about Mr. Botha's speech today. Now, I'm not going to comment generally or take questions on that because I haven't heard it, and I'm not going to comment until I hear the whole thing. But I did, thanks to the media, hear at least one line of his. And this line -- he spoke of the idea of having the leaders of West Germany, France, United Kingdom, and the United States to some meetings.

Well, this is what we ourselves have been talking about, and among ourselves, these same leaders -- is if we could be of help. This is a sovereign nation. You can't go in and dictate to them and tell them how they must run their country.

But if we could be of help in bringing together various groupings there to discuss with the Government as to how something could be planned to bring along an end to apartheid earlier, this we would be pleased to do.

Well, now, as I say, I can't comment because I haven't heard or read, and I will get his transcript and read his speech. But he did -- and that was quoted on the air -- he did say that he was thinking of such a meeting.

Thank you, Mr. President. When you spoke earlier of that one group that you said wants disorder and is radical -- just to clear up the point -- you seemed to be referring to the African National Congress, the very group that Secretary of State Shultz says should be negotiated with, that the Commonwealths feel should be part of the solution. Now, are you saying that they should not be among the groups that ought to be included in some sort of dialog, even though they seem to be very representative of a large number of people in South Africa?

National Congress started out some years ago, and there was no question about its being a solid organization. But in 1921, in South Africa, the Communist Party was formed. And some years later the Communist Party of South Africa joined with, and just moved into, the African National Congress. And it is that element; I don't say the entire ANC, no. And George Shultz has talked with them. We know that there are still sound people. We've had enough experience in our own country with so-called Communist fronts to know that you can have an organization with some well meaning and fine people, but you have an element in there that has its own agenda. And this is what's happened with the ANC. And right now, the ANC in exile, the ones we're hearing from, that are making the statements, are the members of that African Communist Party. So, no, if you could do business with and separate out and get the solid citizens in the ANC to come forward on their own, that's just fine.

The frontline states, the neighboring states, have said that they, even though hurt by sanctions, would welcome it if it came from Western countries. Yet President Botha has imposed sanctions upon them.

You've not criticized him for that, you personally, and at the same time this country has imposed sanctions on Nicaragua and Poland. Are you saying that what those regimes do to their people is worse than what the South African regime has done to the residents of that country?

Poland, if you would check the sanctions that we finally felt had to be applied there, we applied sanctions that we were sure -- and we sought Polish advice on this -- that would not harm the citizens of Poland, that there would be restrictions on the Government that was at that time denying Lech Walesa and the union and so forth, the Solidarity movement, its rights. With regard to Nicaragua, there is no comparison between South Africa and Nicaragua. In South Africa you're talking about a country -- yes, we disagree and find repugnant some of the practices of their government, but they're not seeking to impose their government on other surrounding countries. Nicaragua is a totalitarian, Communist State. It is a sort of a vassal of the Soviet Union.

And it has made plain in utterance after utterance, even since the Somoza revolution, that their revolution is not going to be confined to their borders, that they intend to spread that revolution throughout Latin America.

So, what we're talking about is helping the people of Nicaragua. Just recently, the last newspaper, La Prensa, was silenced; two religious leaders were ejected from the country for criticizing some facets of the government. And we simply feel that the revolution against Somoza, which declared in writing to the Organization of American States what their goals were: a pluralistic society, a democracy, free speech, freedom of press, free labor unions, and all of this -- they pledged was what they were trying to achieve. Then one element in the revolution threw out the others that had fought beside them, and who largely make up the contras, took over, seized power at the point of a gun. And we simply believe that the people of Nicaragua have got a right to try for their original goals.

Mr. President, thank you. Chuck Goudie from WLS in Chicago. After Reverend Lawrence Martin Jenco was released by his captors in Beirut a few weeks ago, he met with you and said he delivered a message from his captors. What was in that message, specifically, and how have you been using that to obtain the release of the other Americans held in Lebanon?

The President. Well, contrary to what the tone of some people is, we've been trying relentlessly to get those hostages back from the first day of their captivity. First, we had to try and find out where they were. We still don't really know that. They're moved frequently. And we're going to keep on trying. We have had some broken hearts.

Many times that we thought we were on the track and that we were almost going to be able to set a day when they would be free, and then it would disappear into the sand and we'd have to start on another path. We're going to continue until we get them back.

But he did bring some oral messages -- well, I say messages because I didn't hear the one that was for the Pope -- but he did to us. And I feel that it was told to me in confidence, and I have a feeling that if I should go public with some of the things in that I might do harm to our efforts to try and get them back.

And then, as I say, it disappeared, and we had to find another track and start over. And we've known encouragement and discouragement. And I can't comment. We must get them back, and we're going to keep on doing everything we can and trying to get them back. But I don't want to say anything that will endanger them.

Mr. President, the comparison you discussed before between Nicaragua and South Africa seems to agitate many of your critics who note the eloquence with which you address the issue of freedom fighting in Nicaragua but seem to lose that eloquence in South Africa. Do you honestly believe that the South African Government treats its black majority worse than the Sandinista regime, Marxist though it may be, treats Nicaraguan citizens inside Nicaragua, keeping in mind the number of black South Africans who have died over the past year alone, the amount of the cross-border incursions the South African Government has conducted against the neighboring states, et cetera, et al?

The President. I think that I have condemned publicly all of those things that you're talking about. On the other hand, I also realize the complexity of the South Africa problem, because much of that death that you spoke of is being inflicted by blacks on blacks because of their own tribal separations. And all of this must be taken into account in finding a system of government. But also I am quoting now one of those black leaders who wrote a most statesmanlike and eloquent letter to me just recently, and he pointed out that while, yes, they were impatient, and, yes, we hope that we can make progress faster, he pointed out he did not disapprove of Botha. He pointed out what he has accomplished and the things that he has done. And he also made a point about what would happen if those in our country who want us to have the American companies that are over there doing business withdraw.

And he pointed out that those companies -- some 200 of them -- following the Sullivan principles, in which there is the kind of treatment that we would recognize as being decent in this country with regard to their employees and outside the actual employment, the things they've tried to do to improve life for the families on the outside, that this would all be lost if some people had their way with sanctions and so forth and with forcing us to withdraw. But then he also pointed out that because of the Sullivan principles that were used by these American companies a great many South African companies had taken the cue from that and adopted on their own principles that were similar to that -- having to do with promotion, having to do with hiring, having to do with ignoring racial difference with regard to promotion to supervisory positions and all.

Now, this is all going on. Well, nothing like that is going on in Nicaragua, not when a priest stands up and speaks to his congregation and because he says some things that -- well, for example, protesting the fact that the Government has shut down on the church's newspaper and shut down on the church's radio station, seized their printing presses so that they can't even have church bulletins anymore -- and then he's thrown out of the country for having said that. That's a little different than what was going on in South Africa.

Ambassador to South Africa seemed, for one reason or another, to have fallen by the wayside. Are you having difficulty in finding a black Ambassador to South Africa because you can find no qualified black who agrees with your policy now?

The President. No, has nothing to do with that. And the one that fell by the wayside -- let me tell you that I regret that more than anything. I have the greatest respect and admiration for that man. And what happened was some possible connection with a legal action involving some institutions -- he's in a public relations field at this moment -- and that he, for one thing, he very probably would not be able to leave and have the time to go there as this comes to a head.

Mr. President, Ron Magers of Channel 5 from Chicago. About 3 years ago, at an editors' lunch at the White House, you said that you thought a great deal of the problem with homeless people in America was mental health patients who had fallen through the cracks.

The President. Well, what has happened, as you know, under the guise of civil rights, there were rulings that people who did not represent a threat of violence to themselves or anyone else could not be committed to an institution. And, thus, a great many people were turned loose from institutions who did have mental problems, whether it was retardation or whatever, and there was no place for them at the local level and, in many instances, either no family or no family that wanted them. And there they are in the streets. And they present a problem, also, in the sense that in many instances, having walked away from an institution, they turn away from many efforts that help, because they feel that it might get them back -- institutionalized.

I don't know what percentage of all of the people that are out there fall into that particular situation, but I do know that -- from my experience as Governor -- that we tried at the State level to subsidize local treatment centers, where they could live at home and be -- with the development now of new drugs and so forth, drugs in the good sense -- that they could be outpatients. And this was coming along, although in some instances counties, just even with the State subsidy, would not take this up. But this is a problem in which, unless they represent a threat to someone else -- to put them in an institution where they would receive the best of care and certainly have fine quarters and be fed and all.

To follow up on that, let me share with you a letter I received today from a family that does have someone in the family who is mentally ill and what they say about it. They say first they suffered through emptying and closing of hospitals. They say, then, the dumping of their relatives onto the streets.

The President. Well, I would look into all the charges they've made there to find out if all of these things are true and whether the financial things that they mention there are the reason for those cases. I would think that Governor Thompson would like to see that letter very much.

The President. No, I can't really take any after -- it is traditional that when the man in the aisle tells me the time is up I can't take any more. No, I'd be breaking all the rules here, and then I'd never be able to live with that side of the aisle when I got them back in Washington.

Ballroom at the Hyatt Regency Hotel in Chicago, IL. It was broadcast live on nationwide radio and television. Members of the White House press corps and members of the Chicago-area press, seated in separate groups on either side of the aisle, participated in the news conference.

We recognize the growth and the proven effectiveness of local crime watch organizations throughout the country. They have played a major role in turning the tide against crime. People working together with their local law enforcement agencies have always been the best deterrent to crime.

Americans should be aware of the significance of community crime prevention programs and the ways in which they can reduce crime in our towns and neighborhoods. This Administration has made crime prevention a top priority. We support efforts to repeat the highly visible ``National Night Out'' as a way of calling attention to the need for citizen-based crime prevention programs.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Overnight a wall was thrown up around the western sectors of Berlin by East Germany in collusion with the Soviet Union. As thousands of persons desperately sought to flee, fences of barbed wire and armed men blocked the exits and turned them back. Often the soldiers, themselves, threw down their weapons and vaulted over the first crude barriers, choosing freedom in the West at the risk of their lives.

The horror of the wall can easily overwhelm us. But this anniversary reminds us, too, of the Berliners who, in resisting tyranny, proved and still prove their courage and their passion for freedom. They have made Berlin a thriving metropolis, a showcase of liberty which will invite the world to join in its 750th anniversary next year. The United States is proud to fulfill, with its British and French allies, its solemn commitment to the Berliners and to their great city. Western strength and cohesion protected Berlin in the past; they are the only basis on which future improvements are possible.

One day it -- and all those like it -- will come down. As long as the wall stands, it can never be porous enough for free men and women in the West, and freedom-loving men and women in the East, to tolerate it. Freedom, not repression, is the way of the future. Dividing Europe, defying the will of its people, has brought tension, not tranquillity. True security for all requires that Europeans be able to choose their own destiny freely and to share their common heritage.

But our conviction must be more than a distant hope; it must be a goal toward which we actively work. Let us rededicate ourselves to new efforts to lower the barriers dividing Berlin. Before another anniversary has passed, I hope that this problem can be the subject of renewed thought and serious discussion between East and West.

Castelo was arraigned in Richmond on Friday, August 8, after voluntarily surrendering and entering a plea of not guilty. She was released by the court on personal bond. And she waived her preliminary hearing in U.S. District Court in Richmond, Tuesday, August 12.

Two Paraguayan nationals were also charged. Although Mrs. Castelo's duties did not involve any responsibility for classified information, as a precautionary measure, she was debriefed by the U.S. Secret Service to ensure that her activities did not entail any breach of national security. The Secret Service has concluded that there was no evidence of a breach of security.

Castelo, who was born in Paraguay and became a naturalized citizen in 1967, has served on the Residence staff since 1981. She is married to Manuel Castelo, a naturalized Portuguese, and prior to coming to the White House, was employed as a part-time housekeeper at Blair House from 1968 to 1981. While on administrative leave, Mrs. Castelo will receive pay and full benefits pending the resolution of this matter. Since these charges are the subject of further legal action in the courts, we will have no further comment.

Reagan. President De la Madrid and I have just completed one of our most constructive and, I think, fruitful meetings. It was the fifth in a series which began in 1982 and demonstrated again that U.S.-Mexican relations are based on respect, understanding, open and frank discussion, and mutually beneficial cooperation.

The decline of oil prices and the burden of a debt incurred in past years have hit Mexico hard. President De la Madrid's administration and the people of Mexico are making a courageous, determined effort to face up to their nation's fundamental economic problems and turn a difficult situation around. In our meeting today I emphasized to President De la Madrid that the people and Government of the United States are ready to lend a hand when and where it can make a difference. The United States, for example, strongly endorses Mexico's recent agreements with the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank. We hope arrangements made with Mexico's private creditors move quickly so that Mexico can reignite economic growth, evolve toward a more efficient market-oriented system, continue to meet its debt obligations, and meet the economic needs of the Mexican people.

I expressed to President De la Madrid today, the United States is prepared to do its part with commercial and agricultural credits; support for international financial institution programs in Mexico; and by maintaining our markets open to Mexican products, products Mexico must export if it is to prosper and meet its international financial obligations. Mexico's entry into the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade is also viewed here as a major step forward.

Symbolic of our strengthening bonds, I am pleased to announce that the United States is lifting today our 6-year-old embargo on the importation of tuna from Mexico. Former Ambassador John Gavin, I should point out, was instrumental in achieving this breakthrough. And we're looking for further progress in our discussions on fisheries issues. One area of solid agreement was our recognition of the necessity of maintaining our countries' strong campaign against drugs. We pledged to bolster our eradication programs and our efforts to bring to justice vicious drug traffickers, who have been such a corrupting influence in both our countries. We also pledged to do all possible to attack the demand side of this evil by aggressively discouraging the consumption of narcotic drugs.

We can be proud of the broad range of cooperation developing between our countries, including border environmental policy, improved civil aviation arrangements, new bridges and border crossings, and our strong energy relations. We plan to strengthen our binational consultations at the Cabinet level to better meet the challenges and take advantage of opportunities for our two nations in the coming years.

What we have accomplished today builds upon the successes of the past and will benefit both our peoples. It was a pleasure to see my friend, President De la Madrid, again. As a good friend and neighbor, we wish you a safe journey home. Hasta luego and nos vemos.

President De la Madrid. Ladies and gentlemen, in the first place, I wish to express my appreciation to President of the United States Ronald Reagan for his cordial invitation to hold this meeting in Washington. It has been a timely and fruitful meeting. It has been a fruitful meeting because it has been positive results in allowing us to deal frankly and in depth with various problems that both Presidents consider to be of prime importance for the proper development of relations between the United States and Mexico.

Reagan and I agreed to give priority attention to the topics included in the bilateral agenda. We are pleased to acknowledge that this year there have been positive developments and agreements in dealing with various economic matters and in border cooperation. We agreed that it is necessary and just to emphasize such progress. We have agreed that the Governments, beginning today, should make an extraordinary effort to strengthen and improve our relations. This is a necessary element in order to broaden and intensify the cooperation between the two peoples. It is with satisfaction that I have today confirmed the firm determination of President Reagan to give renewed impetus to the development of positive relations between the United States and Mexico. In this spirit, we have exchanged views on various issues of great interest to the two Governments and to both countries in general. Allow me to point out some of them briefly.

The recent negotiations on the part of the Mexican Government with the international financial institutions, particularly the International Monetary Fund, have successfully opened the way to new and more realistic and flexible formulas for dealing with the problem of the foreign debt. I recognize that the Government of the United States, in playing a very constructive role, did a very fine thing, and this we greatly appreciate. It is our purpose that Mexico should attain a sufficient and sustained growth as a basis in order to restructure and renew its economy; in order to maintain the social progress that has been the basis for the long stability of our country; and in order to extend its capacity to comply with its international commitments.

The problem of the foreign debt is related with more finances in order to improve the conditions that will make it possible for us to comply with our foreign debt. Mexico seeks to create greater exportations in areas in which it has comparative advantages. Exports that are not oil problems, commercial links that will recognize the varying degrees of developments of both economies and that do not offer decrimination or absolute reciprocity, can be a good basis for the increase of our trade. Both Presidents have given instructions to their associates in order to undertake a broadened trade agreement on trade and on other subjects, and we have given definite instructions to our negotiators on both sides.

Reagan and I also had the opportunity to exchange points of view on the problems of the undocumented workers in the United States. This is a problem that has to do with the structures of both economies. And there is no doubt that as the Mexican economy improves, the migrant flows will tend to decline.

I would also like to refer to a subject that President Reagan and I dealt with as a very important part of our conversations. And I am referring now to the war against drug trafficking. The Government of Mexico maintains that international cooperation is absolutely necessary in order to efficiently face drug trafficking. We agreed that it's necessary to simultaneously attack all the links of the chains; that is, production, distribution, and consumption. I have said to President Reagan that we believe that the campaign that, under his leadership, has been established in the United States is very important to combat the consumption and the distribution of drugs. We shall continue to strengthen the cooperation between both governments in order to combat this cancer of modern society. I believe, ladies and gentlemen, as has been said by President Reagan, this conversation has been particularly satisfactory. It is an additional proof of the firm and loyal friendship that unites our two peoples.

We have a great deal to benefit from a dignified, cordial relationship of mutually good for both. I thank President Reagan and the members of his party for the very warm hospitality that they have extended to us. And, once again, I would like to state the recognition of the Government and the people of Mexico for the assistance that was given to us by the United States during the earthquakes in the month of September, particularly the very warm friendship of Nancy Reagan who went to be with us during those painful times.

Today the Senate made an historic vote in favor of democracy. The Senate has given bipartisan approval to $100 million for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua and $300 million for the economic development of Honduras, El Salvador, Costa Rica, and Guatemala. The Senate's wise decision will be greeted with joy by democrats throughout Central America.

The peasants, students, Miskito Indians, and former Sandinista soldiers who make up the Nicaraguan democratic resistance forces will be deeply grateful for the Senate's confidence in their struggle for democratic rule. The leaders of Central America's democratic governments will appreciate the Senate's support for their efforts to develop strong economies and fair societies.

The Senate's vote today further demonstrates that we have developed a truly bipartisan policy on Central America. Both the House and the Senate have now endorsed a policy which supports the goals recommended by the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America: democracy, economic well-being, defense against Communist aggression, and pursuit of verifiable and comprehensive diplomatic solutions. I hope the House and Senate conferees will meet quickly on this important legislation and resolve their differences. The Nicaraguan resistance forces urgently need this assistance. Their spirits have been raised, but they still anxiously await our concrete support.

House is fashioning a defense authorization bill that threatens to reduce our national security and undercut the delicate and sensitive arms control negotiations now underway. It could jeopardize the President's efforts to seek a real solution to arms control. The House bill authorizes an amount for defense that is significantly below the Senate's amount and $34 billion below the amount the President originally requested. The bill contains some particularly unhelpful features. It would, first, not allow us to produce the new chemical weapons that are safer and, at the same time, would prevent us from removing the older, less reliable chemical weapons from Europe. We get the worst of both worlds in this type of legislation, which is clearly catch-22 legislation.

We're concerned that a number of other provisions in the bill are designed to affect U.S. foreign policy rather than to enable our defense forces to underwrite national security. This bill is an improper vehicle to legislate foreign policy. The bill's purpose should be to add to our security. The bill would continue a ban on effective testing of our antisatellite weapons system, thus denying the American people an assured defense capability that the Soviets already have. It would ban nuclear testing for a year, a ban that we have repeatedly rejected, that would leave our military forces with weapons whose safety and reliability could not be ascertained. Further, the bill attempts to force us to comply with the SALT II agreement -- which the Soviets violate -- and the bill cuts deeply into our research and development funds for SDI.

House action has the effect of tying the President's hands when we should be strengthening his hand for negotiations with the Soviet Union. It affects the prospects for real reductions in nuclear weapons and ignores the fact that the Soviet Union only began to talk seriously when the United States clearly indicated its determination to remain strong. It gives the Soviets many things they want without the necessity of negotiation. I am confident that the President's advisers would unanimously recommend the President veto the bill if it comes to him in the form that the House legislation is taking.

The President. Well, thank you all for coming. I'm not going to make a speech tonight, you'll be glad to hear. But I know that we all enjoy these bipartisan, festive events and maybe hope that a little of their spirit will be carried back to our work. After all, we're in this town because we love this country and we want to make it better. But I'd like to say, especially to the spouses and the children who are here tonight, a heartfelt thanks; because I know that you've sacrificed so much -- maybe even more in leaving your homes and coming to Washington -- than do the rest of us.

I think we've all been richly entertained here tonight by these wonderful people who so generously come and spread their talent among us. And, again, thank you all for being here. And, again, a heartfelt thanks to all of you.

In recent years other nations, especially Japan, have challenged America's lead in high-technology industries such as computers, semiconductors, fiber optics, and robotics. Part of Japan's success can be attributed to an active, coordinated effort at a national level to collect, translate, and apply foreign scientific and technical information.

This law will build upon ongoing efforts within the Department of Commerce, which has for some time been providing information and related services through its National Bureau of Standards, International Trade Administration, National Technical Information Service, and Patent and Trademark Office in support of the efforts of American business to compete abroad.

The requirement under Section 1003 involves: ``limited exchanges of data and scientific personnel,'' in general, and ``joint technological effort in the area of seismic monitoring,'' in particular. Upon review of a number of possible scientific disciplines, it was concluded that in terms of this study, nuclear testing issues appear to offer the most promising avenues for such ``scientific'' cooperation and data exchange. Therefore, the attached study focuses its examination on matters relating to the verification of limitations in nuclear testing.

While the attached study focuses on nuclear testing limitations, it should be noted that in other arms control areas as well, the Administration believes that exchanges of information would, in addition to various monitoring provisions including types of on-site inspections, play an important role in establishing a verification framework.

START and INF, for example, areas of possible exchange of information might include the declaration of missile and launcher facilities, the numbers of missiles and launchers at such facilities, and information on the destruction of missiles and launchers that are in excess of agreed treaty limits. In the negotiations on Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions (MBFR), we have asked for an exchange of information, to be updated annually, on the structure of forces subject to MBFR limitations. At the Stockholm Conference on Confidence- and Security-Building Measures in Europe (CDE), we believe it important to have an exchange of information both on overall force structures and on specific forces participating in military activities. In chemical weapons arms control, we believe it important, among other things, to have a preliminary bilateral exchange of data on chemical weapons stockpiles and on production facilities as a confidence-building measure prior to the entry into force of a convention banning such weapons.

The prospects for progress in arms control may be significantly enhanced if a regime of cooperation between the United States and the Soviet Union in the development of verification capabilities consistent with national security restrictions can be established. The attached interagency study describes some possible avenues of cooperation that could produce benefits in the near term in the nuclear testing limitations area.

As indicated in the attached study, the United States has long sought a meeting with the Soviets to present our concerns about the verification provisions of the Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET). The United States and the Soviet Union recently agreed to have experts meet to discuss issues related to nuclear testing.

This meeting of experts, which took place in Geneva July 25 - August 1, allowed the United States to present its ideas and concerns to the Soviet Union and to hear Soviet views. At the meeting, the United States presented its views of verification improvements in existing agreements, which we believe are needed and achievable at this time. A follow-on meeting of U.S. and Soviet experts is scheduled for September. We hope the Soviet Union will join in a constructive dialogue.

Representatives of the Governments of Korea and the United States held a series of consultations from November 1985 through May 1986 concerning access to the Korean insurance market. As a result of these consultations, we reached an agreement regarding actions that Korea will take to improve our firms' access to its insurance market. Korea has agreed to license qualified U.S. insurance firms to underwrite both life and non-life insurance in Korea. Furthermore, Korean insurance authorities will review all applications in a timely manner and provide written notice of their decisions on the qualifications of U.S. firms. A consultative mechanism will ensure discussion of matters relating to implementation of this agreement and other issues related to the Korean insurance market. This agreement accomplishes our goal of obtaining increased access for U.S. firms to Korea's insurance market.

The sustained, cooperative efforts of both our Governments and the successful outcome of these efforts demonstrate how we can work together constructively to achieve a more open world trading system. Therefore, pursuant to Section 301 of the Trade Act, I have determined to accept the agreement described below as an appropriate and feasible action to resolve this investigation and therefore to terminate the investigation. I direct the United States Trade Representative (USTR) to notify the Government of Korea of my approval of the agreement and to take any actions necessary to implement and monitor it.

November 4, 1985, in response to my request, the USTR initiated an investigation into the adequacy of Korean laws governing the protection of intellectual property rights. Korean laws deny patent protection for pharmaceutical and agricultural chemical products and do not provide copyright protection for computer software and audio recordings.

Under Korean trademark law, Korean firms have been permitted to register trademarks similar or even identical to foreign trademarks that are not ``well known'' in Korea. Moreover, there has been a lack of effective enforcement of existing laws pertaining to copyright protection for literary works. Pursuant to Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended, I have determined that the prior policy of Korea of denying effective protection to intellectual property rights was unreasonable and a burden or restriction on U.S. commerce.

Korea and the United States have also agreed to establish a consultative mechanism to discuss matters relating to implementation of this agreement and other issues related to protection of intellectual property.

This agreement represents a major achievement in our efforts to obtain effective intellectual property protection for American industries. Thus, this agreement will encourage freer trade with the Republic of Korea and remove trade distortions.

I would like to ask you, sir, to what would you attribute the late interest which has been expressed by Members of the Senate as well as high officials of your government regarding the fact of Mexico's Government?

The President. Well, maybe it has come about because of some of the things -- such as the closer relationship now with regard to drugs and so forth. But it was something that I had determined we needed before I became President -- that here we are, three neighbors here in North America -- Canada, the United States, and Mexico -- from north to south, and that I just thought that there should be a closer relationship between these three. And so, President De la Madrid and I have met every year. In fact, our first meeting was when he was just the President-elect, before he had even taken office. And we have kept that relationship going, and I think it is closer and better. And I know right now, on the problem of drugs that concerns us both, the Attorney General of Mexico and our Attorney General are working very closely together.

The President. Well, again, as I say, we keep in touch, and you know I've always believed that you only get in trouble when you're talking about each other instead of to each other. And we discussed a number of things: our concerns in Central America with regard to the Nicaragua situation; again, the drug policy, and strengthened again our resolve to work together resolving that; and also the economic problems that are besetting Mexico and how we could possibly cooperate and work and help them through this particular period.

You are still wanting to push against Managua because it is a dictatorship and -- in respect with this $100 million [pending legislation to provide assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance] -- to reach what?

The President. Well, since we have met nine times with the leaders of the Sandinista government in an attempt to get them to agree to sit down and negotiate with the others who are in the revolution against Somoza and who are now the freedom fighters, because the Sandinistas seized power and violated the pledge that they had all made to the Organization of American States, a pledge that their goal, a revolutionary goal, was democracy, free speech, freedom of press, free labor unions -- all of the things associated with democracy. When the Sandinistas took over, they ousted their former allies, and they named it a totalitarian government.

And what our attempt has always been in these nine meetings with them is to persuade them to sit down and negotiate the democratization of Nicaragua, to return to those principles that they had once pledged. And in every instance the freedom fighters had agreed with us they would lay down their arms to come to the table and have a peaceful political solution to the problem. And nine times there was failure on the part of the Nicaraguans, the Sandinista government. They refused. We believe that it's going to take the pressure of the freedom fighters. And what we really think would be the best goal is if they have the strength to exert leverage on the Sandinista government, then we could still have a peaceful political settlement.

And the alternative would have to be, then, if Nicaragua still won't see the light -- or the Sandinista government won't, then the only alternative is for the freedom fighters to have their way and take over.

The President. Well, it depends on how long it might take for a resolution to this problem. But I think, right now, it can go much further than most people think it will, because, you know, the needs of fighters or soldiers using guerrilla tactics are much less than those of a more formal military structure. As a matter of fact, the rule of thumb in such a relationship is that normally a government and its forces have to outnumber the guerrillas 10 to 1 in order to succeed.

The President. Well, let me just answer that in a broader sense. The Sandinistas themselves -- early on after they took over -- they proclaimed that their revolution was not going to be confined to their own borders. In other words, they were going to pursue Communist revolution throughout Latin America. Now, that was their statement, not ours. And so, I feel we ought to take them at their word.

What is the basic purpose of your meeting with President De la Madrid? Does this meeting mean that your administration wants to cooperate in solving, for the benefit of both countries, the problems Mexico faces -- and which would also affect the United States?

The President. This meeting is an opportunity for a friendly, frank, and open dialog between friends. Your President and I have gotten to know each other well since our first meeting in 1982. Beyond that, we do want to strengthen cooperative relations. Mexico and the United States are, above all, good neighbors. What affects Mexico does, indeed, affect the United States and vice versa. Being good neighbors means being willing to exchange views about problems and challenges we face and then seeing how we can work together for our mutual benefit.

It seems that during the last 2 years some significant disagreements and tensions have surfaced in U.S.-Mexican relations. Some examples of this situation are the criticism by some U.S. elements of Mexican democracy and the pressure on Mexico by some U.S. Senators and other political figures with regards to Mexico's domestic politics and the corruption of Mexico's political system, which have even been questioned by some U.S. diplomats. What is your opinion of this situation, and how should relations be between two so close and so different neighboring countries?

The President. Maintaining a close, friendly, and mutually beneficial relationship between the United States and Mexico has always been one of my top foreign policy objectives. In fact, you may recall that President Lopez Portillo was the first head of state with whom I met, even before I assumed office. That's not to say that we don't have problems in our relationship from time to time. But with the relationship we have built together, we can discuss those problems honestly and try to resolve them. It's important to distinguish very carefully between the policy of the United States Government and the private views of individuals, whether they are political figures or ordinary citizens. I believe relations between our two countries are excellent and are typical of relations between old friends: We have our differences, but none of them can overcome our fundamental bonds and common concerns.

Do you believe that Mexico is adequately fulfilling its commitments with regards to its foreign debt servicing? If so, do you believe that the high interest rates on Mexico's debt are correct, taking into consideration that they harm, upset, and destabilize Mexican society?

The President. President De la Madrid and his cabinet have shown extraordinary courage and political will in proposing programs and policies to overcome economic difficulties and restore economic growth. There is still work to be done to ensure that Mexico will enjoy sustained economic growth in the future. Mexico has serviced its debt in a timely fashion and has not accumulated arrears as have some other debtor nations. As a result of its good record in cooperating with creditors in working out rescheduling agreements and its stabilization efforts after 1982, Mexico has enjoyed lower interest rate spreads than many other debtor nations. Interest charges on Mexican debt will be about $1.5 billion less this year than in 1985 as a result of these relatively narrower spreads and lower interest rates worldwide.

Even though the U.S. Government is not a creditor of Mexico, U.S. banks are, and it is well known that U.S. banks operate according to the political environment between the two countries. It has also been proven that the Baker plan has not had the success which had been anticipated. As a consequence, the U.S. Treasury Department had to intervene directly to assist in alleviating -- though temporarily -- Mexico's financial crisis so that Mexico could be able to sign an agreement with the International Monetary Fund. Up to what point is your administration interested in Mexico's continued economic growth? And what would you advise creditors and indebted Latin American countries so that they could reach an equitable agreement and that the true economic development of the countries south of the Rio Grande would be feasible?

The President. A keystone of our policy towards Mexico is our desire to see your country continue to grow and develop as it did for several decades before 1982. Mexico clearly has the resources -- in every sense of the word -- to prosper and thereby better the lives of its people.

The economic restructuring program announced by President De la Madrid and outlined in the agreement with the International Monetary Fund augurs well for the future. The agreement with the IMF is based on an economic program developed by the Mexican authorities themselves. It is an equitable agreement which will allow Mexico to grow and meet its financial obligations.

Our debt strategy provides an overall framework for cooperation among debtor nations, commercial banks, and international financial institutions to achieve sustained economic growth. The major elements of the U.S. proposal for sustained growth are clearly evident in the Mexican program. I have urged other countries to follow Mexico's example.

There is no simple recipe that can be used everywhere to deal with nations debt problems. The countries which have been more successful economically have encouraged private initiative, avoided excessive regulation, and provided adequate incentives for productive investment. They have relied primarily on markets to set interest rates and prices and have maintained appropriate exchange rates. They have avoided excessive government consumption and control.

With regard to democracy and politics, what should both of them consist of? And why do countries like Nicaragua have to be characterized by your administration as they have? Would it be in accordance with democracy to intervene directly and officially in the affairs of other countries, as in the case of supporting the contras in Nicaragua? Do you think that such a small country can actually be considered a threat to the United States and U.S. allies?

Democracy should consist of representative and pluralistic processes that will guarantee that the people take part in the decisions that will affect their lives. The system should ensure that the various currents of opinion have free access to fair, regular, and competitive elections based on the full observance of citizens rights. We realize, however, that while democracy requires elections, elections alone are not enough. Democracy must also consist of equal access to education, justice, and employment. Democracy also means the absence of tyranny, whether this be the tyranny of a minority over the majority or that of the majority over a minority.

Unfortunately in Nicaragua there is little evidence of democracy, and what vestiges remain are rapidly being stifled. We describe Nicaragua as a Marxist-Leninist state in simple recognition of the reality. I might add that they describe themselves as Marxist-Leninist. All of the elements which are commonly considered throughout the world as necessary for a democracy are being subjected to the tyranny of the commandantes in Nicaragua. The Sandinistas have now completed their elimination of the free press. They are harassing the Catholic Church and other religious groups. They are preventing the other political parties, labor unions, and business groups from carrying out their legitimate functions. In such circumstances it is not surprising that Nicaraguans who rejoiced at the overthrow of the Somoza dictatorship have banded together to resist the consolidation of another dictatorship, a dictatorship with sponsors who come from outside of this hemisphere.

You have stated that Nicaragua's communism could expand to Mexico. Could you tell me what Mexico should do to help prevent that, and what is Mexico not doing at the present time to avoid that from happening?

The President. I think your President would be better than I at answering your question. I have great respect for President De la Madrid and the Mexican people's commitment to democracy and Western values, which are inherently inconsistent with communism. We have seen how Communist governments in Cuba and Nicaragua have established close ties to the Soviet Union and have engaged in subversion of democratic governments as a matter of policy.

Communists are hostile to democracy. They are hostile to the church. And they feel threatened by democratic governments. All people who cherish democracy should be deeply concerned about the consolidation of expansionist, Communist, pro-Soviet governments in this hemisphere.

The President. Cuba's rulers, who show no willingness to tolerate a dissenting thought in their own domain, have never been so out of step as they are now with trends in the hemisphere, where freedom and human rights are ascendant. Their Communist economic model has proven a dismal failure with a drop in per capita income under Castro's rule from among the highest in the hemisphere to among the lowest. In foreign policy, Cuba shows itself dedicated first and foremost to the Soviet alliance. Among its neighbors and as far away as Africa it sows violence and discord. There is little prospect of any significant improvement in our relations with such a Cuba. Yet despite these fundamental differences, we remain prepared to resolve specific issues, such as [im]migration, if Cuba is willing.

It is said that the Contadora peace initiative was not signed because of the pressures the United States exercised on El Salvador, Honduras, Costa Rica, and Guatemala. Is this true? If it is not true, could you tell us what, in your view, is the reason for the stalemate in the Contadora process?

The President. It certainly is not true. We have never pressured the Central American democracies not to sign a Contadora peace treaty. The problem is that the draft is not complete; it is not ready for signature. The democracies have given detailed explanations of its deficiencies. The draft needs to be strengthened in several areas, such as verification and democratization. Also, it calls for negotiations on arms limits to begin after the treaty has already been signed and implemented. When you look at it closely, it asks the Central Americans to ``sign now, negotiate later.'' The Central Americans don't need us or any other nation to tell them that this is not a smart thing to do.

The principal problem confronting the Contadora process is the same as it has always been: The Sandinistas are unwilling to seriously negotiate many of the key points of the 1983 Document of Objectives. They have been intransigent on the political aspects of democracy and national reconciliation as well as on military levels. They want a treaty which immediately gives them what they want -- relief from the pressure of the democratic resistance -- but puts no real obligations on them. They have repeatedly blocked progress, using the standard Communist negotiating tactic of being inflexible in order to force the other parties to make concessions. Now they are saying that they will sign the incomplete draft, but they are conditioning their acceptance on their own proposal for arms limits. They have proposed limits on 14 categories of weapons -- many of which they don't even have. They are refusing to limit most of their major weapons systems or the size of their huge army.

Central American democracies have properly rejected this proposal and are insisting that realistic arms levels be established. They are prepared to continue working for a comprehensive agreement that will bring lasting peace to the region. We seek a political solution in Nicaragua. What we want to see is a democratic outcome with free and fair elections for all political parties, where all potential candidates are given the opportunity to participate, and a free and open society which will live at peace with its neighbors and its own people.

According to your earlier statements criticizing dictatorships of the left and of the right, after what has happened in the Philippines and Haiti, do you think that the downfall of the current governments in Paraguay and Chile is near? What is the status of overall U.S. relations with Latin American countries?

The President. Any change of government in either of those two countries would stem, of course, from decisions made by the peoples of those nations, not the U.S. Our policy toward Chile and Paraguay is to support peaceful and orderly transitions to full democratic rule and to encourage greater respect for human rights. We try to implement this policy through communications with both the Government and the democratic opposition in each country, with the goal of promoting dialog between them.

As for the second part of your question, our relations with Latin America are currently at one of the highest levels in the history of our countries. The expansion of democracy throughout the region in the last decade has reinforced the bond between us.

Our democratically elected governments represent the will of the people, and this fact enables us to work more easily and more effectively together. Our support to the majority of countries in Latin America and the Caribbean, either in moving to democracy or solidifying the existing democracies, has strengthened the ties between our governments and our peoples. Together we are working to assure the security of our peoples and our way of life.

The Group of the Six [nonaligned nations] has called for the suspension of nuclear tests and the freezing of war arsenals. Do you think such an action is viable at this time, taking into consideration your upcoming meeting with Soviet leader Gorbachev? Also, keeping in mind the increasing tension in East-West and North-South relations, do you think that violence could break out not only at a regional but at the worldwide level?

The President. I think we all share the eventual goal of a world totally free of nuclear weapons. But we differ on whether a nuclear-testing moratorium truly contributes to this process. A nuclear-testing moratorium is not in the security interests of the United States, its allies, and its friends. Now, and for some time, the security of the United States, its allies, and its friends must rely on a credible and effective nuclear deterrent. In my view, this makes nuclear testing imperative.

For the United States, therefore, a comprehensive test ban (CTB) remains a long-term objective. Such a ban must be viewed in the context of a time when we do not need to depend on nuclear deterrence to ensure international security and stability and when we have achieved broad, deep, and verifiable arms reductions, substantially improved verification capabilities, expanded confidence-building measures, and greater balance in conventional forces. For the near term, our priority is to improve the verification provisions of existing limitations: the Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET).

We have recently opened expert-level discussions with the Soviets on the broad range of nuclear-testing issues. We provided the Soviets with the details of our verification concerns regarding the TTBT and PNET and advised them that resolution of these concerns would enable us to move forward on their ratification. We also heard and discussed Soviet concerns. In those discussions, and in current arms control negotiations, we are hopeful of achieving progress which would truly enhance security, stability, and peace. General Secretary Gorbachev and I promised at our Geneva summit to accelerate arms control negotiations, and the United States is working hard to honor that pledge.

The world has too many nuclear arms. We need real cuts. I think we can achieve genuine reductions in nuclear weapons in Geneva, which I think will move us toward our ultimate objectives. A moratorium or a nuclear weapons freeze will not. The United States seeks to enhance its own security by promoting freedom and prosperity throughout the world. At the same time, we must take account of the diversity of regional conflicts and the conditions in which they arise. Most of the world's turbulence has indigenous causes, and not every regional conflict should be viewed as part of the East-West conflict.

General Secretary Gorbachev and I agreed at our summit meeting in Geneva that any conflict between the U.S.S.R. and the United States could have catastrophic consequences. We emphasized the importance of preventing any war between us, whether conventional or nuclear, and we agreed that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. Therefore, my administration has insisted that the issue of regional security must have a prominent place on the agenda of U.S.-Soviet relations. Since the Geneva summit we have had a number of discussions with the Soviets on a wide range of regional issues. This process has been very useful for us, and we intend to continue it.

Your early image of a charismatic man and of a typical American has increasingly been projected towards that of a world public opinion leader -- criticized by many, but also authentic. What do you think of yourself and your actions during the time you have been President of the United States? What do you think of the country you received as President and of the country you will turn to your successor when your term is over?

The President. Let me take those first two questions together. I think the past 6 years have shown that America is back on its feet, back to being the major force for progress and freedom in the world. Six years ago we started working hard at home, restoring our defenses and putting our own economic house in order. After rebuilding those strengths, we're able to play a much stronger role in the world. I think we see that more clearly right here in this hemisphere. Today over 90 percent of the people of Latin America and the Caribbean enjoy self-government, compared to one-third only 6 years ago.

Now, how did this progress occur? Most of it has to do with the courage and determination of the people of Latin America, who have worked to build democratic institutions despite threats from outside and subversion by violent minorities within. But I believe the United States also made a contribution through our military and economic assistance. So, both trends -- toward freedom and toward greater U.S. strength -- have reinforced each other.

You don't hear much about our unwillingness to help our friends. And that's because we've shown -- from Latin America to the Philippines, from the Middle East to Western Europe -- that we're determined to stick by our principles and our friends and to promote those principles wherever we think it's possible.

As for your last question: The United States has always been a beacon to people who aspire to liberty and self-government. That's as true today as it was in 1890, and it will be just as true in 1990. And if we've been able to strengthen her over the past few years -- and I think we have -- then we'll have done what the people of the United States elected us to do.

We are deeply concerned at the mistreatment of Victor Cortez at the hands of the Jalisco State Police in Mexico. Mr. Cortez is an officer of the Drug Enforcement Administration and was carrying out official duties in Mexico with the concurrence of the Mexican Government when he was detained Wednesday in Guadalajara. He identified himself immediately as an officer of the DEA. The police threatened Mr. Cortez and beat him and tortured him with a cattle prod during interrogation. He was released after the office of the Mexican Attorney General interceded at the request of the United States. Yesterday Mr. Cortez was flown to the United States, where he is undergoing medical examination.

Vigilantism by a state authority causes serious harm to the relationship necessary for our two countries to be able to combat drug trafficking and production. We are submitting a note of protest to the Mexican Government. We note with satisfaction that Attorney General Garcia Ramirez has ordered a full investigation of this incident. We expect that when the full facts are known appropriate steps will be taken against those who are responsible.

It is particularly unfortunate that this incident occurred during the very successful visit to Washington of Mexican President De la Madrid, whose government has been working closely with us to address the danger of narcotics in our two countries.

This letter is submitted in compliance with Section 7310(b) of Title 10, United States Code. That section requires me to provide the Congress with my conclusions with respect to the survivability, cost-effectiveness, and combat effectiveness of any new ship requested for the combatant forces; a recommendation whether the ship should be nuclear or conventionally powered; and the reasons for my conclusions and recommendations. Authorization is being requested for Fiscal Years 1987 and 1988 for the ships listed in the attachment to this letter. All of these ships are considered to be combat effective.

Because ships last 25 to 30 years or more, their effectiveness will be enhanced in the future as new equipment is added. Combat effectiveness is judged in terms of the ability of each ship to accomplish the mission for which it was designed. In all cases, these ships provide more capability than the ships of comparable type of class that are scheduled to be retired as the new ones are delivered.

The ships are considered to be cost-effective in relation to the various missions they are to perform. In determining cost-effectiveness, consideration is given to several factors, including alternative power systems and alternative weapon systems that may be used to accomplish the missions of the ship and the fact that it is difficult to prorate the total cost of a ship among all of the missions it is designed to perform. Cost-effectiveness is considered acceptable for the continuing programs requested for Fiscal Years 1987 and 1988 because the ships can accomplish their primary missions and because nonrecurring costs have been incurred and production is underway. The LSD - 41 Cargo Variant is the only new ship class not included in previous authorizations. It will be a modified version of the LSD - 41 amphibious ship design with greater cargo capacity than the LSD - 41. Six LSD - 41 class ships have previously been authorized.

Assault Ship since these systems are adequate for these ships to accomplish their missions and have lower procurement costs. Nuclear power is proposed for the TRIDENT and SSN - 688 submarines. In view of higher investment costs of nuclear-powered ships, I believe that nuclear power should be limited to those ships for which clear benefits are derived. Compared to the missions of surface ships, submarine missions provide a much greater opportunity to capitalize on the benefits of nuclear power. In addition, it would not be cost-effective to alter either the TRIDENT or attack submarine designs for conventional power at this time. Hence, I recommend that these ships be nuclear powered and that the others be conventionally powered. Compared to the ships now in the Fleet, class for class, the ships in this authorization request are more survivable.

Welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. You know, I can't help but stick in here -- we do have more than just recent activities in common. I got to remembering the other day that when I was a lifeguard on the Rock River in Dixon, Illinois, all the way through high school and college -- had to work my way through school. I had a canoe. I used to rent it out at 35 cents an hour. [Laughter] That's because the people that were renting out the rowboats were charging 25 cents, and I didn't want to seem to be competing with them -- and canoes are better than rowboats.

Well, anyway, it's wonderful to be having this White House Conference on Small Business again after almost 6 years. Things certainly have changed in the meantime. Back then, government's view of the economy could be summed up in a few short phrases: If it moves, tax it. If it keeps moving, regulate it. And if it stops moving, subsidize it. [Laughter] Well, with your help, I think we've turned all that around. We cut taxes. We squashed inflation. We brought interest rates down, threw out needless regulations, setting the economy on a growth path that has created somewhere in the neighborhood of 11 million new jobs in under 4 years. Now, most people know that history. What isn't widely enough recognized, however, is the leading role of entrepreneurs and small businesses in our ongoing expansion.

According to the Small Business Administration, small businesses account for nearly half of all the innovations and over 70 percent of all those new jobs -- you heard right, over 70 percent. That increase in these last few years was by what we call small business. And incidentally, a figure that is astounding today -- when we still keep being concerned with an unemployment rate -- is that 61.2 percent of what is known as the potential job market is employed. And that is the highest percentage in all our history, because that figure is 61.2 percent of all the human beings, male and female, from ages 16 up. And there never has been that great a percentage employed before.

But it's individuals and small firms who are on the cutting edge of growth and technological development. It's entrepreneurs with a new idea or a different approach, visionaries with an impossible dream and the determination to make it happen -- these are the people who are propelling our economy forward. And the best way to keep up the momentum is to give them the freedom they need by cutting tax rates -- and then cutting them again. If you thought our 1981 tax rates were good, wait till you feel the added horsepower that tax reform injects into our economy. We're slashing the top individual and corporate tax rates and wiping out unfair tax breaks at the same time. We're going to get America's investments out from under the tax shelters and back into the productive economy where they belong.

But we've still got a fight on our hands trying to cut back Federal spending. And your continued support on this is vital. Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is a big help, of course, but if Congress has trouble making the necessary, responsible cuts, then they should give me the line-item veto. I'll take the political heat. In fact, I'll enjoy it. [Laughter] As a Governor, with the line-item veto on budgets, I did it 943 times in 8 years without being overridden once. I miss that. [Laughter] But total reform is another major item on our agenda, and we're going to encourage the Senate to act on it this fall. We must return to a system that is based on fault, rather than deep pockets, a system -- I said total reform -- tort reform is what I'm talking about, a system that's fair to small business and consumers who need your continued innovation in marketing and job creation. I pledge to you that we share your commitment to seeing these goals achieved.

And you know, it's said that if you lined up all the economists in the world end to end, they still wouldn't reach a conclusion. [Laughter] Now, I feel free to tell that joke because my degree was in economics. [Laughter] Well, economists may forever differ, but one of the most exciting things about tax reform is that it represents a new consensus in this town -- a consensus developing around progrowth, low-tax policies. We saw the strength of that consensus by the way that tax reform powered through the Senate. As my economic advisers point out, tax reform will rev up the engines of growth. It's just a hunch, but I bet there won't be many candidates in '88 calling for a tax hike.

The next stage is to convince our trading partners to follow suit, to take the path of high real growth. Maybe then we could get the world economy moving faster and stronger, and it wouldn't just be us out there in front all alone, trying to pull the rest of the world behind us. The Europeans call our economic performance -- to my face they've called it the American miracle. In fact, it is thousands of individual miracles of faith, hard work, and imagination -- thousands of entrepreneurs and small business people like you. I've often thought that America's entrepreneurs, like the men and women here at this conference, would make the best ambassadors of progress. You'd not only be convincing proponents of low tax rates and stable monetary policies, deregulation, you'd show the world that economic growth doesn't come from government spending or planning, but from the heart and soul of entrepreneurs -- men and women who are willing to take risks, who brave failure to seek success on the frontiers of enterprise.

Mr. Gilder speaks of the essential spirit of giving that lies at the heart of free enterprise -- because it is the only economic system in which success depends not on coercion or power, but the ability to respond creatively to others' needs. That underlying generosity of purpose is seen in the likes of Ray Kurzweil, whose genius has given us a computer that can read books to the blind; or Wally Amos, who has devoted his profits from his Famous Amos cookies to help disadvantaged children get an education.

All of these people being honored here today, and all of you in the small business community, exemplify the generous creativity of free enterprise that is making this the age of the entrepreneur. You are adventurers on the road of progress; you are the pathfinders, the scouts of a world of new and greater possibilities. You have all given so much to your country and your fellow man -- jobs, hope, opportunity for millions, and expanding horizons for America's future. For that, I and the American people owe you our esteem and our gratitude.

I'm looking forward to meeting you, as I'm going to get to in a very few minutes, and getting the recommendations from the 1986 Conference on Small Business. I will be naming a permanent administrator of the SBA, and I can assure you that the Small Business Administration will continue to have an important voice in the councils of government.

Now we go to the reception, where I'll be able to congratulate each one of the honorees personally. And until then, which is only a few minutes, as I say, down the hall there, thank you. God bless you all.

I am announcing today two steps that will ensure America's leadership in space exploration and utilization. First, the United States will, in FY 1987, start building a fourth space shuttle to take the place of Challenger, which was destroyed on January 28th. This decision will bring our shuttle fleet up to strength and enable the United States to safely and energetically project a manned presence in space. Without the fourth orbiter, NASA's capabilities would be severely limited and long-term projects for the development of space would have to be either postponed, or even canceled. A fourth orbiter will enable our shuttles to accomplish the mission for which they were originally intended and permit the United States to move forward with new, exciting endeavors like the building of a permanently manned space station.

NASA and our shuttles will continue to lead the way, breaking new ground, pioneering new technology, and pushing back the frontiers. It has been determined, however, that NASA will no longer be in the business of launching private satellites. The private sector, with its ingenuity and cost effectiveness, will be playing an increasingly important role in the American space effort. Free enterprise corporations will become a highly competitive method of launching commercial satellites and doing those things which do not require a manned presence in space. These private firms are essential in clearing away the backlog that has built up during this time when our shuttles are being modified.

We must always set our sights on tomorrow. NASA and our shuttles can't be committing their scarce resources to things which can be done better and cheaper by the private sector. Instead, NASA and the four shuttles should be dedicated to payloads important to national security and foreign policy, and, even more, on exploration, pioneering, and developing new technologies and uses of space. NASA will keep America on the leading edge of change; the private sector will take over from there. Together, they will ensure that our country has a robust, balanced, and safe space program.

It has been over 6 months since the tragic loss of the Challenger and her gallant crew. We have done everything humanly possible to discover the organizational and technical causes of the disaster and to correct the situation. The greatest tribute we can pay to those brave pathfinders who gave their lives on the Challenger is to move forward and rededicate ourselves to America's leadership in space.

I ran for the Presidency in 1980, I made a solemn commitment to do all in my power to restore to our country a national defense second to none. In that election, and again in 1984, the American people, I believe, gave me a mandate to do precisely that. Today, however, that commitment and many of the great gains we've made together these past 5 years have been placed in jeopardy by actions taken in the House of Representatives. Let me outline for you a few of the decisions which, if permitted to stand, would pull the rug out from under our arms negotiators in Geneva and, eventually, imperil the national security of the United States.

First, the House voted to deny the U.S. Air Force the right even to test our small antisatellite weapon called ASAT. The ASAT is designed to destroy, in the event of a conflict, Soviet military satellites that would guide Russian bombers and missiles to American targets. It is a defensive weapon built to help protect the men and women of the U.S. Armed Forces at home and abroad. It's inexplicable to me how the House could deny us the right to even test this weapon when a killer satellite weapon has long been deployed inside the Soviet Union.

Second, the House voted to halt any nuclear test larger than a single kiloton. If that vote is permitted to stand, all testing to maintain the safety, credibility, and reliability of the U.S. strategic deterrent would come to an end. Has the majority of the House forgotten history? In 1958 the United States agreed to a similar moratorium. Three years later the Soviets unilaterally smashed that moratorium with the largest series of nuclear tests in history. It took us almost a decade to discover what the Soviets had learned from those tests, prepared in secret even as the United States relied upon a Soviet promise. We must not make the same mistake again.

If that vote is permitted to stand, the House will have increased the probability these dreadful weapons will one day be used. History has taught repeatedly that the best deterrent to such awful weapons is when both sides, not just one side, possess them. Hitler did not use his terrible gas weapons against the allies for a single reason -- he feared retaliation by the allies with the same kind of weapon.

Fourth, the House voted to severely slash our request for the Strategic Defense Initiative. But SDI is not the only -- or not only, I should say, the great hope of this country for finding a way out of the prison of mutual terror, it is an idea that helped bring the Soviets back to the negotiating table at Geneva. To gravely underfund SDI is to place in jeopardy all our hopes for arms reduction. It is to leave America indefinitely naked to missile attack, whether by accident or design. These radical cuts in SDI would permit the Soviet Union, which has been working on strategic defense for decades, to make strides at the expense of the United States.

Beyond this, the House voted to cut away at several of the programs that are at the heart of this nation's strategic deterrent -- the land-based MX missile, the Trident submarine, and the advanced cruise missile. Soviet arms negotiators must be mystified today that U.S. legislators would give away in Washington what they have been unable to win at Geneva. Soviet military planners must be astonished at the blows the House delivered this week to America's national defense.

Finally, the House mandated that 10 percent of countless military contracts be awarded without competition on the basis of a quota for certain businesses -- and this they call military reform. It's a step in the wrong direction.

Make no mistake, the House defense bill is a reckless assault upon the national defense of the United States. It threatens our hopes for arms control and moves us back toward an era in policies which the American people emphatically rejected in the last two national elections. While it is my custom not to say whether I will veto a bill until it reaches my desk, if the defense budget arrives in anything like the present form, it will be vetoed and national security will be the issue in 1986.

In my 1984 State of the Union Address I called for tax reform. Now, in August of 1986, that call has been answered with today's historic achievement. Although we have not seen all the details of the final agreement adopted by the conferees, I believe that this agreement satisfies my requirements for meaningful tax reform. The agreement significantly reduces tax rates and simplifies the tax code for all Americans, while at the same time eliminating unnecessary loopholes. It removes some 6\1/2\ million more Americans from the Federal income tax rolls and means that 80 percent of all Americans will be taxed at a rate of 15 percent or less.

I commend the tireless efforts and dedication of Bob Packwood and Dan Rostenkowski and their colleagues on the conference committee. During the past 2\1/2\ years tax reform was said to be impossible and declared dead many times.

Today's agreement is a triumph for the American people and the American system, showing that we can rise to great challenges on a bipartisan basis against special interests and for the benefit of the American people. While some may not agree with all of the provisions of this agreement, I believe it is in the overall economic interest of the country. In short, it's good for the economy and good for the taxpayer.

Security Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe (CDE) begins its 12th and final session on August 19. It will adjourn on September 19, and its work must be complete by then. The United States places great importance on reaching a militarily significant result in Stockholm. Success in CDE would contribute directly to a clearer and more predictable military situation in Europe. More broadly, it would give an important impulse to the Helsinki process, of which CDE is an integral part, and thus contribute to promotion of all the aims of the Helsinki Final Act.

United States was pleased with the progress that was made in the final days of the last round of negotiations. If the East adopts a constructive posture, we believe we can fulfill the Conference's mandate to negotiate concrete, verifiable measures that increase the openness of all military activities in Europe. To meet this objective, we believe the Stockholm Conference must adopt measures to create a comprehensive, verifiable confidence-building regime, requiring the exchange of military information and the forecasting, notification, and observation of military activities. We believe that effective verification of these measures by all participating States can only come from inspection of activities which cast doubt on compliance.

Because so little time remains in which to reach agreement, the President has instructed the U.S. delegation to return to Stockholm early to take part in informal consultations aimed at resolving some outstanding issues. Ambassador Robert L. Barry, head of the U.S. delegation to CDE, has the full support of the President in seeking a concluding document which meets the objectives we have pursued since negotiations began and which will contribute to the security of all participating States.

This administration is against the intervention of the Federal Government in the resolution of limited, isolated labor disputes. However, all the procedures in the Railway Labor Act for settling the Maine Central-BMWE dispute have been exhausted, and as a result of recent court decisions, the possibility exists of a national railroad strike stemming from this unresolved dispute. I earnestly hope that the parties will avail themselves of the additional cooling-off period in H.J. Res. 683 to settle their dispute.

Two-and-a-half years ago, I instructed the Treasury Department to begin work on a revolutionary overhaul of our tax system that would make it fairer and simpler and stimulate growth by lowering tax rates. It's been a long, arduous struggle.

Each step of the way a chorus of pessimists predicted failure: It would never get by the special interests. Tax reform, they said, stood about as much chance as a long-tailed cat in a room full of rocking chairs. Well, they forgot one thing: America didn't become great being pessimistic and cynical. America is built on a can-do spirit that sees every obstacle as a challenge, every problem as an opportunity.

Thanks to the support of the American people, tax reform has gained steadily in popularity and momentum, powering past the opposition and on to victory in both Houses of Congress. Now, just last week the Senate-House conference committee approved an agreement that reconciles the Senate and House versions. We want to commend Chairmen Packwood and Rostenkowski for this great achievement. The next step is final approval -- an up or down vote in both Houses. There is absolutely no reason for any further delay, which only causes uncertainty and puts a damper on investment and economic growth. I urge Congress, when it reconvenes in September, to act promptly and make tax reform the law of the land.

Let me give you a few of the highlights of this revolutionary tax overhaul. First of all, the present 14-rate structure will be collapsed into only 2, and over 80 percent of the American people will pay the lower rate of only 15 percent or will pay no taxes at all. The top individual and corporate rates will also be slashed, while many special tax breaks will be closed. All of this will draw America's investment money out from under the tax shelters and back into the productive economy where it belongs. And we've indexed taxes to make sure inflation never again pushes Americans into higher tax brackets. Families will get a long overdue break through increases in the standard deduction and personal exemption. And millions of working poor will be completely dropped from the tax roles, making this one of the best antipoverty programs this country has ever seen.

We will no longer use the tax code to make economic and social policy. Instead, we're going to let market forces shape our economy into a sleek and efficient powerhouse of growth. With tax reform, America will have the lowest marginal rates and the most modern tax code in the industrialized world -- one that encourages risk-taking, innovation, and that old American spirit of enterprise. We will be refueling the American growth economy with the kind of incentives that have helped create record numbers of new businesses and over 10\1/2\ million jobs in 44 months.

We're already beginning to see the slowing effects on our own economy of sluggish world growth. Without faster growth, other countries simply can't afford to buy as many of our goods and services, and that hurts American workers. Well, tax reform is good news for them, too. A British news magazine has described it as the beginning of a tax revolution that will ``stalk through the West'' as our industrialized partners cut tax rates in their own countries in order to remain competitive with the American dynamo. The Europeans have called our expansion the American miracle and have talked enviously of our record of economic growth and job creation. Well, now is their opportunity to join us on the growth path, to carry this revolution of hope and opportunity around the world, and create a strong, sound, and growing world economy. Tax reform is the door to a bigger future, a future as big and hopeful and full of heart as the American dream, a future of expanding possibility and ever increasing opportunity for all Americans, indeed, for the whole world.

I have signed S. 992, the Congressional Reports Elimination Act of 1986. This act eliminates or modifies a number of statutory reporting requirements. Federal agencies are required by law to report to Congress on a wide variety of subjects at specified intervals. These reporting requirements impose a considerable workload on the executive branch. S. 992 represents congressional action on an administration proposal to repeal or modify reporting requirements if they no longer serve a useful purpose, the information required is available from other sources, or the cost and time required to prepare a report outweigh any benefit to the public or the Congress.

I am disappointed the great majority of the repeals or modifications of reporting requirements proposed by the administration were not adopted by the Congress, the passage of S. 992 does demonstrate congressional recognition of the problem of burdensome reporting requirements. We will continue to work with the Congress to eliminate other unnecessary, redundant, or otherwise inappropriate reporting requirements.

Fortier's death is a great loss to my administration and the United States. Don had worked tirelessly and brilliantly in developing our national security policy. His creativity in the search for lasting peace throughout the world contributed significantly to our progress toward that goal. Nancy and I extend our heartfelt condolences to Don's wife, Alison, and his son, Graham. May God bless them.

Since then, women have not only availed themselves of their access to the voting booth, they have gone on to take part at every level of politics and government. We as a Nation are much the better for this fundamental enlargement of our public life.

Women's growing participation in public life has been paralleled by their increasing importance in every field. All of us benefit from the accomplishments of women in commerce, law, science, medicine, the arts, and every other area of human activity. We are most grateful for all of these achievements, just as we are for women's special role at the heart of the family and for the freedom of opportunity women have to determine the vocations they wish to pursue.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

I have signed into law H.R. 4151, the Omnibus Diplomatic Security and Antiterrorism Act of 1986. This marks yet another step forward in our bipartisan effort to eradicate international terrorism. I would like to recognize the valuable contributions to this legislation by the Vice President and his Task Force on Combatting Terrorism; Secretary [of State] Shultz and Admiral Inman and their Panel on Diplomatic Security; and the work of Senator Richard Lugar and Representatives Dante Fascell, Bill Broomfield, Dan Mica, and Olympia Snowe, as well as many other distinguished Members of the Congress for bringing the various parts of this act together. This is truly a bipartisan piece of work.

This act once again puts those who would instigate acts of terrorism against U.S. citizens or property on notice that we will not be deterred from carrying out our obligations throughout the world. I am committed to ensuring the safety of our diplomats, servicemen, and citizens wherever they may be. This historic act provides the organization and authorities necessary to implement the recommendations of the Advisory Panel on Overseas Security. It also establishes within the Department of State a new Bureau of Diplomatic Security and a Diplomatic Security Service to increase the professionalism and effectiveness of our security personnel. Another important piece of this act that I am particularly pleased to have supported is the victims of terrorism assistance program. This, for the first time, will provide for the care and welfare of the victims of terrorism and their families.

At the same time, I continue to urge cooperation with all nations, on both a bilateral and multilateral basis, to seek ways to work together to end the continuing onslaught of international terrorism against civilized society.

Seeking international cooperation is vital in the struggle against terrorism, and that effort will remain a top foreign policy priority for me. Within the Government, cooperation and coordination between all departments and agencies is also essential in protecting our vital national security interests from the terrorist threat.

We can never legislate an end to terrorism. However, we must remain resolute in our commitment to confront this criminal behavior in every way -- diplomatically, economically, legally, and, when necessary, militarily. First-rate intelligence remains the key element in each of these areas. We will continue to improve our ability to predict, prevent, and respond to threats of terrorism with an expanded intelligence-gathering capability. We will continue to work with the Congress to identify legislative gaps in our ability to combat terrorism. This act adds to our capabilities and further demonstrates our resolve. I congratulate those responsible for this historic act.

H.R. 2478 contains a number of desirable provisions, as well as some the administration has advised against, it contains one critical provision that requires comment. Section 19(b) of H.R. 2478 would make the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings sequestration procedure inapplicable to payments to Guam, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands of excise and/or income taxes collected by the Federal Government resulting from economic activity on these islands. It would also exempt from sequestration certain payments to the Northern Mariana Islands under a preexisting covenant negotiated with the Islands and backed by the full faith and credit of the United States. Statements on the floor of the House of Representatives indicated that the exemption from Gramm-Rudman-Hollings contained in section 19(b) was intended to be limited to these payments. There was no written report on this item.

Notwithstanding the apparent intent of the Congress, however, the language of section 19(b) could be read to exempt from Gramm-Rudman-Hollings an open-ended variety of mostly discretionary payments authorized over past years. For example, it could exempt from sequestration all payments made to Guam, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands under the acts cited in section 19. It also could be deemed to exempt all payments to these jurisdictions and to the Northern Mariana Islands under a 1978 omnibus territories authorization act (P.L. 95 - 348). While the cumulative effect of these additional exemptions is not now susceptible of precise determination, any such exemptions would be unacceptable.

Our efforts to reduce the Federal deficit have entered into a critical period. If we are unable to achieve as many reductions as are necessary to meet the deficit reduction targets under the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act, which I believe can be accomplished through regular legislative and appropriations action, then it is essential that the sequestration process proceed unimpeded. Under such circumstances, I must oppose any effort to protect specific programs from Gramm-Rudman-Hollings sequestration except in the most unusual circumstances.

The ambiguous language in section 19(b), if interpreted broadly as described above, would create an unjustified exemption from Gramm-Rudman-Hollings and set a serious and damaging precedent. If such an exemption were allowed in this case, it could start in motion a growing snowball of sequestration protections for other programs and threaten to render inoperable the entire Gramm-Rudman-Hollings approach to the deficit problem.

We must not risk such results. For this reason, I am signing H.R. 2478 only after receiving from the congressional jurisdictional committee leadership their assurances that section 19(b) was not intended to create broad exemptions from Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, and they will endeavor to enact clarifying legislation at the earliest possible time. Without these assurances, I could not sign H.R.

The incidence of illiteracy and functional illiteracy among the Nation's adult population negatively affects our economy, our social institutions, and our security. It also limits the opportunities open to those who lack basic reading and writing skills. Estimates of the number of illiterate or functionally illiterate Americans range from twenty-three million to over fifty million.

Adult illiteracy has not received the attention it deserves. As Americans come to understand the problem better they will come to grips with it. Illiteracy is not limited to any region of the Nation, nor to any social or ethnic group. We must take this problem seriously and provide the means and the motivation to help those with literacy deficiencies to master the ability to read and write.

Americans traditionally have responded when they become aware of a problem, especially when it comes to helping their fellow Americans. The problem of adult illiteracy can be solved if enough Americans volunteer to serve as tutors, provide in-kind services, and support other targeted efforts. There must be maximum private initiative, public-private cooperation, and coordinated community action. The Federal government has recognized the need to address adult illiteracy, and the private sector is beginning to do its part through a number of promising initiatives.

I am pleased to learn that many organizations will be involved in addressing this problem. Others in communications -- television producers, magazine publishers, book publishers, broadcasters, and advertising agencies -- will be supporting and encouraging efforts to raise awareness of the problem of adult illiteracy in September 1986 and beyond.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of September 1986 as Adult Literacy Awareness Month. I call on the American people and organizations of every kind to observe the month with activities to increase awareness of the problem of adult illiteracy and to encourage involvement in programs to help eliminate illiteracy and functional illiteracy among adults in our Nation.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

My pay advisors have reported to me that an increase in pay rates averaging 23.79 percent, to be effective in October 1986, would be required under existing procedures to raise Federal pay rates to comparability with private sector pay rates for the same levels of work. However, the law also empowers me to prepare and transmit to the Congress an alternative plan for the pay adjustment if I consider such an alternative plan appropriate because of ``national emergency or economic conditions affecting the general welfare.'' Furthermore, section 15201(a) of the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985, Public Law 99 - 272, requires that, in adjusting rates of pay under the Comparability Act, I achieve savings of at least $746 million in fiscal year 1987 compared to the ``baseline'' the Congress has used in its budget process. Section 15201(a) also requires that the effective date of the pay adjustment be delayed until January 1987.

It is a pleasure to be able to sign into law H.R. 3132 to ban the production or importation of the so-called cop-killer bullets, which pose an unreasonable threat to law enforcement officers who use soft body armor. This bill, similar to legislation jointly submitted to the Congress by the Departments of Justice and the Treasury in 1984, recognizes that certain forms of ammunition have no legitimate sporting, recreational, or self-defense use and thus should be prohibited. Such action is long overdue.

In signing this bill, I want to urge those States and localities that have not acquired body armor for their law enforcement officers to obtain such lifesaving equipment for their officers. The use of soft body armor is credited with saving the lives of more than 600 officers since it was first introduced in the 1970's. An even more important message is the one I have for law enforcement officers: If you have access to soft body armor, please use it.

Your lives and safety are too important to risk needlessly. The fabric used in modern soft body armor is truly a miracle fiber, but it is useless if left in the dressing room locker or the trunk of a squad car.

Those officers who in the past may have used the threat of armor-piercing bullets as a justification for failing to wear soft body armor should no longer have that excuse. We are doing our best at the Federal level to enhance the safety of police officers but must have the cooperation of the officers themselves to secure the full benefits of this important legislative action.

Courage and sacrifice are no strangers to America. In every war since our first struggle for independence, America's prisoners of war have endured terrible hardships and have been called upon to make extraordinary sacrifices. The bravery, perseverance, and profound devotion to duty of our POWs and MIAs have earned them a place of honor in the hearts of all Americans.

American prisoners of war, those still missing, and their families who have made extraordinary sacrifices on behalf of this country. I also call upon State and local officials and private organizations to observe this day with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

This weekend we mark the 92d observance of Labor Day, a day when we celebrate the strong backs, keen minds, hard work, and dedication that have made America the mightiest nation on Earth. We celebrate this land of immigrants and their descendants, the men and women who came to this land in search of freedom and hope and the opportunity to make an honest wage. We honor the laborers who built our great cities brick by brick, who poured the concrete, laid the macadam, riveted the steel girders, the worker in the factory and the farmer in the field, the secretary at a desk and the trucker at the wheel of a semi hauling freight from coast to coast.

Because we cut taxes and squashed inflation, America's workers once again can have faith in the future. They know they'll get a fair reward for their labor and that more and more of their paycheck won't be swallowed up by big government. The Census Bureau reports that real median family income rose in 1985 for the third year in a row. Inflation is the lowest it's been in more than 20 years. And interest rates continue to drop, making home ownership possible once again for average Americans -- average-income Americans, I should say. In other words, more Americans are working, they're earning more, and their money is going farther. More good news: Economic growth is winning against poverty. In the past, big government policies of high taxes mixed with high inflation pushed millions into poverty. Well, we turned that around.

Poverty has dropped for the second year in a row, as jobs and opportunity conquer dependence and hopelessness, once again proving that a growing, vibrant economy is the best antipoverty program there is.

Now, some workers in some sections of the economy haven't benefited from our prosperity. I'm thinking especially of some of our farmers who, after years of government interference in agriculture, are having difficulty adjusting to a noninflationary economy. Record levels of farm supports are helping farmers weather hard times, and we're committed to helping them move to a market-oriented farm economy. Also, the changing face of industry has left some workers without jobs. Where unfair foreign trade practices is the culprit, this administration will continue to be the most aggressive ever in protecting the rights of American workers, making sure that free trade is also fair trade.

Job Training Partnership Act has also helped over 2 million workers find new jobs. But the best answer is tax reform. By cutting tax rates we're going to rev the engines of entrepreneurship and job creation. We're raising exemptions for dependents and giving families a long-overdue break, and we're dropping millions of working poor off the income tax rolls altogether. Tax reform will be the best thing to happen to the American worker since -- well, since our tax cut in 1981. That's why I urge Congress this Labor Day to remember our responsibility to America's working men and women and waste no time passing tax reform when they return to Washington.

United States and the Soviet Union will begin a new round of discussions on arms control in Geneva on September 18th. An interagency arms control group has been meeting during the past several weeks to prepare for this round of talks. The United States considers this new round to be important in the process of reaching an agreement for meaningful arms control leading to total elimination of nuclear weapons. The September discussions come at a critical juncture in the process.

The recent exchanges between President Reagan and General Secretary Gorbachev have served to underscore the seriousness of the discussions. We are pleased that the Soviet Union has moved from a position of limiting the expansion of the arms race to a discussion of reducing the nuclear arsenals on both sides. The United States, for its part, has assigned major priority to seeking areas in which the two sides can make progress. We believe our most recent proposals are serious, concrete, and detailed. They provide the impetus for discussions with the Soviet Union that can significantly contribute to an agreement in the future. The interagency discussions in preparation for resumption of the Geneva talks will continue during the coming weeks. No final decisions have been made and will not be approved by the President until nearer the time that talks resume.

We believe the principle of confidentiality is essential to the successful outcome of these discussions. We are committed to preserving this principle and, therefore, will have no comment on the discussions that take place within our government or at the table in Geneva. We deplore those in this administration who make this information public. Breaching the principle of confidentiality serves to undermine the opportunity for a successful outcome in arms control. Quite frankly, we must question their motives. Their actions ill-serve the President, the American people, and the cause of world peace.

Americans always have cared about the less fortunate, and I'm sure it'll deeply gladden the hearts of many of you to know the kind of progress we've made during the past 6\1/2\ years in helping the poor. We have between 4 and 6 million fewer low-income families on the Federal income tax rolls. We've tamed inflation rates that were devastating the purchasing power of those least able to afford the basic necessities of life and reversed an upward spiral in the number of poor people that began in 1979. The official statistics released on Thursday show that the poverty rate is down for the third year in a row. The 1.6-percentage drop in poverty over the last 3 years is the largest sustained improvement since 1970. And median family income, adjusted for inflation, rose by 4.2 percent in 1986 -- the largest increase since 1972.

All of us can be pleased with this progress; pleased but not satisfied. More must be done to reduce poverty and dependency and, believe me, nothing is more important than welfare reform. It's now common knowledge that our welfare system has itself become a poverty trap -- a creator and reinforcer of dependency -- and that's why last year, in my State of the Union Message, I called for an overhaul of our welfare system.

Since that time, I've sent to Congress a carefully designed package of proposals that rejects the old Federal approach of sweeping solutions dictated from Washington. The central point of our new proposal -- as outlined in our earlier study ``Up From Dependency'' and now embodied in our legislative proposal, the Low-Income Opportunity Improvement Act -- is a provision that will allow States and localities to test new ideas for reducing welfare dependency. Through experimental changes, through carefully tested and evaluated demonstrations, this new approach can determine what does work in reducing welfare dependency. When the National Governors' Association met last weekend in Michigan, they gave substantial support to our plans to give them greater flexibility and they promised to work closely with us and the Congress.

Under the laws now in place, all mothers who have children under age 6 are exempt from participating in work activities that -- as several demonstration projects have shown -- can help Aid For Dependent Children, AFDC, recipients become more self-reliant. Fewer than one-fifth of all recipients now participate in work activities. We must lift this counterproductive exemption and thereby get early help to these women and their children before they become chronically dependent on welfare. We must also reform work requirements so that long gaps in school or in other work-related experiences no longer occur -- and so too, work opportunities for AFDC recipients must be expanded. We must give teenagers on AFDC who have not completed high school the opportunity to continue their schooling and older recipients to participate in employment and training activities. Two proposals we've sent to the Congress -- GROW, or Greater Opportunities Through Work, in AFDC and the AFDC Youth Training Initiative -- will allow us to do all of these things.

So too, changes in our child support enforcement system can reduce welfare dependency. Parents who bring children into the world have a responsibility for these children, whether they live with them or not. The administration is taking steps to ensure that States are able to do a better job in locating absent parents, establishing paternity, and collecting child support on behalf of AFDC recipients. We also have asked the Congress for new laws that would increase child support award amounts for both welfare and nonwelfare families.

Now the question I ask about any welfare reform proposal is: Will it help people become self-sufficient and lead a full life, or will it keep them down in a state of dependency? I'm afraid that several Members of Congress have suggested some proposals that, while claiming to require work-related activities, would make staying on welfare more attractive. Their misguided compassion would only bring more people into the welfare system, encourage them to stay on the welfare rolls longer, and discourage work. For example, the Democratic House bill contains no demonstration authority at all and another Senate bill only a very limited one.

AFDC work program reforms that emphasize early intervention to prevent welfare dependency, child support enforcement improvements to provide children the help that they need, and demonstration projects that give us the information necessary to make changes in the national welfare system: that is my welfare reform strategy; I hope it has your support.

Well, first and foremost, I would like to express my appreciation to Ambassador Middendorf and Norm Kurland and the members of the task force for the time and effort they contributed to this project. And I just wonder -- would the members of the task force like to stand? There they are. Thank you. And incidentally, there are some other gentlemen who were mentioned here by Bill, and I would like to personally welcome the Ambassadors and representatives of Embassies from our Latin American neighbors and the Caribbean countries who are with us today. Perhaps you gentlemen and ladies would like to stand also. Thank you.

You know, scientists say a perpetual motion machine is impossible. Well, considering that this task force completed its work without any appropriation from Congress, I think we ought to introduce Bill Middendorf to a few scientists. [Laughter] This country's ultimate resource is the creative talent, the hard work, and entrepreneurial spirit of individuals like Bill and like many of you here today. The American character -- and that's what we're talking about -- is no accident, no fluke of nature. It was nurtured by the political and economic liberty that has been hailed and protected by generations of Americans. It's the source of power that turned a vast wilderness into an economy that has provided more opportunity and a higher standard of living for more people than any other in the history of mankind.

Today the pivotal relationship between freedom and economic progress is becoming ever more important. The root cause of stagnation in the developing world, clearly, is not a lack of resources but a lack of freedom. In Ethiopia, for example, it has been the Communist dictatorship, even more than drought, that has brought about such suffering and hunger.

In so many countries, what will change despair into confidence, deprivation into plenty, stagnation into upward mobility is a commitment to human freedom and an understanding of how that relates to the economic progress of mankind. We see evidence of this in the great progress taking place on the Pacific rim. There competition flourishes, the market is less controlled, and the people are freer to invest and engage in enterprise.

They are more confident that they will be permitted to enjoy the fruits of their labor. Freedom of enterprise at an individual level builds countries from the bottom up; a lack of it, on the other hand, has the opposite effect.

Economist and businessman Hernando De Soto conducted an extensive study of the economy of his native Peru that confirms this. He found the greatest impediments to progress in his country are laws, regulations, and government controls that suppress the common people's entrepreneurial activities and prevent social and economic mobility. Those trying to improve their lot are hurt the worst.

De Soto describes how it took a lawyer and three others 301 days of full-time work, dealing with 11 government agencies, to get through the redtape necessary to put into business one small garmentmaking shop in Lima, Peru. According to Mr. De Soto, when the forms and paperwork were laid end to end, they measured 102 feet. One researcher working on the project then tried the same experiment in Tampa, Florida. The entire process took 3\1/2\ hours. The controls and restrictions Mr. De Soto talks about are certainly not unique to Peru. Such government intention is often -- or intervention, I should say, is often well-intended, but in the end, it does not serve the needs of the people, as producers or consumers.

You know, I have a recent hobby. I have been collecting stories that I can tell -- or prove are being told by the citizens of the Soviet Union among themselves which display not only a sense of humor but their feeling about their system.

Far too many Third World countries are immobilized by the policies that smother individual initiative and drain the private sector of resources. Instead of controlling the energies of their people, lesser developed countries should be freeing up and unleashing those energies. Andres Bello, an intellectual giant of the last century, once said: ``Liberty gives wings to the spirit of enterprise wherever it meets it; it breathes breath into it where it does not exist.'' There's no reason to believe that the citizens of most countries with struggling economies are not as bright and hard working and capable as those in countries which are enjoying great progress, like on the Pacific rim. If an environment is created where enterprise can thrive and profit can be made, investment will flow, jobs will be created, production will increase, and everybody will be better off.

Our government's international programs at Treasury and AID in recent years have been molded to promote just such growth-oriented policies. There's been a crying need, however, for creative and innovative thinking in regard to economic growth in Central America; and that's where the task force for Project Economic Justice comes in.

We're all aware that Central America is today on the frontlines of the battle for human freedom. The security of our country and the stability of the hemisphere are tied to events in that volatile region. We've provided our friends there with the weapons and the military equipment needed to counter an ongoing strategic move by the Soviet bloc, which, I might add, pumped in more than $1 billion of military aid and other support to its puppet regime in Nicaragua last year alone.

Our friends in Central America must have the weapons they need to survive, but if they're to win, if freedom is to be secure, the Central American democracies must have strong, growing economies. And let me reaffirm to all of you: Our commitment to counter Communist aggression in Central America will not diminish. We will not diminish our efforts to meet the economic challenges that confront the people of that troubled region.

Growth, of course, is not enough. It must be the vehicle of a better standard of living for all the people. Again, economic and political freedom are inseparably linked. The people of Central America -- and in a broader sense, the entire developing world -- need to know firsthand that freedom and opportunity are not just for the elite but the birthright of every citizen, that property is not just something enjoyed by a few but can be owned by any individual who works hard and makes correct decisions, that free enterprise is not just the province of the rich but a system of free choice in which everyone has rights, and that business, large or small, is something in which everyone can own a piece of the action.

I've long believed that one of the mainsprings of our own liberty has been the widespread ownership of property among our people and the expectation that anyone's child, even from the humblest of families, could grow up to own a business or a corporation. Thomas Jefferson dreamed of a land of small farmers, of shopowners, and merchants. Abraham Lincoln signed into law the Homestead Act that ensured that the great western prairies of America would be the realm of independent, property-owning citizens -- a mightier guarantee of freedom is difficult to imagine.

I know we have with us today employee-owners from La Perla Plantation in Guatemala. They have a stake in the place where they work and a stake in the freedom of their country. When Communist guerrillas came, these proud owners protected what belonged to them; they drove the Communists off their land. And I know you join me in saluting their courage.

Well, in the marketplace our people benefit from direct and indirect business ownership. There are currently close to 10 million self-employed workers in the United States; that's nearly 9 percent of total civilian employment. And millions more hope to own a business someday. Furthermore, over 47 million individuals reap the rewards of free enterprise through stock ownership in the vast number of companies listed on U.S. stock exchanges. I can't help but believe that in the future we'll see in the United States and throughout the Western World an increasing trend toward the next logical step: employee ownership. It's a path that benefits a free people.

Reuther was one of the first major labor leaders to advocate that major -- or that management and labor shift away from battling over wage and benefit levels to a cooperative effort aimed at sharing in the ownership of the new wealth being produced. He was looking far beyond the next contract. There's a story that Reuther was touring a highly automated Ford assembly plant when someone said, ``Walter, you're going to have a hard time collecting union dues from all these machines.'' And Reuther simply shot back, ``Not as hard a time as you're going to have selling them cars.'' [Laughter] Reuther was killed in a tragic plane accident in 1970, so he didn't live to see the passage of legislation sponsored by Senator Russell Long of Louisiana that provides incentives for employee stock ownership plans, or, as we call them, ESOP's.

In recent years, we've witnessed medium-sized and even some large corporations being purchased, in part or in whole, by their employees. Weirton Steel in West Virginia, as has been mentioned here; Lowe's companies in North Carolina; the Milwaukee Journal; the Lincoln Electric Company of Cleveland, Ohio; and many others are now manned by employees who are also owners. And I want to tell you, in our own privatization efforts here, my biggest thrill was when we made a sale of a railroad and made it on a plan of sale to stockowners -- to people who would be the owners of that instead of to some existing corporate management. The energy and vitality unleashed by this kind of people's capitalism -- free and open markets, robust competition, and broad-based ownership of the means of production -- can serve this nation well.

Nowhere is the potential for this greater than in Central America. Ambassador Middendorf, I'm looking forward to examining thoroughly the recommendations in this report, especially those that deal with debt-equity swaps as a method of reducing the debt burden in Central America. Members of my staff described for me the overwhelmingly positive response your task force received when it floated this idea during a visit to Central America -- that debt payments can be reduced, state-owned businesses privatized and made more efficient, and employee ownership expanded, all as part of a mutually reinforcing plan. And that's an exciting idea. I'd like to think of it as the Middendorf plan for growth and justice. But I hope all of you on the commission will continue to work with me to see that this proposal and the other innovative ideas put forth in the task force report don't get lost or ignored, as so many good ideas do.

Privatization is part of our current Economic Bill of Rights reform effort. If privatizing government operations is valuable for the United States, with our powerful economy, how much more valuable will it be for developing economies to be freed from such burdens. I'm instructing the appropriate officials in our administration to take a close look at all of the task force's recommendations and to move on those that can be put into practice. This effort builds nicely on the foundation laid by the Kissinger commission, the Caribbean Basin Initiative, and the Agency for International Development and the Secretary of the Treasury. I would hope that a dialog with our friends in the region commences quickly as to how this report can be turned into economy-building action.

July 3d I announced our Economic Bill of Rights reform package from the steps of the Jefferson Memorial. Well, the Founding Fathers, Jefferson in particular, did not see economic and political freedom as the right only of the citizens of the United States but the right of all people, everywhere and for all time. Today the free people of the United States and Central America face a great challenge.

I welcome the Senate's confirmation of Dr. Alan Greenspan as a member and Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board. I appreciate the Senate's expeditious consideration of his nomination and the overwhelming support afforded him by the Banking Committee and the Senate. Dr. Greenspan will now be able to assume his post as Chairman Volcker departs office.

Greenspan's experience in both the public and private sectors, spanning the last three decades, superbly qualifies him for this important and challenging position. His years of prior service to the Government, including his tenure as Chairman of the President's Council of Economic Advisers, have given him a broad perspective on the role of government and the operation of the Federal Reserve. In the private sector, Dr. Greenspan successfully practiced his profession as an economist and shared his talents through teaching. Dr. Greenspan will carry on the important traditions of an independent Federal Reserve System, dedicated to stability and economic growth while maintaining the safety and soundness of the banking system.

Throughout our history, an American saga of optimism, hard work, quiet heroism, and steady expansion, the contributions of women have been indispensable to this Nation's progress. From Plymouth and Jamestown to the Oregon Trail and the Great Plains, women of strength and determination helped fashion a new life and a new nation from the raw materials of the American wilderness. Their faith in God, their trust in the promise of the New World, and their love for their families steeled them against the rigors of daily living in a harsh and untamed land. Without their commitment, America would never have yielded up the bounty that was the first hallmark of its greatness.

In recognition of these immeasurable contributions and to redress the injustice of denying American women the right to vote, the Nineteenth Amendment was adopted in 1920 to guarantee political equality, the very bedrock of all rights and liberties, to American women. On this August 26, we celebrate the 67th anniversary of the ratification of the Nineteenth Amendment as Women's Equality Day, and we celebrate as well the role that women have won for themselves in our country's democratic process. Political equality has meant a growing panoply of opportunity for women and accelerating economic growth for America. It has reaffirmed the core ideals of the political compacts that built our Nation and sustain it now -- the endowment of unalienable rights and unique abilities that each of us possesses from our Creator. It has opened the horizons of achievement and widened the paths of prosperity and personal fulfillment.

On this occasion, then, we must rededicate ourselves to policies and strategies that safeguard equality of opportunity and that help us secure the goals that equality serves: healthy families, good neighborhoods, productive work, true peace, and genuine freedom. America today honors women for all they have done, as pioneers, patriots, parents and partners, to build happy homes and a strong society.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Alzheimer's disease is a degenerative brain disorder that causes progressive loss of memory and intellectual function. Those afflicted suffer increasing forgetfulness, confusion, irritability, and other changes in personality and behavior, and sometimes in judgment, concentration, and speech.

The tragedy of Alzheimer's disease has spurred scientists to intensify their efforts to understand what causes the brain to deteriorate. Recently, a research team cloned a gene involved in the wayward biochemistry of the Alzheimer's brain and located this gene on a specific chromosome. This achievement opens new lines of investigation and offers hope that one day we can identify those at risk and develop methods of treatment and prevention.

Until we conquer Alzheimer's disease, we must continue our research efforts, provide the public with information about the disorder, and seek other ways to ease its burden on patients, families, and caregivers. Many people and organizations are already devoted to this effort, including the Federal government's National Institute on Aging and National Institute of Mental Health and the private sector's Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Association, which conducts and promotes research and lends support to families seeking help.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of November 1987 as National Alzheimer's Disease Month, and I call upon the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

I've just concluded a meeting with the joint congressional leadership, and I'm pleased to announce that there's a general agreement among us to go forward with a renewed diplomatic initiative in Central America along the lines of the peace plan prepared in cooperation with the Speaker and the joint congressional leadership. Accordingly, I've instructed the Secretary of State to transmit that document to the leaders of the five Central American countries that are meeting in Guatemala City tomorrow with the request that these views should be taken into account in their deliberations.

Island several months ago, this administration has always supported regional diplomatic initiatives aimed at peace and democracy. The aspirations of our Central American neighbors, the democratic resistance in Nicaragua, and the Nicaraguan people are one and the same: the establishment of genuinely democratic systems throughout the region with the fully guaranteed liberties of free assembly, free speech, free press, and the simple principle of self-determination.

I applaud this bipartisan effort in Congress, and I express the hope that it will produce a peaceful resolution to the conflict in Nicaragua. I urge other nations of the world to join in the support of this effort and refrain from activities that would jeopardize it.

I therefore direct you to negotiate and conclude an orderly marketing agreement and to report the results of such negotiations not later than 50 days from the date of this determination. If such negotiations are not successful, I direct you to prepare and present to me for signature no later than 60 days from the date of this decision a proclamation imposing quantitative restrictions.

Finally, in view of this determination to provide relief, I direct that a review be completed, within 60 days, regarding relevant plans for the operation of the stockpile for the fiscal years 1988 and 1989.

Relief will help maintain a viable domestic processing industry; important because tungsten is a strategic metal, and the legislated national stockpile is based on continued domestic processing capabilities.

President today announced his intention to nominate William Schneider, Jr., to be a member of the General Advisory Committee of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency. He would succeed Colin Spencer Gray. Upon confirmation he will be designated Chairman.

President today announced his intention to nominate William Henry Houston III, of Mississippi, for the rank of Ambassador during his tenure of service as United States Negotiator on Textile Matters in the Office of the United States Trade Representative.

Well, we better get down to business here. I'd like to thank all of you, first of all, for coming down on what turned out to be very short notice. But there's a lot of pressing business before we all leave Washington, and one of the major issues is certainly welfare reform.

I said last year in the State of the Union Address, the principal issue in any welfare reform proposal is whether or not it'll help people become self-sufficient and lead a full life or keep them in a state of dependency. I feel strongly that we're on the right track in proposing the Low-Income Opportunity Act, which would allow States to test new ideas for reducing dependency. We also believe in the need to reform work requirements and to provide training and education, a greater opportunity through work. The GROW program would allow us to do that.

I know that all of you've been under some pressure to sign on the so-called welfare reform bills that would increase benefits and make welfare more attractive. And I commend you for your willingness to follow a responsible path to prevent increased dependency. And, Bob, I understand that your task force has worked diligently with members of the administration to come up with a proposal that we can all work together on. And, Hank, I'm most appreciative of what you offered as an alternative.

Chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, puts one of the most knowledgeable securities law experts in the country at the helm of this important agency. David Ruder is the right man at the right time for this key post.

The budget I submitted to the Congress contains a request for increased funding for SEC enforcement work. I know that Chairman Ruder shares my view that continued vigilant efforts to enforce the securities antifraud laws are necessary to combat insider trading and maintain investor confidence in the Nation's securities markets. Under his leadership, we can expect the Commission will continue with that essential role. I am also confident that Chairman Ruder will continue the efforts of the Commission to minimize the regulatory burden of the securities laws, ensuring that America's capital markets are the most efficient and competitive in the world.

Ruder's more than 25 years' experience in securities regulation and corporation finance assures the SEC of a steady hand as it continues its work of facilitating and improving the operation of our capital markets. We are fortunate that such a distinguished securities regulation expert -- whose career as law school dean, educator, lawyer in private practice, lecturer, and author has for so long been devoted to this field -- is now willing to serve his nation in this essential leadership role for which he is so well qualified.

I know you all think here this morning I'm here to talk about the unemployment rate -- I am, and to make a general point about the economy, as well. Total employment rose in July by 472,000, and to make a general point -- well, and unemployment fell by 36,000. And that means the unemployment rate went down another tenth of a point, to 5.9 percent, breaking for the first time in 8 years the 6 percent mark. And I think it's particularly important to point out that this breakthrough of the 6 percent mark does not occur in a hyperinflated economy as it did in 1979 but is based instead on sound growth and steady, long-term job creation.

Now, the below-6-percent figure is remarkable news. I think all of you can recall there were those who said that low rates of unemployment coupled with low rates of inflation were simply unattainable. In addition, this is another record for the total number of people employed in this country, again pointing to a solid start for the economy in the third quarter, all of which goes to the larger point that I want to make today. Yesterday in this room, the Chairman of our Council of Economic Advisers, Beryl Sprinkel, went through with you the economic statistics for this year and the revised numbers for the past 3 years.

Chairman Sprinkel said, these figures indicate that the economy is performing well at 1987 and performed even better than thought during the preceding 3 years. Our trade balance is better. Employment is growing, and unemployment falling. And after a temporary increase earlier this year, inflation is returning to the 4 percent range that we've seen during most of this expansion. All of this is excellent news for the American economy and for the American people.

They're vitally aware of the importance of maintaining America's prosperity and never again returning to the days of high inflation, climbing interest rates, growing unemployment, and no growth. And that's why it was the right decision to take to the country the message I have during the past 6 months: that deficit spending, tax increases, and protectionism threaten our hard-won prosperity.

I believe this is a message the American people are responding to. I believe they want to check the tendency to overspend and overtax, and I believe that, as they see continued economic growth in the months and years ahead, the American people will support our efforts through the Economic Bill of Rights to institutionalize sound growth and economic reform and to prevent the excesses of big government that jeopardize prosperity.

Agreement is one of a series negotiated in accordance with the Act and has been extended for periods of between one year and 18 months since July 1982. The extension of the Agreement would ensure the continuation of mutually beneficial joint ventures between the U.S. and Soviet fishing industries in the U.S. exclusive economic zone. Unless the Agreement is extended, these operations will cease, causing significant financial hardship to U.S. fishermen.

The President. I'm gratified we meet today in the spirit of bipartisan cooperation and agreement about new procedures that govern the approval and notification to Congress concerning sensitive intelligence activities. I know the letter that I'm giving to each of you reflects serious work and intense work by you and my senior advisers, and I'm most grateful for your efforts.

The measure of agreement that's reflected in my letter demonstrates the vital importance that I attach to cooperation between the Congress and the executive branch in the intelligence area. And on this, I know we all agree. And I firmly believe that the new procedures we're putting in place will strengthen that cooperation and facilitate the work of your committee in fulfilling its important responsibilities. The procedures address legitimate areas of concern to the Congress and the Executive, and they have my full support. And so saying, I shall deliver the mail.

In this regard, Frank Carlucci has presented to me the suggestions developed by the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence for improving these procedures. I welcome these constructive suggestions for the development of a more positive partnership between the intelligence committees and the Executive branch.

Greater cooperation in this critical area will be of substantial benefit to our country, and I pledge to work with you and the members of the two committees to achieve it. We all benefit when we have an opportunity to confer in advance about important decisions affecting our national security.

Except in cases of extreme emergency, all national security ``Findings'' should be in writing. If an oral directive is necessary, a record should be made contemporaneously and the Finding reduced to writing and signed by the President as soon as possible, but in no event more than two working days thereafter. All Findings will be made available to members of the National Security Council (NSC).

If the President directs any agency or persons outside of the CIA or traditional intelligence agencies to conduct a special activity, all applicable procedures for approval of a Finding and notification to Congress shall apply to such agency or persons.

There should be a regular and periodic review of all ongoing special activities both by the intelligence committees and by the NSC. This review should be made to determine whether each such activity is continuing to serve the purpose for which it was instituted. Findings should terminate or ``sunset'' at periodic intervals unless the President, by appropriate action, continues them in force.

I believe we cannot conduct an effective program of special activities without the cooperation and support of Congress. Effective consultation with the intelligence committees is essential, and I am determined to ensure that these committees can discharge their statutory responsibilities in this area. In all but the most exceptional circumstances, timely notification to Congress under Section 501(b) of the National Security Act of 1947, as amended, will not be delayed beyond two working days of the initiation of a special activity. While I believe that the current statutory framework is adequate, new Executive branch procedures nevertheless are desirable to ensure that the spirit of that framework is fully implemented. Accordingly, I have directed my staff to draft for my signature executive documents to implement appropriately the principles set forth in this letter.

While the President must retain the flexibility as Commander in Chief and Chief Executive to exercise those constitutional authorities necessary to safeguard the nation and its citizens, maximum consultation and notification is and will be the firm policy of this Administration.

Note: Identical letters were sent to Senator David L. Boren, chairman, and Senator William S. Cohen, vice chairman, of the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence. The originals were not available for verification of the contents of these letters.

President today met with Senator David L. Boren and Senator William Cohen, chairman and vice chairman, respectively, of the Select Senate Committee on Intelligence (SSCI), to indicate his agreement to new procedures concerning the approval, review, and notification to Congress of covert action programs.

The principles outlined in the President's letter to the chairman and vice chairman of the SSCI were developed over a period of intensive and fruitful consultations between the White House and the SSCI. They evidence a desire for close cooperation between the President and Congress with respect to these very sensitive and important programs. The President responded to a letter to national security adviser Frank Carlucci from Senators Boren and Cohen on behalf of the SSCI. The measure of agreement reflected in the President's letter demonstrates the vital importance he attaches to cooperation between the Congress and the executive branch in the intelligence area. On this there is agreement. The new procedures we are putting in place will strengthen that cooperation, and facilitate the work of the committee in fulfilling its important responsibilities.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 7 day of Aug., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

This week the world will mark a dark anniversary. Twenty-six years ago on Thursday, at one minute after midnight, thousands of East German troops marched out of their barracks and, in the dead of night and backed by Soviet forces, built the Berlin Wall. Today's Berlin Wall is very different from the crude strip of barbed wire that the people of Berlin woke up to the following morning 26 years ago. Changes have included the addition of guard towers, tank stops, razor-sharp metal fences, floodlights, ditches, and dog runs. The wall itself is now 12 feet high, concrete, and painted white so that anyone climbing it will make an easy target.

Yet over the years, one thing hasn't changed. It is this: Although the wall surrounds West Berlin, it is not West Berliners who are its prisoners. As one West German newspaper put it the morning after the wall went up: ``Yesterday, East Berlin was officially transformed into one immense concentration camp.'' But it takes more than walls and guns to imprison the human spirit. In the last 26 years, almost 5,000 people have broken through this barrier and fled to freedom. Some tunneled under the wall. Some rigged ropes and pulleys to glide over it. Some ran trucks through checkpoints. Some simply ran on foot across what officials in the Soviet bloc call a ``modern border'' and the people of Berlin call the ``death strip.'' At least 74 men and women have died in that race for freedom.

June, on my way home from the economic summit in Venice, I visited Berlin and saw the wall once again. And I saw, as I have before, that people have put up small crosses on the free side of the wall -- memorials to those who were killed trying to get over. On one side, the ``death strip;'' on the other, memorials to those who fell crossing it. No place on Earth can you see more clearly the contrast between the prison that is communism and the spirit of liberty that lives in all of humanity.

But does it mean genuine openness to speak, to write, to travel, even to buy and sell? Or is it more of a publicity show? As I said in Berlin in June, the way for the Soviets to demonstrate their dedication to true openness is to tear down the wall. That's not all they could do. At the end of World War II, the Soviets promised free elections in Eastern Europe. Openness should mean fulfilling that promise. Openness should also mean freeing political prisoners, refuseniks, and other prisoners of conscience. It should mean an end to Soviet imperialism, whether it's in Eastern Europe, Afghanistan, Angola, Cuba, or Nicaragua. It should, in short, mean openness in all the nations subject to Soviet domination.

Berlin this June, I said that we in the United States were ready to join with the Soviets in bringing true openness to that divided city. I suggested starting discussions on four proposals. The proposals were: first, to look for ways to expand commercial air access to Berlin so that one day it might be the hub of central European air traffic; second, to bring more international meetings and conferences to Berlin -- for example, United Nations meetings; third, I encouraged a program of exchanges so that young East and West Berliners could more easily visit and come to know one another; and fourth, I proposed holding, in some future year, the Olympic games in Berlin.

So, on this 20th [26th] anniversary of the Berlin Wall, let us resolve to do all we can to hasten the day when the wall is down and Berlin has become a symbol not of confrontation but of cooperation among the peoples of Europe and of the entire world.

I welcome this commitment to peace and democracy by the five Central American Presidents, and I hope it will lead to peace in Central America and democracy in Nicaragua. The agreement makes clear that there is much work to be done by the parties involved. The United States will be as helpful as possible, consistent with our interests and the interests of the Nicaraguan resistance -- who have already stated their readiness to take part in genuine negotiations for peace and democracy in Nicaragua.

The agreement emphasizes reconciliation, democracy, and full respect for political and civil rights. We are encouraged by that emphasis. The promise of this agreement can only be realized in its implementation. We look forward to the day when the commitments made in this agreement are a part of everyday life in Central America.

President today announced his intention to appoint Mary Jo Arndt to be a member of the President's Commission on White House Fellowships in recognition of her devotion and excellence in service to the Government. She would succeed LeGree Silva Daniels.

I am today signing H.R. 27, the Competitive Equality Banking Act of 1987, which recapitalizes the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC) and makes a number of other changes in the Federal regulation of banking. From the outset, our guiding principle in working with the Congress on this bill has been to avoid a taxpayer bailout -- as was the case in both Ohio and Maryland -- for an industry that has the wherewithal to help itself. This legislation vindicates that principle.

I am signing this bill with the understanding that all of the provisions in titles III and IV are to be viewed collectively as working to protect both depositors and the insurance fund itself. For example, provisions relating to exit fees and the moratorium on leaving the FSLIC should not be interpreted in such a way as to undermine the FSLIC's rebuilding efforts. Unfortunately, while certain provisions of the bill should help the FSLIC sell large failing savings and loans to a variety of companies and draw needed capital to the industry, other provisions of title I may still handicap the FSLIC's ability to find purchasers for savings and loans in financial trouble. Counterproductive restrictions should not be imposed on potential acquirers of ailing savings and loans at a time when the FSLIC needs to attract new sources of private capital to offset its limited resources. I urge the Congress to revisit this issue now that the development of comprehensive financial reform is at the top of the legislative agenda.

I am also opposed to the several extraneous protectionist provisions that were added to this legislation. These provisions will deny consumers the services of new limited-purpose banks. They will also place significant operating restrictions on recent acquirers of limited-purpose banks and impose a retrogressive moratorium on the ability of Federal bank regulators to authorize new real estate, securities, and insurance products and services to consumers until March 1, 1988. My willingness to sign this bill is based in part upon its statement of congressional intent not to renew or extend the moratorium on the granting of needed new authorities for banks beyond March 1, 1988, whether or not subsequent legislation is passed by the Congress. It is also my clear understanding that this legislation will not impede the ability of Federal banking agencies to authorize banks and bank holding companies to conduct banking activities permitted under current law.

Certain other provisions of this legislation stand in the way of promoting competition, lowering costs, and increasing efficiencies in the delivery of financial services. While it is entirely appropriate to safeguard against conflicts of interest and to require arms-length transactions among affiliates, restrictions on the merchandising of consumer services and artificial limits on economic growth are unwarranted. These new anticonsumer and anticompetitive provisions could hold back a vital service industry at a time when competition in the international capital markets increasingly challenges United States financial institutions, and they should be repealed.

Act restrictions on securities activities to State-chartered, nonmember banks for the first time, without any showing of public benefit. I note that this intrusion upon the longstanding authority of States to determine the proper activities for financial institutions under their supervision is inconsistent with other provisions of the bill, such as section 201(e) upholding State authority to regulate the insurance activities of State-chartered banks.

This legislation, while accomplishing the necessary recapitalization of the FSLIC without increasing the budget deficit, goes well beyond that central purpose and raises a number of issues that require further congressional attention. I look forward, therefore, to the comprehensive financial reform legislation that the Congress has pledged to present to me early next year.

The President. I am pleased to announce my intention to nominate C. William Verity, Jr., as Secretary of Commerce. Bill, who retired as chairman of Armco, Incorporated, in 1982, has long been active in public service. He's served as the Chairman of my Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives, which produced an outstanding report on creative ways for the private sector to supplement governmental efforts in meeting basic human needs. He has continued as a leader in that area.

I know that Bill, like his predecessor, Malcolm Baldrige, understands the importance of expanding international markets, maintaining our competitiveness, and enhancing our export capability. He also supports ongoing efforts to keep vital technology from falling into the hands of our adversaries. His extensive experience in business and overseas trade makes him eminently qualified to assume control of the Department of Commerce in these critical times.

Before his untimely death, Mac Baldrige served as a principal architect of American international economic policy. He had a vision not only for dealing with immediate issues but for the future of the world economy, as well. I expect Bill Verity will continue that vital role. I know he shares my commitment to free and fair trade and supports our efforts to prevent any move toward protectionism that would bring immediate retaliation and reverse the recent progress we've made in correcting the trade imbalance.

I appreciate Bill's willingness to assume this vital position. Mac's boots will be tough to fill, but I have every confidence that Bill will ably pursue the policies this administration has developed over the past 6\1/2\ years. And I urge that the Senate, when it returns from the August recess, quickly confirm Bill Verity as Secretary of Commerce.

Verity. Thank you, Mr. President, and thank you for giving me this opportunity to do this very challenging job. I've been so impressed with what's happened in this country over the last 6\1/2\ years, where there's been a redirection of effort towards making this country more competitive. It's been under your leadership, Mr. President, and also Mac Baldrige, who was very instrumental in trying to get American industry to modernize itself. And that is beginning to show up.

I'm just happy to have this opportunity at what I think is an historic time in international trade with a trade bill going through the various Houses. I want to make it clear, Mr. President, that all the specifics that you mentioned, I endorse. And I'm looking forward to trying to help you in the job of making this country more competitive.

Verity. It was suggested, and I agree, that as far as any specific questions, I think I should answer the Senate first, if they would confirm me. And I think to answer any specific questions until then would be very unwise.

The struggle to see that promise fulfilled has continued in our own era and, through the civil rights movement, has inspired new Federal laws that seek to guarantee that ``equal chance'' by prohibiting discrimination against any citizen on the basis of race, gender, ethnicity, age, or handicap. We can be proud of the progress we have made in securing the civil rights of all Americans. Racial segregation has been proscribed. Employment discrimination is barred. Federal statutes now outlaw housing bias, safeguard every citizen's precious right to vote, and require that people with disabilities be provided accessibility and be treated without discrimination. The misguided few who use force or violence to interfere with others' enjoyment of their civil rights face swift and sure criminal prosecution.

Despite these steps forward, much still remains to be done to make Lincoln's promise a reality and to fulfill the dream shared by leaders like Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Susan B. Anthony, and Mary McLeod Bethune. The example of these Americans, and of so many other brave men and women, reminds us of the tasks that belong to each of us as citizens of this great Nation. We must work to see the civil rights laws strongly enforced and to ensure that every branch of government -- at every level -- renders justice to individuals without regard to race, sex, color, religion, nationality, or condition of handicap. In this way, we can move toward the day when the rights of every human being to ``life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness'' are secured forever.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Crime prevention is at the top of our Nation's public policy agenda for the simple reason that crime is still all too commonplace. Each year in America millions of our citizens face the stark reality of crime, suffering losses of property and injuries to personal health that exact from them and from all of us a terrible cost. Although new laws, more aggressive prosecution, swifter and more certain punishment, and programs to aid innocent victims are doing much to deter crime and to redress the harm it causes, our citizens continue to find new ways to work with law enforcement officials to prevent crime before it happens.

Passivity in the fight against crime is now passe. Across the Nation law-abiding citizens are banding together and, in close cooperation with the appropriate agencies of government, they are taking the initiative to protect themselves, their loved ones, and their neighborhoods. The effectiveness of this form of deterrence against crime has been proven in community after community, and it all boils down to one guiding principle -- neighbors looking out for neighbors.

Twenty-two million American households were touched by crime last year -- a staggering figure, but still the lowest in a decade. The decline that has taken place is certainly due in part to greater public awareness of crime and increased citizen participation in crime prevention activities. The statistics represent improved safeguarding of homes and property, but their real significance is the improved security and well-being of our people -- the core values any society is constituted to protect.

We must do all we can to make more citizens aware of the importance of community crime watch programs and the impact they as individuals can have on the detection, reporting, discouragement, and solution of crimes. On August 11, 1987, a ``National Night Out'' campaign will be conducted to call attention to the importance of these programs. All Americans are urged to participate that evening by spending the hour between 8:00 p.m. and 9:00 p.m. on the lawns, porches, or steps in front of their homes, thereby emphasizing that looking out for one's neighbors is still the most effective form of crime prevention.

Participation in this nationwide event will also demonstrate the value and effectiveness of police and community cooperation in crime prevention. It will generate support for the worthwhile campaign the National Crime Prevention Council is conducting through its Crime Prevention Coalition. This Coalition, composed of organizations representing law enforcement, business, labor, minorities, the elderly, and various public interest groups, seeks to promote citizen involvement in crime watch activities and, through public service advertising and publications, provides information on how citizens can better protect themselves.

Coalition's campaign features the trench-coated, floppy-eared dog, McGruff, popularized on radio and television and in newspapers and magazines. His message is basic and direct: We can all ``Take a Bite Out of Crime'' by playing a role in neighborhood block watches, citizen patrols, escort services for the elderly and the vulnerable, and similar activities and by taking a few simple precautions.

President today announced his intention to appoint Armando Valladares to be Representative of the United States on the Human Rights Commission of the Economic and Social Council of the United Nations. He would succeed E. Robert Wallach.

The life of Patrick Cardinal O'Boyle paralleled the course of this century and epitomized the finest qualities of a turbulent era in the life of America and of the world. A son of immigrants, he became a true father, teacher, and exemplar to his flock and to generations of American Catholics. All Americans rejoice in his contributions, and we will forever honor this great man who served his God and his country with a profound and abiding love.

The President. Today it's my pleasure to welcome Alan Greenspan back to official service to his country. I say official service because even in private life, Alan Greenspan has again and again devoted his time and talents to public service: Chairman of President Ford's Council of Economic Advisors; member of three Presidential commissions, including the Greenspan commission; frequent witness before congressional committees; guest lecturer at New York University; member of the board of overseers of the Hoover Institution -- and the list goes on and on.

Since its creation in 1913, the Federal Reserve System, with its Board of Governors, has become one of the central institutions of our government. Charged with maintaining the soundness of the banking system, the Fed helps to make possible the many millions of financial transactions that take place in America every day, from the purchase of stocks and bonds on Wall Street to the purchase of groceries on Main Street.

Well, as we all know, economic growth has taken place, and it has been sustained. The economic expansion is now just 2 months short of becoming the longest peacetime economic expansion in American history. For some 5 years now, inflation has stayed well below the rates of the late 1970's, with interest rates coming down sharply as well. We've seen a burst of new business formations, a virtual riot of new technologies, and the creation of over 13\1/2\ million new jobs.

I know that Governor Martha Seger, who has done some briefings for us here at the White House, reported after consultations with foreign bankers and businessmen during her recent European trip that today confidence in the American economy is firmly established abroad, and this represents a source of stability for the entire world economy. I want to express my gratitude to Paul Volcker for the part he played in these accomplishments. And I want to restate my confidence in Alan Greenspan to carry these accomplishments still further, all the while maintaining the Fed's traditional independence.

Here in our own country, Chairman Greenspan will bring all his skill to bear upon the task of promoting our continued economic growth while keeping inflation low. And this is a point that's important to note: Today, keeping down inflation and sustaining economic growth is not an either-or proposition.

Chairman Greenspan will have to work closely with the heads of foreign central banks. With the entire globe becoming a single and highly competitive marketplace, Chairman Greenspan will play an important role in seeking solutions to the problems of developing countries and the massive debt some of them have accumulated. He'll work to ensure an open and fair trading system among all nations. And he will be deeply involved in the restructuring and modernization of the American banking system to keep our own capital markets competitive with others around the world.

Alan, I guess that's the fundamental reason why I'm so happy that when I asked you to become Chairman of the Federal Reserve Board, you said yes. You're an economist's economist, one of the most widely respected men in your field. But you know that economics is more than numbers, that there are crucial intangibles, as well -- intangibles like hope, a willingness to work, and, yes, faith in the future of this great and good land.

Greenspan. Mr. President, Mr. Vice President, and everyone out there, all my friends: Little more than 2 months ago, in the White House press room down the hall, the President announced that he was nominating me to replace Paul Volcker. At that time, I indicated to the President, and today I repeat, how much I appreciate his confidence in me to act as a replacement for Paul, whose career at the Fed has been one with few parallels in the history of this nation's public service. Since the nomination, I've received innumerable best wishes from friends, new and old, from all over the world. I'm particularly saddened, however, that Dr. Arthur F. Burns, former Council of Economics and Federal Reserve Board Chairman and my mentor for 35 years, through graduate school and thereafter, is not with us today.

Sec. 2. The function delegated to the Secretary of Defense by this Order may be redelegated to the Deputy Secretary of Defense, any of the Assistant Secretaries of Defense, and the Secretary of the Navy who may further subdelegate such authority to subordinates who are appointed to their office by the President, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate.

We see the promise of our great Nation exemplified in our Constitution whose bicentennial we celebrate this year. The 1987 - 88 Combined Federal Campaign gives us the opportunity to help others achieve the full promise of America through our voluntary giving. It is important that each of us take visible leadership roles in the Campaigns in our agencies.

Secretary of Health and Human Services Otis R. Bowen has agreed to serve as Chairman of the 1987 - 88 Combined Federal Campaign of the National Capital Area. I am asking that you support Secretary Bowen by personally serving as Chairman of the Campaign in your agency and appointing a top official as your Vice Chairman. Please advise Secretary Bowen of your willingness to serve and the name of the person you designate.

The single most important ingredient in making the Combined Federal Campaign a success is the active involvement of top leadership. Consequently, your personal interest, visible support, and participation are essential. Thousands of Federal employees participate, but many others remain on the sidelines. Make a special effort to encourage all of your employees, both in the Washington area and in all the CFC locations worldwide, to support the Campaign.

The promise of America is contained in our Constitution whose bicentennial we celebrate this year. Let us take the opportunity provided by the 1987 - 88 Combined Federal Campaign to help all Americans participate in our Nation's promise.

You have a record of unselfishness and concern for others that is unsurpassed. I am proud of you all. I am confident that your outstanding past performance will continue in this year's Campaign. While the decision to give is personal and voluntary, I encourage each of you to join me in wholeheartedly supporting the 1987 - 88 Combined Federal Campaign.

The President. Well, naturally it wasn't the happiest of times, and sometimes I'd get annoyed at the interference with what I thought was getting on with the things that should be done. But, Hugh, I have to tell you, I never felt too upset, because I knew I'd told the truth and that the truth would have to come out -- and did.

But how did you keep smiling, because a lot of people wouldn't believe you still? A lot of people question, you know, whether the -- or at least think that you haven't told everything, according to the polls.

The President. Yes, I did. And what used to make me smile a little bit was the fact that I was the first one to tell them about such things as that there was extra money and so forth. And good Lord, I appointed the first commission, and it came in long before this one started with a lot of the information that was new to me and that I had to hear for the first time.

The President. Well, I think that those that were close around me kind of took their cue from me. But I did hear from a great many friends who expressed, again, their faith and trust, and that was very pleasant.

Yes. A number of people have said that the thing that bothers you -- friends have told me that -- were these polls that said the people thought that you were holding back. Now, can you recover that? Do you fully expect to restore the credibility?

The President. Yes. Naturally no one's going to be overjoyed at seeing a poll that finds that people thought you weren't telling the truth. But then one other poll asked an added question, and that was a question of the people who said that they thought I wasn't telling the truth. They asked them, well, you know, what did they think about that? And the overwhelming majority of them thought, well, of course, there are always going to be things that a President shouldn't tell. And it threw a whole different aspect then on that first question and the answers to it.

I see, yes. Did you end this period at all -- or how did you feel about the group of men that were involved in this that had been on your staff? How do you end this period now with your feelings about North and Poindexter and McFarlane?

I can understand why they did what they did and what their motives were, and certainly they weren't bad motives. And I'm just sorry that it turned out that way. The truth that I told the first time, once [Attorney General] Ed Meese came in here and said there was a piece of paper that indicated there was more money than the purchase price of the weapons and that somehow that money was in a Swiss bank account and so forth -- now, all I fall back on is: I am the one who went on the air and told the people that and told the press that in the press room, and that I had appointed a commission to find out what there was to know about this.

The President. Well, you see, in a covert operation like that -- and the covert operation was a response by us to an appeal from this other group of individuals who wanted to discuss better relations with our country. And it had to be covert for their safety, because contrary to what some of the people have said, I was not doing business with the [Ayatollah] Khomeini. In fact, quite the contrary; these were people that were anticipating another government to follow him. And if you'll remember, at that particular time, almost every day there were reports of his failing health and that his days were very numbered and so forth. And they wanted to talk about a better relation than we have with the present government.

The President. Actually, I didn't change my pattern or my schedule much at all. Occasionally, I might have a few minutes and step into the next room and turn on the TV just to see who was on and so forth. And I didn't have to depend on the press. Our legal counsel kept me informed with a summary.

And I think if you check back, every President of the opposite party has been investigated for something or other. But I don't recall any investigations of the Presidents when the Presidents and the Legislature were of the same party.

Oh, I see. I see, you know that. Did you expect when you became President, having seen, of course, what happened to Lyndon Johnson and Nixon and Truman and all of them, as you mentioned before, did you expect that anything like this would happen, that there would be an episode in your Presidency? Were you prepared for that possibility, I guess is what I'm saying.

The President. Well, Hugh, I think after the 8 years as Governor, also, you know that there's always a target painted on the Chief Executive's door. No, the big surprise, however, was exactly what we said. First of all, my reaction when our covert operation was exposed by that leak in Beirut and our press immediately went up with it, my reaction there -- it was just one of -- and I voiced it to the press at every opportunity, and then it was echoed by David Jacobsen, the hostage that came home at about the same time -- and that was, please, you can get some people killed by talking about this and asking about it. And I had in mind the people we were dealing with as well as our own hostages, because when Jacobsen came out, the word we had was that there were going to be a couple more in just a few days. And that was all that was on my mind.

Well, then when -- as I say, Ed Meese was the one who saw that one paper that indicated that there was somehow more money and in a Swiss bank account -- this was just the biggest surprise in the world, because we hadn't set out to trade hostages for -- or arms for hostages, even though I always feel a great responsibility to do everything possible to get back the hostages, except ransom. And I knew that the arms we sold were priced at $12 million, and we got our $12 million. That had come back before the exposure and all. And it was just such a surprise that first -- well, the very next morning -- he agreed with me that we had to make this known. And we called in the joint leadership of the Congress, both Houses and both parties, and told them. And then I went immediately into the press room and then, as you know, a short time later, went on the air.

The President. Well, whether our thinking was right or wrong at that point -- and we were all agreed here that with this now exposed and my not having been told that they just had to leave the National Security Council, they could not continue. So, I thought of that before I thought any questions or anything, and I think they both felt the same way.

The President. Well, it is my hope that, once everything is settled and known, history will deal with it as the big investigation that finally discovered the President was telling the truth from the very beginning.

Naturally, seeing it from the Executive Office side, I believe what's being attempted is a mistake. I think there are some things that just can't be run by a committee of 535 people. And when you stop to think back over history, we have been in my lifetime -- well, in the lifetime of the nation, I should say -- five declared wars. But history will reveal that Presidents have sent military forces of the United States into action 125 times, and without it being a declared war, and on the assumption of the executive branch that it was essential for the security of the United States to do that.

Take it from the other side then: Who was the most help throughout this period for you in terms of morale and guidance? Because, you know, it had to be somewhat of a burden added on to the normal job.

The President. Yes. But, no, from the very beginning, not only the people here in the White House and some outside but also friends and supporters that have gone out of their way from the very beginning to express their confidence in me -- and it was very heartwarming.

Well, it had that piece in column eight saying, you know, the President seemed to be losing steam and this, you know. It was one of those ambiguous pieces, to be true. But anyway, a lot of comment on the feeling that you are slowing down in these last months, not only because of the burden, but just because you're just older.

The President. Well, that would have been true even without this other thing. And that has to be, because I think we've accomplished a great many things in these 6\1/2\ years. I think the fact that we're within 2 months of having the longest expansion period in the Nation's history -- economic expansion and all -- but I think there are things that I will regret all my life if we don't get them pinned down. Well, for one thing, the great problem that from the very beginning that has faced us -- the deficit -- that I had thought at one time we could get balanced. But that was during the campaign, and I had had a group of economists who were working on the plan that we followed. But no one's ever asked me, so I'll tell you. Before the election, those economists came to me and told me that the deterioration had now been so much greater than when they made their study that, no, there was no way that we were going to, in a few years, be able to balance the budget. But we put the plan into effect anyway, aimed at whenever it can happen.

But now with this deficit spending and our Economic Bill of Rights, as we call it -- that is based on some things that are just essential, and that is a balanced budget amendment. And it's a strange thing. When I heard some of the Congressmen talking about their obligation to the people and to do what the people want -- the polls show that 80 percent of the people want a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution.

Governors have and what I had as Governor -- and that is the right of line-item veto. I think those are essential tools. I would like to see those in place and a program in place. Well, the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings program is dedicated to this also -- that is aiming at a point down here where the budget will be balanced and from then on have to stay balanced. Having had that in our Constitution -- I think about 44 States have that in their State constitutions; we had it in California. And I have to tell you, it is a guarantee when you know that as executive officer you are responsible that, when you come to the end of the budget year, the revenues have to have matched the outgo.

And of course, the answer to those people who think that, well, then let's just raise the revenues -- well, we've done that a few times, and if you want to look back in history, virtually every tax increase has led to lower revenues when the rates were higher because of the lack of incentive and the search by people to find tax shelters and so forth. And since our tax cuts have gone into effect, the revenues now are bigger.

And the truth of the matter is, the top earners today are paying a higher percentage of the total tax than they were before, even though their rates have been reduced. Now, that means that there is the proof that those people who are in brackets where they look for tax shelters and so forth, or didn't earn extra money because it wasn't worth it, now with a lower tax rate, the incentive is there for them to produce more, and as a result, they do pay a higher tax even though it's at a lower rate.

The President. But then, sports announcing -- I thought that was my career. And yet I had always -- going through school, high school and college -- I'd always, in addition to athletics, I'd always been involved in the dramatic clubs and that sort of thing and the class plays. And when, out of the blue, literally, came an opportunity to switch from sports announcing to acting -- and I loved that.

And all I can tell you is I fought like a tiger against ever running for office. I thought that was for someone else, that I would do what I had done for other candidates, like my speeches for Barry Goldwater, that I would campaign for others. And when I was beset in 1965 by this group that insisted that I had to seek the governorship against the incumbent Governor then because the party was divided and all, I fought like a tiger not to. And finally, I couldn't sleep nights, and Nancy and I said yes. But then, I have to tell you, we'd only been there a few months and one night we looked at each other, sitting in the living room in Sacramento, and said this makes everything else we've ever done look as dull as dishwater.

The President. Well, there will be some more pruning. And the pruning is also accompanied by -- out of it getting firewood, because there are two fireplaces, which is our only heat. And you'd be surprised at the extent of the woodpiles that we have there and yet how fast they go when you're there for several days in the cooler season and you have fires going in both fireplaces all day long. We'll be doing that, but every morning, we'll be riding.

Speaking of horses reminds me of a story. When you're my age, everything reminds you of a story. [Laughter] Seems that this fellow was a great racing fan and was planning to go to the races on the weekend. And then for 3 nights straight, he dreamed of the number five. So, when he got to the track, he took that program, and he went right to the fifth race and looked down to the fifth horse, and there it was, and the horse was named ``5 by 5.'' So, he saved his bundle till that race, and he bet it all on that race. And sure enough, the horse came in fifth. [Laughter] But that story has a moral: It's that those people who think that the race is over and are counting out this administration better hold onto their bets, because we're going into the home stretch, and they better believe we'll make a fast finish.

There are many items on our agenda, but there are a few that are especially important ones that I'd like to talk to you about today. First, I want to talk to you about how we lock in the gains that we've made these last 6\1/2\ years and how we make sure we never return to the days of high taxes and stagflation.

The gross national product numbers for the last 3 years have just been revised upward, showing that our economic expansion has been even stronger than we previously thought. But what about the future? The stock market just this week broke another record, and the leading economic indicators are rising, forecasting growth and good times ahead.

Unfortunately, there's one economic indicator that couldn't be worse. It's so bad, in fact, it threatens to undo all our economic progress and plunge America back into the malaise days of the 1970's. I'm talking about those in Washington who don't want to discipline themselves. And with present company excepted, Congress wants to spend first and pay later by increasing everyone's taxes.

I have this hunch that most Americans don't agree with all those people who think your taxes are too low; in fact, maybe they think just the opposite. I don't know about you, but I thought all this tax hike business was settled in the election of 1984. The American people sent a message loud and clear, but I guess Washington just doesn't hear. And that's why we have to send another message -- one that can't be ignored. And that's why I've promised to spend not just the remainder of my Presidency but the rest of my public life campaigning for an Economic Bill of Rights that will once and for all secure our economic freedoms.

Once and for all, we want a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. And once and for all, we want a line-item veto, just like your Governor, Kay Orr, and most Governors have, so that we can cut the fat off budget appropriations. And once and for all, we want a truth-in-spending provision, so that anyone who proposes a new program or new spending bills tells the American people exactly how it's going to be paid for. If it's coming out of your pockets, you have a right to know. Once and for all, we're going to require more than a mere majority to pass a tax hike. I don't see anything wrong with having to take either a 60 percent or a two-thirds vote in order to raise your taxes. And we're going to make it darn near impossible, if we can, to raise your taxes.

I signed our tax reform into law, I said that the past two decades have witnessed an expansion of many of our civil rights but that our economic liberties have been too often neglected, even abused. Well, it's time that abuse stopped. And that's what this Economic Bill of Rights is designed to do -- to give our economic rights the same guarantees, the same constitutional protections as our other civil rights. This country was built free and strong not only because individuals were free to speak their minds but also because they were free to prosper. For too long, we forgot that. Let's never let government again take away our freedom to prosper.

I know I read in the paper that there are some advertisements that have started appearing and are going to appear after I leave here and that are going to tell you that who am I to talk about things like this, because I'm responsible for the deficit. Well, could I give you just a little lesson in civics and politics? The President can't spend a nickel; only Congress can appropriate money to be spent. And there are some things I think you should know. The President is required to submit a budget every year. I have never had one of my budgets approved by Congress since I've been there. And if they had passed the budget I first proposed for 1982, the cumulative deficits from there through 1986 would have been $207 billion less than they were.

In our efforts to try and refurbish the military, which was so bad that when I became President, on any given day, 50 percent of our military aircraft could not take off for lack of spare parts or fuel; 50 percent of our Navy couldn't leave port for lack of crew or spare parts -- so, we set out to refurbish the military and give ourselves some strength. Well, more about that maybe later.

But this is the one place that in the years that I have submitted the military budgets, through 1986 the Congress has cut the budgets that I presented for the military by $125 billion. Now, you'd think that that shows that they really are trying to save some money. They added $250 billion to the cost of the domestic programs that I had asked for. So, it didn't exactly come out as a savings.

There's another cloud on the economic horizon. It's the protectionists who tell us that the way to bring down the trade deficit is to raise barriers of our own. Well, they now have their hands on versions of the trade bill which so distort the procompetitive legislation which I asked for in the State of the Union Message as to be virtually unrecognizable and dangerous -- dangerous because it threatens to tear down all the good work we've done to open foreign markets to U.S. goods and farm produce and will seriously set back progress in the new GATT round of trade negotiations. Believe me, I would like to sign sound trade legislation, but I will not sign bills that close down markets and shut off expanded job opportunities here in our own country.

On the subject of economic good news, let me just say, too, that it's the best news possible, that the picture's beginning to brighten for agriculture here in America's heartland. Land values have stabilized, crop prices are firming, and export markets are expanding. Now, that doesn't mean the road ahead will be easy, but it does mean that we're on the right road, traveling in the right direction.

It's clear now that it was right to reject the false solutions offered by some in Congress that would have gotten government even more involved in farm policies, priced our farm commodities out of world markets, and driven thousands of small agriculture suppliers out of business. But we're not stopping here; we're pushing more aggressively than ever to open foreign markets to American farmers. And recently we set forth a bold new initiative that could revolutionize American agriculture and that of the entire free world, the most ambitious proposal for world agricultural reform ever offered. We're calling for a total phaseout of all policies that distort trade in agriculture by the end of the century. Over a 10-year period, we want to see all of our major trading partners opening the borders, tearing down barriers, and ending the export subsidies for agricultural goods. If we're successful, agriculture throughout the Western World will be set free from political controls and interference. I happen to believe that when it comes to farming the decisionmaking shouldn't be in the hands of the politicians, academics, and bureaucrats; it should be in the hands of the farmers.

Now, in the month ahead, I also hope -- or in the months ahead -- an agreement can be reached with the Soviet Union on reducing nuclear arms. We're making real progress on the global elimination of an entire class of nuclear weapons -- the land-based intermediate-range, or INF, missiles of both longer and shorter range. We've come this far because you gave me a mandate, as I said earlier, to rebuild our military strength. And today we're seeing the results of that resolve. I'm optimistic that soon we'll witness a first in world history -- a U.S.-Soviet agreement bringing about the actual destruction of nuclear weapons.

Now, before I go, there's one more issue I'd like to talk to you about today. No other issue could be more pressing. I'm talking about the nomination of Judge Robert Bork to the Supreme Court. [Applause] Bless you, and thank you. He's a jurist of outstanding intellect and unrivaled qualifications, a brilliant legal scholar, and a premier constitutional authority. For 15 years, he served as a distinguished professor of law at Yale Law School. When I appointed Judge Bork to the second highest court of the land, the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, the American Bar Association gave him its highest rating: ``exceptionally well-qualified.'' Not a single Senator voted against his nomination; he was unanimously confirmed by the U.S. Senate.

Bork's record as an appellate judge could hardly be more impressive. Not a single one of his more than 100 majority opinions has ever been reversed by the Supreme Court. In 94 percent of the cases he's heard, he has been in the majority with his fellow judges of the District of Columbia Circuit. The New York Times has called him ``a legal scholar of distinction and principle.'' I don't think any unbiased observer could disagree with that. Fortunately, most Americans, and virtually all of the Senators who will vote on Judge Bork's confirmation, have made it clear they recognize the need to focus on qualifications and to act quickly to give us once again a nine-member Supreme Court.

You know, when he retired, Justice Powell said that it wasn't fair to the Supreme Court, or to the parties with cases before it, for the Court to operate at less than full strength. Well, since last June, that's just what's happened. The approval process for Judge Bork's nomination is already the longest in 25 years. During this hot Washington summer, law clerks for the remaining eight justices are poring over hundreds of petitions for Supreme Court review. Although their work has increased to near breakpoint, the Court is now operating shorthanded. Of course, the delays and the added burdens that have already occurred can't be undone, but what can be done is completing the confirmation process well before the Supreme Court begins its October term. The American people want to see a full complement of nine judges on the bench when the Supreme Court reconvenes.

Now, let me say just one final word on this subject. Judge Bork is a fine man, a very fair man, and a model of judicial temperament. He's a credit to the bench and to the bar -- and I mean the legal bar. [Laughter] And I know that he will be a credit to his nation in his service on the Supreme Court.

The President. It sure does. And that's the man who performed where I'm going. Oh, thank you. Oh. I had the pleasure of seeing some of Mr. Long's artistic work in the log cabin here just before we came out to lunch, and I can't tell you how honored I am and how very grateful I am to have this magnificent bronze.

And while we're here, I want to say just a few words about another man who would have felt right at home in this ring -- the Secretary of Commerce, and my friend, Mac Baldrige. As you may know, he was from Omaha, and the lessons he learned as a young boy in Nebraska stayed with him. He spent his life working for his country and being a cowboy. And who could ask for a better life than that? When I called him -- I'd never met him -- but when I called him to ask him to be Secretary of Commerce, I got his wife, and she said he couldn't come to the phone -- he was busy in a calf roping contest.

I've come to North Platte today because I've got a very important message, a message that I know the people of this State carry in their hearts. It's about America's future, and I've come to say that it can be as big and wide open as the horizon over the Nebraska farmland, as independent as the Nebraska rancher, as resilient as the Nebraska farmer. And nothing gives me greater confidence in America's future than the young people of today. [Applause] God bless them, they're the best darn bunch of kids this country's ever had. I figured there must be a few of them here today.

Getting on with the business of America's future -- that's what we're here for today -- some of you may have seen me on television last night in an address to the Nation. My first priority was always to get the facts before the American people. And that's why I requested three of the investigations and endorsed and fully cooperated with the fourth, the congressional hearings. When the Tower commission completed its review last February, I made a report to the American people, but waited until Congress finished its work before speaking out once again, and that was last night. But now it's time to get down to the real business at hand -- to move forward with America.

I think a first order of business is peace and democracy in Central America. And last week I joined with bipartisan leaders in Congress in calling for an end to the fighting and a commitment to democratic reforms by the Sandinista Communist government in Nicaragua. Peace and democracy -- the two are inseparable. And if any one of you think maybe I'm going too far in referring to the Sandinista government as Communist, well, I've got some Nicaraguan stamps in my desk drawer in Washington -- they carry the picture of Nikolai Lenin.

The aspirations for democracy, promised by the Sandinistas in 1979 -- the commitment to free speech, free press, freedom of religion, free elections, all civil rights -- must be fulfilled. What this all means is that the leaders of the Central American democracies, the Republicans and Democrats in Congress, and my administration all agree -- the key to peace in that region is genuine democracy in Nicaragua. Now, this country stands ready to work with those in Central America who seek peace, but it must be consistent with the interests of the United States and it must be consistent with the interests of those who are fighting for freedom in Nicaragua. Peace negotiations with Nicaragua's democratic neighbors will begin to reduce and balance the standing armies in the region. In this context of freedom, demilitarization, and civil rights -- and only in this context -- a real election campaign, with real, meaningful elections, can take place. We're going the extra mile with this plan, real negotiations with a firm timetable. And all we're saying is give democracy a chance in Central America.

The President. Besides, we've accomplished a number of things in the past 6 years, and I'd like to see them pinned down and made permanent. That's at the top of our agenda, to lock in and cement the economic progress we've made in the last 6 years.

I pledge to you: I'm not leaving office until your paycheck is, once and for all, safe from those who want to tax it and spend it into oblivion. For too long, the advocates of big government have been treating your paycheck, your savings, even your pensions, like they're government property. And they act as if they're being generous when they let you keep a little of it. Well, those days are over. In America, government is the servant, not the master, and we intend to keep it that way.

One of my favorite songs, a few years back, went, ``Sure could use a little good news today.'' Well, today, I think we have some economic good news in America. I'm not surprised if you haven't heard much about it. I figure our economic program was working when they stopped calling it Reaganomics. [Laughter] But now the news is so good and has gone on so long, they don't report it at all anymore.

Sixty-two percent of everyone 16 years of age or older, all the way up, are employed. Just last week, unemployment dropped to 5.9 percent, the lowest level since 1979. And I don't know what it would be if the statisticians counted the near half a million military based outside the U.S., and counted them as employed -- which they are. They've got jobs, but they aren't counted when we start figuring out these statistics.

And these aren't the inflationary jobs of 1979 destined to burst with the inflationary bubble. These are jobs in a strong, growing, low-inflation economy. In fact, recent revisions of the gross national product figures show that our economic expansion is stronger than anybody thought. Come October, this expansion, if it is continued till then, will be the longest in America's peacetime history.

Now, something else is also setting records. Strong, continuous, low-inflationary growth has meant that not only are more Americans working than ever before but their paychecks are growing, too. American family incomes increased for the fourth year in a row, while the poverty rate continues its decline below its level in 1981. Meanwhile, the stock market reached another record high last week and the leading economic indicators are rising, pointing to good times ahead.

They'd produce so much growth that revenues would actually increase, even at the lower tax rates. Well, our critics thought that was crazy. But lo and behold, in 1984, the first complete year that our tax cut program was in place, revenues increased about 11 percent. And they've kept right on increasing.

Counting estimated revenues for this year, that adds up to an increase of revenue at the lower tax rates of over 40 percent. But still, some aren't satisfied. So, they want to raise your taxes again and throw America back into the days of stagnation -- or stagflation, I should say -- and decline.

Well, the American people made their views on taxes well known in 1984. But since some in Washington still haven't gotten the message, let's let them hear it again loud and clear. Do we want to go back to the days of high taxes and big spending?

The President. Well, I just finished talking about why they're basing that. They think the only way to balance the budget and end the deficit is to raise your taxes. I say the way to end the deficit is to lower their spending. When you see those commercials, or hear them, about me and the deficit, may I just tell you that every year the law requires I send a budget to the Congress. And not one year since I've been there has Congress adopted my budget. They have cut, yes. They've cut defense every year. They've cut it a total of $125 billion over what I asked for. But they added $250 billion to the domestic programs over what I asked for. So, somebody's off base with their commercials.

But you know, we've still got a lot of work to do. We have to institutionalize the gains that we've made, so no one can take them away again. And that's why I stood on the steps of the Jefferson Memorial and announced our call last month for an Economic Bill of Rights to be added to the Constitution, so that the American people will finally have permanent protection from the always growing and always greedy demands of big government.

And the first thing it would require is that the Federal Government do what every American family has to do -- balance its budget. And let me repeat what I said last night: If the Congress continues to refuse to vote on our balanced budget amendment, the call for a constitutional convention will grow louder and louder. And, one way or the other, the will of the people always prevails. Now, the Congress could eliminate that long, lengthy, and time-consuming operation of a constitutional convention by simply passing an amendment that says the Government, from here on -- well, we're going to take a few years to have to get down there -- but then keep balancing the budget.

And second, to make sure that the balanced budget amendment isn't simply used as a lever to raise your taxes, we would require that more than a majority must vote to pass a tax hike. On the theory that it should be as difficult for Congress to raise taxes as it is painful for you to pay them. So, let's look at instead of 50 percent plus one being able to raise the taxes, maybe 60 percent or even two-thirds should have to vote in order to take such a drastic action.

Now, some provisions would strengthen something our forefathers took for granted -- property rights. Others would require truth-in-spending, every piece of legislation would come with a pricetag and an explanation of how it's going to be paid for. This just isn't some economic package we're talking about. It's an insurance policy for America's future that can open the door wide to a generation of prosperity, hope, and opportunity. It's also about our basic principles: individual rights and limited government -- in a word, freedom. And that's why I promise you that I'm going to continue fighting for this. Not just for the remainder of my Presidency but for the rest of my public life, I'm going to be campaigning for these things.

I'm told that during World War II the people of North Platte set up a canteen for the soldiers riding past on the railroad cars on their way to the war. And the Government didn't ask them to do it; they just took it on themselves. And in those years -- 1941 to 1946 -- they took in 8 million soldiers, gave them food and shelter and a warm welcome. That's the spirit of this great country of ours, independent and full of heart. And that's a spirit that we've got to keep burning ever brightly, shining from these prairies, from the mountain majesties, from our cities and towns. Shining for all the world to see: a people as good and generous as they are free.

Although the Congress and the Executive branch have designed programs to help nurture children and protect them from poverty, the ultimate responsibility for the care of children belongs with their parents. Ensuring that parents provide for their children is an important goal for our Nation. As I have said, the family is the most basic support system there is, and the most fundamental duty of a parent is to provide financial support to his or her children.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Every year for more than three decades, we Americans have celebrated our constitutional rights and responsibilities as citizens of the United States through the observance of Citizenship Day and Constitution Week. In 1987 this traditional celebration takes on special significance, as September 17 marks the 200th anniversary of the signing of our Constitution.

In anticipation of this occasion, the Commission on the Bicentennial of the United States Constitution will conduct a special observance on September 16, 1987, entitled ``A Celebration of Citizenship.'' On this date, millions of students will reflect upon the blessings of liberty bestowed by our Constitution.

Constitution and in gratefully recalling the privileges and duties secured by our Constitution. At 1:00 p.m., E.D.T., a national and international radio and television broadcast will unite all Americans in a recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. The broadcast will include a reading of the Preamble to our Constitution. It is my hope that all Americans will take advantage of this opportunity to gain new insight into the precious principles of our governing document.

Those principles have stood the tests of time and turmoil. In 1787, we were a Nation of some four million people, living in 13 sovereign States, aligned along the eastern seaboard. The States were ``united'' in name only, barely held together by the Articles of Confederation, an agreement of mutual interest among the 13 original colonies drafted during the Revolutionary War. Once the common enemy was defeated, the general confederation began to unravel. Many of the States had their own army, printed their own currency, and charged tariffs to other States for using their ports and roads.

A convention was called in Philadelphia in May 1787 for the sole purpose of making the Articles of Confederation ``adequate to the exigencies of Government and preservation of the Union.'' Many of the Nation's leaders feared that unless a stronger national government was created, the country would founder, leading to the formation of independent republics or the reaccession of foreign powers. Despite the long odds against success, the Framers were able, through numerous compromises, to fashion a blueprint for a new Nation. In this peaceful revolution, the States transformed their loose political alliance into a Federal union under the first written national Constitution in history.

Today, 200 years later, that Constitution is the oldest written instrument of democratic rule in the world still in use, and it continues to proclaim and to shape a peaceful revolution toward freedom and prosperity for all mankind.

Constitution and in recognition of all who, by coming of age or by naturalization, have attained the status of citizenship, and authorized the President to issue annually a proclamation calling upon officials of the government to display the flag on all government buildings on that day. Also, by joint resolution of August 2, 1956 (36 U.S.C. 159), the Congress designated the week beginning September 17 and ending September 23 of each year as ``Constitution Week'' in recognition of the historic importance of the Constitution and the significant role it plays in our lives today.

President today announced his intention to nominate Donna Hill Oliver to be a member of the Commission on Presidential Scholars during her tenure as National Teacher of the Year. She would succeed Guy Rice Doud.

Wednesday evening I spoke to you from the Oval Office, and I'd like to take a moment today to discuss with you the importance of the message I delivered. After many weeks, the Iran-contra hearings are over. The issues involved have been examined from every angle and in every light. The mistakes that were made have been dealt with. Now it's time for Americans to come together and move our nation forward.

Here at home, there's the urgent need to put the Federal budget process in order, bringing runaway Federal spending under control and achieving further reductions in the Federal deficit. Delay after delay, missed deadline after missed deadline -- the entire budget process is so chaotic it is providing a cover for those in Congress whose aim is to shift resources from the people's interest to the special interests. Not one appropriations bill has been passed by the Congress for the fiscal year which begins in less than 60 days. And just consider what this budget process produces. There's the Federal program that will spend millions to help build luxury hotels, restaurants, and condominiums.

That's right -- fancy condominiums. If Congress is serious about getting back down to work, serious about promoting our nation's economic growth, then Congress should pass a responsible budget that is credible and enforceable. The time has come to enact a line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment.

My nomination of Judge Robert Bork to the Supreme Court comes at the top of our nation's domestic agenda. Judge Bork is a distinguished judge and a man of great intellect and broad experience. Like me, Judge Bork believes in judicial restraint: that courts should interpret the law and that judges should not substitute their own personal views for those of legislators whose responsibility it is to make the laws. The former Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, Warren Burger, has said that he could not recall a nominee better qualified than Judge Bork. Just 5 years ago, the Senate voted unanimously to confirm him as a judge on our nation's second highest court. I believe the Senate should now move expeditiously to confirm him as a Justice on the Supreme Court.

Abroad, our nation's business is no less pressing. We're pursuing intensive negotiations with the Soviet Union on arms control that actually hold out the hope of cutting both sides' nuclear arsenals. In the Persian Gulf and the Middle East, generally bringing about stability and a lasting peace remains one of the most important goals of my Presidency. If we're going to make progress toward peace, we cannot permit extremists to set the agenda or coerce their neighbors. We have to show that efforts of intimidation, like Iranian threats against Kuwait and other nonbelligerent states in the Gulf, do not work. We're a tolerant people, but we do not bow to intimidation, and we've consistently throughout our history been willing to defend ourselves. Our tolerance should not be mistaken for a lack of resolve. We will stand by the security commitments we've made to our friends in the Gulf and elsewhere in the region. Of course, we strongly favor the peaceful resolution of conflicts. We will continue our diplomatic efforts in the U.N. and elsewhere to diffuse tensions and pursue a prompt negotiated settlement to the Iran-Iraq war, and we will press our efforts to resolve the Arab-Israeli conflict, recognizing that stalemate will strengthen those very forces most opposed to peace.

Permit me now to turn to Nicaragua, where we're engaged in a crucial effort to promote human freedom. Last week our administration proposed a timetable for negotiations to bring peace to Nicaragua by opening the country to democracy. Just days later, the leaders of five Central American countries themselves put forward a plan for peace and democracy in Nicaragua. This plan differs from our own in certain regards, but it's important to understand that both insist upon opening Nicaragua to genuine democracy.

Central American friends as they perfect and implement it, consistent with our national interests and our commitment to those fighting for freedom in Nicaragua. Our support for the freedom fighters should continue until a satisfactory peace plan is in place, a cease-fire has occurred, and a verifiable process of democratization is underway. The principles that Speaker Wright and I agreed to are valid principles that we hope will assist our friends in Central America as they pursue the twin goals of peace and democracy in the region.

I have signed H.R. 921, which calls for the cooperative efforts of the Secretary of the Interior and the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) to specify compatible aviation uses over our national parks. In its report on H.R. 921, the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation recognized, however, the potential problems of an agency other than the FAA developing airspace regulations and expressed concern that the plenary authority of the FAA over airspace management not be diminished or diffused. Accordingly, it urged cooperative efforts between the Secretary of the Interior and the Administrator of the FAA in the development of airspace use recommendations for the Grand Canyon.

Because I share the committee's concern, I am directing that the Secretary of the Interior, in developing his recommendations for aviation uses over the Grand Canyon, take into consideration, to the extent permitted by law, the views of the Administrator of the FAA. This will not only assure a cooperative effort but should facilitate the timely adoption of the recommendations by the FAA.

Department as the Secretary's speechwriter in March 1981. Previously Mr. Cooper was an editor for the Waterbury (Connecticut) Republican-American newspapers. He had served as a reporter for those papers for about 10 years and also wrote a weekly political column. During a leave of absence from the newspapers in 1980, he served as communications director for the Connecticut Reagan-Bush campaign. While at the Waterbury newspapers, he won several awards, including the UPI New England Community Service Award.

I am pleased to sign S. 769, the Excellence in Minority Health Education and Care Act. This legislation continues support for four educational institutions that serve predominantly black health-professions students. These schools have made tremendous contributions to our health-care system through the training of black health-care professionals.

This legislation supplements the continuing efforts of my administration to increase the educational opportunities for minority students. In 1986, 27 Federal agencies and departments invested more than $600 million in our nation's historically black colleges, much of it in the form of research grants and projects. Next year the National Science Foundation will fund comprehensive projects to improve the teaching of science and engineering to precollege and undergraduate students in minority schools.

I said at the Tuskegee commencement last May, the history of this country is replete with the contributions of black physicians, scientists, physicists, and mathematicians. It is crucial that more young black Americans follow in their path. America must not be denied the benefits of the creativity and talents of all its citizens.

Perhaps no American could cherish our country's liberty more dearly than those who have defended it and in doing so have paid the price of capture and imprisonment. We take solemn inspiration and resolve from the sacrifices of brave Americans who have endured captivity for their allegiance to our beloved land and our ideals.

We also take inspiration from the courage of the families of those who remain missing or unaccounted for. The fortitude they display in the face of uncertainty is heroic, like the acts of those whose fates they seek to learn.

We as a Nation will not rest in our efforts to secure the release of any U.S. personnel who may still be held against their will, to obtain the fullest possible accounting of those still missing, to repatriate all recoverable American remains, and to relieve the suffering of the families.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Throughout the history of our Republic, many a candidate has promised that if elected he would clean up the mess in Washington. Well, when I got to Washington 6\1/2\ years ago, I found the mess still here. Our Federal Government was weighted down with waste, victimized by fraud, and out of step with modern management techniques. We started on day one to set things right. To begin with, we brought in topnotch inspectors general for Federal departments and agencies, who were instructed not only to be tough on waste, fraud, and abuse but, as my Press Secretary Jim Brady put it, to be as mean as junkyard dogs. In March of 1981, a Council on Integrity and Efficiency composed of these inspectors general was established to ensure that our cleanup operation left no stone unturned. Over the years, you've probably heard snippets on the news about outrageously expensive wrenches purchased by the military and other stories concerning government waste. More often than not, what you've been hearing are success stories -- stories of waste or fraud uncovered and corrected.

In the last few years, we've made enormous strides in our efforts to ensure that you get the maximum benefit out of every tax dollar you send to Washington. Already, over $90 billion had been put to better use since we took office. And I fully expect this trend to continue. Just this week, I signed H.R. 1444, which will improve the Government's tools for weeding out fraud and abuse in the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Furthermore, through Reform '88 -- my governmentwide management improvement program -- efficient new business techniques have been put in place. This includes a new comprehensive cash management system that now oversees the Federal Government's $1.8 trillion annual cash flow. By relying on the existing private sector banking structure, the new system has reduced cost from 1983 through 1986 by $2.3 billion. We've also reduced the Federal publication inventory by one-fourth, at a savings of $35 million. And by using private travel companies, the Federal Government has saved $762 million in its annual travel budget. And the list goes on.

We've also turned up the heat on those who have the means but refuse to pay their debts to the Federal Government. Over at the Department of Education, for example, we found that many individuals -- some in high-paying jobs -- simply ignored pleas that they repay their long-overdue student loans. Our efforts to crack down have paid off. Collections of loans have almost quadrupled since 1981, from $80 million to over $300 million last year. Last month, Budget Director Jim Miller announced that the entire Federal Government will be accelerating the drive to collect the delinquent $68.3 billion it's owed.

But piece-by-piece change is not enough. In 1982 we established a commission headed by Peter Grace -- one of the country's most prominent businessmen -- to set down a long-term strategy for streamlining our government. Mr. Grace put together a team of experts and went through our Federal Government from top to bottom. Their report is now the basis for ongoing reform that should save tens of billions of dollars over the next decade. The recommendations include everything from stepped-up privatization of Federal services to the reform of our budget system. Building on this success, Peter Grace and a group of dedicated business leaders are now forming the United States taxpayers commission to keep the focus on reducing costs rather than raising taxes. I expect they'll bring renewed interest to streamline Federal operations and to ensure that you, the American people, are getting all the government you're paying for.

Getting the waste out of government, of course, requires not just a commitment from the executive branch but also from Congress. Unfortunately, expenses, special interest provisions, are often added to needed legislation. We can no longer afford this costly all-or-nothing way of doing business. The President should be able to cut the fat yet keep the meat of spending bills that reach his desk.

The tool needed to cut that fat is the line-item veto. Congress has the power to enact this needed reform right now. I hope you agree with me it's time every elected official be part of our effort to protect the take-home pay of the American people by getting waste out of government.

National Quality Improvement Act of 1987, which establishes an awards program that will provide special recognition for companies demonstrating high achievement in improving the quality of their goods or services. Improved quality enhances productivity, lowers costs, and increases profitability. These components are essential to the well-being of the Nation's economy and its ability to compete effectively.

Malcolm Baldrige. As Secretary of Commerce and as a successful businessman, he practiced the kind of management the award will promote: close attention to the needs of the customer and emphasis on delivering quality products and services.

I have signed S. 1550, the Federal Triangle Development Act. This legislation will permit completion of the development of the Federal Triangle in the District of Columbia through the construction of a building that will serve as Federal office space as well as house an international cultural and trade center. The largest component will be used by Federal agencies, thereby allowing the Federal Government to vacate a substantial amount of costly leased space in the District of Columbia. Other space will be devoted to a new international cultural and trade center.

Completion of this project will achieve a number of important goals, including: providing high-quality, economical space for Federal employees; consolidating agencies that need to be located in downtown Washington, DC; advancing efforts to reduce Federal office space requirements; and furthering the trade, economic, and diplomatic interests of the United States. The General Services Administration, the Pennsylvania Avenue Development Corporation, and a newly established International Cultural and Trade Center Commission will be responsible for the construction and management of the new building. I am confident that this project will be a noteworthy component of the revitalization of Pennsylvania Avenue in the District of Columbia, which is becoming one of the finest examples of the effectiveness of public-private partnership in the renewal of American cities.

In approving this bill, however, I note that it contains a clearly unconstitutional provision as well as one other provision that warrants interpretation. The unconstitutional provision of the bill is section 5(a)(1), which provides that the Pennsylvania Avenue Development Corporation may not select a private developer until its plans have been approved by the Committee on Environment and Public Works of the Senate and the Committee on Public Works and Transportation of the House of Representatives. Under the landmark decision of INS v. Chadha, 462 U.S. 919, 952 (1983), this congressional approval mechanism clearly is unconstitutional, because the Congress may not make decisions that have ``the purpose and effect of altering the legal rights, duties, and relations of persons . . . outside the Legislative branch'' through procedures that bypass the constitutional requirements for valid legislative action.

I am signing this bill in spite of its constitutional defect so as not to delay further the development of the Federal Triangle property. I do so because I am confident that section 5(a) is severable from the remainder of the act. In Alaska Airlines v. Brock, No. 85 - 920 (March 25, 1987), the Supreme Court held that an unconstitutional legislative veto provision was severable from the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, because the Congress would have enacted the statute even without the objectionable provision. It appears that section 5(a), like the legislative veto provision considered in Alaska Airlines, supra, is not ``so controversial or so broad that Congress would have been unwilling to make the delegation without a strong oversight mechanism.'' Id. at 7.

A second provision of the Federal Triangle Development Act also warrants brief discussion. Section 7 of the act provides that one of the members of the newly established International Cultural and Trade Commission is to be the mayor of the District of Columbia. Only officers of the United States, appointed pursuant to article II, section 2, clause 2 of the Constitution, are empowered to exercise significant authority under the laws of the United States. Therefore, I do not understand the act to authorize the mayor to vote on any Commission matter that would bind the United States. The mayor, of course, may attend all meetings of the Commission and vote on all Commission actions that do not bind the United States or third parties in any way.

In the upcoming weeks, our hopes will be measured against reality, and promises will be measured against deeds. The signing of the Guatemalan peace plan was an important act of faith. But our faith must be tempered by realism, because faith without realism will not end in peace but in disillusionment and a permanent Communist rule that will threaten the other emerging democracies in Central America.

Sandinistas promised to respect your rights when they signed this peace plan -- rights that they have denied you for the last 8 years. They promised to respect your rights of free speech and free association. They promised political, religious, and press freedom. They promised access for all political parties and currents of opinion to the means of communication. They promised to lift the state of emergency. They promised free elections. The Sandinistas now have promised you democracy with the world as witness. Like you, I hope that they keep this promise. But like you, I also know that the civil war in Nicaragua began when the Sandinistas promised you democracy but failed to meet their commitment. This struggle will end when that promise is fulfilled.

Under the terms of the Guatemalan plan, there must be democracy in Nicaragua in order for the fighting to stop. This is called simultaneity. By accepting the Guatemalan plan, it means that the Sandinistas have agreed that the repression must stop at the same time that the fighting stops. The Sandinistas have told us this before, and no one believes the Sandinistas anymore. Simultaneity must mean freedom up front, or no deal.

We will be helping the democratic leaders of Central America and your countrymen inside Nicaragua as they seek a diplomatic solution to the war that has befallen your country, but we will remain firm in our policy. Our objective remains the same: peace and democracy in Nicaragua. Your commitment to freedom and democracy has created political movement and hope for liberation.

For this, the people of Nicaragua and the people of Central America owe you a list of gratitude. I know your deepest wish is to return home to a free Nicaragua. Your struggle has, and always will have, our support, because our goal is the same: democracy.

Until the people of Nicaragua are guaranteed basic liberties, I know you will keep on with the struggle, and the United States will be with you. The journey's end is Nicaragua libre [a free Nicaragua]. We must not stop until we reach that goal.

President announced today the formation of an interagency task force on adoption. He asked the task force to report to him, through the Domestic Policy Council, by November 22, with specific recommendations on how adoption can be encouraged.

We mourn the loss of Bayard Rustin, a great leader in the struggle for civil rights in the United States and for human rights throughout the world. He will be sorely missed by all those who shared his commitment to the twin causes of peace and freedom.

As few men have, Mr. Rustin understood that the struggle for the two is inseparable; either we achieve them both or neither. Mr. Rustin held to this belief all his adult life. This took great physical, intellectual, and, most of all, moral courage. He was denounced by former friends, because he never gave up his conviction that minorities in America could and would succeed based on their individual merit. But Mr. Rustin never gave an inch. Though a pacifist, he was a fighter to the finish. That is why over the course of his life he won the undying love of all who cherish freedom.

But we know now the great powers did agree at Yalta. Difficult issues were raised and resolved; agreements were reached. In a narrow sense, the summit conference was successful; the meeting produced tangible diplomatic results.

The Yalta guarantees of freedom and human rights in Eastern Europe became undone. And as democracy died in Poland, the era of allied cooperation ended. What followed is known to us now as the postwar era, a time of tense exchanges and often dangerous confrontations between East and West, our ``long twilight struggle,'' as President Kennedy called it. And so, 40 years ago, far from ending the world strife and human suffering that so haunted Churchill, the great powers embarked on an era of cold war conflict.

Perceiving a grave threat to our own security and the freedom of our allies in Western Europe, the people of the United States put in place the major elements of America's bipartisan foreign policy for the next four decades. In 1947 the Marshall plan began the reconstruction of Europe. In 1947 the Truman doctrine supported the independence of Greece and Turkey and established the principle of assistance to nations struggling for democracy and against the imposition of totalitarian rule.

In the 40 years since -- for 8 American administrations and 20 Congresses -- the basis of America's foreign policy principles held firm: opposition to totalitarianism, the advocacy of democratic reform and human rights, and the promotion of worldwide prosperity and freedom, all on the foundation of a strong defense and resolute commitment to allies and friends. When this administration took office, our own sense of these longstanding goals was keen, but we were also aware that much needed to be done to restore their vigor and vibrancy. The structure and purpose of American foreign policy had decayed in the 1970's. But as we worked to restore the traditionally upright and forceful posture of the United States in the world and reinvigorate a foreign policy that had maintained allied security for 40 years, we also sought to break out of the stalemate of the cold war, to push forward with new initiatives that might help the world evolve beyond the postwar era.

We sought more than a shaky world peace atop the volcano of potential nuclear destruction; we sought something beyond accepted spheres of influence and tense standoffs between the totalitarian and the democratic worlds. In short, we sought ways to dispel rather than to live with the two great darkening clouds of the postwar era: the danger of nuclear holocaust and the expansion of totalitarian rule. In dealing with the nuclear threat, the United States said it would no longer pursue merely arms control -- the management, limitation, or controlled growth of existing arsenals. The United States, together with our NATO allies, would seek instead deep verifiable reductions in these arsenals -- arms reduction, not just arms control. We sought to do it by moving beyond the status quo, a mere modus vivendi, in the arms race.

In addition to opening negotiations to reduce arms in several categories, we did something even more revolutionary in order to end nuclear fear. We launched a new program of research into defensive means of preventing ballistic missile attack. And by doing so, we attempted to maintain deterrence while seeking to move away from the concept of mutual assured destruction -- to render it obsolete, to take the advantage out of building more and more offensive missiles and more and more warheads, at last to remove from the world the specter of military powers holding each other hostage to nuclear retaliation.

This was the meaning of our decision to move forward with SDI, and I believe it was the right decision at the right time. But while we sought arms reduction and defensive deterrence, we never lost sight of the fact that nations do not disagree because they are armed; they are armed because they disagree on very important matters of human life and liberty. The fundamental differences between totalitarian and democratic rule remained. We could not gloss over them, nor could we be content anymore with accepted spheres of influence, a world only half free. And that is why we sought to advance the cause of personal freedom wherever opportunities existed to do so. Sometimes this meant support for liberalization; sometimes, support for liberation.

In regional conflicts, for example, we elaborated a new policy of helping democratic insurgents in their battle to bring self-determination and human rights to their own countries. This doctrine was first spelled out in our decision to assist the people of Afghanistan in their fight against Soviet invasion and occupation. It was also part of our decision to assist the people of Nicaragua in their battle to restore the integrity of their 1979 revolution and make that government keep its promise of democratic rule. Our current efforts in Angola in support of freedom fighters constitute the most recent extension of this policy.

In the area of human rights, our challenges to the Soviet Union became direct. We observed with Andrei Sakharov that true peace in the world could come only when governments observed and recognized the human rights of their citizens. Similarly, in our bilateral relationships -- cultural and political exchanges, for example -- we sought from the Soviets a new willingness to open this process up to larger and more diverse groups.

And finally, undergirding all of this was our commitment to public candor about the nature of totalitarian rule and about the ultimate objective of United States foreign policy: peace, yes; but world freedom, as well. We refused to believe that it was somehow an act of belligerence to proclaim publicly the crucial moral distinctions between democracy and totalitarianism.

And in my address to the British Parliament in 1982, when I noted the peaceful extension of human liberty was the ultimate goal of American foreign policy, I also pointed out that history's momentum resided instead with the cause of democracy and world freedom. And I offered hope that the increasing failure of statist economies would lead to demands for political change. I asked, in short, for a ``crusade for freedom'' that would spread democracy and promote democratic institutions throughout the world.

I've said before, we believe that such public affirmations were not only necessary for the protection and extension of freedom but, far from adding to world tensions, crucial to reducing them and helping the pursuit of peace.

Public candor and realism about and with the Soviets have helped the peace process. They were a signal to our Soviet counterparts that any compulsion to exploit Western illusions must be resisted, because such illusions no longer exist.

Our foreign policy, then, has been an attempt both to reassert the traditional elements of America's postwar strategy while at the same time moving beyond the doctrines of mutual assured destruction or containment. Our goal has been to break the deadlock of the past, to seek a forward strategy -- a forward strategy for world peace, a forward strategy for world freedom. We have not forsaken deterrence or containment, but working with our allies, we've sought something even beyond these doctrines. We have sought the elimination of the threat of nuclear weapons and an end to the threat of totalitarianism. Today we see this strategy -- a strategy of hope -- at work. We're moving toward reductions in nuclear arms. SDI is now underway. Our offer to share the benefits of strategic defense remains open to all, including the Soviet Union.

In regional conflicts like Afghanistan and Central America, the Soviet Union and its clients have, thus far, shown all too little real willingness to move toward peace with real self-determination for the people. But the forces of freedom grow steadily in strength, and they put ever greater pressure on the forces of totalitarianism.

The paths to peace with freedom are open if Moscow decides to stop imposing its self-styled revolutions. In another area, we found a parallel interest with the Soviet Union in a political end to the Iran-Iraq war. We hope we can build together on this despite our differences. And finally, in the Soviet Union itself, we see movement toward more openness, possibly even progress towards respect for human rights and economic reform.

And all of these developments weigh on our minds. We ponder their meaning; we ask ourselves: Are we entering a truly new phase in East-West relations? Is far-reaching, enduring change in the postwar standoff now possible? Do we have at last the chance envisioned by Churchill to end the agony of the 20th century?

Surely, these are our hopes, but let honesty compel us to acknowledge we have fears and deep concerns, as well. And while we acknowledge the interesting changes in the Soviet Union, we know, too, that any Western standard for democracy is still a very distant one for the Soviets.

We know what real democracy constitutes; we understand its implications. It means the rule of law for the leaders as well as the people. It involves limitations on the power of the state over the people. It means orderly debate and meaningful votes. It means liberation of the captive people from the thralls of a ruling elite that presumes to know the people's good better than the people. So, while there's hope today, there's also uncertainty.

And that's why we know we must deal with the Soviet Union as it has been and as it is, and not as we would hope it to be. And yet we cannot rest with this. The opportunity before us is too great to let pass by. And that's why in the past year we've challenged the Soviets with our own expectations -- ways of showing us and the world their seriousness about fundamental improvements. It's why we have set down guideposts and pointers towards a better relationship with the Soviet Union.

Well, today, I want to propose another step that Soviet leaders could take, a realistic step that would greatly help our efforts to reduce arms. We're near an historic agreement that could eliminate a whole class of missiles. If it is signed, we shall rely not on trust but on the evidence of our own eyes that it is being implemented. As the Russians themselves say, dovorey no provorey -- trust but verify. And that we shall do. But effective verification requires more than unilateral technical means.

Even on-site inspection is not a panacea, especially as we address the ambitious agenda of arms reduction ahead. We need to seek compliance with existing agreements, all too often violated by the U.S.S.R. We also need to see more openness, a departure from the habits of secrecy that have so long applied to Soviet military affairs.

I say to the Soviet leadership: It's time to show some glasnost in your military affairs. First, publish a valid budget of your military expenditures, just as we do. Second, reveal to the Soviet people and the world the size and composition of the Soviet Armed Forces. Third, open for debate in your Supreme Soviet the big issues of military policy and weapons, just as we do. These steps would contribute to greater understanding between us and also to the good sense of your own decisions on the grave matter of armaments and military posture.

The immediate agenda of arms reduction is clear. We can wrap up an agreement on intermediate-range nuclear missiles promptly. There are still issues to be worked out. Our delegation in Geneva has already pointed the way to simplifying verification requirements now that we've agreed to the total elimination of U.S. and Soviet INF missiles. We have also repeatedly pointed out that the last-minute demand by the Soviets concerning West German Pershing 1 - A missiles was without foundation. Well, earlier today Chancellor Kohl removed even this artificial obstacle from consideration. We are therefore hopeful that the Soviet Union will demonstrate that there is substance behind the rhetoric they have repeated so often of late: that they genuinely want a stabilizing INF agreement. And if so, they'll move to meet our proposals constructively rather than elect [erect] additional barriers to agreement. We also need to move ahead rapidly on the goal Mr.

Let me pause and make note of something that will advance the cause of all these negotiations. I think it is vital that Western reporters and editors keep the real record of these negotiations in mind. I note, for example, that the other day the Economist ran a kind of believe-it-or-not type item in which it reminded its readership that it had been the United States that first proposed the zero option in the INF negotiations and first proposed the 50-percent reductions in strategic weapons. I would simply say that as soon as the Soviets realize that attempts to manipulate the media of [on] these negotiations will not work, the better the chances are of treaty documents eventually getting signed.

So, too, as most of you know, we have pursued our four-part agenda with the Soviets of human rights, arms reductions, resolution of regional conflicts, and bilateral issues. All parts must advance if the relationship as a whole is to advance. Let me stress the serious concern about Soviet actions in one of these areas: regional conflicts. The fact remains that in Afghanistan Soviet occupation forces are still waging a war of indiscriminate bombing and civilian massacre against a Moslem people whose only crime is to love their country and their faith. In Central America, Soviet-bloc arms deliveries have been speeding up during the past year, increasing by more than 100 percent. So, while talking about reforms at home, the Soviet Union has stepped up its efforts to impose a failed system on others. I stress that speaking up about such actions is a matter of conscience to the West and that Soviet actions in these areas are being viewed with the utmost concern. And I cannot overemphasize this point.

But let me again note that the progress we've seen in East-West relations flows from the new strength and resolution that we have brought to American foreign policy and from the boldness of our initiatives for peace. We are also seeing a Soviet leadership that appears more willing to address the problems that have divided East and West so long and to seek agreements based on mutual benefit.

Perhaps the final measure of this new resolve can be found in the growth of democracy throughout the world. Only a decade ago, democracy was under attack throughout Latin America. Today more than 90 percent of Latin Americans live in nations that are now democratic or headed decisively in that direction. A recent U.N. General Assembly session on Africa called for more personal freedom and a reduction of government power in order to spur economic progress. We have also seen dramatic democratic gains in the past few years in nations like the Philippines and South Korea. Even places like China have shown an openness toward economic reform. And above all, the old solutions of the 20th century for the world's woes -- solutions calling for more and more state power concentrated in the hands of smaller and smaller elites -- have come under fire everywhere, especially among the intellectuals.

In looking back over these 6\1/2\ years, then, I cannot help but reflect on the most dramatic change to my own eyes: the exciting new prospects for the democratic cause. A feeling of energy and hope prevails. Statism has lost the intellectuals, and everywhere one turns, nations and people are seeking the fulfillment of their age-old aspirations for self-government and self-determination. Perhaps, then, we may finally progress beyond the postwar standoff and fulfill the promises made at Yalta but never acted upon.

Yes, we may, then, live at the moment Churchill once anticipated: a moment when the world would have a chance to redeem the opportunity it missed four decades ago -- a chance for the ``broad sunlit uplands'' of freedom, a chance to end the terrible agony of the 20th century and the twin threats of nuclear war and totalitarian ideology, a chance, above all, to see humanity live and prosper under that form of government that Churchill called the worst form of government except, as he said, for all the others: democracy. This is the opportunity before us. It's one we must seize now for ourselves and future generations.

I am most grateful and most honored. And I thank you, Mr. Sweeney. As I told you, I've been a member of Town Hall for many years, and I know that your impartial programs set a fine example for our youth. I'm thrilled that you are involving young people in this important Town Hall tradition. And if I could say something to you about it -- talk about being deserving -- the thing I'm the most proud of and all that goes with this job I have is when I have an opportunity to visit those young men and women of ours in military uniform.

You've heard their music. But let me also tell you that we have the highest percentage of high school graduates in our military today that we have ever had in our history, and it is entirely voluntary.

You know that in World War II when General George Marshall was asked what was our secret weapon, he said the best blankety-blank kids in the world. Well, I won't use his language. [Laughter] Generals can say it, but Presidents can't. [Laughter] But I've come to the conclusion that these young people are deserving of what you've proposed, because they are the best blankety-blank kids in the world.

I heartily endorse what has been presented here. I'm grateful for the honors that have been done me. But they tell me that a number of you aren't members of Town Hall. [Laughter] And if you'd like to join -- [laughter] -- you can put down my name as sponsor. [Laughter] Thank you all. They told me that I came on from the left and I can exit from the right. That's been the story of my life.

As you know, Chancellor Kohl has made a statement concerning the future status of the German Pershing 1 - A missiles. We strongly support his reaffirmation that the German Pershing 1 - A's have not been and will not be a matter for discussion in U.S.-Soviet negotiations, which are bilateral.

NAC communique of NATO Foreign Ministers -- concerning the sequencing and priorities for negotiations beyond those currently underway at Geneva. As the communique from that meeting indicates and as the Supreme Commander of Allied Forces in Europe, General Galvin, has emphasized, NATO must retain a robust, modern, and survivable nuclear deterrent for the foreseeable future.

Protecting the lives and property of citizens is one of government's fundamental responsibilities. In times of emergency, citizens must have a quick and easy way to summon police and other rescue services. The 9 - 1 - 1 emergency telephone number fulfills this need and proves its value hundreds of times every day throughout our country.

State and local governments have made a commitment to implement the 9 - 1 - 1 telephone system across our Nation as soon as possible. Some States have mandated that the system be operational by a certain date, while others have made much progress on a voluntary basis. These efforts to enhance the welfare and safety of our citizens deserve public recognition and every commendation.

We have much to thank you for. The political and military pressure you've applied, I think, is showing results. The Sandinistas have now signed a peace agreement based on democracy in Nicaragua, and we'll be watching carefully to see if they really comply. Without the freedom fighters, they will have no incentives to implement the measures they've said that they will implement.

We have not yet decided on the format of our next funding request, but we intend to see that you have adequate funding until a cease-fire is in place and a verifiable process of democratization is underway.

The President. It's a great pleasure to meet this morning with such distinguished law enforcement officials who've been active on the front lines of our fight against crime. I'm particularly pleased to have this opportunity to hear your views on a matter that will have a continuing impact on law enforcement and criminal justice long after my administration leaves office: the nomination of Judge Robert Bork to succeed Lewis Powell as a Justice of the United States Supreme Court.

Supreme Court has always had a critical role in the administration of criminal justice at both the State and Federal levels. Criminal cases make up one of the largest categories of the highest Court's decisions. I'm surprised to learn it's almost one-third of all the cases it considers. And that's why, when it comes to crime and safety of our citizens, it's so important for our courts to make a tough, clear-eyed look at the Constitution's purpose to establish justice and ensure domestic tranquility.

His guiding principle is one of judicial restraint. And Judge Bork believes that judges should not make the laws; their function is to interpret the laws based on the Constitution and precedent. It's time we reassert the fundamental principle of the purpose of criminal justice is to find the truth, not to coddle criminals. The constitutional rights of the accused must be protected but so must the rights of our law-abiding citizens.

During his distinguished career in law and public service, Robert Bork has demonstrated a genuine concern for the right of our citizens to live in safe communities and a clear understanding of the problems facing today's law enforcement professions. As Solicitor General, the Nation's chief legal advocate before the Supreme Court, he argued the landmark cases that upheld the constitutionality of capital punishment, a position maintained by Justice Lewis Powell in his years on the Court. Last term the constitutionality of capital punishment in cases of particularly brutal murders was narrowly reaffirmed with the support of Justice Powell, whose seat Judge Bork would fill. It's essential that capital punishment remain on the books if we're to protect innocent lives from the tragedy of vicious criminal acts.

Constitution that would help, not hinder, the search for truth in criminal trials. He argued the Constitution was intended to assure real justice for all citizens, not to foster never-ending sparring matches between lawyers. As a judge on one of our nation's most important appellate courts, Judge Bork has handed down tough but fair decisions that have protected the rights of victims in the society as well as the rights of the accused, and our Constitution, we know, requires no less.

Together, we've made great strides in the war on crime. A key reason for that progress has been the appointment of tough-minded judges. For the past 7 years, Federal criminal sentences have increased 30 percent overall. Judge Bork's nomination is a crucial opportunity to continue our progress in the war against crime. The Supreme Court today is closely divided on many important criminal justice issues. The support given to Judge Bork's nomination by law enforcement professionals like you and the men and women you represent can help ensure that Lewis Powell's seat on the Supreme Court is filled by a judge who shares his support for the rule of law.

In accordance with section 5305(c)(1) of title 5, United States Code, the pay rates of the General Schedule and the related statutory pay schedules shall be increased by an overall percentage of 2 percent for each schedule, with such increase to become effective on the first day of the first applicable pay period beginning on or after January 1, 1988.

In this summer season, most of us would like to forget work, take some time off, and relax. Still, if you're like me, while you're on vacation, your mind wanders to bigger issues than the day-to-day ones -- issues like where we're going over the long run and how we plan to get there. I hope you'll forgive me then if I take a few minutes to talk with you about one of the biggest issues: relations between the United States and the Soviet Union. You see, I had a chance to speak about this a few days ago to a group in Los Angeles and by satellite hookup to another one in New York. I wanted to share some of that with you.

America and the Soviet Union are adversaries, as we have been since shortly after the Second World War. This hostility was not of U.S. choosing. Before his death, President Franklin Roosevelt spoke for all Americans when he said that he hoped the Soviets would work with us after the war for a world of democracy and peace. With this prayer in his heart, F.D.R. went to the Yalta Conference in 1945 to meet with Stalin. There the Soviets fed his hopes by agreeing that when peace came they would hold free and unfettered elections in Eastern European countries like Poland. Within 2 years they broke that promise. Then they began to subvert free countries like Greece and Turkey. Only after that did America reluctantly accept that the Soviets were our adversaries.

Today the goals of our foreign policy are the same as they have been for the last four decades. We stand against totalitarianism, particularly imperialistic expansionist totalitarianism. We are for democracy and human rights, and we're for a worldwide prosperity that only free economies can give and the pursuit of human happiness that only political freedom allows. When my administration took office 6\1/2\ years ago, we found that in some crucial ways American policy had lost sight of these great goals. A massive Soviet military buildup throughout the 1970's had been met with inaction in the United States. The Soviets had added several thousand warheads, introduced advanced intermediate-range nuclear weapons to Europe, and installed their fourth generation of intercontinental missiles, while we simply watched.

Today much has changed. We have built up our military, and the Soviets have responded to our new strength with a new willingness to talk seriously about arms reductions. In the past, arms agreements simply set rules for how fast our two countries could increase their numbers of nuclear weapons. Six years ago I said that this was a wrong goal for arms talks. We should try to cut the nuclear numbers. I suggested that in one area -- ground-launched intermediate-range missiles -- we simply eliminate them. Well, today we are close to an agreement with the Soviets to do just that. At the same time, we have begun work on technologies that could free all of mankind from the fear of nuclear missiles for all time -- a strategic defense against nuclear ballistic missiles. In the last 6\1/2\ years, we have also established a new approach to Soviet adventurism. We have said that America has a moral obligation to stand with those brave souls who fight for freedom and against Soviet-sponsored oppression in their homelands. If the world is to know true peace, the Soviets must give up these imperial adventures.

This week I suggested a number of steps the Soviets can take to improve relations with the United States. They can get out of Afghanistan; they can tear down the Berlin Wall; they can allow free elections in Eastern Europe. And since this month marks the seventh anniversary of the free Polish labor union Solidarity, as well as the 19th anniversary of the 1968 Soviet-led invasion of Czechoslovakia, it is a particularly good time for the Soviets to repudiate force as a means of preventing liberalization in Eastern Europe. And along the same lines, they can stop helping the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua subvert its neighbors.

The Soviets can also open their defense establishment to world scrutiny. They can publish a valid and comprehensive defense budget and reveal the size and composition of their armed forces. They can let their parliament, the Supreme Soviet, debate major new military programs.

President is gratified and relieved that President Aquino has resolved the crisis faced by her government over the past 2 days. The President was deeply distressed by the injury suffered by President Aquino's son and the deaths and injuries of the numerous victims -- both military and civilian -- of these unfortunate events.

President wishes to express his whole-hearted support and that of his administration, the Congress, and the American people for President Aquino and the democratic principles she represents. The President is determined to continue working closely with President Aquino on behalf of her efforts to strengthen democracy in the Philippines.

Your talent is manifest; your brilliant performance in Europe was an inspiration to all of us. I don't need to tell you about the kind of world class competition you were up against or the fact that a good many of your competitors had plenty more resources behind them than you did. But you did have advantages: first, your talent; second, your commitment and determination -- you practiced endlessly, sometimes in Latin or German, and you raised the money for the trip yourselves; third, the wonderful people behind you -- and here I mean your parents, families, and friends; and most of all you had a secret weapon whose name was Joyce Garrett. And, Joyce, I know how proud you are of all these young people. But you know what? I have a feeling they're proud of you, too. Am I right on that?

I think Edward Love said something important, too, about what all this meant to you and to us. He said: ``It makes me very aware that as a person I can do something and share with other people. I know people who use and sell drugs, but I don't get caught up in that crowd. I want to look back and say, `I went to Europe and experienced great pleasure in singing songs and representing my country, my school.''' Well, that you did -- all of you. And all of us -- your families, friends, classmates, community, and country -- are proud of the tremendous job you did over there.

The main purpose of the Protocol is to modify the Convention to take into account the provisions of the Tax Reform Act of 1986. In addition, the Protocol will permit France to exempt U.S. citizens resident in France from French tax on their U.S.-source investment income.

Thirteen years ago, 33 European states, the United States, and Canada signed the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe. In so doing, we and the other signatories undertook a sacred commitment to the principles of freedom, self-determination, and human dignity. The Helsinki Final Act acknowledged the fundamental interrelationship of human rights, economic relations, and security considerations in the overall conduct of affairs within and among states. The Final Act recognized that there can be no true international security without respect for basic political and civil rights; that economic ties can contribute to security, but only if based upon open relations among peoples; and that security and confidence can also be improved through the free exchange of information.

That historic meeting in Helsinki has spawned a dynamic process that we in the United States regard as one of the most important developments in East-West relations in the post-World War II period. The work begun at Helsinki to eliminate the barriers that divide East and West has been carried on in three follow-up meetings during the intervening years. At present we are working with the delegations from all the signatory states in Vienna to advance our cherished objectives of freedom, openness, and security.

While progress has occurred in reducing the tensions between East and West, the Soviet Union and other states of the East have not fully lived up to the commitments undertaken at Helsinki. Respect for human rights in these countries continues to fall far short of the standards set forth in the Final Act, as well as in the document issued at the conclusion of the Madrid review conference in 1983.

Freedom of movement, conscience, and religion are still shackled by unreasonable and arbitrary government controls. Individuals such as Ukrainian Helsinki monitors Ivan Kandyba and Ivan Sokulsky and Lithuanian Catholic priest Sigitas Tamkevicius, whose only ``crime'' was to monitor the Soviet Government's compliance with the Helsinki Final Act and speak out in behalf of political and religious freedom, remain in Soviet labor camps. The free flow of ideas and information from abroad and within Eastern Europe is still impeded.

A few short weeks ago I stood in Finlandia Hall -- the historic building in which the Helsinki Final Act was signed. I reiterated the commitment of the American people to continue to work to bring down the barriers that have so cruelly divided the European continent for 4 decades.

However, it bears reminding that those barriers were erected by the East, and so much of the demolition work will necessarily fall to those states. We are encouraged by recent hopeful pronouncements coming from the Soviet Union and its allies; we await further concrete progress in the treatment of all individuals in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe and positive steps in the Vienna meeting to give those pronouncements substance.

It is appropriate that we mark this 13th anniversary of the signing of the Final Act by setting aside a special day to reflect upon and to renew our dedication to the values of human dignity and freedom embodied in that farsighted document. On this occasion, we call upon all signatories of the Final Act to honor in full its solemn principles. Let us pledge to spare no effort in striving toward this goal.

Senate is scheduled to consider shortly legislation we have long sought to strengthen the Fair Housing Act. That act prohibits discrimination in housing based on race, color, religion, sex, or national origin. I am extremely pleased at the swift congressional response to the call in my legislative message at the beginning of this session of Congress for the enactment of new civil rights legislation to strengthen the Fair Housing Act. Among other things, the legislation extends the protection of the act to prohibit housing discrimination against those with handicaps, one of my key legislative goals.

Pierce and Attorney General Ed Meese that a package of amendments with broad support has been fashioned to further improve the bill that the House of Representatives passed in June. The package ensures appropriate roles for Federal, State and local government in protecting the housing rights of persons with handicaps, improves arrangements for the conduct of lawsuits by the Federal Government to enforce the act, and protects the rights of older Americans.

Thank you, and thank you, Bill, for that most generous and kind introduction. That's the fine thing about this job -- people start talking that way about you, and all you can do is sit there and modestly take it. [Laughter] But thank you all, and let me say a special thank you to Delaware's national committeewoman, Priscilla Rakestraw, and the finance chairman for Bill's campaign, Dick Collins.

We're here tonight not just to hear about a friend of his State and of his nation but to help make sure that one of the most visionary and effective men to serve in this century is returned to the United States Senate in November. And I'll bet you know I'm talking about Senator Bill Roth.

You know, when I think of what having Bill Roth in the Senate has meant to the country, when I think of the landmark legislation he's sponsored and the way that that legislation has changed not only our nation but the entire world, it reminds me of something a great Hollywood producer, Sam Goldwyn, one of the founders of MGM, once said when he got worked up about a script. Sam Goldwyn had a way with words. He said, ``That story is wonderful. It's magnificent. It's prolific.'' [Laughter] Well, yes, wonderful, magnificent, prolific describe the career and contributions to America of Bill Roth. For 22 years, he has served in Congress -- 18 of those years in the Senate. How has he changed America? Let me count the ways.

Bill has been a leader in uncovering government waste. He was a strong supporter of the Grace commission [President's Private Sector Survey on Cost Control in the Federal Government] and has pushed for implementation of the commission's recommendations -- recommendations that went department by department throughout the entire Government. And out of 2,160 recommendations, we have, to date, implemented 1,426, or 66 percent of them. And we estimate that this year alone we have saved about $41 billion. Bill Roth deserves a lot of credit for these achievements.

In another area, the environment, last week the news magazines finally caught up with Bill. Both Time and Newsweek ran stories on ocean dumping. Well, for years Bill has been working to stop ocean dumping and the burning of toxic waste off the Delaware coast.

Some candidates talk about family and traditional values. Bill works to foster and protect them. He led the fight to save IRA's and to encourage their use for college education. He's among the Senate's leaders in the fight against child pornography. And he helped persuade the Motion Picture Association to tighten the rating guidelines for movies that portray drug use.

Finally, of course, without Bill Roth's help, would there or could there have been the Roth-Kemp tax cut? That tax cut ushered in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record. Since our expansion began, America has created more than 17 million new jobs, and the real income of the typical American family has grown by more than 10 percent, compared to a 3-percent drop during the previous administration. Some predicted that Roth-Kemp would launch a new round of inflation. Instead, inflation today is a third of what it was the day we took office. Others said it would take from the poor and give to the rich. Yet today Americans with the most income pay more of our total income taxes than before Roth-Kemp and our subsequent tax reform bill, while millions of the poorest now pay no Federal income tax at all.

Let me give you an idea of what rising incomes and lower inflation, together with the lower interest rates that have come with low inflation, have meant to American families. According to the National Association of Realtors, in the year we took office the average American family made only 74 percent of the income it needed to buy a home. For many families, particularly new families, affordable housing was quickly becoming a memory of the past. Today the average family makes 114 percent of what it needs to buy a home. The American dream of owning a home is in reach of American families once again.

America is in a new era of opportunity. Some have called it the Reagan era, but I could as easily call it the Roth era because Bill Roth is one of those we can thank for more people being at work this year than at any time in the history of the United States of America.

I have to add something here. I was surprised myself -- I didn't know too much about the statisticians -- as to what they considered the potential employment pool in America. It is everybody, male and female, from the age of 16 and up -- all the way up. Today the greatest percentage of that pool is employed -- 62.6 percent -- than ever in the history of our country before.

A certain candidate recently said that if he has his way next January the Reagan era will be over. Does he want to end the era of lower tax rates and higher real income for families, record numbers of jobs, low inflation and interest rates, steady growth, and respect -- not just lipservice -- to families? The American people may have a thing or two to say about that.

America this year has come to a divide in the road. Take one fork and we continue in the direction that Bill Roth has helped chart. Take the other and in 4 years all of us may be picking up the pieces. Today America has peace and prosperity, growth and opportunity. We can reelect them or turn to the liberal alternative. It's no secret which way I want to go: Come January, I want Bill Roth in the Senate and George Bush in the White House.

And this brings me to a pivotal point. Electing a new President is only half of deciding which way America will go. The other half is electing a new Congress. None of what Bill and I have accomplished the last 8 years could have been achieved had we not had a Republican Senate for 6 of those years. So, I hope you'll not only help Bill return to the Senate but help him get a little more company there as well. Think of it as an Inauguration Day present for President Bush.

Each of us can contribute to Bill's campaign in his or her way. The foundation of a successful campaign is hard work and the dedication of loyal supporters, like Priscilla and Dick and every one of you here. Yes, if anyone in America has loyal supporters, it's Bill Roth, and he deserves your support.

We welcome the action of the House-Senate conference on H.R. 442, a bill to provide compensation for Americans of Japanese descent interned in the United States during the Second World War. The bill reported from the conference and passed by the Senate on July 27 is substantially improved over the versions of the bill previously considered.

We are particularly pleased that the bill provides for a measured disbursement of the amounts authorized for the trust fund and ensures that acceptance of compensation under the legislation fully satisfies claims against the United States based on the unique circumstances of the internment.

One of my guiding principles has been to reduce the intrusion of the Federal government into the lives of all Americans. I believe that principle has served this country well. During the current economic expansion we have created over 17 million new jobs -- mostly high-quality and full-time -- the unemployment rate is the lowest in 14 years, and more people are now at work in America than ever before. Our economic policies have produced plant openings and job opportunities. But the Congress has taken a step in the wrong direction by passing the plant closing legislation.

Workers should be given as much notice as possible when a business is forced to resort to layoffs, or to close altogether. Compassion demands no less. But the Federal government's mandating that businesses under virtually all conditions must give 60-days' notice -- even if doing so eliminates any chance to save the company -- is not a proper course. We should not go down the road of European labor policy -- a policy that has resulted in no net job growth in the last decade.

The European experience has proven that notification mandated by law does not create or save one job. Nor does it assist those who find themselves without work -- it does just the opposite. Plant closing restrictions have resulted in fewer plant openings.

Federal law, unlike negotiations between labor and management, cannot anticipate the variety of individual circumstances faced by workers and firms. Federal laws like this one are counterproductive. Unfortunately, some in the Congress have been more interested in scoring political points with organized labor than in saving workers' jobs. To make matters worse, the Senate leadership refuses to even consider important trade legislation until final action is taken on the plant closing bill.

But the national interest now dictates that the majority in the Congress must be forced to stop playing politics. Therefore, in order to end these political shenanigans and to get on with the business of the Nation -- especially enacting responsible trade legislation -- I have decided to allow the plant closing bill to become law but without my signature.

Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), caused by the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), has moved through our society with tragic human consequences. It is a public health threat that has touched the lives of Americans with alarming speed and frightening consequences. It demands knowledge and attention by the best experts in our society. I am today ordering a number of actions to focus the efforts of the Government and private sector on this horrible human problem. These directives will assure compassion toward those with the HIV infection, provide dignity and kindness in treatment and medical care, and require that we inform and educate our citizens to prevent further spread of the disease.

We are today adopting a 10-point action plan to advance the battle against AIDS and HIV consistent with the recommendations of the Presidential Commission on AIDS. It is a wide-ranging plan that calls on the action and cooperation of all levels of our society. As a first step, I am today directing that every Federal agency adopt a policy based on Office of Personnel Management (OPM) guidelines on how to treat HIV-infected persons in the workplace. I ask American businesses, unions, and schools to examine and consider adopting education and personnel policies based on the OPM and Centers for Disease Control guidelines.

I am directing the Attorney General to provide me with an expeditious review of how the Federal Government should provide direction and leadership in encouraging nondiscrimination for HIV-infected individuals. We will also proceed to improve laboratory safety, accelerate drug approvals, evaluate the health care financing system, and pursue a multifocused international initiative, among other steps. I have asked Dr. Macdonald [Deputy Assistant to the President for Drug Abuse Policy] to monitor our response to the Commission's recommendations and report to me in September.

Today we're here to honor a quality that is both simple and noble: dedication, true dedication to public service. When our administration came to Washington nearly 8 years ago, we promised the American people a government that would stop doing what it shouldn't be doing and did a good job on all that was left. Today we're honoring those who have helped us keep that promise. You're the ones who have taken our broad policies and put them into practice one day at a time. You're the best of our senior career services -- the men and women who stand out above all the rest -- and we're here today to show our appreciation for you.

You've taken the chances. You've exercised the judgment. You've found the solutions, and you've made them work. Thanks to you, as well as the agency heads you serve under and many of your colleagues, both political and nonpolitical, America today has, overall, the best run Federal Government we've ever had.

I can't mention all of you and what you've accomplished. But I thought that you'd like to hear a few examples of what some who share these awards with you today have achieved. For example, there's Peter Allgeier, an Assistant U.S. Trade Representative. Under his direction, American negotiators obtained elimination of Korea's import licensing restrictions on U.S. computers, on construction equipment, and on a wide range of consumer products. He's won revisions of Singapore's copyright law and the near elimination of Singapore's exports of pirated records, tapes, and video cassettes. And thanks to his work, improved patent and copyright laws have been negotiated with Korea and Taiwan, and America is far more able to protect its intellectual property in Asia.

Doing something right must run in the family. Stephen's brother Maurice, who's Executive Director for Contracting in the Naval Air Systems Command, is also receiving an award. He's a big reason the price the Government pays for major naval aircraft did not go up one penny between 1982 and 1987. I'm told Stephen and Maurice's mother and stepfather have come all the way from Kansas to celebrate with their sons, and you both can be very proud.

One last example: Dr. Janet Norwood, Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor Statistics. Employment, unemployment, price, productivity, and wage reports are among the most sensitive and significant data that the Federal Government produces. And yet, when we came into office, the way we determined many of our economic statistics was badly out of date. Dr. Norwood has directed numerous improvements in national data, including the revision of the Consumer Price Index, as well as improvements in employment and unemployment data for individual States.

Agency, in which the United States participates pursuant to P.L. 100 - 202 and the Convention establishing the Multilateral Investment Guarantee Agency, is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation is not intended to abridge in any respect the privileges and immunities that such organization has acquired or may acquire by international agreements or by statute.

The President. I have just now vetoed the defense authorization bill in the Oval Office. I think my reasons for this action can be plainly stated, if not seen. The bill would signal a basic change in the direction of our national defense, a change away from strength and proven success and back toward weakness and accommodation of the 1970's.

This decade opened with a weakened national defense, totalitarian expansionism, and growing regional conflicts. All of these trends, as we move toward the close of the eighties, are being reversed. I just returned from Moscow after signing the first nuclear arms treaty in history that reduces nuclear missiles. There's a Soviet pullout underway in Afghanistan. We see progress in settling regional conflicts such as Cambodia and Angola and even in the Iran-Iraq war. Because of our military presence and strong stand in the Persian Gulf, there is hope of a settlement. We're also cautiously hopeful about democratic reform within the Eastern bloc itself. American prestige and power have been restored. We've dampened aggression and promoted peace. And we've come to an even greater realization of how much our renewed military strength has meant to all of us.

Second, the bill would gravely endanger the SDI program. No development has been more crucial to the progress in arms reduction negotiations than our decision 5 years ago to proceed with a Strategic Defense Initiative. The importance placed on this system by the Soviets is evidenced not only by the 20-year-long development of their own SDI but by their actions at the 1986 summit. The American people understand the simple truth, the elementary logic, of having in place a defensive system that can protect this nation from nuclear missile attack and may someday free the world of the nightmare of nuclear terror. And the American people have repeatedly expressed their agreement with this position. However, the way this bill restricts our proposed space-based interceptors would cripple the very concept of a space shield against nuclear attack. And I will not abide this, particularly in view of the technical progress that SDI is making. They say this bill would take the ``stars'' out of Star Wars. With my veto today, I'm putting back the ``I'' -- initiative -- in SDI.

And again, I want to emphasize that this bill would mean unilateral concessions to the Soviets -- concessions that would reduce my bargaining leverage at the conference table at the very moment when that leverage has produced its most fruitful results. It cuts by 25 percent our strategic modernization funding request at the very moment when we're negotiating a strategic arms reduction treaty. It represents congressional micromanagement not only of key strategic defense programs but of delicate arms negotiations. It would set a dangerous precedent of tying Presidential hands in arms negotiations.

I have been patient as the liberals in Congress attempted to erode our military strength, the strength that has provided the basis for our diplomatic success, but I can be patient no longer. Congress needs to get back to work and come up with a bill I can sign. These are issues of national security, and they must remain above partisan politics.

Mr. President, what about the fact that the Democrats have in this bill more money than you, in fact, asked for? So, how do you respond to those who say that this is a political gambit on your part, that this is partisan politics for George Bush against Mike Dukakis, and that you're vetoing a bill that would actually spend more on defense than you had even asked Congress for?

The President. Well, the partisan politics is on the other side. And the fact that the total of the bill is within the budget requirements -- due to the fact that inside they have taken upon themselves to change where the spending is going to take place and remove it from some things and add it to others.

The President. I think there has to come a time when you depend on the experts and the people in the military -- experts and all -- and your own knowledge of what and where the money is most needed in the military, and not on what they've been doing -- for example, not because we know that there is a partisan position in which there are a great many there who just don't want SDI at all. Well, I think they're bucking the tide because we've proven that SDI can be practical and can be a method of protecting us against a nuclear attack, and I think the overwhelming majority of the American people want that kind of protection.

Mr. President, given the lateness in both the congressional season and the political season, do you not now risk getting no bill at all or a continuing resolution that would give you even less of what you seek in terms of defense?

The President. Well, I think we have to recognize that the Senate had a good bill on this, and one that would have been appropriate; and in conference they gave it too many things. And I just think that they have to recognize that we've got to come together and recognize each other's views on what is necessary and what is essential.

Mr. President, are you ready to retract statements that you made when we downed the Iranian airliner? It seems that the report will show, apparently, according to reports today, that the crew panicked and that actually, you know, this sort of thing could probably happen again.

Thomas, United Press International], I've read and seen and heard what is being said about the report and assigning the blame to the people in the radar room who were interpreting the radar signals and all, but I can't comment because actually neither the military nor my office have received the report as yet.

The President. No, and I don't think that we could consider the report final until it has been submitted now. And how it has escaped before this took place -- I have to feel the process has not been concluded.

The President. You know something, you've caught me here. I can't remember just exactly some of the things -- all that we're considering and whether we were ready to make an announcement on that situation.

Mr. President, you have said that this bill is a product of partisan politics, and you've accused liberals of playing politics with it, yet your own Secretary of Defense, Mr. Carlucci, urged you to sign the bill. Senator Warner from Virginia, the leading Republican on Armed Services, urged you to sign the bill.

Secretary will abide by the decision that I have made. He had some questions, and he had some concerns of what might result from vetoing. And I have to say that the preponderance, however, of belief -- and that from our own people in the legislature -- was that the faults and flaws outweighed any of the concerns that were expressed by a few others.

Mr. President, what has been Vice President Bush's role in the two decisions -- yesterday's decision not to veto the plant closings bill and today's decision to veto this defense authorization measure?

The President. Well, I know whether he agrees or disagrees on things, and he has been very careful of whether he seems to be overstepping or not in his present position. But he's been a part not only of these but he's been a part of every other major undertaking of our administration.

On the subject of Vice President Bush, both your plant-closing decision yesterday and today's DOD authorization veto hinged not only on advice and counsel from the Vice President but also on what you and your advisers felt would help him politically. But I'm interested in what your explanation is for his great deficit in the polls. You have gone out of your way to say that he's been an active Vice President, but apparently the American people don't buy that -- or if they do, they don't like what they see.

The President. Well, you all are aware of the power of the media, the power of the press. Maybe it has to do -- something with the fact that for quite some considerable time now, ever since the decision was recognized as final on the Democratic side, their candidate has been getting several times as much space and time in the press and the media than the Vice President has. Now, maybe when our convention takes place and there's going to be some coverage of that, maybe we'll see a change coming.

Do you feel that Michael Dukakis should make his medical records public? He has refused to make his medical records public -- the first official for high office since Eagleton in 1972. He's had his campaign representatives call up -- unsolicited phone calls to newspapers saying he never had psychiatric care. He walked away from a question about that last Friday. Do you think the American people deserve to know whether he's fit to govern by having his medical records made public?

Mr. President, how do you happen to -- that you feel that you know more about what public opinion wants in the way of defense than the Congress, which spent 6 months making compromises and taking testimony from military and other experts? Why do you think you know more? Don't you think the public opinion in this country may have changed from wanting all-out money for the Defense Department to making some of that money be more balanced and go for other programs?

The bill's provisions on strategic defense and arms control undercut the very foundation of our Nation's security and our successful arms reduction efforts -- to negotiate with the Soviets, we must do so from strength. On the basis of strength alone, we concluded the historic INF Treaty to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

This bill would drastically curtail our Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) program, make unilateral concessions on arms control, limit our strategic forces and their modernization, and sacrifice national defense requirements to the demands of parochial interests. It would needlessly concede military advantage to the Soviets, whose military programs are not similarly restricted. The bill would signal a basic change in the future direction of our national defense -- away from strength and proven success and back toward weakness and accommodation. It would reward the Soviets for their words and not their deeds. This I shall not do.

The bill would restrict, reorient, and limit funding for our Strategic Defense Initiative. Together, these restrictions and funding cuts would cripple our ability to fulfill the promise of effective strategic defense. The bill would hand the Soviet Union restrictions on our Strategic Defense Initiative program they have long sought.

It would limit critical funding for the space-based interceptor program, altering long-established priorities for the SDI and delaying unacceptably the development of technology to defend against missiles in the boost-phase, where defensive leverage is greatest. The Strategic Defense Initiative challenges our best scientists to find a way to deter war and protect what we value while threatening no one. The use of advanced technologies to defend -- rather than destroy -- offers the brightest hope for a more secure future. Most importantly, we owe our children an alternative to the current policy of deterrence based solely on the threat of nuclear retaliation.

Trajectory Missile Testing -- The bill would prohibit depressed trajectory missile testing. Yet, the Congress admits that depressed trajectory testing is something it cannot define. So, the bill asks the Department of Defense to define the action, after which the Department will be banned from conducting such tests unless such tests are undertaken by the Soviet Union. This hastily written provision usurps the President's treaty negotiating authority and erodes the Senate's treaty ratification responsibility.

POSEIDON ballistic missile submarines from active duty earlier than we had planned. The action is a vestige of thinly disguised congressional efforts to force the United States to comply unilaterally with numerical limits in the fatally flawed and unratified SALT II treaty. In its current form, it would arbitrarily restrict U.S. strategic force levels by prematurely retiring POSEIDON submarines. There is no similar requirement for the Soviet Union.

The bill would cut 25 percent of the funds requested to continue modernization of our strategic forces at the same time we are pursuing strategic arms reductions. It does not assure our rail-mobile PEACEKEEPER program -- a program critical to ensuring the continued effectiveness of the land-based leg of the triad of forces we have relied upon for several decades. The Soviet Union continues, without letup, its own strategic modernization program which includes both new rail- and road-mobile ICBM's.

Our negotiators in Geneva have told us that the Strategic Defense Initiative and the strategic modernization program brought the Soviets back to the table in 1985. This helped us attain the first real cuts and begin to move even further toward more historic 50-percent reductions in Soviet and American strategic nuclear forces. Bolder agreements and deeper, stabilizing cuts are only possible if we maintain our resolve. The Congress must fully fund the modernization of our strategic forces. The Congress must stop tying the hands of our negotiators in Geneva.

Finally, the bill would authorize a number of procurements that are clearly in the special interest of a few. Although the bill is within the overall levels of defense spending outlined in the bipartisan budget agreement, the Congress stayed within the agreement only by reducing vital programs and inserting billions of dollars for items not needed to defend our Nation. In short, the bill trades vitally needed defense muscle for the parochial interests of those in the Congress.

There are a number of desirable provisions in this bill. In fact, the version passed by the Senate was one of the better defense bills in several years. The provisions for the readiness and modernization of our forces needed for a strong conventional deterrent, the authorized personnel levels, the needed pay raise for our men and women in uniform, the support for multi-year procurement, and the responsible involvement of the Department of Defense in our war on drugs are all positive aspects of the bill.

In conclusion, I cannot accept H.R. 4264 because it would undercut current U.S. arms control and negotiating efforts and redirect funds from critical defense programs. I look forward to receiving from the Congress a responsible defense bill.

The President. A short time ago I was down in the press room, and I attempted a joke in response to a question, and I think -- I was kidding, but I don't think I should have said what I said. But for some of those who were present in that room, I think I should tell them that I do believe the medical history of a President is something that people have a right to know. And I speak from personal experience.

I think that I will say I thank you all for coming, and I want to welcome you here today and begin by speaking briefly about Nicaragua. It was last August that the Sandinistas signed on to the Guatemala accord and once again pledged themselves to democracy. And since then, two deadlines have passed.

American democracies agreed that Nicaragua had failed to comply, had failed to democratize, and called for immediate Sandinista compliance. Then Congress cut off military aid to the freedom fighters, and the Sandinistas have become only more repressive. The chairman of the Senate Intelligence Committee, Senator David Boren, said a few days ago, ``The idea that if we removed all the pressure on the Sandinistas they would somehow then move to peace and democracy has been proven false.'' Well, the fact is that it is only strong pressure on the Sandinistas from Nicaragua's democratic resistance that offers any hope of keeping the compliance process alive.

Senator Boren warned, as I have repeatedly, that Sandinista subversion poses the risk of ``potential chaos in Central America, all the way up to the Rio Grande.'' I believe that the American people want to prevent that from happening. But on matters of national security, the real issue is not whether it's the popular thing, but whether it's the right thing. Standing up for democracy, supporting freedom against communism, is the right thing.

Yes, you do this out of reciprocal interest, but also because the issue is fundamental to you and to all of us. The Sandinistas have tried to eliminate the independent press because they want to carry out the rest of their program under cover of darkness. But despite arrests, beatings, death threats, midnight police visits, and violent mob attacks, the few Nicaraguan press outlets not completely state-controlled have tried to keep truth alive for the Nicaraguan people.

Three weeks ago, after a massive demonstration was brutally put down by the regime, La Prensa's headline told the story: ``Sandinista Police Beat the People With Rifle Butts.'' For that, the newspaper was shut down for 15 days. The church-run Radio Catolica was closed the same day and has still not reopened, and two independent radio news programs have since been suspended.

Well, the original Sandinista commitments to the OAS [Organization of American States], their obligations under the Guatemala accord, and those under the Sapoa accord of last March have been continuously violated. These have been Communist falsehoods told to deceive well-intentioned people. Token relaxations are done to provide a smokescreen; then the regime clamps down again lest the Nicaraguan people believe it's for real. And last January, at the same time that the Sandinistas were again promising their democratic neighbors that they would honor their broken promises under the Guatemala accord, Nicaraguan opposition leaders and a senior editor of La Prensa were being arrested in Managua.

Well, since the signing of the Guatemala accord a year ago, the Sandinistas have confiscated film from television crews, organized mob attacks on journalists, electronically commandeered radio stations to block news broadcasts, denied newsprint to La Prensa, and prevented the newspaper from getting paper elsewhere. Radio news programs, the chief source of news in Nicaragua, have been closed down again and again in recent months; and some 20 were never permitted to reopen in the first place.

And there have been constant threats and acts of intimidation. What greater proof can there be of how these dictators fear a free press than that Sandinista state television has been broadcasting vicious personal attacks on the publisher of La Prensa because they fear her ability to tell the truth. Or when Interior Minister Tomas Borge summoned the director of a radio station to his office and personally beat the man bloody because the station had reported police attacks on members of a labor union who were on a hunger strike. And in a police state, when the head of the secret police beats you, you can't hit back.

Well, when the Guatemala accord was signed we knew it would produce one of two things: either Sandinista compliance or Sandinista exposure. Well, it has succeeded -- the Sandinistas have been exposed. After 9 long years under the Sandinista Communists -- in which Jews and Christians have been persecuted, business and labor oppressed, children indoctrinated, a nation militarized, a people abused, and a region subject to constant aggression -- the Sandinistas' deceit and violence and corruption have caught up with them. After 9 years of lies, broken promises, and noncompliance, the Sandinistas' mortgage is due.

So, let's be clear: The Sandinistas never could have taken power in 1979 had they not pledged themselves to genuine freedom and democracy and, on that basis, received the assistance of the Carter administration in gaining power -- and then over $100 million in U.S. aid approved by vote of Congress. The Sandinistas could never have held power, as they have, had they not continually taken new vows about their democratic intentions. When are the people in Congress who've been lied to by the Sandinistas for 9 years going to get angry about it? When are the people in Nicaragua going to get the democracy that they fought for and that the Organization of American States set as the necessary condition for the government that it helped bring into being?

I call upon the U.S. Congress to keep faith with itself. Last December, by a remarkable 6-to-1 margin, the House of Representatives passed the Byron-Tallon-Chandler amendment that enumerated 33 specific items the Sandinistas would have to honor to comply with the Guatemala accord, 4 of them related directly to press freedom. The Sandinistas have failed across the board to meet the minimum criteria specified by Congress. Unless Congress provides new aid to the resistance, I do not see how that body can expect any of its democratic requirements to be met or even taken seriously by the Sandinistas.

A new chapter in this issue has now begun because we've reached a point where the true nature and intentions of the Sandinista regime are exposed and beyond dispute. From the crushing of press freedom to the expansionist military plans revealed by Major Roger Miranda, we know who the Sandinistas are and the threat they pose in the region. And I hope that with this knowledge, a new consensus can be reached on our policy.

The President. I don't know the exact amounts that are being talked about, but we could begin with $18 million worth of military supplies that are in warehouses -- once passed by the Congress, and now they're prohibited from releasing the material to the contras.

I am pleased the Senate has responded to my call yesterday and has joined the House by quickly approving, by an overwhelming bipartisan vote, a responsible trade bill that includes repeal of the windfall profits tax and many of the elements proposed as part of my 1987 competitiveness initiative. While this bill is not perfect -- no bill 1,128 pages in length ever is -- on balance it will strengthen America's international competitiveness. The bill therefore merits my approval when it reaches my desk.

Prior to joining the administration, Dr. Macdonald was a practicing pediatrician in Clearwater, FL, and a national leader in the parents movement against drug abuse. He was a clinical associate professor of pediatrics at the University of South Florida, College of Medicine, and a member of the Florida Medical Association, serving as chairman of the association's committee on substance abuse. He has been affiliated with numerous professional and public organizations and is the author of numerous articles on substance abuse and related topics.

President today announced his intention to nominate Victor Blanco to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Inter-American Foundation for a term expiring September 20, 1994. This is a reappointment. Upon confirmation, he will be designated Chairman.

A century ago, President Grover Cleveland called for ``prayers and song of praise'' that would render to God the appreciation of the American people for His mercy and for the abundant harvests and rich rewards He had bestowed upon our Nation through the labor of its farmers, shopkeepers, and tradesmen. Both of these Proclamations included something else as well: a recognition of our shortcomings and transgressions and our dependence, in total and in every particular, on the forgiveness and forbearance of the Almighty.

Today, cognizant of our American heritage of freedom and opportunity, we are again called to gratitude, thanksgiving, and contrition. Thanksgiving Day summons every American to pause in the midst of activity, however necessary and valuable, to give simple and humble thanks to God. This gracious gratitude is the ``service'' of which Washington spoke. It is a service that opens our hearts to one another as members of a single family gathered around the bounteous table of God's Creation. The images of the Thanksgiving celebrations at America's earliest settlement -- of Pilgrim and Iroquois Confederacy assembled in festive friendship -- resonate with even greater power in our own day. People from every race, culture, and creed on the face of the Earth now inhabit this land. Their presence illuminates the basic yearning for freedom, peace, and prosperity that has always been the spirit of the New World.

Senate conference report to provide drought relief to farmers. The Secretary said the bill was within the limits of the congressional budget agreement and represented a sound relief effort. The Secretary said the final bill carries out the objectives outlined by the President in his speech in Marion, IL, on July 14, 1988.

President said he was satisfied that the bill would offer payments to the farmers who actually suffer the losses. Secretary Lyng said the bill would provide real hope for those who suffered from this devastating drought.

Reagan has followed the drought closely, receiving briefings from Secretary Lyng on a weekly basis for the last 2 months. The President visited with farmers in Illinois and Iowa for a firsthand look at the problem. The President looks forward to a vote early next week on the conference report and quick passage of the legislation.

I transmit herewith, for Senate advice and consent to ratification, the Convention between the Government of the United States of America and the Government of the Republic of Indonesia for the Avoidance of Double Taxation and the Prevention of Fiscal Evasion with Respect to Taxes on Income, together with a related Protocol and exchange of notes, signed at Jakarta on July 11, 1988. I also transmit for the information of the Senate the report of the Department of State with respect thereto.

Convention is the first tax treaty to be negotiated between the United States and Indonesia. It is based on model income tax conventions of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, the United Nations, and the United States, with changes to reflect the tax laws and policies of the two countries.

It is most desirable that this Convention, together with the related Protocol and exchange of notes, be considered by the Senate as soon as possible and that the Senate give advice and consent to ratification.

I also have asked American businesses, unions, and schools to examine and consider adopting education and personnel management policies based on the OPM and the Centers for Disease Control (CDC) guidelines.

Many agencies have already adopted policies based on the OPM guidelines. If your agency has not already done so, you should proceed to do so. The Office of Personnel Management is available to answer questions or provide any needed assistance. The Justice Department and the Department of Health and Human Services offer additional sources of information and assistance.

To further encourage businesses, unions, and schools as well as housing projects, correctional facilities, and others to adopt policies based on OPM and CDC guidelines and provide the education that is vital to effective implementation, I also ask each of you to communicate through your programs the value of this approach.

I am directing Donald Ian Macdonald, Deputy Assistant to the President for Drug Abuse Policy, to monitor progress on our response to the Commission's Report and provide me with status reports in September and December, 1988. Please provide Dr. Macdonald with appropriate information about your progress.

State, local, and private groups to encourage them to adopt the specific public health measures discussed in the Commission Report, such as increased counseling and testing, reporting of HIV infection, partner notification, and health care worker safety. One conference should address restrictive measures and criminal statutes directed to HIV-infected persons who knowingly persist in maintaining behaviors that transmit their infection. Another possible topic is the serious problem of neighborhood resistance to facilities for the care of HIV patients, drug abusers, and group homes for HIV-infected infants and children.

Increase the number of community-based educational programs, especially programs directed to those women and members of minority groups who are at highest risk of HIV infection. These programs, and especially those directed to youth, should place greater emphasis on my Principles for AIDS Education, especially those encouraging individuals to take responsibility for their efforts to prevent the spread of HIV infection. Please collaborate with the Department of Education in developing youth-oriented programs.

Implement actions within the next 45 days that address the blood safety issues raised by the Commission. This plan should address: (a) the prompt notification of transfusion recipients who are at increased risk of HIV infection; (b) steps to improve HIV laboratory quality and HIV screening tests; and, (c) ways to encourage the use of autologous transfusions in appropriate circumstances.

Implement actions within the next 60 days to improve and accelerate further the process for development, evaluation, approval, and distribution of HIV-related vaccines, drugs, and devices. This plan should draw upon research of Federal and State governments, the private sector, academia, and national laboratories.

Provide me, within 120 days, with an assessment of private incentives for development and marketing of HIV products, including an evaluation of the need, if any, to have Federal authority with which to offer increased incentives in exchange for royalties, licenses, or pricing concessions. This assessment should take into consideration solutions proposed in the February 1986 report of the Tort Policy Working Group. In doing this assessment, please consult with the Departments of Justice and Defense.

Conduct specific studies of ways to better promote out-of-hospital and case-managed care; to encourage States to establish insurance risk pools for medically uninsurable persons; and to increase the responsiveness of the public health and health services system to HIV-infected infants, children, adolescents, and to low-income disabled individuals.

To carry this out, please provide me with an expeditious review and response to the Commission's recommendations on how the Federal government should provide direction and leadership in encouraging nondiscrimination for HIV-infected individuals, including a review of current Federal and State laws in this area.

This plan includes developing a multi-focused international initiative involving: encouragement and assistance to international HIV efforts, with emphasis on less-developed countries; a heightened U.S. commitment to international technical assistance within established technology transfer laws; and the development of a 3-year plan for international efforts against HIV infection.

Management, and the Department of Health and Human Services to ensure that HIV activities included in the FY 1989 and FY 1990 budgets reflect appropriate funding, personnel levels, and office and laboratory space. The budget, as well as other management initiatives, should also address the removal of both administrative and statutory impediments to efficient use of these resources including grant, contract, and hiring procedures. OMB should take a positive role in removing any unnecessary administrative and management impediments to the agencies' attack on HIV infection.

I have approved a 10-point action plan to advance the national and international response to the public health threat caused by the Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) infection and the AIDS epidemic. These strong measures require compassion, cooperation, and commitment from all levels of government and all segments of society.

It is imperative that action and progress continue in the Federal government and in the private sector, as well as throughout the Nation. Those infected with the HIV must be treated with dignity and compassion as our health systems accelerate their response to the infection. To this end, my initiatives direct that every Federal agency adopt policies and guidelines on compassionate treatment of HIV-infected persons in the workplace. I ask that unions, schools, businesses, and private citizens consider adopting similar guidelines. The 10-point action plan is consistent with the fine work and recommendations of the President's Commission, which has moved the Nation forward in its understanding of the HIV infection and AIDS.

I now ask the Congress to take another important step forward; I ask you to enact the FY 1989 appropriations for HIV activities as expeditiously as possible. I further call on the Congress to adopt the FY 1990 budget request regarding HIV measures as soon as possible after the budget is submitted.

It is imperative to the future of our Nation that we move with compassion and skill to ease the tremendous human, social, and economic costs caused by the HIV infection and AIDS. I know we can work together in this matter of tremendous concern and priority for all Americans.

Your letter of today wasn't entirely unexpected, but I have to admit to mixed feelings. After all, you've been with me for more than eight years now as a trusted friend and adviser. But you're going on to something of fundamental importance -- helping to elect George Bush as the next President of the United States.

You and I first met when we opened Texas campaign offices for the 1972 Presidential election. Later, I was somewhat surprised to learn of your grandfather's admonition to: ``Work hard, study, and keep out of politics.'' His view represented a healthy strain of American skepticism about the potential pitfalls of involvement with politics. But in your career you have set an important example: You have clearly demonstrated that the best of the political arts can be combined with first-class professionalism in the effective pursuit of America's interests.

Immediately after your election victory almost eight years ago, you broke the mold of convention. You named as your White House Chief of Staff the former campaign manager of your last competitor in the primary campaign. In doing so, you not only surprised most political and governmental observers, you shocked me as well.

Thanks to your willingness to entrust me with responsibility, I was able to participate directly in what you rightly termed a New Beginning. In your first term, I was able to share in the euphoric sense of victory as your economic program was enacted; in the renewed sense of pride as respect for America was restored at home and abroad; and in appreciation for your very special bond with the American people -- who gave you an extraordinary vote of confidence, reelecting you with a forty-nine state electoral majority.

In your second term, you honored me again by entrusting me with responsibility as your Secretary of the Treasury. You thus afforded me a special opportunity to help formulate and implement economic policy in a challenging historical context. I am particularly grateful for having had the opportunity to help advance three of your initiatives that I believe will be widely judged to have lasting significance: in domestic economic policy, historical tax reform; and in international economic policy, a new system of economic policy coordination endorsed by the Heads of State and Government at several annual Economic Summits and a Free Trade Agreement between the U.S. and Canada, the world's two largest trading partners.

I have alluded to but a few of the achievements that have made me, like so many people, proud to be associated with your Presidency. You have achieved the first successful two-term presidency in almost three decades. I am confident that historians will view the Reagan era as one in which America refound her pride, her strength, her confidence and her proper direction -- for which, of course, we must be all deeply thankful to you.

But, as you know, the Vice President has asked that I assume the Chairmanship of his Presidential election campaign. And it does seem to me that in seeking to advance your Vice President's candidacy, I could best help insure the survival of your legacy and assure that your remarkable contributions are extended on toward the twenty-first century. I therefore respectfully request that you accept my resignation as Secretary of the Treasury -- and propose that this resignation be effective on August 17 in order that I might assume my new responsibilities upon the Vice President's nomination for the Presidency at our party's National Convention.

In a way, it would thus seem that I might go out where I came in. But I have been forever enriched by the experience you have afforded me. And, of course, the world has changed substantially in the intervening almost eight years. Happily, that change has been for the better. Now, the challenge is to carry forward the progress you have fostered -- and to build upon it. I seek to help meet that challenge with an image of your bold and effective leadership etched forever in my mind -- and with appreciation for your warmth and kindness deep in my heart.

The changes we brought about in America required the dedication and hard work of a massive team of people. But Jim Baker has helped lead the charge since he strode into my campaign in his cowboy boots in the summer of 1980. He's taken his licks and earned his stripes. And, Jim, if there ever was a Reaganite, you're it.

Jim's management, organization, and savvy were essential to the enormous success of the 1980 campaign. As Chief of Staff throughout my first term, those same skills were turned to governing. He was at my side as we delivered on our promises to the people: cutting and reforming taxes, reducing regulations, restraining the growth of spending, rebuilding America's defenses, and becoming once again a proud force for freedom around the world. Jim managed the legislative process that produced, among other victories, the historic Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 and the Social Security Compromise of 1983 that rescued the system.

Treasury Secretary, Jim ushered in the tax reform everyone had said was impossible. He brought about a new and better system of international economic policy coordination and led the effort to achieve a free trade agreement between the United States and Canada.

Jim is leaving to become chairman of George Bush's Presidential campaign. And as you go, let me tell you this: You're a friend whom I will miss. You've been a secret of our success. Now, Jim, go do it for George.

I'm pleased to be able to announce that I will nominate such an able successor as Nick Brady. Nick has answered my call 5 times before. He also served as the United States Senator from New Jersey and has been a leader in the investment community. I cannot imagine anyone more qualified to step in as Treasury Secretary. And once confirmed, he will become the chief economic spokesman for my administration. Nick's sure hand at the helm would ensure the steady continuation of the economic policies that have brought about the longest economic recovery in our history and job opportunities that have resulted in the lowest unemployment rate in 14 years.

The theme of this administration has been: ``Others talk, we deliver.'' Jim and Nick are doers who share my vision of what can be, and I'm proud and grateful for their help. Jim, I wish you luck. And, Nick, welcome to what just might be the most active 6 months of this administration.

Baker. Thank you very much, Mr. President. After your election victory almost 8 years ago, I think it's fair to say that you broke the mold of convention. You named as your White House Chief of Staff the former campaign manager of your last competitor in the primary campaign. In doing so, you not only surprised most political and governmental observers, you shocked me as well. But at the same time, you gave me an opportunity to serve for which I will always be profoundly grateful. Thanks to your willingness to entrust me with responsibility, I was able to participate directly in what you rightly termed a new beginning.

You have achieved, Mr. President, the first successful two-term Presidency in almost three decades. Mr. President, I'm confident that historians will view the Reagan era as one in which America refound her pride, her strength, her confidence, and her proper direction, for which, of course, we must all be deeply thankful to you.

You know, I feel there's no way I can fully repay you for the trust and the kindness which you have shown me over the years. But as you've noted, the Vice President has asked that I assume the chairmanship of his Presidential election campaign. And it does seem to me that in seeking to advance your Vice President's candidacy I can best help ensure the survival of your legacy and assure that your remarkable contributions are extended on toward the 21st century. The challenge, of course, is to carry forward the progress that you have fostered and to build upon that progress. I seek to help meet that challenge, with an image of your effective leadership etched forever in my mind and with appreciation for your warmth and your kindness deep in my heart.

Brady. Mr. President, I'm honored by your confidence. And I'm proud, subject to confirmation by the Senate, to serve in your Cabinet. Your administration has brought to this country the longest sustained period of prosperity in recent years. Under Jim Baker's firm hand, the United States has reestablished itself as a leader in world financial circles. I look forward to continuing this progress, serving you and the American people. Thank you.

Wednesday of this past week, I took a dramatic step, one that I must admit gave me no pleasure: I vetoed the defense authorization bill. As it stood, the defense bill that Congress sent me would have made unilateral concessions to the Soviets at the very moment when we're trying to achieve a strategic arms reduction treaty. I could not in good conscience have done anything other than mark that bill ``veto'' and send it right back.

Permit me to discuss with you for a moment just what's at stake in this whole matter of the defense bill. And in doing so, it's important to begin with some historical background. You see, it was just 8 years ago that America's defenses were in a pitiable state: weaker, relative to the threats we faced, than at any time in decades. We had airplanes that couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. Our Navy had declined from more than a thousand battle-ready ships to fewer than 500.

Among our men and women in uniform, morale was understandably low. And yet at the same time, the Soviet Union was embarked upon a massive arms buildup, enlarging its Armed Forces on land, sea, and air. The Soviet Union had invaded Afghanistan. It was backing Communist expansion in Africa, in Asia, and, yes, with the Sandinistas in Nicaragua, in our hemisphere. The trend was clear: American power and influence were declining, while the power of the totalitarian world was growing greater and greater. The implications for the cause of freedom, for the cause of peace, were grim. The trend had to be reversed. During these last 8 years, we've done just that -- restoring America's strength.

The results? Well, today the Soviets are withdrawing from Afghanistan. We're seeing progress in settling regional conflicts. And not long ago, an American President returned from a successful summit in Moscow, having earlier signed the first treaty in history that actually reduces nuclear arsenals. By the way, if we had listened to those who wanted to stop the deployment of our INF missiles in Europe, the so-called ``freeze movement,'' we would have thrown away the bargaining leverage that forced the Soviets to return to the negotiating table. We would not have signed the INF treaty in Washington, and Soviet SS - 20 missiles would still be pointed at our allies.

This brings me back to the defense bill that I just vetoed. You see, if I had accepted that bill, it would have undermined the strength we've worked so hard to restore, in time jeopardizing all our remarkable diplomatic advances.

Congress' defense bill represented an all but open attempt to block our Strategic Defense Initiative, or, as we call it, SDI. Yet no development has been of greater importance in our strategic arms negotiations with the Soviets than our decision to proceed with SDI. The idea of SDI is simple: to give us the advanced technologies necessary to defend us and our allies from attack by nuclear-armed ballistic missiles. Some said it would take years to develop such a technologically sophisticated defense system. We said, All the more reason to get started right now. And in fact, as SDI has gone forward, overall progress has taken place even faster than we had hoped.

Congress wants to cut our budget request for SDI deeply. Congress also wants to cut all requests for funding one of the most promising SDI technologies, the space-based interceptor program, by over 70 percent. But it's not just the damage done to SDI's funding and space component that concerns me. From requirements for unilateral disarmament, missile testing, the bill represents an attempt by Congress to handcuff the President in our arms reduction negotiations with the Soviets. And this kind of unilateral concession to the Soviets could set back all the progress we've made on the arms reduction front.

Now that I've vetoed the defense bill, there's talk on Capitol Hill about producing an even worse defense bill as an act of political retribution. Well, let me ask you: What could be more deplorable than to use the defense of this nation as a political pawn? It won't happen, not if I have anything to say about it. As long as I'm President, our nation's defenses, including our strategic defenses, will remain above partisan politics. Congress needs to go back to work to pass a new defense bill, one that I can sign because it strengthens our negotiating hand instead of weakening it. We may be Republicans or Democrats, but when it comes to a strongly defended nation, we must all be simply Americans.

I came here today to tell you something really that you already know: that you're a part of a remarkable American success story. Around the country, companies like U.S. Precision Lens are leading America's economic expansion and manufacturing boom. In fact, more good news came out last week: U.S. factory orders have grown at their highest rate in 18 years, and production levels are pushing factories to near capacity. Not surprisingly, employment is at its highest level in history. Just last month, America created another 283,000 new jobs -- that makes it over 17 million jobs since our expansion began. And like yours, these are high-wage jobs, jobs with a future.

America is in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record, and it's our exports and our manufacturing that are now driving it. In many ways, all of you already know this, because you've been part of it right here. Since 1980, as if you didn't know, your company has tripled sales, doubled employment, and your exports have exploded into world markets. And talk about beating the pants off the competition: You sell over a third of what you make to companies from Japan.

Louis now exports to Europe, its owner having discovered, in his words, ``that my products were a lot better and a helluva lot cheaper.'' [Laughter] One company up the road in Columbus has even figured out a way to sell sand to Egypt. [Laughter] It mines and refines a high-tech silica sand that is used as a cleansing agent in furnaces. From software to sand, from jumbo jets to precision lenses, American products are the finest in the world, and we can outcompete any country on Earth.

I've heard some people bad-mouthing our economy recently. I think they must have stopped reading the newspaper that day in 1981 when they handed over the lease to the White House. Yes, things were bad back then. But today unemployment is at its lowest level in 14 years. Inflation is low and under control. America's manufacturing productivity has soared 4.3 percent a year -- that's the highest rate since World War II. Real family income is up. Exports are at an all-time high. And America has created, on the average, a quarter of a million private sector jobs each month for 68 consecutive months. Any way you slice it, America has taken the pennant and is sweeping the World Series.

You know, I have to interrupt right here to say something on this employment. I had to go to Washington to discover a certain statistic: those statistics about employment. Do you know what the potential employment pool of the United States is? It is everybody, male and female, from age 16 and up. And today the highest percentage of that potential pool is employed than ever in our history -- 62.6 percent have jobs in this country, of everyone, male and female, above the age of 16.

It's time for a change; take a chance on us. Well, that's sort of like someone telling you that you've stored up all the cold beer you could want, so now you can unplug the refrigerator. [Laughter] But, no more than with a refrigerator, you can't unplug our progrowth economic policies and expect things to stay the same.

Well, the fact is the whole world is learning from our example and turning away from decades-old policies of government-mandated economic failure and turning toward the type of economic policies that Vice President Bush and I have put into practice over the last 7 years. The policies that pulled America out of economic stagnation, rising unemployment, declining family income, and double-digit inflation have made America's economy a global success story. These policies are the wave of the future. Country after country is reducing taxes, cutting regulation, reducing the role of government, and letting entrepreneurs and working people build new factories, new jobs, and new futures for themselves and their families. It's sweeping the world, but like hamburgers and baseball, it all began right here in the United States.

You know, I have to tell you, there is a thing called the economic summit every year -- seven of us, seven countries. And we go from one country to the other, and the country where you're meeting is -- their head of state is the chairman.

And so, I was a new kid in school when I went to my first one up in Canada, and for a little while, why, I kind of stayed there and stayed silent and so forth at these meetings. And then our economic reforms began to take hold, and what a thrill it was! The new kid walked into the meeting -- it was in Europe someplace -- and there the other six of the seven sat facing me. And finally one of them said, ``Tell us about the American miracle.'' Well, I was very pleased to do that.

Well, no bureaucrat, politician, government expert, or certified genius sitting in a Federal office in Washington has ever been able to replace the economic miracle of free men and women working with their hands, their hearts, and their heads to build a better future for their families and a stronger economy for America. I have said this again and again, and I'm going to keep on saying it: It's not the Government, it is the American people who have made our nation the greatest country on Earth. Basically what our program did was get out of your way and let you do what you can do so well.

I can't think of any part of America where that's truer than here in the heartland, the Midwest. You know, I get a little tired of hearing Cincinnati and other Midwestern cities called the Rust Belt when the Midwest is the heartland of America's industrial renaissance. The Midwest isn't the Rust Belt; it's the Boom Belt. I can't help wondering if maybe Precision Lens can help out some of our critics.

I'm talking about your important efforts toward a drug-free workplace. Through preemployment testing, employment counseling, and treatment, you've really made a difference. Here and around the country, workplace drug programs have brought dramatic improvements in worker safety.

There is no place for illegal drugs in the workplace or anyplace else in this land. I believe that programs like yours make a positive impact throughout the community. In addition to making this plant safer and more productive, you can also be proud that you're sending a message to our children to be drug-free because illegal drug use will not be tolerated.

Well, before I go, I want to let you know that I'm delighted you were all able to get in to work today. [Laughter] They weren't going to let me in at first, but luckily someone recognized me. [Laughter] Of course, it's always nice to be recognized.

Well, you know New Yorkers. They all stopped, and everybody in the street kind of lined up, made an alley. And here he came, down the middle of the alley, and he was fumbling in his pocket up here, coming toward me. And he keeps on talking about how well he's known me and how much he's seen me on the screen and everything. Gets right to me and sticks out a pad and a pencil and said, ``Ray Milland.'' [Laughter] So, I signed ``Ray Milland.'' There was no sense in disappointing him.

Well, it's been a real joy for me to be here with you and to see the work that you do and the tremendous pride with which you do it. And I think that's enough for me. I just thank you all, and God bless you all.

Note: The President spoke at 11:10 a.m. on the warehouse floor at the company. In his opening remarks, he referred to Roger Howe and David Hinchman, chief executive officer and president, of the company. Prior to his remarks, the President toured the facility's manufacturing and production areas.

Thank you all very much, and thank you, Governor Sununu. And I know someplace here with us are two Congressmen who came out with me, Gradison and McEwen from Ohio. And a special thanks to you, John, for your leadership in restoring the balance of Federal-State relations.

United Nations Secretary-General will announce later today a cease-fire in the Persian Gulf. This is news the world has waited for and the United States has pressed for -- news that we may finally see an end to that long and bloody war.

Although this is only a first step, it's an affirmation of a policy of strength and commitment. Our forces in the Persian Gulf and those of our allies have demonstrated that we have the resolve and the staying power in the Gulf, as well as in the Security Council when it comes to securing peace. On behalf of all Americans, I applaud and encourage the efforts of Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar in bringing an end to this tragic war, and I send him this message: The hopes of the world are with you.

Association. It seems just like yesterday that I was sitting where you're sitting, and I was talking about the need to get the Federal Government off the backs of the States and to let those who were closest to the people serve the people as the people tell them they want to be served.

I hope that history will record that this former Governor went on to practice what he'd preached and to fight the use of Federal dollars, first as bait and then as a club, and to return power and responsibility to the States, where they belong. And I am confident that history will also find that the States were up to the challenge and that, in these years, America entered a new era of democracy and had a new birth of freedom.

Yes, a new era, a new beginning, a rediscovery -- in this time when we hear so much about competitiveness, we also hear about the necessity for businesses to do what some call flattening hierarchies. Simply put, this means that company presidents listen to and work with the men and women on the shop floor, in the stores, and driving the trucks.

Along these lines, scholars tell us that one of the great advantages entrepreneurial firms have over giant corporations is that they do this better. And as we all know, the vast proportion of America's new jobs and much of our new technology come from entrepreneurial firms, firms less than 5 years old and firms beginning with 100 or fewer employees, which only proves that those advantages are big advantages. The most modern business consultant has rediscovered a wisdom known to our Founding Fathers: that the genius of America, whether in governing ourselves or in providing our daily bread, is in the ordinary man and woman. America's strength and wisdom have never come from the power and cleverness of those on top, but from the strength and wisdom of the American people. And after years of skepticism, the wisdom of our founders is once more the accepted guide to practice in Washington.

In the last 7\1/2\ years, we've broken the Federal Government of its compulsion to control every breath the States take. We've consolidated dozens of categorical grants into nine block grants, putting power that was once in the hands of Federal agencies back into the hands of Governors and State legislatures. We've loosened Federal controls on the States in a number of other areas. We've required that Federal agencies consult more often and in greater detail with State and local officials on issues dealing with Federal grants and economic development aid to their areas. We've issued uniform rules governing grants and cooperative agreements. And we have listened -- too often in the past when Washington listened to the States, it heard only what it wanted to hear.

It was like the story of a fellow who went off to the Army and learned marksmanship. And he won a medal for it and came home on leave very proud. When he got to the edge of town, he saw a wall, and on the wall someone had chalked dozens of bull's-eyes. And in the middle of each bull's-eye was a bullet hole.

Well, that's how on target Washington used to be when it responded to the States. Today things are different. When Governors talk, we not only listen but we hear. We've been listening especially closely since John Sununu wrote to me almost 2 years ago with your suggestions for improving how we run Federal assistance programs. And as we reported to you in February, many of these suggestions have either been put into practice or will be soon. Now we have a second round of suggestions, and you saw the results of that yesterday in phase two of the regulatory reform report that you received.

Secretary Lyng attended, to your Washington meeting in early July with the administration and congressional leaders to the consultations Secretary Lyng has had with so many of you, we have worked side by side to meet this crisis. You have advised, and we responded. America's farmers are getting help.

But at the heart of this new era in American government is not the idea that the Federal Government will merely let the States toss ideas into a suggestion box, but that we in Washington will also honor the leadership role the States have to play. And from education to transportation to helping America's poor and homeless, you have led. While Washington has been caught up in partisan intrigue, you've gone out and done the job.

Welfare reform is another field in which you've been way out front. Congress today is still debating a welfare reform package years after States started taking advantage of the greater flexibility we gave them. One State after another has returned to the basic, homespun, enduring wisdom that the best way to learn to work is to work. And the best way to get people to work is to make sure they have the incentives to work. Once we gave you the flexibility, you abandoned the destructive and bizarre prejudices that had crept into programs designed and administered from Washington -- prejudices such as that public assistance carried no obligations for the recipient, or that, if one had a choice, it was as acceptable to live on welfare as to be independent.

Now even more ambitious experiments have begun. Over the years, Congress has come up with program after program that was advertised as a way to wean long-term welfare recipients from their dependence on the government check. All those programs had one thing in common: They failed. And that's why just over a year ago we said it was time to stop looking for another program from Washington. We said that it was time for Washington to show a little humility, that in 50 States and thousands of communities across our land there are millions of sparks of genius. Why not kindle them into flames?

And we said we would approve any State proposal that had a chance of reducing dependency as long as it ensured that needs continued to be met, it created no net increase in Federal costs, and it could be soundly evaluated.

I don't have to tell you what happened next. So far we have approved proposals from New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, North Carolina, Ohio, Washington State, West Virginia, and Wisconsin. We're reviewing proposals from Georgia, South Carolina, Illinois, New Mexico, Arizona, and California. By the end of the year, we expect that at least half the States will have proposals approved or under consideration. And over a quarter of all AFDC recipients in the Nation will soon be involved in projects already approved or pending. AFDC -- we're so used to initials in Washington, maybe I should say that's Aid for Dependent Children. And let me make a prediction here: After decades of Washington flailing from one dependency-producing welfare program to another, I believe that the States will find the way truly to help welfare families become independent and productive and to put them on the ladder of opportunity that we call the American dream.

State and local receipts have doubled in the last decade -- dollar for dollar, a bigger climb than we had in Federal revenues. Some of this was because -- with our 1981 tax cuts, with tax reform in 1986, and by restraining some Washington eager beavers -- we've broadened the tax base of the States and either stopped the Federal Government or kept the Federal Government from preempting State revenue sources.

But more than that, our States, like our citizens, have known the blessings of the longest peacetime economic expansion on record. You know the story. Since our recovery began, America has created -- and forgive me, John -- is more now than 17 million jobs, and the percentage of the labor force employed this year is the highest not only in our history but in the peacetime history of the industrial world.

Now, at the same time, unemployment is at the lowest level in 14 years; and the income of the typical American family, after dropping almost 7 percent between 1977 and '81, has soared nearly 10 percent in these last 8 years. Some talk about the declining middle class, and it turns out that the middle class is smaller not because more people are poor but because more people have become better off.

Here in Cincinnati, I met this morning with some of the men and women who had pushed our exports to the highest level in history. U.S. Precision Lens makes more than two-thirds of its sales to foreign companies. And meeting the men and women there, I just couldn't help remembering what General George C. Marshall said when asked why he was so confident that we would win the Second World War. ``We have a secret weapon,'' he said, ``the best blankety-blank kids in the whole world.'' Well, we, too, have a secret weapon: the best blankety-blank workers in the whole world.

You've seen the result when, as our nation's most effective sales men and women, you've gone on trade missions overseas. From Japan to Germany, you've persuaded international business to invest in America and create new jobs here and, in the process, have seen the respect and awe the American economy commands around the world. By the way, because you asked for it, we've made major revisions in the foreign trade data the Federal Government collects. Soon you will have better tools for keeping pace in the international economy.

State Governments see the sunshine of our expansion in other ways as well. Next door to Ohio, in Indiana -- thanks to the strong rises in the financial markets since 1982 -- the assets and earnings of the State employee pension fund have nearly tripled. Indiana has made up for what was lost in the stagnation and inflation of the seventies, has increased the benefits to its retired State employees in each of the past 6 years, and has more assets available to pay future benefits than ever before.

With few exceptions, the story is the same all over the Nation: State and local pension funds have shared in the growth of America in these years. Since 1981 total assets in State and local government pension funds have more than doubled. Guiding the policies that have given America what one economic writer has called the silent boom is the same old, as well as modern, wisdom that, as I said, has guided Federal-State relations in our 7\1/2\ years.

Flattening hierarchies; less power for Washington, more for the people -- however you describe it, it has produced in America a blooming of entrepreneurship, investment, innovation, and opportunity unlike what the world has ever seen.

Some say this blooming has gone hand in hand with a rise in greed. But every Governor can point to just the opposite: to the record highs in charitable contributions; to the growing endowments of schools, universities, and museums.

Yes, thanks to this silent boom and to a rediscovered initiative, State and local governments, together with private charities and churches, have done more for those indeed than ever before. Last year total private cash giving -- cash -- was over $94 billion.

Looking at all this, I can't help thinking that, while much of the 20th century saw the rise of the Federal Government, the 21st century will be the century of the States. I have always believed that America is strongest and freest and happiest when it is truest to the wisdom of its founders. In Federalist 45, James Madison wrote that ``The powers delegated by the Constitution to the Federal Government are few and defined. Those which are to remain in the State Government are numerous and indefinite.'' Or to put it another way, ``We the People.'' As long as we remember these words -- ``We the People'' -- and make them our guide, so long as we remember that America has always drawn its inspiration from the people and has always been governed best when governed most by those governments closest to the people, America will remain strong and free, the envy of the world.

Terrorist tactics, such as used against Secretary Shultz and his motorcade in Bolivia today, are always repugnant. Thankfully, the Secretary's party was not injured, but the fact remains that an attack on U.S. officials cannot be tolerated. We ask the Government of Bolivia to bring those responsible to justice.

Union's large, phased-array radar at Krasnoyarsk is a significant violation of a central element of the ABM treaty. The Krasnoyarsk radar will be one of the key topics of the upcoming review. In preparation for the upcoming review, the President has issued guidance that the U.S. delegation should continue to make it clear that the existence of the Krasnoyarsk radar violation calls into question the viability of the ABM treaty and, therefore, it should be dismantled without further delay and without condition. Unless resolved, the Krasnoyarsk radar violation will force the United States to consider the exercise of its rights under international law to take appropriate and proportionate responses.

In this context, the United States will also have to consider whether to declare the Krasnoyarsk radar to be a material breach of the ABM treaty. The President has also directed that the Department of Defense, working with other executive branch agencies and the Congress, take the lead in developing a range of appropriate and proportionate responses for consideration if the Soviet Union continues to refuse to correct the Krasnoyarsk violation.

After hearing what the Soviet Union has to say at the 5-year ABM treaty review, should the situation remain unresolved, the President will consult with the Congress and our allies concerning next steps.

The progress made in Geneva last week is a step toward bringing independence to Namibia and ending military confrontation in southwestern Africa. We welcome the decisions taken by the Governments of South Africa, Angola, and Cuba to begin military disengagement and to formalize a cease-fire. Also important is the setting of target dates to begin implementation of U.N. Security Council Resolution 435 and agreement on withdrawal of Cuban military forces from Angola. It is imperative that the parties involved approach the next round of meetings seriously and constructively in order to resolve the one major area of disagreement: a mutually acceptable timetable for total Cuban troop withdrawal.

The President. Well, thank you for being with us today as we confer the fourth annual National Medal of Arts. I would like to thank the National Council on the Arts for its list of nominees and the Committee on the Arts and Humanities for its help in our efforts to enhance private-sector support in these critical areas. And I also want to thank Frank Hodsoll, Chairman of the National Endowment for the Arts, for all of his work.

This occasion is a special pleasure for me every year. As I look at the names of the 12 people we honor today, I think of the words of the poet Walt Whitman: ``I hear America singing.'' The voice within -- heard -- is the same voice that all great artists can hear. It's the voice that inspires them, the voice that inspires great American art. But America does not sing in one voice. No, she sings in many voices, a thousand different songs in a thousand different keys. And when American art captures the breathtaking variety of this land, as it does in the work of the seven artists we honor today, America's voices come together in a chorus of what is best and noblest in us.

We can hear America singing in the compositions of Virgil Thomson, the virtuosity of Rudolf Serkin, and the performances of Helen Hayes. We can hear her in the prose of Saul Bellow and the choreography of Jerome Robbins, in the photography of Gordon Parks and the architecture of I.M. Pei. But we couldn't hear America's song without the wonderful contribution of those who dedicate themselves to bringing the arts before us and instructing us in them. And that's why we honor five others today as well.

Tanner have helped America to sing by spending so much of their lives supporting and promoting the best that America has to offer. Roger Stevens has helped America to sing by helping its playwrights find their voice. Every American, as Whitman said, is ``singing what belongs to him or her and to none else.'' Well, that gift, the right to sing your own song, is the promise and the glory of America. And I'm proud to be able to honor those who've used the freedom to speak and think and write and bring the arts to all Americans. They enrich us and immortalize us and make us whole.

Reagan. Mrs. Vincent Astor was born in Portsmouth, New Hampshire, and lives in New York where she serves as president of the Vincent Astor Foundation. Under her guidance, the foundation has provided major funding to many organizations, including the Metropolitan Museum of Art and the New York Public Library. The foundation's current focus is on the homeless and illiteracy. Mrs. Astor was honored by the American Academy and Institute of Arts and Letters in 1986.

Goelet, a major donor and commissioner of American music, was born in Bordeaux, France, and now lives in Riverside, Connecticut. He is most noted for commissioning new works for the New York Philharmonic. His donations for new productions of the Metropolitan Opera include the world premier of Samuel Barber's ``Antony and Cleopatra.'' He's assisted orchestral and operatic composers nationwide.

Parks was born in Fort Scott, Kansas, and in his youth supported himself by working as a piano player and professional basketball player. A newsreel led him to buy his first camera. And within a few months, he had his first exhibit. His career includes 19 years on assignments for Life magazine. Mr. Parks is an accomplished photographer, composer, writer, and director of films.

L. Stevens was born in Detroit and grew up in Ann Arbor, Michigan. He began his career as a real estate dealer and later became a major theatrical producer in New York City and London. In total, he has produced or coproduced nearly 200 plays. He chaired the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts from 1961 to 1988, guiding its fundraising and programming with outstanding success.

Obert C. Tanner was born in Farmington, Utah, and lives in Salt Lake City. There he's noted for leadership in constructing Salt Lake City's Symphony Hall and restoring the historic Capital Theater. Mr. Tanner's also the author of 10 religious and philosophical books. As founder and chairman of his own company, he's generously contributed to Utah's artistic community.

J. Freedberg was born in Boston, Massachusetts, and was educated at Boston Latin School and Harvard. He served twice as chairman of the fine arts department at Harvard and later was appointed the Arthur Kingsley Porter Professor of Fine Arts. In 1983 he became Chief Curator with the National Gallery of Art in Washington. A distinguished art historian and curator, Professor Freedberg has written five major books and influenced generations of art historians and students.

President today announced his intention to appoint Norman R. Augustine to be a member of the President's National Security Telecommunications Advisory Committee. He would succeed Thomas Gillmore Pownall.

And now I'm delighted to present to you this afternoon Lauro F. Cavazos, my nominee for the post of Secretary of Education. A distinguished educator, Dr. Cavazos holds master's and doctorate degrees in zoology and physiology; has been an anatomy professor at the Medical College of Virginia, Tufts University, and Texas Tech; has served as the department chairman and dean of the Tufts University School of Medicine; and for the last 8 years has been president of Texas Tech University and Texas Tech University Health Sciences Center, where he has been widely credited with expanding the scope of their programs and endowment, gaining national recognition for himself and his innovative leadership.

His commitment to the profession of teaching and to excellence in education, his belief in getting back to basics and things like homework, and above all his emphasis on education's special importance to America's minorities are messages I hope that he will sound far and wide across the Nation. Dr. Cavazos has been a leader in helping minorities gain educational opportunity in his work, where he believes progress has been made, but where much remains to be done; and I share that view. And, Dr. Cavazos, you'll have my every assistance in carrying on this important work for America's minorities.

Now, finally, I want to add a brief biographical note about Dr. Cavazos. He is the first Texas Tech graduate to head that university. And it is a special source of pride to his family and to the people of Texas that he is the first Hispanic to head such a major institution. The influence of Hispanic culture is evident in our everyday life. Its values, such as family, work, neighborhood, and religion, are a great sustaining influence in American life -- an influence that in the years ahead will continue to enrich our national life and heritage.

So, let me close, if I may, on a personal note. This job has had its thrills during the past 91 months, and not a few of those experiences I've shared with those of you in this room. But it's hard right now to think of a more exciting moment than this one and the knowledge that Dr. Cavazos will be the first Hispanic-American member of the Cabinet. That says a lot about him and about Americans of Hispanic heritage. It also says something about America, about America as a place of opportunity and hope. Dr. Cavazos is the embodiment of that tradition. This is a proud day not just for Dr. Cavazos, his family, and Hispanic-Americans, it's a proud day for all Americans. I look forward to working with the new Secretary. And, Dr. Cavazos, as an Hispanic-American once said to me, let me assure you, mi casa es su casa [my house is your house].

Cavazos. I would like to express my appreciation to you, Mr. President, for the confidence and trust that you've placed in me by asking me to lead the Department of Education, if confirmed by the Senate. Your administration has clearly demonstrated that education is one of its highest priorities, and the initiatives that you have begun in this vital area will be of tremendous benefit to this nation and to this nation's future. I share your views, and I look forward to serving you and our great country in this most important post.

Dr. Cavazos. As is plain, he has a distinguished academic career and a strong commitment to education. His story is an American success story. It's a tribute to his abilities and his hard work and the opportunity in the United States of America. I am confident that Dr. Cavazos will find his new job interesting. I know I certainly found it interesting. I look forward to handing over the keys, the apple, the pencils, the ruler, everything else, on September 20th, but not before. And along the lines of this classroom metaphor, Mr. President, I know you have another class to go to. So, we all want to wish Dr. Cavazos well and offer our congratulations. And I am to remind you about that other meeting, sir.

Last year, crime left its mark on one in four American homes, a sobering reminder that, despite recent heartening progress against criminals and the causes of crime, particularly drug abuse, much remains to be done to ensure for ourselves and our children the safety of our homes, our neighborhoods, and our communities. It is an unfortunate fact that the scourge of crime continues to occupy the head of the list of national problems crying out for immediate action.

Those who have experienced the pain, the loss, the sense of violation and frustration that accompany crime know that defeating it requires more than tougher laws and surer punishments -- though tougher and surer they are. Truly effective law enforcement demands our reliance on one of our great historical strengths as a Nation: the willingness of our people to band freely together, in local communities, in defense of lives, homes, and property.

Local crime watch committees, in cooperation with law enforcement officers and the appropriate government agencies, can make a real difference in crime rates. As McGruff the anti-crime dog, the familiar national symbol of crime prevention, would put it: They take a bite out of crime. But the benefits of such citizen groups do not stop there: Their work teaches children respect for law, reinforces community values, and encourages the kind of individual responsibility that makes for healthy, creative neighborhoods peopled by safer and happier citizens.

The growth of these committees is truly encouraging. Today over 19 million Americans participate in neighborhood watch programs, keeping an eye out for crime near their homes, reporting suspicious activity to the police, and providing escorts to elderly or vulnerable citizens.

And for the last several years, millions of Americans have joined in the highly visible ``National Night Out,'' an evening sponsored by the National Association of Town Watch in which families spend the period from 8 o'clock to 9 o'clock p.m. on their front porch or lawn as a way of saying to potential criminal predators: ``You had better think twice, because in this community neighbors look out for each other.'' This worthwhile event has been extended this year to 10 o'clock.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Minister Thorsteinn Palsson to the White House with particular pleasure, for he's the first Icelandic Prime Minister to make an official working visit to the United States. The Prime Minister and I had a very good and friendly meeting this morning, and we continued our conversation over lunch.

It was a gift from the American people to Iceland in 1930 for the 1,000th anniversary of the founding of the Icelandic Parliament. Your Parliament, the Althing, is the oldest in the world; and it existed long before most parliamentary systems ever got started. That statue now stands as a reminder of the traditionally close and cooperative ties between our two democratic nations. It also reminds us of how fortunate it is that Icelanders were and remain a brave and seafaring people.

On the occasion of the Prime Minister's visit to the White House today, I want again to express my personal thanks and the appreciation of the American people for the gracious hospitality shown by the Icelandic people and Government in hosting my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev in October of 1986. Mr.

I was told while there that Icelanders are accustomed to responding to such things as earthquakes and volcanic eruptions. But I'm sure, however, they had never previously witnessed the upheaval of a U.S.-Soviet summit, complete with more than 3,000 journalists. But you and your countrymen took it all in stride, and we're all left with an unforgettable impression of your warmth, generosity, and hospitality. In the wake of the Moscow summit, I must note that the talks that the General Secretary and I had in Hofdi House were an important milestone in the development of our current dialog with the Soviet Union, a dialog made possible by the firm determination and unity of the Western alliance of which your nation was a founding member.

NATO is an alliance of sovereign equals whose members have agreed to share both its benefits and responsibilities. But our bilateral and NATO relationship transcends security considerations and rests solidly on shared democratic values, history, trade, and a tradition upheld by your leadership, Mr. Prime Minister. It is that long and valued relationship I am proud to acknowledge today.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, it is indeed both an honor and a distinct pleasure to have been your guest here at the White House today. My invitation here underscores the friendly relationship and close cooperation prevailing between the United States and Iceland. At our meeting today, we were able to review many issues in our bilateral relationship, as well as some of the larger issues on the international scene. Our bilateral relationship is excellent. It's based not only on our joint membership in the Atlantic alliance and a mutually beneficial defense agreement but also on historical ties and important cooperation in fields as diverse as trade, transportation, education, and scientific research.

We have, during this visit, been able to explore ways of further solidifying and strengthening our ties in some of these fields. But perhaps most importantly, our friendship is based on certain shared basic values, such as respect for freedom, human dignity, and the democratic process -- all of which are fundamental elements of open, pluralistic societies. These shared principles transcend differences in size or population.

For most of its 1,100 years of recorded history, my country was relatively isolated from the currents of world events. All that changed during the Second World War. The foundations for the security relationship between our two countries were laid during a crucial phase of the Battle of the Atlantic. We are hopeful that we may jointly, with our partners in the Western alliance, prevent such times from ever occurring again.

But clearly, a lot also depends on the arms control efforts of your government and that of the Soviet Union, as well as the international community in general. The people of my country were encouraged by the recently concluded INF treaty. And we are proud to have been able to contribute in a small way to the process leading up to that agreement by hosting the summit between yourself, Mr. President, and the Soviet leader in the fall of 1986. We hope that progress can also be made this year in the area of strategic arms and wish you and your negotiators success in those talks.

To conclude, allow me again to express my appreciation for your hospitality and the fine reception we have received here in Washington. Coming from Iceland, I can tell a warm day, Mr. President. But it's not the climate which will make this visit memorable but rather the human warmth we have encountered. Thank you, Mr. President.

Members of Congress and distinguished guests, my fellow Americans, we gather here today to right a grave wrong. More than 40 years ago, shortly after the bombing of Pearl Harbor, 120,000 persons of Japanese ancestry living in the United States were forcibly removed from their homes and placed in makeshift internment camps. This action was taken without trial, without jury. It was based solely on race, for these 120,000 were Americans of Japanese descent.

Yes, the Nation was then at war, struggling for its survival, and it's not for us today to pass judgment upon those who may have made mistakes while engaged in that great struggle. Yet we must recognize that the internment of Japanese-Americans was just that: a mistake. For throughout the war, Japanese-Americans in the tens of thousands remained utterly loyal to the United States. Indeed, scores of Japanese-Americans volunteered for our Armed Forces, many stepping forward in the internment camps themselves. The 442d Regimental Combat Team, made up entirely of Japanese-Americans, served with immense distinction to defend this nation, their nation. Yet back at home, the soldiers' families were being denied the very freedom for which so many of the soldiers themselves were laying down their lives.

Norman Mineta, with us today, was 10 years old when his family was interned. In the Congressman's words: ``My own family was sent first to Santa Anita Racetrack. We showered in the horse paddocks. Some families lived in converted stables, others in hastily thrown together barracks. We were then moved to Heart Mountain, Wyoming, where our entire family lived in one small room of a rude tar paper barrack.'' Like so many tens of thousands of others, the members of the Mineta family lived in those conditions not for a matter of weeks or months but for 3 long years.

The legislation that I am about to sign provides for a restitution payment to each of the 60,000 surviving Japanese-Americans of the 120,000 who were relocated or detained. Yet no payment can make up for those lost years. So, what is most important in this bill has less to do with property than with honor. For here we admit a wrong; here we reaffirm our commitment as a nation to equal justice under the law.

I'd like to note that the bill I'm about to sign also provides funds for members of the Aleut community who were evacuated from the Aleutian and Pribilof Islands after a Japanese attack in 1942. This action was taken for the Aleuts' own protection, but property was lost or damaged that has never been replaced.

And now in closing, I wonder whether you'd permit me one personal reminiscence, one prompted by an old newspaper report sent to me by Rose Ochi, a former internee. The clipping comes from the Pacific Citizen and is dated December 1945.

In one action, Kazuo ordered his men back and advanced through heavy fire, hauling a mortar. For 12 hours, he engaged in a singlehanded barrage of Nazi positions. Several weeks later at Cassino, Kazuo staged another lone advance. This time it cost him his life.

The newspaper clipping notes that her two surviving brothers were with Mary and her parents on the little porch that morning. These two brothers, like the heroic Kazuo, had served in the United States Army. After General Stilwell made the award, the motion picture actress Louise Allbritton, a Texas girl, told how a Texas battalion had been saved by the 442d. Other show business personalities paid tribute -- Robert Young, Will Rogers, Jr. And one young actor said: ``Blood that has soaked into the sands of a beach is all of one color. America stands unique in the world: the only country not founded on race but on a way, an ideal. Not in spite of but because of our polyglot background, we have had all the strength in the world. That is the American way.'' The name of that young actor -- I hope I pronounce this right -- was Ronald Reagan. And, yes, the ideal of liberty and justice for all -- that is still the American way.

And since you welcomed me to your home, I thought it would be only fitting to invite you here to Nancy's and mine. Well, I know that there are a number of other farmers here today, including some who were visited by Secretary Lyng and the Interagency Drought Policy Committee, and so, welcome to all of you.

The bill that I'm about to sign represents the largest disaster-relief measure in history. According to this legislation, farmers who lost more than 35 percent of a crop will receive direct payments to help cover their losses. Livestock producers who've suffered losses in feed production due to the drought will also receive relief. In all, hundreds of thousands of farmers and ranchers will benefit.

The bill expresses a distinctly American tradition: that of lending a helping hand when misfortune strikes. And there's another tradition it embodies, one of our noblest political traditions: bipartisanship. Congressional leaders on both sides of the aisle worked together on this legislation in the understanding that the need to help our farmers rose far above any partisan politics. And I'm especially pleased that they were able to do so, operating within our budget requirements. And I want to add my special thanks to my Secretary of Agriculture, Dick Lyng. Dick, this is your bill.

This legislation is helpful and generous, but at the same time, it's not a budget-buster, since the drought will reduce the cost of our regular farm programs. To ensure the continued success of this important bill, we must stick to the principles I've outlined: targeting assistance to the truly needy and emphasizing sound business decisions. That way, we'll be able to keep costs down to the $3.9 billion currently estimated. You know, when I told the Krones about the trouble we so often have with special interests adding unnecessary costs to legislation, they said, ``Let's save the Christmas trees for the 25th of December.'' Well, we've done just that.

Congratulations to the congressional leadership on a job well done. Special congratulations to Secretary of Agriculture Dick Lyng, for his leadership throughout this legislative effort. But most of all, congratulations to America's farmers for the indomitable spirit with which they've been facing this crisis. This bill isn't as good as rain, but it'll tide you over until normal weather and your own skills permit you to return to your accustomed role of being the most productive farmers in the world.

American agriculture is one of the great success stories of our time. As recently as 1949, a single American farmer could feed 19 people for a year. Today a single American farmer feeds 120 people for a year. American products are shipped around the world. And through all these decades, despite drought and misfortune, American agriculture continues to succeed.

After a formal hearing, informal meetings with the parties, and review of the written submissions, the emergency board made the following recommendations for settlement of the disputes between the parties. The board suggested that the parties follow the wage pattern accepted by five other unions on PATH: the United Transportation Union, the Transport Workers Union, the International Brotherhood of Teamsters, the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, and the American Railway Supervisors Association (a division of the TCU).

Essentially the same wage pattern has been accepted by most unions representing rail employees on other commuter lines in the New York metropolitan area. The wage increases would be 5 percent in each of 3 years: June 1985 to June 1987.

The board conducted an extensive review of the other issues dealing with benefit improvements and rule changes. With the exception of certain betterments in benefits, it did not recommend major contract rule changes.

Secretary of State is hereby authorized and empowered, in accordance with such regulations as he may prescribe, to perform all lawful acts that may be necessary and proper in order to execute the functions of the Central Authority in a timely and efficient manner.

By virtue of the authority vested in me as President by the Constitution and laws of the United States of America, including the Defense Production Act of 1950, as amended (50 U.S.C. App. 2061 et seq.), and in order to provide for the performance of certain reporting functions with respect to the effect of offsets in international trade, it is hereby ordered that Executive Order No.

President today announced his intention to nominate Arnold L. Steinberg to be a member of the Board of Directors of the National Institute of Building Sciences for a term expiring September 7, 1991. This is a reappointment.

Free men and women everywhere take heart from the courage of the people of Berlin. Their determination to protect their outpost of freedom remains undaunted despite repeated challenges over the years from those who would deny their liberty and who fear their example. Berliners remain committed to preserving their democratic way of life and to removing the barriers dividing the German Nation. The United States is honored to stand firmly with the British and French to defend the freedom and promote the well-being of Berlin. These unwavering commitments continue to be a cornerstone of American policy in Europe.

June of last year, I stood before the Brandenburg Gate and offered an initiative meant to bring positive change to the lives of Berliners: improved air access; bringing more conferences to the entire city; staging international sporting events, including the Olympics; and promoting youth exchanges between the two parts of Berlin. Last December we, together with the British and French, proposed specific ideas to the Soviets along these lines. We are still awaiting an answer.

As we recall the construction of the wall on this day in 1961, the people of the United States reaffirm their commitment to Berlin and salute the brave people who live there. Americans believe that with imagination and will East and West can make Berlin a symbol of a new era, reflecting the true aspirations of the human spirit, before another anniversary of the wall is passed.

Chief of Staff -- the President's -- who is here and who has spoken. And you know the way Ken Duberstein came into this thing and took over, and he's doing an outstanding job. I'm delighted to be sharing this podium with him. I want to pay my respects to the members of the President's Cabinet and to all of you.

I won't speak too long here today. I don't want to be like the speaker at the Democratic Convention who gave the nominating speech. The Washington Post reported that one delegate at that convention hit another one with his sign during that speech. Just before the guy that was hit passed out, he said, ``Hit me again; I can still hear him.'' [Laughter] So, I don't want to do that.

I am happy to have this chance to speak to the senior appointees of this administration, including many in the President's Cabinet -- the field commanders, if you will, of the Reagan revolution. And more than most other Americans, you have a special understanding of the importance of the election that lies ahead. For the last 7\1/2\ years we've worked with the President to build a better America, and we've done just exactly that. To create literally a sea change in American Government and politics. And now, frankly, I am counting on you to help determine whether that change continues, whether it gets even better, whether we can build on the successes of this administration or whether the direction changes, whether it's totally reversed. And that is exactly what's at stake in the coming election.

Things are still moving forward. The revolution that you all helped engineer is getting better all the time, domestically and in foreign policy as well. Four years ago, the Mondale Democrats said -- and we all remember it, all of us who were here 4 years ago -- said that this economic expansion was fleeting, that disaster was around the corner. There was predictions over and over again that the young recovery then couldn't possibly continue. And here we are, 68 months into the greatest explosion of job growth in American history, and we're still going strong.

You know, we all know what will kill -- definitively kill -- this economic expansion that we've worked so hard to create, and that's the policies of those same Democrats I referred to -- the McGovern or Carter or Mondale Democrats, who were just itching to get back into the game, get their hands back on the levers that you now operate so ably. Given the chance, I am convinced that they would repeal the tax cuts that we've worked so hard to enact and defend, and that would defeat and simply bury this recovery.

You see, economic expansions don't die of old age; they die because of bad policies. And that's what this election -- really the critical thing that this election is all about. And I will readily concede that all the good things you've accomplished are not in focus in the minds of the electorate. Part of our job at our convention, and part of my job as the standard-bearer, and hopefully your job as surrogates, will be to get these good things in focus. Elections are normally determined by the state of the economy, and the state of the economy is A - 1.

I'm sure you've noticed that our opponents, at the convention at least, and certainly afterward, don't seem to want to talk about policy at all. They've declared that this election is about competence, not ideology -- as if good ideas and good execution were somehow inconsistent. As you've proven in these last 8 years, that simply isn't so. In the last 8 years, we've had some fantastic ideas: reducing tax rates so America could grow, cutting the interest rates so families could afford a home. You know, there's a lot of young people out there that don't remember that 10 days before the President and I were sworn in the prime rate of interest was 21\1/2\ percent. Fighting inflation so that a family could buy more with the dollar that they worked so hard to earn. And building a strong and secure America so that we would be in a position through that strength to negotiate reductions in nuclear arms and indeed to eliminate -- in the face of the skeptics -- eliminate an entire generation of nuclear weapons. Reforming the tax code to close off loopholes and open up opportunity. And aiding the cause of freedom around the world in order to give peace a chance.

I've been to a lot of different countries as Vice President, and I am absolutely convinced that it is only the United States of America that is steady enough and convinced enough and strong enough to offer the hope of freedom and democracies to those who would like to have it.

Measure us by our performance. In the last 6 years, more than 17 million new jobs have been created -- good jobs, at good wages. And last year, three out of four jobs that were created were in the higher paying categories, where the average salary was $26,000. Only 2 percent were low-paying service jobs.

And measure us by our performance. Real family income is growing after it had fallen under the Democrats. The average American family, the one that's right in the middle, is now earning $5,000 a year more than it would be under the Democratic policies.

Measure us by our performance. Peace is breaking out all over the world. Earlier this week, on the same day, the headlines announced not one, but two cease-fires in very troubled areas of the world: one between Iran and Iraq and one between Angola, Cuba, and South Africa.

Our policies are working, and I want to build on those policies. With performance like that, it's no wonder that my opponent would have us believe that he supported these Republican policies all along. The other day, I referred to him, only semi-in jest, as the Stealth candidate -- [laughter] -- because no matter how much he jetted around the country, from place to place, no issues seemed to crop up on that radar screen.

We have a two-part mission in this election: to remind the American people what we've done, what we've accomplished, and then to convince them, given a chance, that there's going to be change as we move into a new decade, but that we can do even better. We must remind them that peace and economic growth are not blanketing our land by accident; they've not fallen out of the sky. But rather, they've grown from carefully cultivated seeds planted by the men and women in this room. And now the task is to plant where no flowers have bloomed before, to grow to heights previously unimagined. And we've got to keep this recovery going until every man and woman in this country benefit from this recovery.

I have been very specific in offering new proposals for extending the Reagan revolution into the Bush era. I've proposed a cut in the capital gains rate to create new jobs by spurring the start of new business. It worked in 1978. It will work again now. It will raise revenues for the Federal Government, and I am convinced it will help people by creating more jobs.

I've proposed to slam the door on the deficit by using what I call a flexible freeze to rein in Federal spending and yet give the President some flexibility in how to allocate resources. And I'm asking the American people to instruct the Congress to give the President what 43 Governors have, and that's that line-item veto. It's time now, the Congress having failed, to give the executive branch a chance to do better in controlling spending.

I've proposed a comprehensive child care plan for America's families, one which doesn't rely on the heavy and all-intrusive hand of government, but on free choice for parents. One which doesn't discriminate against families whose children are cared for by the neighbors or relatives or church centers or by the parents themselves at home, but preserves that diversity that makes our country so unique.

I've proposed merit schools and magnet schools to reward and encourage excellence in education. And I've proposed expanding educational assistance from Head Start for preschoolers to college savings bonds for college students. Education is the answer to our competitiveness. Education is the answer that will bring hope to those kids who really haven't had hope and opportunity before.

I've laid out a wide-ranging plan for cleaning up the environment and a comprehensive plan for reducing America's dependence on foreign oil. And I've spelled out in detail my vision of the steps we've got to take to see that we remain free and secure in the 1990's. In every one of these areas I've been specific for a very clear reason: Because the American people have a right to know where the candidates stand. And I believe if they do they will choose to continue and to improve on the work that you have so ably begun.

Burnett, one of the finest advertising executives of all time, used to have a ten commandments on the art of plain talk. And one of his commandments was forget about image and concentrate on substance. Project what you are, not what you would like others to think that you are. And I take this commandment to heart. If we state in plain terms the case for low taxes and high opportunity, for a strong America and a peaceful world, I believe we'll have another Republican victory in November.

You know, that victory isn't important just for political reasons. It is literally vital for the future of our country. And this election hinges on one crucial difference. My opponent sees the task ahead is how to manage the decline of this country. And I see it as how to open up further the golden promise of opportunity that is America. They all talk about this book out of Boston about America in decline. We are not in decline. That is too negative.

And now, on Thursday, I will be the standard-bearer of this party. And I'm asking you to take the hustings and to remember that you're not just political spokesmen, not just women out there spelling out what's been accomplished in the administration. You're messengers of hope for this new American revolution. And what's at stake is not just one election; what's at stake is a way of life. And if we can convince the American people of that, then I'm convinced that we will have the opportunity for the next 4 years to serve this, the greatest, freest, most wonderful country on the face of the Earth.

But really, the reason I asked you all here is because we've got 5 full months ahead of us, and we're going to continue to advance our policies and programs until we cross the finish line next January. Our agenda is still full. We want welfare reforms that create incentives for work, and a U.S.-Canada free trade agreement to create the world's greatest free trade area. We want a comprehensive antidrug bill that includes the death penalty for drug kingpins, a defense bill that supports the Strategic Defense Initiative, and effective new aid for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters so they can secure their own freedom and remove the threat of communism from the mainland of North America.

And as I said in the State of the Union, Congress had better obey the law and give us 13 appropriations bills as required and on time because if they try to send me up another one of those omnibus continuing resolution monstrosities, I won't sign it.

I'll be crisscrossing America this fall to lay out our record and what we stand for. I know that so many of you who are eager and able to do so will be doing the same. All of you deserve a share in the credit for what's been accomplished. You all are a part of a great and continuing success story. You can be proud of your service, and I'm proud of you.

Well, if I say so myself, all of you who answered the call to serve here were very well cast. In fact, I don't know a finer group of public servants anywhere. Our work is not over yet. But I've been meaning to ask you, and I'd like to hear your answer: Tell me, so far, has it been worth it? [Applause] Well, I feel just the same way.

I want all of you to keep up your fine work. And to really appreciate what we've accomplished, all you need to do is look back at where we started. In 1981, when we took office, America was in its worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. The only things going up were taxes, inflation, unemployment, and interest rates. The great irony was that the folks who nearly wrecked the economy had run for office saying the issue was competence. [Laughter] Well, just like this year, the other fellows promised competence, but that's not what they delivered. From 1977 to 1981, real family income dropped 7 percent. Not only couldn't working families get ahead, they could barely hold on. That's what the folks who talk about compassion inflicted on the American people. Since we've been in office, real family income has soared nearly 10 percent. I think there's an important lesson there that tells a lot about the difference between us and the other folks: They talk; we deliver.

They talk about jobs. We've delivered over 17\1/2\ million jobs in the last 68 months and raised employment to its highest level in history. They talk about economic growth. We've delivered the longest peacetime expansion on record -- over 5\1/2\ years of growth. They talk about peace and security. We've delivered a treaty that eliminates an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. The Soviets are withdrawing from Afghanistan. Cease-fires have been agreed to in the Persian Gulf and in Angola. And freedom is on the march around the world. They talk about change. Well, we've delivered 8 years of steady change -- change for the better.

You know, there are only two things that the liberals don't understand: the things that change and the things that don't. [Laughter] The economy and technology -- these things change, and under us, they change for the better. But America's basic moral, spiritual, and family values -- they don't change.

What do the American people believe in? Teaching right from wrong, putting criminals behind bars and keeping them there -- [laughter] -- and promoting excellence in education, and saying the Pledge of Allegiance, America's tradition of peace through strength, and upholding the Monroe Doctrine -- this is also what we believe in. And that's one reason why the American people are going to vote with us this November and why we're going to hold the White House with George Bush.

Now, in laying out our record in the months ahead, each of us can be a force for truth and a player in the national debate. The reason our record of success is important is because that's the proof that our philosophy works, that George Bush's policies work. The other folks talk; George Bush will deliver. The truth is that what we've achieved is just the beginning; the best is yet to come. If the people elect George Bush President so America continues the progrowth economic policies of the last 8 years, the next decade, believe me, will be known as the Roaring Nineties.

Attorney, Assistant Attorney General, Governor of one of our largest States. Dick Thornburgh has been all these and more. Along the way, he has put mobsters behind bars, he has fought for integrity in government, and has shown himself to be a leader under fire.

Here are some facts that speak for themselves. Between 1976 and 1980, drug cases brought by the Justice Department fell by more than 44 percent. Convictions plunged by nearly 50 percent. Since 1980, Federal drug cases brought have almost tripled and convictions have gone up nearly 167 percent. To fight the war against drugs and organized crime, we've hired more than 4,000 new agents and prosecutors. And under Vice President Bush's leadership, Federal, State, and local law enforcement officials have been working together as never before to stop drug runners from smuggling illegal drugs into the United States. The results of that work and the work that Attorney General Meese led are incredible -- cocaine seizures are up by over 1,800 percent and over half a billion dollars in boats, bank accounts, homes and planes, and other property owned by drug lords was seized last year alone.

Today the drug war is international. When we took office, only two nations had drug eradication programs; today 23 do. And our Justice Department and the Italian Ministry of Justice have worked together to produce an unprecedented number of convictions against members of organized crime. Our prosecutors also recently won the conviction of one of the four founders of the largest Colombian cocaine cartel, Carlos Lehder. And not long ago, our agents arrested another major Latin American drug kingpin, Juan Ramon Matta. And he'll be cooling his heels behind bars for a long time to come.

Initial reports said the attempt was linked directly or indirectly to the drug trade. If these reports are true, this desperate move is another sign of how badly we're hurting the drug trade. We must keep up and step up the pressure.

Dick, you're just the man I want taking the helm at the Justice Department at this critical time. As a prosecutor and as a Governor, you earned a nationwide reputation for attacking the drug problem head on and cracking down on drug traffickers. And you've already indicated that as Attorney General you will again make the war against illegal drugs a top priority.

I know that you can't do the job alone. The Senate recognized the importance of your nomination by acting on it with rare speed, and let me thank the Senate for its action. The Senators addressed this nomination with businesslike seriousness. In doing so, they put national interest above all other interests. And now it's time for the Senate to recognize, as well, the vital importance of this nation's judges to our efforts in the drug war. It's time to act on the 30 judicial nominations that we have submitted but have yet to reach a floor vote. Dick, I know that you mentioned the great need for those judges at your confirmation hearings. And recently the judicial conference declared a state of judicial emergency because of the many nominations that the Senate has hanging. Our law enforcement people can investigate and bring to court all the drug traffickers in the world, but without an adequately staffed judiciary of tough-minded judges, many of them may be back on the streets in no time.

Some say the Senate is simply playing politics as usual, but this is not politics as usual. In 1980 only 17 nominations had not been acted on by the end of the year. And of these, all but five had been nominated on or after the end of July. Well, some of our nominees have been waiting for a year and a half. For example, Pamela Rymer, who has already proven herself to be tough against crime as a district court judge, has been waiting for Senate approval as an appeals court judge since April, even though she received the ABA's highest rating of confidence. The Senate's inaction throws a monkeywrench into the wheels of the war on drugs. And Dick, I know that you'll continue to join me in urging the Senate to act quickly on our judicial nominees.

And in the meantime, we're grateful to have you as our nation's leading crime fighter. I know that you'll continue in your long tradition of serving the public with excellence, integrity, and distinction. So, Dick and Ginny, congratulations, and welcome aboard.

As many here know, I have spent much of the last year and a half with young people -- students, the next generation of American leaders. And as you also know, Ginny and I have shared the wonderful experience of raising four fine sons of our own. I have accordingly acquired a special perspective on the priorities you and I share for Federal law enforcement, Mr. President. For example, I firmly believe that unless we sustain a vigorous effort to make drug trafficking and drug abuse public enemy number one, we could well stunt significantly the capacity of today's young people to contribute to a better quality of life for tomorrow's America.

I accept your challenge as well, Mr. President, to devote every resource of the Department of Justice, consistent with strict observance of the civil rights and civil liberties of all our citizens, to fight other unique threats to our traditional values and institutions -- organized crime and racketeering, official corruption, and white collar crime -- as well as to protecting the first civil right of every American, the right to be free from fear in our homes, on our streets, and in our communities. But as you have often noted, Mr.

The people of the United States owe much to our courageous countrymen over the years who have dedicated their lives to the achievement of equal rights, equal opportunity, equal protection of the law, and mutual respect and reconciliation. These Americans have reminded us that the promise of the Declaration of Independence is a universal and eternal one -- that God has granted everyone alike ``certain unalienable Rights, . . . among these . . . Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness'' and that our duty and privilege as Americans is to guard and guarantee this promise always.

The protection of our rights requires champions in every generation. Twenty-five years ago this month, the Reverend Martin Luther King, Jr., led the March on Washington in the cause of civil rights and helped awaken among his fellow Americans a strong and true sense that justice, if it is to be genuine, must ever be color-blind. The anniversary of this event is a fitting time for all Americans to reflect on our achievements in this regard and to recall the need for continual vigilance and constant effort in behalf of the promise of equality for all.

This coming week the Republican National Convention will take place in New Orleans, the 32d such convention since the Grand Old Party first met in 1856. I want to talk about that convention in just a moment, but first I'd like to tell you a little about what's been taking place here at the White House in the past few days. And you should know, I have a special reason for wanting to do so. You see, in this campaign season, some in the other party are parading around the country, talking and talking about what they claim they'd do if they were elected. Well, while they talk, we deliver.

I won't stand for that and neither will George Bush. Now it's up to Congress to come up with a new bill, one that strengthens our defenses instead of weakening them and strengthens our hand still further in dealing with the Soviets.

Still on foreign affairs, we're seeking from Congress effective aid for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. In recent weeks, the Communist regime in Nicaragua -- the regime the freedom fighters are opposing -- has stalled the Arias peace plan, expelled the American Ambassador to Nicaragua, shut down the independent press, and brutally suppressed a peaceful protest. Regarding Nicaragua, the leadership of the other party advocates policies of disengagement and unconcern, policies that would surely permit the Communists to consolidate their power. Indeed, they would permit a Communist lock on a nation right here in our own hemisphere. George Bush and I happen to disagree with them. It's our firm belief that in Nicaragua the United States has a high moral duty: a duty to stand for human liberty and to extend our help to those who are struggling to secure it.

Turning to matters here at home, we saw the passage this past week of an important fair housing bill. George Bush and I have supported stronger fair housing measures from the first, and I look forward to signing the measure. On Wednesday, I signed legislation that compensates Japanese-Americans who were wrongly interned during the Second World War. And on Thursday, I signed into law the largest disaster relief bill in our history: drought legislation that will help the tens of thousands of American farmers who are suffering from this summer's terrible shortage of rain.

You see, they talk as if the country were in some kind of recession, if not in outright depression. But the truth is just the opposite. Since George Bush and I put our economic policies in place, we've witnessed the longest peacetime expansion in American history, an expansion that has created over 17\1/2\ million jobs.

This past week we saw the implementing legislation for the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement move closer to final congressional approval. And Congress has passed a trade bill, one that more closely reflects George Bush's and my emphasis on world trade that is both free and, yes, fair.

So you see, while the leadership of the other party have been talking, George Bush and I've been hard at work, putting into practice the ideals you believe in, the ideals that, at her heart, America has always stood for: strong defenses; low taxes and limited government; compassion and fair play, like that embodied in the fair housing bill; faith in our future; and an openness to the rest of the world, as demonstrated in our trade legislation. And, yes, those are just the ideals you'll hear us Republicans rededicating ourselves to this coming week in New Orleans.

Hooley has been working for Ronald Reagan since May 1978, serving as an advance man and organization consultant until the 1980 election. Prior to that time, he had served in several national and statewide campaigns as a political consultant.

And they gave us one huge glaring clue to all that when they said at the Atlanta convention this was a campaign about competence, not ideology. Now, let's be honest. If this really were a campaign about competence, if this really were a battle of the resumes, I just happen to think that the former captain of the Yale baseball team, the youngest flier in the Navy with 58 combat missions, the former Texas wildcatter who turned down a soft job on Wall Street to make his own way, the former Member of the House of Representatives from Texas, the former Republican National Chairman -- hang on, there's more -- the former Ambassador to the United Nations, the former de facto Ambassador in China, the Director of Central Intelligence, and the current Vice President of the United States, who's handled every tough issue from deregulation to drugs to terrorism -- frankly, I think the fella with that resume has it all.

So, why did they say it? Well, you see, when they came right out at that convention and said this is a campaign not about ideology but about competence, they were really telegraphing their greatest weakness -- the very thing that worries them and their advisers most -- to every State in the Union, to every voter in America; and that's their liberal record and that of the liberal leadership of their party in Congress.

The President. They know what they intend to do once in office, but they don't want the American people to find out until after the election. And that's where we come in -- you and me. We Republicans know the truth: That convention in Atlanta was the biggest masquerade since last year's Mardi Gras here in New Orleans. And so, we're here this week for one purpose: to get our message to the American people, to prove to the liberal leadership of the other party, starting here and starting now, their attempt to hide their stand on the issues isn't going to work. The masquerade is over. The stealth candidacy has to come out from cover. It's time to talk issues; to use the dreaded ``L'' word; to say the policies of our opposition and the congressional leadership of his party are liberal, liberal, liberal. The choice before the American people this year is just as clear as it was in 1980 and 1984: a choice between, on the one hand, the policies of limited government, economic growth, a strong defense, and a firm foreign policy and, on the other hand, policies of tax and spend, economic stagnation, international weakness and accommodation, and always, always, always, blame America first.

But you and I understand that just having Republicans know all this isn't good enough. Our great victories of 1980 and '84 were based on millions of independents and rank-and-file Democrats who came our way. Their votes, especially those of traditional Democrats, is the key battleground. And here we have an advantage because on economic, social, and foreign policy issues those conservative-minded Democrats agree with us. And you know, some people -- and I've been a little flattered by this -- refer to this group as Reagan Democrats. Well, if it's true that I have an ``in'' with those Democrats, here's what I want to say to them today -- and what I hope you'll say to them when you get back home: You're right to feel uncomfortable about the leadership of the party you and I once pledged loyalty to. A party that once stood for the broad interests of America's working men and women has become a party fixated on the narrow agenda of the liberal elites and special interest groups. The power of liberal pressure groups in the party has grown so great that the rest of their candidates this year, the ones who voted for strong defense or tax cuts, didn't even dare to get into the primaries.

The President. All right. But the best way to do that is by saying yes to George Bush and yes to a new Congress -- a Congress that will work with the new President, not against him -- a Republican Congress.

For too long the control of the Congress has been in the hands of the liberal leadership. So, let us say to conservative Democrats and independents: Don't cancel out your vote for George Bush by voting for a Senator or Representative who will go along with the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party and fight all the good the new President will try to do. But even beyond that, my fellow conservatives, beyond identifying our sharp differences on the issues and exposing the opposition's attempt to hide its liberalism, there is something else we have to do. As time has gone by, the memory of the economic and foreign policy nightmares that we faced when we took office has faded. And so, we have to remind the American people of the record, of how far we've come.

Now, you can be sure the opposition party isn't going to help us here. They're even trying to pretend those economic and foreign policy nightmares they gave us never happened. One political commentator noticed this at their recent convention, and believe me, I just don't think I can improve on this paragraph. Let me read to you what Mark Helprin said. And remember, this is from him now, not me. Because you know, I might be accused of being biased. [Laughter] ``After 8 years of Ronald Reagan; a dozen new or incipient democracies in South America, the Philippines, and South Korea; after Russian or proxy withdrawal in process in Afghanistan, Angola, and Cambodia; the winding down of the Iran-Iraq war; half a dozen treaties and summits with a marvelously chastened Soviet Union; after the longest peacetime economic expansion in American history, record employment, and a two-point drop in the unemployment rate; a significant drop in the crime rate; a 12-point drop in the prime rate, and a 10-point drop in the rate of inflation -- not to mention tax reform and an economy that has succeeded in making the stock market crash almost inconsequential -- the Democrats trotted out Jimmy Carter to say `I told you so.''' [Laughter] And you know something, when I saw that happen in Atlanta, forgive me, but I couldn't help but think: There he goes again.

You know, that reminds me of a little story. [Laughter] It's about Mark Twain. One dark day Mark Twain went through shirt after shirt after shirt and just couldn't get one with all the buttons on it, and finally, losing his patience, he flew into a rage and then used a string of some very choice words. And then, as the story is told, when he was through, he turned and was startled to see his wife standing in the doorway. Carefully, slowly, and without a trace of emotion, she repeated every naughty word just uttered by her husband. That took several minutes. [Laughter] And when she was through, she stood impassive in silence, hoping her display would shame Twain.

Instead, there was a twinkle in his eye. He said, ``My dear, you have the words. You don't have the music.'' [Laughter] Well, that's true about the so-called leaders of the other party. They can try and adopt our words, but as long as we Republicans get out there and give the American people the music, there isn't a chance they'll get away with it.

So, that's the job ahead of us. And you tell me, when the liberals try to tell the American people they won't raise taxes, but fail to mention the new spending programs they've promised every liberal special interest group in Washington, are we going to stand by and let 'em get away with it?

The President. When the liberal leadership tries to tell the American people that they're the party of peace, but forgets to admit they jeopardized the chance for peace and tried to tie my hands in arms negotiations by favoring a nuclear freeze, cutting defense, and gutting SDI, are we going to let them get away with it?

The President. I thought you might object. [Laughter] You know, when they start using our words and slogans and then try to tell us that's how they're going to make the American people vote for them in November, it reminds me of that little kid at school who the day after getting his report card went back to school and said, ``Teacher, I thought somebody should warn you. My dad says that unless my math grades go up, somebody's going to get a whipping.'' [Laughter] You know what? They're right about one thing: The American people, just like that young fellow's dad, really are in a mood to settle some important questions this November. And it won't be President Bush and a new Republican Congress but those liberals from the other party that the American people take out behind the barn.

So, ladies and gentlemen, we have to get our word out about our own great record. But one other thing, too. Nobody votes for you just to say thank you. Americans can be appreciative about the past, but believe me, Americans vote for a vision of the future. So, we must talk to America about her future. We conservatives must go to the American people and tell them even 68 months of economic growth and 17\1/2\ million new jobs isn't good enough for us. We want more -- more growth, more opportunity, more jobs.

And we intend to ensure this kind of economic prosperity right through the nineties and into the next century by guaranteeing the Federal Government can never again spend and tax the American people into another economic nightmare. We'll do it by passing the line-item veto, the balanced budget amendment, and limits on the congressional taxing power.

So, too, we never want to see the day when the Supreme Court is more interested in criminal rights than in the rights of the victim and of society itself. You know, the next President may have the opportunity to appoint three and possibly four new justices shortly after taking office. We want to tell the American people what it will mean for their future if it's George Bush making those appointments.

And finally, there is this one last issue, yes, more important than even all the other crucial matters I've discussed with you today. Ladies and gentlemen, when we were together in Detroit in 1980 and Dallas in 1984, I wonder how many of us could really have believed then that so many of our fondest hopes and dreams for America would come true. And of all those things that have happened, how many of us could have imagined 8 or even 4 years ago that one day I would have the opportunity to stand, as I did a few months ago, there in the Lenin Hills, at a podium at Moscow State University, and tell the young people of Russia about the wonder and glory of human freedom. And here is the crux, the heart of the matter. With the beginnings of change we've seen in the Eastern bloc and with the development of concepts like SDI that destroy weapons, not people, it is just possible that we have a chance now to end the two great nightmares of this century and give our children a future free of both totalitarianism and nuclear terror.

My fellow Republicans, we have proved that what works in foreign policy is exactly the opposite of the policies of our opposition. We have demonstrated time and again that plain talk, a strong defense, and tough diplomacy bring peace. What a great moment we have before us, and oh how future generations will dishonor us if now, in a moment of sudden folly, we throw it all away. And this is what is now at stake. We must hold to this moment of hope. And I tell you with every ounce of energy and every fiber of my being, only electing George Bush President of the United States can accomplish that.

Instead, remember this: This isn't a campaign, it's a crusade, a crusade for America's future. And this, too: We aren't just good conservative managers, we are the keepers of the flame, the protectors of the dream -- the American dream that someday freedom will be the blessing and birthright of every people in every nation across God's greening Earth. This is a dream worth protecting and one, believe me, that needs protecting -- protection from those who would squander it away with special interest spending; for those who would tax the American people into servitude; those who would make leniency, not justice, the hallmark of our courtrooms; those who would risk a Soviet base camp in Central America; those who would cut defense or end SDI or return us to weakness and accommodation abroad. No, my fellow Republicans, this is not the future our fellow Americans want.

So, let us go to the American people. Let us tell them of our vision, of the future we offer: a future of economic growth and opportunity and democratic revolution and peace among nations. And let us remind them, too, of America's destiny, of our great calling as a people. And let us take them to a place where they can see with us that hilltop just now being glimpsed through the dark but dispersing clouds of 20th-century tragedy. Let us help them look from there upon that shining city we have seen and labored for and loved so long, a city aglow with the light of human freedom, a light that someday will cast its glow on every dark corner of the world and on every age and generation to come.

My fellow Republicans, America needs the strength, the vision, and the true grit of George Bush. And after almost a half a century of Democratic Congresses, America needs a Republican Congress. And you and I are going to give her both. Let's do this for America. Thank you, and God bless you all.

Well, now, if I can come down to Earth for a minute here. You know, obviously, this convention is a very warm and nostalgic one for my husband and me. We can't help but think of previous conventions and all the remarkable people that we've met over the years. So many memories come flooding back: Kansas City, Detroit, Dallas. The Republican Party has given Ronnie and me 8 of the most wonderful years we ever had. Of course, sometimes they were a little bit frustrating and a little bit frightening, but they were wonderful. So, I'd like to express our thanks to you for giving us those years.

But you know, there are cycles and rhythms to life. There are times to enter, times to stay, and times to leave. And today the curtain begins to close on the Reagan era of the Republican Party. We've had a wonderful run. But the time has come for the Bushes to step into the political leading roles, and for the Reagans to step into the wings. And that's as it should be.

During our two terms together, George and Bar have been totally supportive and helpful and gracious. And they have our gratitude and affection. My husband couldn't have selected a better Vice President than George Bush. He's a man of integrity and conscience and loyalty -- qualities that aren't always in great abundance in Washington. And I know I couldn't have found a warmer, more considerate, more caring counterpart than Barbara Bush. And I think she'll be a remarkable First Lady.

I want to thank George and Bar for that letter that they sent also. And I want to thank all of you here and so many others who aren't here, who have stood by us over these past 8 years. I can't tell you how important it is to know that you have friends. So, to my friends, I say a very heartfelt thank you. Thank you very much.

In fact, I've been thinking for several days about what exactly I wanted to say today and how to put Nancy's role in my life in perspective for you. But what do you say about someone who gives your life meaning? What do you say about someone who's always there with support and understanding, someone who makes sacrifices so that your life will be easier and more successful? Well, what you say is that you love that person and treasure her. I simply can't imagine the last 8 years without Nancy. The Presidency wouldn't have been the joy it's been for me without her there beside me. And that second-floor living quarters in the White House would have seemed a big and lonely spot without her waiting for me every day at the end of the day. You know, she once said that a President has all kinds of advisers and experts who look after his interests when it comes to foreign policy or the economy or whatever, but no one who looks after his needs as a human being. Well, Nancy has done that for me through recuperations and crises. Every President should be so lucky.

I think it's all too common in marriages that, no matter how much partners love each other, they don't thank each other enough. And I suppose I don't thank Nancy enough for all that she does for me. So, Nancy, in front of all your friends here today, let me say: Thank you for all you do. Thank you for your love. And thank you for just being you.

And today America can see further because of your vision. And now it's time to extend that vision into the next century, and it's time to accept the challenge that you've left for us and made possible: to build a better America. And we accept that challenge, and we look forward to writing the next chapter in America's freedom story because America's mission is greatness.

But seriously -- and no more of that -- George, a great deal rides on this campaign. And on you are America's hopes for continued peace and prosperity. And Nancy and I want you and Barbara to know that you have all our support all the way and all our love. And good luck, and God bless you both.

President Bush has made an outstanding selection of Senator Quayle as his running mate. Dan was first elected to the Senate as part of the Reagan-Bush team in 1980. He's a proven vote-getter. I've worked closely with Dan on a number of issues. He has been a leader in the Senate for a strong national defense, particularly the Strategic Defense Initiative, and proponent of innovative job creation programs. His talent, intellect, family, and energy will be valuable assets during the campaign, and I know he will be a great Vice President. I salute Vice President Bush's selection. George has made an excellent choice.

Today at the U.S. nuclear test site in Nevada, the United States and the Soviet Union will conduct the first phase of the Joint Verification Experiment (JVE). This is the result of a U.S.-Soviet agreement which provides for one underground nuclear explosion experiment at the U.S. test site and for another such experiment at the Soviet test site near Semipalatinsk in September. U.S. and Soviet scientists, technicians, and observers will be present at each other's test site to measure yields of the explosions and to discuss the results of the two tests.

For the past four decades a strong nuclear deterrent has ensured U.S. security and helped to preserve the freedom of our allies and friends. As long as we must rely on nuclear weapons, we must continue to test to ensure the reliability, effectiveness, safety, security, and survivability of our nuclear arsenal.

In these 7\1/2\ years, I met with President Zia several times, and we worked together for peace and stability. His commitment to the independence and security of his country always came through. President Zia also believed in freedom for Afghanistan. He had the courage to host millions of Afghans who fled to Pakistan to escape a brutal war and to provide support for the Afghan resistance. The people of Pakistan followed his lead, incurring sacrifices to do so.

United States was fortunate to have such a friend in President Zia, but our support for Pakistan is not dependent upon any individual. Our close relations with Pakistan go back three decades, as does our commitment to its security and stability. Our strong support for the people of Pakistan and the security and territorial integrity of Pakistan will continue. We will give our full support to acting President Ghulam Ishaq Khan.

Service. He worked tirelessly to build and preserve the ties between our two countries. He will be missed. Nancy and I extend our sympathy and prayers to Mrs. Raphel and to the Raphel family and to the families of the others who lost their lives.

General Accounting Office's request for information on General Noriega asks for a broad range of sensitive intelligence material, information from open law enforcement files, and material reflecting the deliberative decisionmaking process of the executive branch. Administration officials met with the GAO in an effort to narrow the request, which GAO declined to do.

Because the request involved extremely sensitive intelligence and law enforcement information, and because the attempt to inquire into the deliberative process of the executive branch raises serious constitutional concerns, we informed GAO on July 13, 1988, that [we] would need to complete a legal review of the issues raised by their request before responding. The Justice Department has just completed that review and has concluded that the subject matter of the request is beyond GAO's statutory authority. The Justice Department has also concluded that, even were the request within the GAO's legal authority, there are statutory and constitutional objections to providing various specific categories of information requests.

The administration is prepared to meet with GAO to discuss the legal issues involved. Moreover, if GAO reformulates its request in a manner consistent with its statutory authority and the legal principles involved, we will respond to any such new request in an appropriate manner.

President has been briefed on the results of the investigation into the circumstances surrounding the downing of Iran Air flight 655 and concurs in the actions taken by Secretary [of Defense] Carlucci. The President has been provided a copy of the report of the investigation.

Throughout our history, older people have achieved much for our families, our communities, and our country. That remains true today, and gives us ample reason this year to reserve a special day in honor of the senior citizens who mean so much to our land.

With improved health care and more years of productivity, older citizens are reinforcing their historical roles as leaders and as links with our patrimony and sense of purpose as individuals and as a Nation. Many older people are embarking on second careers, giving younger Americans a fine example of responsibility, resourcefulness, competence, and determination. And more than 4.5 million senior citizens are serving as volunteers in various programs and projects that benefit every sector of society. Wherever the need exists, older people are making their presence felt -- for their own good and that of others.

For all they have achieved throughout life and for all they continue to accomplish, we owe older citizens our thanks and a heartfelt salute. We can best demonstrate our gratitude and esteem by making sure that our communities are good places in which to mature and grow older -- places in which older people can participate to the fullest and can find the encouragement, acceptance, assistance, and services they need to continue to lead lives of independence and dignity.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Station will advance the frontiers of scientific knowledge and strengthen cooperation in space among the United States and its Allies. The Act also provides important funding needed to restore the Nation's Space Shuttle capability, which is essential to national security and the effective use of space to meet our economic needs. Although the Act permits the transfer of a specified amount of Department of Defense funds to the National Aeronautics and Space Administration to fund certain space activities, it does not require such transfer and therefore does not mandate action inconsistent with the Bipartisan Budget Agreement to which the Congressional Leadership and I agreed last November.

In addition to providing the funds to continue the Nation's leadership in space, the Act funds essential federal housing assistance programs, supports vital efforts to improve the environment, and provides veterans the benefits they earn by answering the Nation's call to arms.

HUD -- Independent Agencies Appropriations Act is only the second of the 13 appropriations bills for Fiscal Year 1989 that the Congress must send me before it completes its work for the year. In past years, the Congress has sent me a single mega-bill called an ``omnibus continuing resolution'' that wraps up the various appropriations bills in a single bill that spends $600 billion of the taxpayers' money. The mega-bill approach does not permit the Legislative and Executive branches to exercise the necessary control over Federal spending.

You and I had the privilege of attending quite a party this week in New Orleans. Of course, I'm talking about the Republican National Convention. And let me tell you, when the Grand Old Party throws itself a grand old party, it can even give the exuberant folks of New Orleans a lesson or two in how to have fun.

I was moved beyond words to see my very, very good friend and colleague George Bush accepting the nomination for President. On Monday night, I said I wanted to work as a foot soldier in George's campaign. After hearing his speech Thursday night, all Americans could see what I've seen for 8 years: dedication, integrity, and commitment to principle; a strong man and a strong leader. I've said many times that George has the experience, the credentials, the savvy, and the -- well -- the just plain grit to be President of the United States.

Ford put it so beautifully in his address Tuesday night: ``When his nation needed him to fly 58 combat missions during World War II, George answered America's call. When our intelligence agencies were under siege during the 1970's, George made a vital contribution to our national security by restoring their dignity and integrity.'' I said the other night that, as Vice President, George Bush brilliantly served his nation's quest for peace by playing a vital role in the process that has led to the historic INF treaty that will eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

I'm talking about his determined attack on unnecessary government regulations that had our economy under siege and were assaulting job creation. Yes, if you're one of the many millions of Americans who has found a new job in the last 8 years, one major reason that job exists may well be George Bush. And one other thing: George has always given me straight-from-the-shoulder advice and counsel on how we could advance our vision for the future, and he's always been candid with me when we disagreed. That's the George Bush I know best. But there's also the George Bush who's a father of 5, grandfather of 10, a devoted husband, a man never too busy to take the time to help a friend who needed him.

The strength and wisdom of George Bush was reflected this week in the strength and wisdom of the Republican Party itself, just as the energy and enthusiasm of the party were reflected in the energy and enthusiasm of Senator Dan Quayle. Dan was elected to the Senate on the day I was first elected President. Dan shares with George Bush and me a vision of an America and a world no longer threatened by the specter of nuclear attack. That's why Dan has labored with conviction for the Strategic Defense Initiative. And he shares a vision of opportunity for all Americans. And that's why he's stood with George Bush and me throughout the fight to lower tax rates and increase opportunity for all Americans.

Throughout the week our party's leaders came together in a display of force and grace -- the no-nonsense wit and wisdom of Bob Dole, the intellectual dynamism of Jack Kemp, the big-hearted populism of Tom Kean, the Texas gusto of Phil Gramm, and so many others. And there were those who brought a special message of unity to the party. Like me, Jeane Kirkpatrick and Bill Bennett were once Democrats, and like me, they've found a home in the Republican Party. Yes, Bill and Jeane and all those who spoke proved that the Republican Party is a party proud of its vision for the future and ready to lay it out in detail.

Just look at the Republican platform. This 40,000 word document spells out the views of George Bush and our party on almost every major issue facing the Nation today. Like it or not -- and I like it -- when you read it, you know where George stands. Now, compare it with the 4,000 word document passed by the opposition last month in Atlanta. That document is a plethora of platitudes, and it points up the difference between the two parties. Our friends in Atlanta won't tell you what they'll do if they get elected, but George Bush and Dan Quayle already have.

George and Dan and our party have spread their roadmap out on the table for all to see, while the other guys won't tell us where they're going and won't even give us directions. It will take more than platitudes to convince the American people: It will take the courage to stand up for principle.

Yes, this week, as in every week for the past 8 years, George Bush has stood up for principle. He's been in on the tough decisions, working for peace through strength and prosperity through liberty. And I'm proud to stand with him.

August 21, 1988, marks the 20th anniversary of the Soviet-led Warsaw Pact invasion of Czechoslovakia. That invasion put a brutal end to the so-called Prague Spring, during which the people of Czechoslovakia sought to implement political and economic reforms which would have moved their country away from tyranny and closer to its own democratic traditions. The Soviet-led invasion stopped this reform process and has left a 20-year legacy of political repression and economic stagnation.

An entire generation has been born and raised since tanks rolled through the streets of Prague, crushing the hopes of Czechoslovakia to determine its own destiny. Brave men and women within the country, such as the signatories of Charter 77 [a Czechoslovakian human rights initiative], continue to struggle for freedom and long-overdue reforms, which remain the fervent hope of Czechs and Slovaks. We take the occasion of this anniversary to salute these people and to express firm agreement with their conviction that, in the end, truth will prevail.

We also take this occasion to note that the winds of change now sweeping across the Soviet Union and parts of Eastern Europe cannot bring fundamental reconciliation between East and West until historical injustices, such as the 1968 invasion, are forthrightly dealt with and corrected. The so-called Brezhnev doctrine, which was used to justify the invasion, should be openly renounced by Moscow. Soviet troops should be removed. The peoples of Eastern Europe should be free to choose their own system of government. There must be an end to the cruel and artificial division of Europe which continues to split that continent from the Baltic States through Berlin to the Balkans. Only true self-determination of peoples can bring genuine peace and stability to Europe and to the East-West relationship.

I have today signed into law H.R. 1414, legislation that extends for 15 years the Price-Anderson Act, the law that protects the public in the event of a nuclear accident and that makes feasible commercial nuclear power generation. This new legislation preserves the public's right to speedy compensation in the event of a nuclear accident and expands the level of protection to over 7 billion dollars.

I sign this legislation in the midst of a summer that has brought record temperatures to much of our country. As a consequence, many of our utilities find themselves near the limits of their power-generating capacity.

The current limits to our electrical generating capacity are already being felt: clocks losing time because of voltage reductions, temporary losses of power at moments of peak demand, and the necessity of employing backup generators at hospitals and like facilities that have this capacity to meet emergency needs.

The implication of this situation is clear: Our Nation must move forward into a new era of safe, economical, and clean nuclear power. Nuclear power, like our other domestic energy sources, is not subject to foreign supply interruptions and does not add to our balance-of-payments deficit. Nearly 100,000 megawatts of electricity are provided by nuclear power each year, enough to meet approximately 20 percent of the country's electricity demand. To replace this energy with electricity produced by oil would require two million barrels of oil per day, pump 350 million tons of carbon dioxide into the atmosphere each year, and, if the demand is not met from domestic reserves, worsen our trade deficit by more than 1 billion dollars per month to purchase foreign oil.

Enactment of an extension of Price-Anderson is the latest in our steps to assure a reliable, expanding supply of nuclear power for the Nation. The Nuclear Regulatory Commission is moving forward to improve the efficiency of its licensing process while still assuring that any safety questions are fully resolved before major new power plants are constructed. We have worked with the Congress to enact legislation that will put in place safe, environmentally sound disposal facilities for the low-level and high-level wastes that are the product of nuclear power plants. Private industry is developing improved nuclear reactor technologies that promise to be simpler, safer, and more economical.

In signing H.R. 1414, I note the presence of one provision that warrants careful construction in order to avoid constitutional problems. Accordingly, I am stating my interpretation of that provision to make certain that the Act is implemented in a constitutional manner.

Section 7 of H.R. 1414, however, might appear to require the President to submit legislation to the Congress under certain circumstances. In order to avoid constitutional difficulties, I will construe section 7 as recommendatory rather than obligatory.

Signing into law this extension of Price-Anderson protection for the public in 1988 is a reflection of the continuing commitment of this Administration and of the Congress to secure the public's right to a safe and economically secure future. To keep America strong, nuclear energy truly must realize its full potential as a technology. I am pleased to take this step to assure that goal.

Individuals with neurofibromatosis, their families, and the health professionals who help them can all benefit from new guidelines for the diagnosis and management of this condition developed last year in a consensus conference at the National Institutes of Health. At the conference, scientists studying the genetics of neurofibromatosis presented particularly encouraging findings: They have determined that the gene defect that causes NF - 1 lies on chromosome 17, and the defect for NF - 2 on chromosome 22. These discoveries, medical experts agree, should soon lead to the development of diagnostic tests capable of definitively detecting neurofibromatosis gene carriers. As more is learned about the genetic defects in neurofibromatosis, scientists will be better able to design treatment strategies to assist those afflicted.

Private voluntary health agencies, chiefly the National Neurofibromatosis Foundation, are partners with the National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke in the fight against this tragic disorder. Countless families have been sustained and encouraged by support groups established by these agencies in most large American cities. These agencies also play an essential role in informing the health care professions and the general public about neurofibromatosis, about the needs of patients and families, and about the positive actions we can all undertake to ease their burdens.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

The President. Thank you all very much, and thank you, President Talin, Ambassador Yeutter, Members of the Congress. I thank you all for being here. And I must tell you, this harbor brings back some memories for me. Of course, when you're my age, everything brings back memories -- [laughter] -- even other memories. [Laughter] I was here nearly 6 years ago for a similar ceremony. And since then, we've seen a record number of people employed in this country. We've seen a blossoming of new technologies unlike any in world history. And we have seen an unparalleled boom in exports, a boom that, in a very real sense, can be said to have started right here at the Port of Long Beach.

And yet, watching the bustle and flow of the harbor then, as now, I was struck by the fact that, while the globe seems to shrink in size as our ability to speed around it expands, still we must, as in olden days, rely on the gallant and hardy folk who go down to the sea in ships to transmit our bounty to other nations and receive theirs on our shores. It's for the purpose of improving and refining America's ability to do both these things that we gather today to sign into law the Omnibus Trade and Competitiveness Act of 1988.

On that day in 1982, I sat here in front of one of the most impressive vessels I've ever seen. And it's here today again, right here behind me. And as I look at this massive creation, our century's answer to the schooners and other trading ships of a century past, the word that comes to mind now, as it did 6 years ago, is an old sailing term not much in use any more, and that word is ``yare.'' It means easy to handle, quick to respond, bright, and lively. And it seems to me that yare is a word that applies just as well to our vibrant economy as it does to this fine ship.

Well, we're here to sign a piece of legislation that will help our economy continue to grow and compete. Our administration and Congress have come together in an effort to ensure open markets around the world. And yet this bill is just the latest step in that direction, in that effort, which began the first day that George Bush and I entered office and has already opened vast markets to American products all around the globe. It hasn't been easy, but I've never doubted our ultimate victory because we're riding a global wave. Country after country is recognizing that free trade is the key to a more prosperous future and that protectionism protects no one, not even the special interests that want it so much. This bill will help us continue our efforts to open markets. It'll help insist on standards of fairplay for our products abroad. It'll strengthen the ability of U.S. firms to protect their patented, copyrighted, or trademarked goods and ideas from international thievery.

Most important, it brings Congress and our administration together in firm support of the new round of multilateral trade talks that began in Uruguay in September 1986. It guarantees that we will consult with the private sector on our initiatives. It compels Congress to consider with all due speed the results of our international trade negotiations. The United States Government now speaks with one voice in calling for a free and open trading system, one committed to fairplay for all participants.

I'm delighted to see that this bill also eliminates the so-called windfall profits tax, a pernicious piece of law from the old tax-and-spend years. You know, the truth about the windfall profits tax is that it was a windfall for those who think the Government knows best what to do with our money. Now, with that tax abolished, many thousands of Americans who've lost their jobs as the result of the downturn in energy prices may find themselves back at work.

Let me be plain that there are some things in this bill I don't like. It is possible this bill could lead to an import fee that would be illegal according to international law and inconsistent with our goal of moving toward free world trade. Its language claims to require the executive branch to negotiate with foreign countries on certain specified trade topics. And that's inconsistent with our constitutional principles. It also claims to require the International Trade Commission to conduct investigations in response to a resolution passed by a single House or Senate committee. And that, too, is inconsistent with our constitutional principles.

Well, finally, there are also provisions that assign specific authority to executive officials, such as the United States Trade Representative. It must and will be understood that all officials of the executive branch of this government are subject to the direction and control of the President. And so, in signing this bill, I'm specifically noting that it will be implemented in a constitutional manner.

What we see before us today is a future filled with promise and hope. This bill will allow us to provide up to a billion dollars a year for retraining workers to adjust to our turbocharged economy, an economy that, with the right leader, will remain yare. Yes, there are challenges ahead of us, but we Americans know that nothing worth having comes without a challenge. Challenges and opportunities are just two words for the same condition: the condition called freedom -- from the freedom of the human soul to the freedom of choice that is the hallmark of our democracy to, yes, the freedom we speak of today, the freedom to exchange goods, services, and ideas in the world market. America craves the challenges and relishes the opportunities that these freedoms provide.

Thank you for proving what I have always said to people when they inquire about Orange County: I've said it's where the good Republicans go before they die. [Laughter] Pete, thank you very much for those kind words, Reverend Moomaw and the other guests here on the top shelf. Two friends of mine who work for me at the White House are with us today. They brought the cake in -- Chris Cox and Dana Rohrabacher. I know that both Chris and Dana, when they go to Washington in January, will be outstanding additions to the Congress and will serve our nation well. Also I want to thank Congressmen Bob Badham and David Dreier who have both been tireless supporters of this administration.

Now, before we begin, I should set the record straight. To most of you, it must seem pretty obvious that I came here today to show my support for Pete Wilson's reelection in this critical race. Actually I just dropped in hoping to get a little birthday cake. [Laughter] The truth is that I had a special reason for wanting to be here for this occasion. You see, I was very moved at my own 55th birthday when President Abraham Lincoln showed up and said a few kind words.

Well, on the Armed Services Committee, Senator Pete Wilson has been a strong voice for California and for the Nation. He has been an important part of our efforts to revitalize America's defenses and restore what another Roosevelt so accurately called ``the great arsenal of democracy.'' Pete Wilson knows that a strong America is essential to world peace and vital for maintaining everything that we've accomplished in international affairs, especially our improved relations with the Soviet Union, which have produced the first treaty in history to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

Pete Wilson knows that a strong America is essential to world peace and vital for maintaining everything that we've accomplished in international affairs, as I say. Yes, we have improved those relations, as I just pointed out. Now, while the liberal opposition opposes the B - 1 bomber, the MX, and our Strategic Defense Initiative, Pete Wilson knows that peace flows from strength and that a return to weakness would jeopardize all that we've achieved and that that cannot be allowed.

One of the most important issues, one that touches the lives of so many people, is the problem of crime. The physical and emotional wounds that are inflicted by violent criminals can take a lifetime to heal. Whole neighborhoods can be destroyed by hoods, thugs, and drug dealers.

Crime is not a statistic: It is an outrage and a sin, and it must be fought. Pete's opponent, like so many of the liberal Democrats on the ballot this year, just can't seem to understand that the way to fight crime is to put the criminals in jail and keep them there. To protect our communities we need tough laws, strict sentencing, and no-nonsense judges. We need Pete Wilson who has always fought for strict drug enforcement, not someone who worked to liberalize the prohibition of illegal drugs and who spent most of his career as an outspoken opponent of the death penalty. In fact, Pete's liberal opponent even opposed the crime victims' bill of rights, while Pete Wilson helped lead the successful effort to pass it. You know, ever since I was Governor, I've felt that liberals need remedial instruction on the subject of crime. So, if any liberals are listening, let's try it one more time: Criminals are not victims, and victims are not criminals.

When new vacancies occur on the Supreme Court, Senator Pete Wilson will continue to support strong men and women to fill those seats, while his liberal opponent would be on the opposite side. Just remember that when the people of California turned out one of the softest chief justices in the Nation, Pete's opponent was on the wrong side: the far left side. I think you'll agree with me that the judicial policy of these liberal Democrats is strictly for the birds and has no place in the United States Senate.

Four years ago today, I accepted for the second time my party's nomination for President. A few things have changed since then. America has become even stronger. The world has become even more peaceful. And, oh, yes, the economy today is even more prosperous than it was four years ago. And why shouldn't it be? With our progrowth economic policies, things just keep getting better every year.

But, no, the message from our liberal opponents is: You can take prosperity for granted. It's time for a change, so take a change [chance] on us. Well, that's sort of like someone telling you you've stored up all the cold beer you could want, so now it's time to unplug the refrigerator. [Laughter] But no more than with a refrigerator, you can't unplug our progrowth economic policies and expect things to stay the same. And the funny thing is that sometimes our liberal opponents will even admit it. They like to say that beginning next year the Reagan era will be over.

Inflation is low; employment is at an all-time high. The unemployment rate recently hit a 14-year low. And, yes, if our opponents are elected this era of record prosperity will be over. But I've got news for the liberals: It's not going to happen.

But what about our opponents? They point at the hole in the donut and say they can fill that hole by reversing the policies that made the donut in the first place. [Laughter] They point at swiss cheese and say they can fill the holes in swiss cheese by reversing the policies that gave us cheese in the first place. They point at peace and prosperity and say they can expand the peace and prosperity. How? By reversing the policies that gave us peace and prosperity in the first place. My friends, the choice is between people pushing an absurd line like that and our team, which promises to continue what's working and to keep America changing for the better. And with a choice like that, I just don't see how we can lose.

Pete's opponent opposes the balanced budget amendment and has supported high taxes, Pete Wilson has worked diligently for fiscal responsibility and as a defender of the taxpayer. Pete supports Gramm-Rudman, the balanced budget amendment, and, yes, the line-item veto, which 43 Governors have. He has supported the policies that have brought record employment in California and brought the unemployment rate to its lowest level for over a decade and a half. Let's keep Pete Wilson in the Senate and keep California and America working.

Republican Party has shown America who talks and who delivers. We've shown them that our team can produce results today, tomorrow, and on into the next decade because our philosophy is sound and our policies work. If the 1988 election is a question, the answer is this: America is not going to trade away our winning team for third-stringers with a weak defense, a foreign policy of errors, curveball campaign promises, a set of policies to be named later, and billions of dollars in higher taxes.

Well, just last week, Pete and I were at the Republican National Convention in New Orleans. And I can tell you, our party is strong, unified, and ready to work for a victory. I'll be crisscrossing the country for our ticket. And California, this year especially, will be one of the truly critical States. With your tremendous support, I feel confident that when I return to my ranch I'll have Pete Wilson representing me in the Senate. And with what I saw in New Orleans -- I saw a real chance that Pete may be part of a Republican majority in the Senate. And wouldn't that be a nice gift for President George Bush and Vice President Dan Quayle?

I'm going to do something that wasn't planned right now. I'm just going to -- you know, I'm sort of addicted to stories, and Pete tempted me when he mentioned stories in -- my latest hobby is collecting stories that I can absolutely establish are told by the citizens of the Soviet Union among themselves. And it reveals they got a great sense of humor and a little cynical approach to their present system. But I came home from the Moscow summit with a new one that caught up with me on the way home. I hadn't heard it there, but one of our security detail had.

And he said the story that they were telling among themselves had me in a limousine with Gorbachev. And I had the head of our secret service unit with me, and he had his head security man with him. And we were sightseeing. And we got to a waterfall, and we all got out to see the beautiful waterfall. And Gorbachev said to my man, ``Well, go ahead, jump. Go over the fall.'' And my man said, ``I got a wife and three kids.'' So Gorbachev turned to his man and said, ``Jump, go over the fall.'' And he did. Well, my man scrambled down the rocks around the fall.

Republican Senate and a Democrat House of Representatives. But, at least having that one House, we couldn't have had the recovery that we have if we had not had that one House. The difference now, in these final 2 years, with both Houses in Democratic hands, is so apparent. And when you stop to think that out of the last 56 years the Congress of the United States has been dominated by the other party -- for 46 of those 56 years, they've had both Houses of the Congress, and for 52 of the 56 years, they have had the House of Representatives. Every Republican President, except for a 2-year period under Ike, has had a Democratic Congress. Every Democratic President, except for 2 years during Harry Truman's term, has had a Democratic Congress.

Associate Counsel to the President, and Dana Rohrabacher, former speechwriter for the President, who were campaigning for seats in the House of Representatives; and Representatives Robert E. Badham and David Dreier.

Repeal of the Windfall Profits tax reflects a recognition that free market incentives -- not taxes and government regulation -- will keep America's oil and gas industries among the world's leading energy producers. The tax imposed substantial costs and paperwork on energy producers while raising little revenue for the Federal Treasury. It made no sense for Congress to force energy producers to spend many millions of dollars each year in accounting and administrative costs just to report that no tax was due.

The people of Texas and the Nation will benefit from the stronger and more competitive energy industry brought by the elimination of this counterproductive tax. With appreciation for your crucial leadership and hard work on the repeal of the Windfall Profits Tax, I am pleased to enclose the pen with which I signed H.R. 4848 into law.

The Vice President. What a crowd! What a wonderful, enthusiastic crowd! For a minute, I thought we'd come to the welcoming ceremony for Wayne Gretzky. [Laughter] This is fantastic. I want to thank the Governor, the good Duke -- thank him for that introduction -- to urge, with all my heart, the overwhelming reelection of Pete Wilson. That's going to benefit all of us on the ticket.

And California is absolutely essential, so Barbara and I will be here. My running mate and his wife, Marilyn, will be here. And we are not going to overlook any single area in this all-important State. I came to ask for your help; with it, I am convinced we can win in November. There is a profound difference between me and my opponent in this election, a difference not only of policies but really of fundamental values. And I believe the two most important issues facing our country are jobs and peace. And that's what I will focus on if elected President, and that's what this election is all about -- jobs and peace.

In the last 6 years, we've created 17 million new jobs. Ninety percent of them are full-time. The majority are in higher paying categories. And we're not creating just good jobs and good wages; we're creating better jobs at better wages, and we intend to keep right on doing it. The President met with some of us earlier, and he reminded me that more Americans are at work today than ever before in the history of this country and a greater percentage of the work force is at work than any time in the history of this country. And they're making more money. And they're keeping more of it in their own pockets, where it belongs.

Democrats, probably with that old Carter-Mondale misery index in mind, are running all around the country talking about this swiss-cheese economy. And as I said in New Orleans, that may be how it looks to the three blind mice, but that's not how it looks to the American people. And when they were in charge, it was all holes and no cheese at all.

Start with urban and rural enterprise zones; cut the capital gains tax rate to help small businesses get started; keep Congress from regulating business to death; and slash the deficit with a flexible freeze on spending and a line-item veto for the President. There's a good five-point program for you.

You've seen the bumper stickers. [Laughter] And if he had -- this is a fact -- if he had increased Federal taxes at the same rate that he's done in Massachusetts, the average American family would be paying $2,300 more this year in income taxes alone.

The Vice President. But let me just repeat what I said on taxes. I promise you, if Congress tries to raise the taxes when I'm President -- and you know they will -- I'll say no. And if they try again, I'll stare them right in the eye and say, Read my lips: No new taxes! To the millions of Americans taking out a loan on that new car or a mortgage on their first house, I'm going to say we've cut inflation from double digits to 4 percent. And we've cut those interest rates in half. And I'm not going to let them take it away from you. And to the leaders of this expansion -- the women who helped create the new jobs and filled two out of every three of them -- I say you know better than anyone that equality begins with economic empowerment.

You're gaining economic power, and I'm not going to let them take that away from you either. And to the older Americans, we're going to keep that Social Security Trust Fund sound. And we're not going to let them take that security away from the older Americans in this country either.

I am worried about foreign affairs and the national security of this country. I'm concerned about my opponent's approach to national security matters. If there's one thing that our President has proved beyond all doubt, it is that weakness and ambivalence tempt aggressors to start wars, and strength and clarity deter aggression and preserve the peace. And we've had a bipartisan consensus on this: Roosevelt, Truman, Dwight Eisenhower, John Kennedy, President Ronald Reagan -- all of them understood this, formed a basis for our bipartisan consensus on foreign policy that has kept the peace for 40 years. And I think it is fair to ask whether my opponent understands that. And his policies place him far outside the bipartisan consensus, far out on the liberal leftwing. And that's where he is on these security issues.

The Vice President. I'd rather keep this country prepared. And so, we're going to have a debate on these fundamental, factual issues. When it comes to the land-based part of our triad, it's three positions -- no new MX, no midgetman, no flight testing of new missiles -- that add up to no modernization. And in this troubled world we're in, no modernization amounts to unilateral cuts. And so I ask: Is he discarding the mainstream, strategic doctrine of Democratic and Republican Presidents alike for 30 years? Is he saying we don't need it? And I want to know, and I believe the American people have a right to know, how we're approaching these defense matters. I will make you this pledge: I will keep our forces modern, and I will keep them strong. And I will keep America secure and at peace.

The Vice President. Today we're entering into a new era in American history: an era of growth and opportunity, an era -- we're strong and hopes are high. But the foundation of our pride -- the people's pride -- is values, old-fashioned American values like family and faith, patriotism, persistence, and really a belief in freedom.

I just have to insert something here. Yesterday, my opponent came out swinging, and of all things -- the Pledge of Allegiance. And what is it about the Pledge of Allegiance that upsets him so much? The Democratic legislature -- now, listen to these facts -- the Democratic legislature in Massachusetts supports it. Ten years ago, they required teachers to lead the pledge, and that remains the law in Massachusetts today because the legislature overrode my opponent's veto by an overwhelming vote. I would have signed that bill. Any constitutional question that someone might raise should be decided by the Supreme Court of the United States. And Governor Jim Thompson, who faced a similar choice, made the right choice: signed the same bill, and now it's law in Illinois.

John Adams and John Hancock -- would have objected to teachers leading students in the Pledge of Allegiance to the flag of the United States. I just don't believe that was their concept when they wrote the Constitution of our great country.

I've served with a great President, and this is no time to go in the opposite direction. This is the time to build on what we have done and to take this country forward. This is the time to offer hope to every American. Some haven't benefited by this, the longest recovery in history, but if we stay the course and keep this country moving ahead, everyone will benefit.

And let me be very, very clear about one last point. I have been very proud, very proud indeed, to serve as Vice President for President Ronald Reagan. And now it is my high honor to once again introduce him to you, his friends and strong supporters -- ladies and gentlemen, the President of the United States.

But after your speech to the convention, I'd say America has another great communicator. And he's going to be America's next President. And I must confess, I like your running mate, too. He has many more years of experience in dealing with national security issues than the head of the other ticket. He's the author of the Job Training Partnership Act, and thousands of Americans are working today because of that legislation. And he has the most important qualification of all for a copilot: He won't be trying to turn the plane in one direction while the pilot is flying it in the other.

Quayle stands for the same principles George Bush and I stand for. We have a big job ahead of us this November. It was more than two decades ago that we first launched, right here in California, our crusade to restore America's freedom and its greatness. We Californians lit the spark here in our State. We nursed it and tended it until it grew into a flame and then into a great beacon fire that has illuminated our nation and inspired the world.

As this fire has grown brighter in the last 8 years; as we cut interest rates, as George told you, to half of what they were and inflation to a third of what it was; as we set America on the longest peacetime expansion in history and gave new vitality to America's promise of opportunity; as we restored America's reduction of -- well, I should say strength, not reduction -- I'm jumping ahead of myself here -- [laughter] -- and negotiated the first real reduction of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles in world history; as we achieved all this, no one has been closer to my side and has contributed more to our success than George Bush.

Our opponents adopted our rhetoric and our slogans, but every word was like a mask which hid the liberal face of their agenda. When they said opportunity, they meant subsidies. When they said reducing the deficit, they meant raising taxes.

Yes, hard as they tried to hide, the liberals gave themselves away when they said that if they're elected, the Reagan era will be over. Well, now, I'd like to ask you something. When George Bush and I took office 8 years ago, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. We turned that around and since our expansion began, we've created, as George told you, actually it's been now more than 17\1/2\ million jobs, reduced the unemployment rate to the lowest it's been in 14 years, and presided over the greatest flowering of new businesses and new technology in the history of the world. For every plant that closes in America today, every business that closes, six new ones are started. So, do you want this era to be over?

During the last liberal administration, the Justice Department started to lose interest in narcotics cases. Each year they brought fewer cases, and convictions were down by almost half by their last year in office. Since George Bush and I got in there, Federal narcotics convictions have more than doubled.

And while the number of drug users soared during the last administration, it's dropping now. And recently we got the best news of all: High school students have heard the plea of a certain lovely lady I know, and they are saying no to drugs. And that includes no to cocaine. Now, do you want this progress to be lost and this era to be over?

The President. Well, this year, the liberal opposition has fielded a three-headed ticket that doesn't know left from center. [Laughter] They talk about reaching for the center, but on issues like national defense, they've taken positions that only a McGovern could love.

Yes, my friends, when our liberal friends refuse to even whisper the ``L'' word and insist that ``this election is not about ideology; it's about competence,'' they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

They know, as well as you do, as well as our nation does, that the one issue, the only issue, that will matter after Inauguration Day is the issue of direction. Will we reelect peace and prosperity or will we play truth or consequences with trenchcoat liberals?

Throughout our history, whenever this great and blessed land has searched for true leadership, it has found it; and this year is no exception. I've worked more closely with George Bush these two terms than with any other member of the administration. I've seen him keep a cool head in hot crises. I've seen his leadership and vision. I've given him some of the most sensitive and difficult tasks that we've had, and he has never let me or the country down.

I once said that he is a great Vice President, but I know and I've seen that it didn't come easily. George Bush is a man of action, a man accustomed to command. The Vice Presidency doesn't fit easily on such a man. But George Bush is also a patriot. And so, he made it fit, and he served with a distinction no one has ever matched. Day in, day out, I've sought George Bush's counsel from the very first day of our administration. Believe me, no one is better prepared to lead America into the next decade and to the threshold of the next century, to continue the work that we've begun, to finish the task that is before us, than President George Bush.

There's one way, however, that I hope a Bush administration will be different. If it hadn't been for a Republican Senate in our first 6 years, we wouldn't have accomplished half of what we did. If we'd had one these last 2 years, we could have done much more. But today, with the other party in control of both Houses, we face a monkey-wrench Congress, determined to throw almost anything into the gears of government to gum up the works. I hope we can make sure that George Bush has more friends on Capitol Hill than he had on that Pacific Island where he was shot down.

State, with regard to congressional districts and State legislative districts has been such that in the last election more Californians voted for Republican congressional candidates than there were votes for the Democratic candidates. But the Democratic candidates outnumbered -- when they were elected -- the Republicans elected to that office because they have gerrymandered the district so, that a majority of Californians become a minority when it comes to counting by those districts.

Inauguration Day -- it's coming -- I know I'll be thinking of the journey we Californians began two decades ago, a journey of rebirth for ourselves and our nation. As it has been so often since then, our choice this year is simple: the future or the past. Back to the past of inflation, humiliation, and malaise; or continue forward with George Bush on the road of hope, opportunity, and peace. We saw here in California a few years ago how quickly a liberal administration could undo years of our good work. Let's not let that happen again.

Because the hope, opportunity, and peace that George Bush stands for are the same things that California stands for. Hope and opportunity in a land of peace. That's what I found when I first climbed on a train and headed here so many years ago. That's what California, like America, has been for so many millions through the years.

Vice President said: ``California is a key part of our campaign. I want the support of all Californians. We will not give away 1 inch of ground in this State.'' The Vice President said he would be campaigning in California, talking about the economic recovery, peace, and other issues of importance to the people of California.

Congress should take no comfort from the fact that the fiscal year 1989 Federal budget has survived this preliminary examination. If the baseline estimate of the Federal deficit had reached $146 billion, automatic cuts would have been required. Taking into account three bills that I signed subsequent to the August 15 snapshot date, the baseline estimate was $145.3 billion, leaving a safety margin of only $.7 billion; and the Congress still has enacted only 2 of the 13 appropriations bills for fiscal year 1989.

Unless the Congress follows to the letter the bipartisan budget agreement to which the congressional leadership and I agreed last November, this small margin of safety will evaporate. In that case, congressional overspending will trigger across-the-board cuts that slash high priority programs every bit as much as lower priority programs.

I urge the Congress to act swiftly and responsibly to pass the remaining 11 appropriations bills in compliance with the bipartisan budget agreement. If the Congress sticks to its word, it will not trigger automatic cuts that are damaging to essential programs upon which the American people depend.

Public Liaison, serving as liaison to the Hispanic-, Asian-, and Arab-American communities. He will continue in this same capacity in his new position. Prior to his appointment to the White House, Mr. Beserra was the small business liaison and Hispanic liaison at the Republican National Committee.

Deaths from drunk driving on America's highways occur every hour of every day throughout the year. On average, someone is killed every 22 minutes, 65 people a day. Almost 24,000 people lost their lives last year in crashes involving alcohol.

These are not remote statistics. Two out of every five individuals in the United States will be involved in an alcohol-related crash at some time during their lives. Each of us is therefore a potential victim.

Our risk is greater on weekends, when alcohol consumption is heavier, and greatest on holiday weekends. We must remember, as we celebrate, that alcohol can turn a holiday into a tragedy. The responsibility belongs to each of us to see that this does not happen.

If we can begin with a single step, a single weekend, on which each of us can make a commitment not to drink and drive, it may be that we can demonstrate how individual commitments can produce life-saving results nationwide. Last year, a coalition headed by Mothers Against Drunk Driving sponsored the first National Drive for Life Day, campaigning for all Americans to pledge not to drink and drive on that day. The success of that first day has prompted calls for an expanded campaign.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Sixty-eight years ago, on August 26, 1920, the Nineteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, granting women the right to vote, was ratified. The anniversary of this milestone is a fitting time to celebrate this achievement and to pay tribute to those who resolutely sought to secure this most basic right. It is also an appropriate time to reflect on the advances women have continued to make over the past seven decades in political participation and other areas, playing indispensable roles and offering leadership in family life, the economy, intellectual and artistic activity, business, the professions, and government.

Women continue to achieve. For instance, women's economic strides in recent years have been notable. More than 55 million women are now in the labor force, and women hold 60 percent of the more than 17 million new jobs created since 1982.

Women's roles continue to grow in other areas, too, such as public service. In this Administration, 1,308 women have achieved senior policy-level positions, and, at all levels of government, 3,039 women have accepted at least one Presidential appointment. In just the first term of this Administration, 37 women served as Presidential assistants. During this Administration, 32 women have received lifetime appointments to the Federal judiciary, and one of them serves as a Supreme Court Justice. Four of the ten female Cabinet members in our entire history have served in this Administration.

On this day, let us recount women's accomplishments and celebrate. But let us also reaffirm, individually and as communities and a Nation, our determination to seek a future of increasing economic freedom, prosperity, and equal opportunity in which all our citizens can fully and freely develop their talents and reach for their dreams for the good of others.

In the Persian Gulf, a cease-fire has been declared in one of this era's most horrible conflicts, the Iran-Iraq war. In Asia, half the Soviet Union's invasion force has left Afghanistan, and the rest are due out early next year. In Southeast Asia, Vietnam has promised to withdraw its occupation force from Cambodia. In southern Africa, we're brokering an agreement that may lead to the departure of all Cuban and South African forces from Angola. And we seem to have a more constructive relationship with the Soviet Union because of the Afghanistan withdrawal, human rights improvements, and the INF treaty that eliminates an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

Peace is gaining ground, but the gains haven't just come in the last few months. It's taken 7\1/2\ years of effort. We came into office convinced that the word ``peace'' is just an empty slogan unless the word ``strength'' follows hard upon it. Peace is a godly thing, but men are seldom godly. What we've learned is that peace is hard to achieve unless the forces of good have the strength to stand firmly for it.

Before we took office in 1981, the globe was reeling from an explosion of international turbulence. Our nation had neglected its defenses for years while some assured us that a passive America would enjoy a peace that was more, not less, secure. But that's not how things turned out. Soon we saw Vietnam invade Cambodia and the Soviet Union invade Afghanistan. Iraq and Iran began their war during this period as well. Over and over, we Americans saw that when our nation does not maintain her strength, peace has no anchor in the world.

With our NATO allies, we went to the Soviets with a proposal: Get rid of those missiles, we said, before we match them with missiles of our own. And the Soviets turned us down. They were daring us to deliver, and we did. Our determination, and that of our allies, to see our missiles installed in Europe convinced the Soviet Union that the days of unilateral disarmament were over. And once the Soviets learned they could not intimidate us or cajole us into giving them the advantage, they came to the bargaining table. They did business because we proved we meant business.

We also meant business when we said we would not sit idly by as noble and brave Afghan freedom fighters resisted an invasion of their country. Our aid to the Afghan resistance has been of critical importance in the Soviet decision to go home. Once again, they did business because we proved we meant business.

Marxist regime and its Cuban protectors. In 1975, President Gerald Ford wanted to help, but some in Congress felt our standing with the freedom fighters would only prolong hostilities. A law was passed that made aid illegal, and the war dragged on -- the Cubans multiplied. In 1985 Congress repealed the law and began supporting UNITA. Now the Cubans are talking of a pullout. They're doing business because we showed them we meant business. We've proved that we can stand united as a country that means business -- business for peace.

Our bipartisan policy in the Persian Gulf has been to stand firm against Iranian aggression and for the principle of free navigation. Now the Iran-Iraq war is coming to a close. Why? One reason, as retired Admirals Elmo Zumwalt and Worth Bagley put it, was that the allied naval operation -- designed to be a deterrent -- worked.

Contrast these successes with the tragic situation in Nicaragua. It's been almost 2 years since Congress has approved any military aid to the brave freedom fighters there. Here's the results: The Sandinistas come to the bargaining table making promises to bring democracy and end the war, and then they violate those promises with impunity. They kick out our Ambassadors, oppress their people, arrest their opposition, muzzle the media, and engage in vicious assaults on civilians to get them to stop aiding the freedom fighters. They feel free to do all this because they do not believe that we mean business.

There is still time to turn the tide in Nicaragua. We shouldn't be overly optimistic, for freedom still faces serious challenges, whether in South Asia or Eastern Europe. But the future for world peace is bright if we Americans continue to stand firm, stand tall, and stand for freedom.

Well, we're here today because we support an outstanding Congressman, our Congressman -- and that includes me because I'm in the district, too -- Bob Lagomarsino. The job that Bob has done these past 14 years, believe me, has earned my vote this year. Sure, he has a tough race, his toughest ever, but I'm confident he'll win. We Santa Barbarans know that Bob didn't go to Washington to make big government ever bigger or to mess around with our defenses. He's in Washington to help build a stronger and sounder America. And that's why on November 8th we'll choose George Bush for President and Bob Lagomarsino for Congress.

Now, it's no secret that when I'm strolling down the street in Washington the House of Representatives isn't the friendliest house on the block. But it sure would be if there were more people there like Bob Lagomarsino in it. He's a standup guy, and he stood with George Bush and me time and again for what's right when too many of his colleagues turned away.

The freedom-loving people of Nicaragua know Bob. He's their champion. He knows that they thirst after the cool waters of liberty. And he's made heroic efforts to satisfy their thirst by working to aid the freedom fighters, who want to free them from Communist domination. Well, I don't know about you, but when it comes to freedom in Central America, I like a standup guy like Bob.

Bob's also a dedicated supporter of America's quest to free itself from the shadow of nuclear assault. Time after time and year after year he has voted for the Strategic Defense Initiative; that is a defense plan that kills weapons, not people. But while Bob was standing up for our space shield, the House leadership wanted to slash away at it so they could find more money to spend on their pet projects. Well, I don't know about you, but when it comes to national defense, I like a standup guy -- and that's Bob.

Congress. Now, I've heard a lot in this campaign from the other side about the evils of deficit spending and I'm responsible. Well, Congress is the only one in government that can spend a dime. The President can't spend any. Congress makes the budget. You bet it's time for change.

We can solve our spending problems -- and let me tell you something else about that more than half a century in which -- every 10 years they have been in charge when it came to reapportionment of the districts throughout the country.

I have to tell you, I don't think we could have gotten what we did and the reforms that we did had that not been true. But now we're back in that with both Houses on the other side. We can solve budget problems. When it comes to Congress, the American people know that if you're not part of the solution, you're part of the problem. And the solution is to reelect Bob Lagomarsino and elect 434 others like him to the House of Representatives.

Now, that's a tall order, but I have a good feeling about this year's election, particularly after seeing a speech last week that I found moving and, yes, inspiring. I don't remember when I've ever been as impressed with an orator, and I know he's going to be an even more impressive President, George Bush.

And yet we must not forget that all we've done and all we are on the very threshold of doing can quickly be lost. We Californians saw it happen in the years of the last liberal administration in our State. Things got so bad that we had to rise up and say, ``no more,'' to the soaring taxes that were strangling economic growth and crushing the budgets of ordinary families. So, Proposition 13 was passed. We don't want to have to go through that again nationally. And there's one way to make sure we won't: George Bush is going to America with his own proposition number one -- no new taxes.

Well, make no mistake, our economy and our national defenses are strong, but they're also under threat. They're threatened by those who want to use the law to engineer the changes in our nation that the American people do not need and do not want and that would hurt. Our liberal friends seem to love to fiddle around making big government even bigger. But they never seem to achieve their goals.

And so, they fiddle around some more, but they still don't get anywhere. And then, before you know it, they've fiddled around so much that they've sent the ship of state into drydock. I know; George Bush knows. And after all, we were called in to get the ship of state seaworthy again. And the way to keep it seaworthy is to have a crew of Republicans in the Congress and George Bush at the helm. Now, Bob will be critical in that effort, and so will a great Senator who will continue to be a great Senator after the dust has settled on November 9th, Pete Wilson.

In 2 years, it will be time for the 1990 census. The results of that census will determine the composition of California's congressional districts. Now, we all remember what happened after the last census. The opposition controlled the two State Houses and the Governor's mansion, so they redrew the map. And what did they do? They shattered the State of California. Each congressional district looked like a piece of broken glass. Well, we can make sure such a travesty doesn't happen again by working with our State legislative leaders, Pat Nolan and Ken Maddy, to elect good Republicans to the State assembly and the State senate. That's vital. I'm going to do my part, and I know you will, too.

And our opponents, over those long 50 odd years when they were in control, have tried to usurp and take away from the States more and more power to reduce the States to administrative districts of the Federal Government. Well, we've been having a program for almost 8 years now called federalism in which we have been restoring, as much as we can, the power and authority that properly belongs to the States and never should have been taken from them.

In doing all these things, I'm going to do my part, and I know you will, too. Yes, there are still promises to keep. There's the promise to keep America strong. There's the promise to expand the frontiers of freedom. There's the promise to continue freeing the creative, enterprising energies of the American people. And with our help, on November 9th, George Bush, Pete Wilson, and Bob Lagomarsino will get to work on keeping those promises. So now let's get to work on getting them to work.

Twenty-five years ago, about a quarter of a million Americans gathered in Washington to bear witness to a noble cause. In their speeches, in their songs, in their prayers, those marchers recalled America's promise of liberty and opportunity and said it was time to make that promise an unblemished reality. No one was more eloquent on that day than Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.

Since that day a quarter century ago, America has made vast progress toward fully achieving Dr. King's dream of a colorblind society. As a result, America today is a freer land for Americans of all backgrounds. And this nation, which Lincoln called ``the last best hope on Earth,'' is an even more brilliant beacon of freedom and hope for peoples throughout the world.

We will continue to press for agreement on effective verification measures so that these two treaties can be ratified. As we return to Geneva, we look for the cooperation of the Soviet Union to achieve this objective.

Today marks the 25th anniversary of the operational start of the Direct Communications Link, or hotline. Since its inception, this confidential and rapid communication channel has proved to be an invaluable tool. Although used infrequently, the hotline has permitted American Presidents to communicate with Soviet leaders to reduce the risk of conflict which might result from accident, miscalculation, or misunderstanding.

Recognizing the need to improve our ability to communicate with the Soviet leadership in emergency situations, President Reagan proposed in 1984 that the hotline be modernized by adding a rapid facsimile capability to the existing teletype system. This modernization was completed in 1986 with excellent results, and the United States and the U.S.S.R. have continued to work together effectively to maintain the highest reliability.

We had earlier assumed, for budget planning purposes, that economic conditions would only permit a two percent pay increase this year. However, as the revitalization of the Nation's economy has continued on the course this Administration has set, we have seen unemployment drop, and free market forces have resulted in rising pay rates for American workers, particularly in shortage occupations. The Federal Government, as an employer, must compete like any other employer in the labor market for the skilled workers it needs, so we must respond to these rising pay rates. The Senate has passed a bill we support, the Federal Personnel Improvements Act of 1988, which would give us badly needed flexibility in adapting to labor market conditions, but we must also address the issue of adequate Federal pay rates in general.

I note that this alternative plan would be consistent with the pay raise that would be provided under the conference agreement on H.R. 4775, the Treasury, Postal Service and General Government Appropriations Act, 1989. I regret that the conference agreement would not let this pay increase apply to all of the Government's Executive Schedule, since it is at the highest levels of the Government's pay system where Federal pay lags most seriously behind private sector pay. However, I will have the opportunity to recommend appropriate pay increases for the Government's senior officials in my budget message this coming January.

During these High Holy Days, Jews focus their prayers on their individual deeds and the need for repentance -- and on the well-being of their brethren and of all humanity. The liturgy of these special days portrays the Almighty as both a stern judge and a compassionate father. Those who observe these Holy Days seek renewed strength and forgiveness for their shortcomings.

Jewish New Year is also a happy time of rebirth and optimism, a time to look to the future with hopes and high expectation. This past year has seen limited but nevertheless positive steps on the issue of human rights in the Soviet Union, and I hope progress will continue and accelerate as the new year of 5749 unfolds. I will continue to press for the release of all refuseniks, for full freedom of emigration, and for basic rights of religious and cultural expression. We cannot be satisfied with less.

We salute working people because they have built our land with skill, energy, and resourcefulness, transforming raw materials into a shining edifice of freedom and prosperity. On Labor Day we recognize these achievements and reflect on the meaning and dignity of work and on the values it protects and strengthens -- the values we as a Nation hold most dear. In both peacetime and time of war, American workers have always offered each other and the world their very best, affirming their liberty as individuals and as members of a team and promoting the ideals of free enterprise and democracy here and around the globe.

America's workers continue to display the spirit, ingenuity, and adaptability to new conditions that labor and employers alike need if our economy is to continue to grow. This willingness to meet every challenge speaks volumes about the health and vitality of our way of life. Let us always remember that so much of what we are, we owe to working men and women. God gave us this land, but, under His good graces, the labor of our people has helped it flourish and pour forth its plenty for ourselves and the world. For all these reasons, America celebrates Labor Day, 1988 with fresh gratitude and pride.

One of the greatest strengths of our Nation is the rich cultural diversity of our people. Since the discovery of America, Hispanics have been a vibrant part of that diversity. They were among the first settlers of the New World, arriving long before the United States achieved independence.

From Florida to California, Hispanics have left an indelible mark on our land, helping to forge one of the greatest nations on earth. As we look forward to the turn of the century, it is clear that Americans of Hispanic descent will have an even greater role in achieving our national destiny. That is good news, because the values which Hispanics have always cherished -- faith, love of family, and pride in country -- are the very values that built our Nation and that will keep it strong and free.

And our national committeeman, Harold Smith, and our State chairman, Don Adams, it's a great pleasure to be back here again. And I know that our time is limited, but I would like to just say a few things to you. I've told a few outside before we came in here that I'm surprised -- I've been taking that vacation at the ranch, part vacation, you know, the job goes with you -- but I've been surprised at all the things that I read that I've decided. [Laughter] I haven't decided any of them. [Laughter] That's what I'm going back to Washington for.

But when John Kennedy said those words, he was echoing the words of Ibn Khaldoun, a Moslem philosopher back in the 14th century, who said, ``At the beginning of the dynasty taxation yields large revenues from small assessments. At the end of the dynasty taxation yields small revenue from large assessments.'' We're going to get back to the beginning of the dynasty. This was why we had to have the tax program as well as the budget cuts, because budget cuts, yes, would reduce government spending, but what was going to get American productivity and American industry rolling again and able to compete in the world market? It was to get government out of the people's pockets to the extent that it was in there, create private capital that could meet the needs for business investment. And to those in business here tonight, let me urge: Invest, expand.

I've just received something that gladdened my heart. I received a statement that is going out to all the members of the iron and steel industry. And based on their optimism about our economic program, the steel industry is embarking on $5 billion worth of expansion, modernization and building of new plant, rehabilitating of old. All the member companies -- there has never been such an expansion in such a short period of time in the history of the steel industry. This, I believe, if it can be done simply on the promise of what the tax cuts will do and the budget cuts, ought to give us some indication of what's going to happen when they actually begin to be implemented.

But the fight isn't over, and that's why in 1982 coming up -- seriously I mean it -- we must send more people to Washington who believe, as we do, that there is a need for a turnaround in the country's policies. Send people there that will help and then be prepared for every kind of pressure from pressure-spending groups, from the bureaucracy that doesn't give up and has got a million tricks yet to be exposed as to how they're going to try to obstruct the progress and prove that this program won't work.

But we've had enough of roller coaster economics, and so we're going forward with this program. And we couldn't have gone forward with it without you. When the chips were down and the issue was in doubt, and believe me, it was -- I woke up on that fatal morning for the last passage and had already been told how many votes there were against us. But in the meantime, all of you had been busy, and the phones were ringing, and the wires were coming in -- not to us, but to the people who needed to get them, over there on the Hill. And when the vote was finally counted, as you know, we had won that battle.

There's one other thing I'd like to touch on because, as I say, I know the time is limited, and I do want to at least get down and be able to say hello to some of you here before we have to break up. But let me, if I could, tell you about the other thing. This morning, I understand that the Washington Post had a lead article to the effect that I was retreating with regard to national defense. Well, now let me state something here. When we say we have to make further cuts, this is across the board, and we realize there's no department of government that doesn't have waste in it that can be eliminated or reduced. And we're going to set out -- and that includes the Department of Defense.

That does not mean that we are retreating from the program we adopted of an annual 7-percent increase in defensive spending to restore our defensive capability and close that window of vulnerability that has been opened in recent years with the superiority of the Soviet forces. We're going to continue, at the same time we are going to continue to urge them to sit down with us in a program of realistic strategic arms reduction. But it will be the first time that we have ever sat on our side of the table and let them know that there's a new chip on the table. And that chip is: There will be legitimate arms reduction, verifiable arms reduction, or they will be in an arms race which they can't win.

Now, one last thing. I know there's been a lot of concern about the volunteer military and would it work or were we going to have to resort to a draft. And as you all know, I've been campaigning up and down the country that I'm opposed to a peacetime draft. We never had had one until the years following World War II. And we've taken some steps. We've taken some steps for a realistic pay scale that we want for the men in the military. And I'm happy to tell you tonight that the enlistments are up, higher than they've ever been. The educational and quality level of the men enlisting is higher than it has ever been. The percentile of the lowest in education that we take in the military is the lowest that it has ever been.

And I've received a couple of letters, one on the domestic situation and one on the military, that made me very proud. One was from a lady here in Illinois. She was working in a Federal program on the Federal payroll. And she wrote to tell me frankly that she was one of four who were working in this particular task, and she said there isn't enough work for one. And she said, ``When we came close to the end of the fiscal year, I was one who was told, `Quick. Go out and spend the money that was left over.' '' And so she said, ``I sit at a magnificent new executive desk and a brand new typewriter. The only thing they could do to spend the money was to buy new furniture.'' Well, that's a bygone era. That isn't going to happen anymore in Washington, D.C. If there's money left over, it's going to be returned.

And we've already had one department head, international aid, AID, who presented me with a big facsimile of a check, about that high and that wide, which was for several hundred million dollars which was not going to be spent and which he was returning to the Secretary of the Treasury. Well, this letter from this lady in California [Illinois] -- and incidentally, we're doing our best to try and find her some employment that will fully utilize her character and her abilities.

I had the pleasure a few days ago of standing on the deck of the Constellation, our great carrier out there with a crew of nearly 5,000, and see all these young men and see their teamwork as they were getting planes off the deck, into the air, on the catapults, three at a time, then see the demonstration of the air power while it was in the air and then, finally, to speak to them, and then was privileged to stand there and watch 40 men step forward and sign up for re-enlistment. And incidentally, we have a new high also in the volunteer military of re-enlistments now.

But God bless all of you. And now I'm going to get off of here. I've talked too long, but I've wanted the chance -- oh, one point. I'll have a postscript. [Laughter] High interest rates. I heard Jim [Governor James R. Thompson of Illinois] talking about them, and he was absolutely right. High interest rates aren't something that someone deliberately imposes on the people or the economy. They are the result of inflation, not the cause. And that's why we're going forward with this battle against inflation to bring those interest rates down, because until we do, there are industries in this country that cannot exist or prosper. And they will come down. But as long as inflation is continuing and as long as there is a belief that there are going to be huge deficits, the interest rates are going to stay up, because there are too many people trying to borrow too little money -- and the biggest borrower of all is the United States Government -- to pay off those deficits.

So, we're going to whittle at those deficits, and when you hear the screams of anguish from some whose toes are being stepped on, just think that they can't be half as bad as the moans of the unemployed in this country today. And we're going to put them back to work.

Over the years, this union was responsible for improving the well-being of its members as they labored building this Nation. And through the collective bargaining system, you improved images -- or wages, I should say -- benefits, and working conditions. More than that, the United Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners has shown time and time again that it supports our free market system and the fundamental tenets of American democracy. It was this belief in representative government and free enterprise that gave the working people of this country unequaled freedom and prosperity.

Samuel Gompers believed with all his heart that if a worker was properly and fairly paid for his work, he could provide for himself without having to hold out this hand to a caseworker for government-provided benefits. He was a champion of collective bargaining.

Collective bargaining in the years since has played a major role in America's economic miracle. Unions represent some of the freest institutions in this land. There are few finer examples of participatory democracy to be found anywhere. Too often, discussion about the labor movement concentrates on disputes, corruption, and strikes. But while these things are headlines, there are thousands of good agreements reached and put into practice every year without a hitch.

Part of successful collective bargaining is honest, straightforward exchanges. A number of Presidents have observed that of all the meetings in the Oval Office, the most direct, productive, and useful have been with the leaders of organized labor. Straight talk has always been a feature of these exchanges, and that's a tradition I want to continue here today. You and I may not always agree, as President Konyha said, on everything, but we should always remember how much we have in common.

I can guarantee you today that this administration will not fight inflation by attacking the sacred right of American workers to negotiate their wages. We propose to control government, not people. Now, today I want to express again my belief in our American system of collective bargaining and pledge that there will always be an open door to you in this administration.

Now, I know that there are some who read of the pay scale of top stars and wonder why a bunch of actors need a union. Well, it's true that a handful of superstars have an individual bargaining power based on their box office rating. But what's little known is the fact that taken as a whole, the membership of the Screen Actors Guild averages about the same annual income level as members of the craft unions. As for those in the high brackets, let it be understood that they have always used their star status and individual bargaining power to help their lower paid fellow actors in the Screen Actors Guild achieve gains at the collective bargaining table.

I participated as a negotiator at that table for some 20 years and as president led the Guild in its first major strike. We followed one rule in our demands. We asked ourselves a question about each thing that we demanded at the bargaining table: Is it fair to the other fellow, and is it fair to the customer, and is it good for our people? If we were satisfied on these three points, we fought our heads off, and we secured a fair pay scale, greatly improved working conditions and fringe benefits, including a pension and welfare plan for our members.

I remember one interunion squabble in which I faced your big Bill Hutcheson.  [William L. Hutcheson, former general president of the United Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners.]  It's kind of ironic to look back on that because Bill was a Republican then. As a matter of fact, he served on the National Republican Committee, and at that time I was a Democrat. [Laughter] Now, if there's one challenge that I have for organized labor today, it is that they, in the foosteps of Bill Hutcheson, recognize that organized labor should not become the handmaiden of any one political party.

Working people in America value family, work, and neighborhood. These are the things we have in common socially and politically. When it comes to the bottom line, all of us are striving for the same thing -- a strong and healthy America and a fair shake for working people. But we weren't getting a fair shake, any of us in these recent years when it appeared that we were making more money -- and we were with regard to the number of dollars -- but the value of those dollars was shrinking by one-third just between 1975 and 1980.

The same forces that chipped away at your purchasing power ravaged the American economy with a severity unseen since the Great Depression, with the worst inflation in 60 years, almost 8 million unemployed, and skyrocketing interest rates.

I've taken the election of 1980 to be a demand by the working people of America for a change in the policies that caused their adversity. From Inauguration Day on, nothing has been more important to this administration than restoring the prosperity and freedom that is every American's birthright.

Today it's appropriate for me to thank you and working men and women throughout this land for the support that you gave to the recent economic reform struggles in the Congress. It was phone calls and letters that Americans like you made that made our economic plan a bipartisan measure. One Democratic Governor recently explained: ``The old liberal approach that more money, a few Ph. D's, and a lot of new programs will cure what ails the nation is gone in our era.'' And he's right.

Now, one of my only regrets is that some in the labor movement oppose the recovery program because they may not fully understand what we are for, what we're trying to do, and that our program is designed to improve the well-being of all the people.

In his first inaugural address, Jefferson warned government not to ``take from the mouth of labor the bread it has earned.'' But what we experienced in the last decade was bloated government feasting at the expense of the people, growing beyond all reason, and taxing away the American way of life.

Over the last 20 years, playing ward politics on a national scale, the Congress enacted for one group or another ever-increased spending plans and entitlement programs. ``Entitlement programs'' means the redistribution of your earnings. In 1967, my first year as Governor of California, these open-ended programs siphoned $57 billion from the pockets of the American taxpayer. By the end of my first year as President, that $57 billion would have been $428 billion had we not passed the economic recovery program. Is this uncontrolled spending really in the interests of the American workers?

The Federal budget has almost tripled in the last 10 years. To some of those who have opposed our proposed budget reductions, let me point out that we haven't cut spending back to less in 1982 than it was in the year of 1981. We have reduced the increase in spending from 14 percent each year to 6\1/2\ percent. Now, this is hardly cruel and inhuman deprivation. We are not, as some have said, trying to turn back the clock. We are just trying to make the rate of increase in spending about half of what it has been.

Similarly, our tax program is aimed at helping everyone. I've told you how inflation reduced the value of your dollar by one-third during the last 5 years. Well, in those same 5 years, your taxes went up by two-thirds -- 67 percent. Even those with cost-of-living clauses in the contracts found the taxes rising faster than their wages. This is why inflation is a tax. As you earned more to keep pace with the cost of living, you moved up to a higher tax bracket. You had a tax increase just as surely as if the Congress had voted to increase the tax rate. Now, that's something our tax bill, through indexing, is going to fix. After the three annual tax cuts, the income tax brackets each year will be adjusted to compensate for inflation. This is an historic reform. For the first time, it takes from government the hidden profit that government makes from inflation.

Most of our critics didn't try to answer that question. Instead, appealing to greed and envy, they held that those paying more taxes would get a larger reduction. Well, you know, Teddy Roosevelt had something to say about a situation like this. ``We must,'' he said, ``decide that it is a great deal better that some people should prosper too much than no one should prosper enough.'' Now, of course, those having a larger tax will get a larger reduction in the number of dollars. The fellow paying a $10,000 tax will get a $1,000 reduction. The fellow paying a $1,000 tax will get $100 off. But the first one will still be paying 10 times as much as the other one.

The tax rate reduction is the same percentage across the board. What is most important, three-quarters of the tax reduction will go to middle-income wage earners who presently pay three-quarters of the total income tax.

Representative government is still alive and well in the United States. Even with powerful special interest groups fighting reform, the voice of the people was heard. The status quo -- that's Latin for ``the mess we're in'' -- was giving the American people a lower standard of living and ever higher taxes. Now the foundation has been laid for an American renaissance which will astound the world, a new era of good feeling in America, a time when jobs will be plentiful and the richness of the country can be shared by anyone who is willing to work.

Having gotten control of government spending and taxes, we will now concentrate on putting America back to work and making sure that there are jobs and opportunity available to all. The number of jobs will expand, and real take-home pay will increase. And while that battle in the Congress may have been won, the war for a healthier economy is not over. The struggle for more jobs and less inflation will continue to be the focus of this administration in the months ahead. There will be the need to further trim the budget, to monitor Capitol Hill closely to ensure that what has been accomplished is not eroded.

But restoring fiscal integrity to the Federal Government and health to our economy will require more than budget reductions. A number of important projects have been sitting on the back burner until the tax and spending cuts were in place.

An attack on waste and fraud will now be given the attention it deserves. In March we established a Council on Integrity and Efficiency to coordinate this effort. It can be expected to set in motion several new strike forces to make certain that we get solid results. This drive will include every part of the Federal Government, including the Department of Defense. The private sector will face scrutiny, too.

We will announce shortly the establishment of a National Productivity Advisory Committee. It will be composed of labor leaders, management, academia, and will make recommendations aimed at keeping American business and the American worker ahead of the competition, which is the real way to secure jobs for the future.

The aggressive deregulation drive Vice President Bush is leading will continue. We've made headway here and are beginning to feel the dividends. Within days of entering office, the price of oil was decontrolled. Critics howled that it contributed to inflation. Now that half a year has passed, the news media talks about how lucky we are to have an oil glut. Well, maybe chance had something to do with it, but the increase in domestic oil exploration unleashed by decontrol didn't hurt. In the first half of this year, more than 16,000 oil wells were successfully completed, almost double the 1979 figure.

In the area of industrial deregulation, we came forward with a plan to help the automobile industry, proposing changes or elimination of 34 specific regulations which, over a 5-year period, will save the American motorist $9.3 billion and release $1.4 billion in company funds which have been invested in federally mandated equipment and facilities. And we've just begun.

We've now talked about three of the pillars of our economic program -- control of spending, reduced taxes, and regulatory relief. There is a fourth pillar -- a stable monetary policy. Over the past decade, we've heard a great deal about fine-tuning the economy with the use of interest rates and money supply. We tried it and went on a financial roller coaster from which we still haven't recovered.

During the last 10 years, as a result of runaway inflation, savings plummeted to the lowest point in recent history. With savings down, the pool of money available for loans dried up. Simultaneously, the Federal Government ran large deficits. We haven't balanced the budget in the last 10 years. This reduced the resources available for building loans, because Uncle Sam was out competing in the money market, borrowing to fund those deficits. Is it any wonder the interest rates burst through the ceiling?

The administration is dedicated to licking inflation and bringing down interest rates permanently, and we've taken the first steps toward that goal. The dollar is strong, and our tax program gives tremendous new incentives to save. The Federal Reserve is following a conservative and careful approach to the money supply, which will ensure that once recovery begins it won't kick off another round of inflation.

Interest rates will come down. And when they do, they'll stay down because the underlying economic problems that caused them to skyrocket in the first place will be cured. And that's when genuine prosperity will begin.

Nowhere is there a greater need for a good dose of prosperity than in the construction industry. Unemployment in your industry is running roughly double that of other segments of the economy, with 768,000 out of work.

But you know, I don't need to tell you the housing construction is in a pit. In 1972, a great year for the housing industry, there were 2.4 million housing starts. Eight years later, 1980, there were only 1.3 million. At the time of the passage of our tax and spending reforms this year, the housing industry was still sinking. This administration is committed to getting America building again, and that means more business and more jobs.

Second, we're moving forward with particular attention to your needs. In June I established a Presidential commission whose only job is solving the housing problem. Some of the best minds in the country are on that commission, and I can assure you that we'll take their recommendations as seriously as we did our effort to cut spending and taxes. They've found that up to 20 percent of the cost of a home is due to redtape, bureaucratic delays, and government regulation. We'll do everything we can to eliminate these impediments at the Federal level and plan to work with the State and local communities to see what can be done there to clear away some of the damaging web of controls, regulations, codes, and other restrictions.

I have told before of a neighbor of mine out in California who is building a home for himself. He got so frustrated with the paperwork that he glued all the pages together and he put up two poles in front of the house he was building and strung this ribbon of paper between the two poles. It was 250 feet long, just for permission to build his own home.

Last month Secretary of Housing and Urban Development Samuel Pierce announced that the redtape which clogged the pipeline preventing the construction of 50,000 low-income housing units had been cleared away. It took an agreement between HUD and the Office of Management and Budget on a financial adjustment factor. Now, this may not represent new allocation, but it certainly represents progress.

And finally, our tax program contains numerous provisions which will encourage building. The reduction in time needed for the depreciation of plant and equipment will quickly free cash for industrial construction, which will translate into more jobs in short order.

As for long-term needs, we're committed to providing the raw materials and energy sources you need to get the job done. To grow and prosper the country needs energy, especially those of you in the construction industry. The mismanagement of this vital component of American progress would be funny if it weren't so damaging. It's a monument to the inefficiency and confusion of the bureaucratic marketplace.

We're advancing on a broad front to ensure that our energy needs and those of the next generation of Americans are met. We started with oil control, but we're also taking the necessary steps to ensure a steady flow of energy from natural gas, nuclear power, coal, and other sources.

What is important for us now is not to be tempted again by those promising a quick fix or something for nothing. We'll come out of our current financial difficulties because, like every generation before us, we're going to knuckle down and work our way out. What our tax bill does is ensure it'll be profitable to do that work. Nevertheless, energy and dedication are still necessary to reach our goal.

Now, you know, it isn't true that I fought at Gettysburg; I didn't even go up San Juan Hill. But as a small boy, I saw Americans march off to war to save the world for democracy. I cast my first vote for Franklin Roosevelt in the depths of the Great Depression. And when totalitarian forces threatened to send civilization into a new dark age, I saw this Nation put itself together and in 44 short months strike a mighty blow for freedom.

I mention these traumatic events only because they illustrate how time and again Americans have met the challenges. I don't believe Americans of today are any different from those doughboys of World War I or the GI's of World War II. And certainly our domestic problems are no greater today than those we overcame in the Great Depression we went through between those two wars.

I would like to speak of one more thing. Earlier in my remarks, I spoke of the history of organized labor in our country and quoted Samuel Gompers, the founder of the American Federation of Labor. The United Brotherhood of Carpenters was a mainstay of that early crusade and of the federation. The AF of L supported municipal, county, State, and Federal employees when they began to unionize. But from the very first, organized labor predicated its help and support on the condition that public employees could never be allowed to strike. Indeed, they insisted that unions of government employees would recognize this in their constitutions.

They were the first to point out the difference between public employment and private employment -- that government could not close up shop, that government workers were employed by the people, and the people could not give any group the right to coerce the people's elected representatives. However, to protect the rights of government employees, labor offered to support legislation to ensure wages and working conditions comparable to those for similar work in the private sector.

When the National Labor Relations Act, known to most of us as the Wagner Act, was ratified in 1935, even liberal labor leaders such as Phillip Murray and John L. Lewis proclaimed they had no intention of allowing any segment of government to be organized with the right to strike.

President Franklin Delano Roosevelt declared: ``Militant tactics have no place in the functions of any organization of government employees. A strike of public employees manifests nothing less than an intent on their part to prevent or obstruct the operations of government until their demands are satisfied. Such action, looking toward the paralysis of government by those who have sworn to support it, is unthinkable and intolerable.'' He likened public employee strikes to insurrection.

Reflecting these views, the Federal Government has a law prohibiting strikes by public employees. Some other levels of government have adopted similar statutes and ordinances. Yet in recent years some in labor have retreated from labor's earlier stand against public employee strikes. Strikes against the public safety by public employees have increased over the last many years, and many, like this last strike in PATCO, were in violation of the law and of oaths sworn to by individual union members.

Our very freedom is secure because we're a nation governed by laws, not by men. We have the means to change the laws if they become unjust or onerous. We cannot, as citizens, pick and choose the laws we will or will not obey. And I hope that organized labor today and its leadership will recognize that you, the rank and file they represent, are the supreme authority in our land, that you are the employers of all who serve in government, elected or appointed, and none of us in government can strike against you and the interests of you, the sovereign people.

Mr. Konyha. President Reagan, we're so thrilled that you took the time to come here to speak to this assembly. Now, I want to present you with a gift from the assemblage, and if nothing else, it will be a token of appreciation for attending our 100th anniversary. Thank you very kindly.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Nancy Clark Reynolds to be Representative of the United States of America on the Commission on the Status of Women of the Economic and Social Council of the United Nations. She would succeed Koryne Kaneski Horbal.

The President has asked Vice President George Bush to lead the U.S. delegation to the sixth round of U.S.-Nigeria bilateral economic talks, September 8 and 9, in Washington, D.C. Nigerian Vice President Alex Ekwueme will chair his country's delegation to the annual consultations. The talks will explore issues of mutual concern in the areas of agriculture, energy, trade and investment, health, education, and science and technology.

The purpose of the trip is to demonstrate the importance this administration places on our relationships with Latin America. In his visits to Brazil, Colombia, and the Dominican Republic, the Vice President will have an opportunity to exchange views with the heads of state and other high-level officials in these countries. The trip is being made at the invitation of the countries involved, and the times were worked out at a mutually convenient time to both countries.

The President was shocked and saddened by the news this morning that the French Ambassador to Lebanon was killed as a result of an attack in Beirut. The President feels strongly that the violence and terror in many areas of the world constitutes a grave danger to the fabric of society. He would like to extend his deepest sympathies to the family, colleagues, and friends of Ambassador Delamar.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation The Hispanic peoples, their traditions, language and culture are a vital part of the American heritage. Their influence on our nation began with the Spaniards long before our revolution brought independence from England. This heritage can today be found almost everywhere in our daily lives: the arts and music we enjoy, the architecture of the homes and buildings in which we live and work, the history we read, and the language we use.

The Hispanic peoples today add to our strength as a nation with their strong devotion to family, deep religious convictions, pride in their language and heritage and commitment to earning a livelihood by hard work. Outstanding Hispanic men and women have advanced our nation in science and technology, business and public service. From the Southwest to the Northeast of the United States, they carry on their tradition of service to the communities in which we all live. This year, San Antonio has joined Miami and other American cities in electing a prominent Hispanic citizen as its mayor. Hispanic Americans bring to us, as well, a tradition of respect for the role of women both at home and in the workplace. Hispanic Americans serve with distinction in our military services today as they have served with leadership and courage on the battlefield in defense of this nation in the past.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Samuel Gompers, one of the first labor leaders in this country, said that Labor Day was a time to pledge ourselves to an even greater effort in the coming year. Samuel Gompers knew that the key to a prosperous future is to have faith in it, and that's why for him, Labor Day stood for a celebration of tomorrow's promise and possibilities.

Together, we've swept away many government-created obstacles to our prosperity. In our fight against inflation and high interest rates, we enacted the largest budget cuts ever considered by the Congress. We produced the first real tax cut for working men and women in nearly 20 years. We slowed the pace of Federal rulemaking. We saw to it our money supply followed a pattern of slow, stable growth.

These dramatic changes in economic policy -- the tax and budget legislation I signed a few weeks ago -- are the dynamic result of millions of individuals coming together, committed to preserving a society where we can each seek our own goals, assured of the freedom to climb as high as our own drive, ambition, and talent can take us.

Let me make our goal in this program very clear: jobs, jobs, jobs, and more jobs. I see the creation of 3 million more jobs by 1986, in addition to the 10 million already expected. I see an era in which wage earners will be taking home more money in real dollars and an era in which fewer of us will be looking for work. Our policy has been and will continue to be: What is good for the American worker is good for America.

We built this great Nation, built it to surpass the highest standards ever imagined, through the hard work of our people. I would match the American worker against any in the world. The people whose labor fuels our industry and economy are among the most productive anywhere.

But too many Americans don't have a job, and too many Americans who do, don't have the tools they need to compete. Past, stagnated policies have made it too difficult to modernize and too risky to expand. Our people, our workers, have cried out for change, and in the last 7 months have achieved an historic reversal of the failed policies of an era gone by. We returned to the principles that made us great.

Legislation now in effect has dawned a new age for American workers, an age in which once again we are free to achieve all that we can. To cite one example: This recent legislation passed by the Congress as part of our economic recovery plan makes it possible for American workers currently participating in company pension plans to expand this coverage with their own individual retirement plans. This is only one of many new exciting possibilities opened for American workers.

All of us must take advantage of the incentives for savings, investment, and hard work that have been restored. I urge American workers who traditionally saved to make their families secure to do so again. I urge American investors who traditionally took risks to make a profit to do so again. I urge American workers to save and invest, because I believe that when our economic program takes full effect, Americans again will be rewarded for working extra hours or assuming more responsibility.

In a few short months we've accomplished much. But merely signing legislation is not going to bring about an instant cure. We're only beginning a recovery that will take many long months. We're only beginning to emerge from an economic crisis still gripping the rest of the world.

In Poland, where the grocery shelves are bare, the state ideology dictates more rationing of scarcity while workers take to the streets in protest over these restrictions. It is a stifled economy. A government official there said the crisis of depression is deepening in Poland, and they still do not have a way out.

Well, as President Eisenhower told us once: A crisis can be deadly when inert men are smothered in despair. But a crisis also can be the sharpest goad to our creative energies, particularly when we recognize it as a challenge and move to meet it in faith, in thought, and in courage. We must act today in the name of generations still to come.

As we work to solve our economic problems, let us tap that well of human spirit. We'll find more than strength of numbers and strength of resources, we'll find strength of individual determination. We will find the strength of mutual trust. For too many years now, we've trusted numbers and computers. We've trusted balance sheets, organizational charts, policies and systems. We've placed trust in rules, regulations, and government dictates. Well, I think it's about time that we placed trust in ourselves and in each other.

I'm confident in our ability to work together, to meet and surmount our problems and accomplish the goals we all seek. Now, I know that we can't make things right overnight -- but we will make them right. Our destiny is not our fate; it is our choice. I ask all Americans, in these first, crucial months of recovery, to join me with confidence as we strike out on this new path to prosperity.

You know, it's always a pleasure to be here in the company of another chief executive. I think the mayor and I have both learned there's a difficult thing about cutting expenses -- the expenses can vote. [Laughter] But, we also have learned, I know, as I've watched him and the magnificent job he's done in restoring fiscal stability here to this city, that if you always do what you believe in your heart is right, you'll please some of the people and astound the rest.

I used to find, when I was Governor myself, sometimes, that I'd go home and make very eloquent speeches in the shower. But then there were days like this Labor Day, here in New York City, when there's nothing like it in all the world. On a day like today, we prove that the American people control their government. We have silenced bureaucrats, cut through the redtape, and kept our promises, as the mayor so graciously said.

The Westway project begins today. Now, people tell me that the name Westway has become a code word for a bureaucracy strangling in its own regulations. From this day forward, let Westway symbolize opportunity and enterprise, and let it remind each of us, as we watch Westway become a reality, that our government works for us, not the other way around.

Now, some of us here have come from another Labor Day celebration; some have not. But next year we should all come back and march together, knowing that because of what was done here today, tens of thousands of working people who are out of jobs will be working again.

Yes, it was 10 years ago that this project was first proposed, and for 10 years nothing happened while hundreds of thousands of New Yorkers needed work. This city's unemployment rate is more than 20 percent higher than the national average. Eleven months ago, as the mayor said, when I campaigned in New York City, I pledged my support. And today, because of the leadership of Mayor Koch and Members of the Congress, because of the close cooperation between New York City and New York State, and because of the persistent efforts of people like Frank Handley and Tom McGuire and Bill Finneran [Executive vice president, International Union of Operating Engineers; business manager of the Operating Engineers of New York, N.Y.; and executive director, General Contractors Association of New York, respectively.] and so many of the rest of you who have worked so hard, Westway is going to be a reality. The project will, as the mayor said, create parkland and new areas for commerce and industry. It'll save millions by easing the flow of people and goods. But most important, it will create jobs.

And today, as we begin a new season of work, we begin what I hope will be a new age for the American workers. The key to everything we're trying to accomplish is jobs, and as I said yesterday: jobs, jobs, and more jobs. Promises and programs, subsidies and studies, welfare and make-work have all been tried by well-meaning individuals. But any worker knows a job is the best social program there is.

I see the creation of 3 million more jobs in this country by 1986, in addition to the 10 million that are already normally expected in our growth. I see an era in which wage earners will be taking home more money in real dollars, and an era in which fewer of us will be looking for work. Our policy has been and will continue to be: What is good for the American worker is good for America.

There's a new spirit sweeping this country, a spirit born from the values, energies, and dreams of our working people. It is the dynamic result of millions of individuals coming together, committed to preserving a society where we can each seek our own goals, assured of freedom to climb as high and as far as our own drive and ambition and talent can take us. For too many years now we've placed trust in regulations and government dictates. Well, I think it's about time we placed trust in ourselves and in each other.

But we have to give ourselves a chance. We have to have jobs. Franklin Delano Roosevelt said, when he spoke to a nation that was gripped by the economic woes of the Great Depression, ``For more than three centuries we've been building on this continent a free society, a society in which the promise of the human spirit may find fulfillment. Comingled here,'' he said, "are the blood and genius of all the people of the world who have sought this promise."

We have every right to be proud of what we've accomplished and to have confidence in what lies ahead. There's no crisis our people can't rise above, no problem we can't solve, and no challenge too great.

So, as I present this check for $85 million for the purchase of the right-of-way, the first installment of a $1.3 billion Federal commitment, let us all take heart in this country from New York's example and from this victory over the inertia of bureaucracy. And on this Labor Day of 1981, let each of us commit ourselves again to the renewal of America.

The President. No, there's not really any bickering. That loses something in translation. No, everybody's got their ideas and opinions, and we openly debate them. But I think you will find there's a great simpatico and a great accord among them.

The Protocol was negotiated subsequent to Prime Minister Seaga's visit to this country in January, 1981. It strengthens the provisions of the Convention in order to limit potential abuse of the treaty in certain situations and to make more effective the means of denying treaty benefits to residents of third countries who establish a corporation in one Contracting State in order to obtain treaty benefits from the other Contracting State. The Protocol also permits United States citizens to deduct expenses incurred while attending business conventions in Jamaica.

He once said, "The heritage of a man of peace will endure and shine into the darkness of this world."  Although Roy's death darkens our day, the accomplishments of his life will continue to endure and shine forth.

I convey my deepest sympathy to his family, to the NAACP [National Association for the Advancement of Colored People] that he helped to build, and to all people who shared his devotion to the dignity of human life.

As a mark of respect for the memory of Roy Wilkins, I hereby order that the flag of the United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal Government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and possessions until his interment. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

We're proud to stand beside you this morning, joining a tradition of hospitality for Israel observed by our Presidents for more than three decades. Your visit is testimony to the warm friendships, mutual respect, and shared values that bind our people. Today and tomorrow, we'll have an opportunity to meet, to come to know each other, and to discuss in detail the vital issues of peace and security that concern both our countries.

Israel and America may be thousands of miles apart, but we are philosophical neighbors sharing a strong commitment to democracy and the rule of law. What we hold in common are the bonds of trust and friendship, qualities that in our eyes make Israel a great nation. No people have fought longer, struggled harder, or sacrificed more than yours in order to survive, to grow, and to live in freedom.

The United States and Israel share similar beginnings as nations of immigrants, yearning to live in freedom and to fulfill the dreams of our forefathers. We have both sought to establish societies of law, to live in peace, and to develop the full potential of our lands. We share a devotion to democratic institutions, responsible to the wills of our citizens. Our peoples embrace common ideals of self-improvement through hard work and individual initiative. Together, we seek peace for all people. In partnership, we're determined to defend liberty and safeguard the security of our citizens. We know Israelis live in constant peril. But Israel will have our help. She will remain strong and secure, and her special character of spirit, genius, and faith will prevail.

The prophet Ezekiel spoke of a new age -- when land that was desolate has become like the Garden of Eden and waste and ruined cities are now inhabited. We saw how miraculously you transformed and made the desert bloom. We see how, despite dangers every day, your families continue working together to build a better place to live and to prosper in peace and freedom.

Our dream, our challenge, and, yes, our mission, is to make the golden age of peace, prosperity, and brotherhood a living reality in all countries of the Middle East. Let us remember that whether we be Christian or Jew or Moslem, we are all children of Abraham; we are all children of the same God.

Mr. Prime Minister, you come at a time of testing and of hope. The challenges we face are great with the forces of aggression, lawlessness, and tyranny intent on exploiting weakness. They seek to undo the work of generations of our people, to put out a light that we've been tending for these past 6,000 years. But we understand their designs, and we're determined to oppose them. Working with all our friends in the Middle East, we seek to reinforce the security of the entire region. As we consult about these problems, rest assured that the security of Israel is a principal objective of this administration and that we regard Israel as an ally in our search for regional stability.

Equally important in our discussions is the commitment of our two countries to advance the cause of peace. Mr. Prime Minister, your strong leadership, great imagination, and skilled statesmanship have been indispensable in reaching the milestones of the past few years on the road toward a just and durable peace in the Middle East.

You and the members of your coalition have earned our respect and admiration. Many cynics said Israel would never make peace with Egypt, but you did. Then they said you would not honor your commitment to return the Sinai to Egypt, but you have. Now they say you cannot go forward to work out a just and durable peace with all your neighbors; we know you will.

I look forward to receiving the benefit of your views and advice on the great tasks that remain before us. I'm confident that the United States and Israel will continue their close partnership as difficult negotiations toward peace are pursued. Let me also thank you, Mr. Prime Minister, for helping our special Ambassador, Philip Habib, to arrange a cessation of hostilities across your border with Lebanon -- still another considered step for peace and one well taken.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, my colleagues and I are grateful to you and to Mrs. Reagan for your kind invitation, for having given us the opportunity to discuss with you and your advisers international problems, bilateral issues, the danger to freedom resulting from Soviet expansionist policy in our region and its periphery and elsewhere, and the defense of human liberty, which is the essence of our lives, demotive of our efforts, the reason of our labors.

Our generation, Mr. President, lived through two World Wars, with all the sacrifices, the casualties, the misery involved. But the two wars also created and left after them, regrettably, two illusions. In the early twenties, the saying went around the world, ``that was the war to end all the wars.'' It was not so to be. Only 25 years later another World War broke out, the most horrifying of all in the annals of mankind, not only with the sacrifices in tens of millions of human beings but also with atrocities unheard of in history. Ultimately, mankind crushed the darkest tyranny which ever arose to enslave the human soul, and then people believed that it is the end of tyranny of man over man. It was not to be.

After May 1945, there were 56 so-called local wars in a period of 36 years alone. In other words, blood-letting and enslavement are going on. Country after country is being taken over by totalitarianism. In nearly 8 years, eight countries were so taken over, either by proxy or directly. So, it is obvious that liberty is in danger, and all free women and men should stand together to defend it and to assure its future for all generations to come.

Mr. President, Israel is a small country, but a free one. Its democracy was proved time and again -- true democracy. It is an integral part of the free world. It is a faithful and, through each democratic regime, a stable ally of the United States. We shall stand together, and Israel will give its share in defending human liberty.

Mr. President, out of those 56 local wars, five were thrust upon little Israel since its inception. We waged them out of necessity to defend our people and to save its existence and to sustain our independence. This is the simple reason why we not only want peace, but we yearn for peace. And therefore, as you rightly said, Mr. President, at a price of great sacrifices and admittedly undertaken -- those are very serious risks -- we made peace. We signed a peace treaty on this very lawn with our southern neighbor, but we strive to sign peace treaties and make peace forever on all our borders with all our neighbors. And with God's help, this noble aim will be achieved, too.

Mr. President, thank you for your heartwarming remarks about my people and my country and touching words about my life, which is only one of the uncountable thousands and millions who have suffered and fought and resisted and saw, after a long night, the rise of the Sun, the day. I am one of them because this is our generation. But your appreciation of our motives, our efforts, our sacrifices is very dear to all of us because, Mr. President, we see in you not only the President of the United States but also the defender of freedom throughout the world.

May I, Mr. President, extend to you on behalf of the people and Government of Israel, our invitation to come and visit our country and its capital, Jerusalem. Then we hope that we shall be able to reciprocate the wonderful hospitality, indeed, in the spirit of all Abraham, whom you mentioned, which was accorded to my colleagues and to myself. Be assured, Mr. President, the people of Israel will receive you not only with utmost respect but with deep cordiality.

But to be serious a moment: After our conversations today, very warm and productive, I'm convinced that we're on the way to the right road, that we really can draw closer to that golden age of peace, prosperity, and brotherhood and reason. And I think this is clear: Providence has blessed us at this critical time with two leaders -- one in Israel and one in Egypt -- uniquely capable of the great decisions that are required.

Prime Minister Begin, I remember reading in your book, "White Nights," how as a young man being held inside Soviet prisons, you longed to return with your people to the Middle East. And even then, you told your captors there would be plenty of room for the Arabs, for millions of Jews, and for peace. And you've been working ever since to make that dream come true. Though trained as a lawyer, you passed up the quiet life of a private attorney. From your earliest days, the spirit of freedom burned within you, leading you to make great personal sacrifices for the Jewish people.

As a political inmate in those Soviet dungeons, you learned the horrors of totalitarian abuse. You fought against Hitler, and you spent your early adult years helping create a haven for your people in a new Israel. Devoted to democratic traditions, you served as leader of your country's loyal opposition for nearly 30 years. Consistent in your views and skillful in presenting them, you were elected leader of a free people who recently reaffirmed their esteem for you. Called as a peacemaker, you boldly seized the opportunity for peace with Egypt and skillfully pursued it to a successful conclusion.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, may I be allowed first of all to thank you for a good day. Our lives were harsh; the difficult days were many. The few ones, we remember them, we count them. You gave us today a good day, one of the few, through the warmth of your heart, your deep humanity, your friendship, understanding. And I believe all my friends and colleagues here assembled join me in the expression of that gratitude to you for a good day in our lives.

Both our nations, Mr. President, are built on vision. Vision is no utopia; it is the prerequisite for changing reality. Your Founding Fathers expressed their vision in the Declaration of Independence, mainly written by Jefferson, proclaiming self-evident truths. But if they are self-evident, why proclaim? But that proclamation called upon people to go into battle, poorly armed against professional soldiers, and after great suffering, win the day and create the greatest republic ever known in history.

Your Founding Fathers wrote a constitution -- original, unknown in those days, and it works for more than 200 years. There are some crises from time to time, but out of every crisis democracy comes out stronger, deeper in the United States. And the Constitution works, with some amendments.

Then you had the vision of building real democracy. Perhaps this is the greatest achievement of the American people, proving in the 18th century, that it is not so that one man should inherit a throne and a crown and rule millions of people at his will. The people should decide who should form the government, and they should accept the government willingly. This, all nations learned from you. And perhaps the greatest vision of all was the acceptance of so many people of various origins from many countries. Here I would like to stress, because I believe in Divine Providence with all my heart, that as far as the Jewish people are concerned, a real miracle happened to them. In 25 years, at the turn of the two centuries, 2\1/2\ million Jews crossed the ocean and came to the hospitable shores of this country. If they hadn't done that, they would have been lost -- their children and their grandchildren. Not a third of the Jewish people would have been wiped out, perhaps two-thirds of them would have been destroyed. Who knows whether we would have been able to recreate our statehood.

This is one of the great miracles in human history -- those 25 years, 100,000 people every year coming to these shores. There is no wonder that Emma Lazarus wrote from her heart, ``Give me your tired, your poor, your huddled masses yearning to breathe free.'' They came here without knowing one word of English. They worked in sweatshops, and they were peddlers. But the second generation learned perfect English. And the third, together with all the other nationalities -- or ethnic groups as you call them in America -- built up this great country. A miracle, indeed. And I want now after so many years to express, may I say morally, historically, our deep gratitude that this great country made it possible for 2\1/2\ million of my brethren to come here and save their lives and the lives of three other generations.

We also build on vision, Mr. President -- on a smaller scale, of course, because we are a New Hampshire more or less, no more, a small country. But when we won our freedom in the same way you did, fighting for it, not getting it as a gift, we were only 600,000. Now we are 3\1/2\ million. Relatively, proportionately perhaps, it is very close. And so that was the vision -- to bring people from the four corners of the world as the prophet really foresaw in his vision in the ancient times, from the four corners of the world back to the land of the forefathers, back, return, old and young and limping and sick and everyone, so as the prophets wrote exactly. And of course we still keep the gates open for everyone who feels that he is persecuted, like in Russia, or humiliated, like in any other country which may happen, for everyone, as you did for so many years, actually for nearly two centuries.

We also had the vision of democracy. As we are a small country, ours is a parliamentary regime. I am not ashamed to say we copied it from the British. The British built up a beautiful home in their own country -- real democracy. And we adopted this system, but it is also real democracy.

Mr. President, the election day in Israel -- it was only 2 months ago -- was one of the most beautiful days in our lives. Everybody a free citizen, went to the polls, put in the ballots. No pressure was asserted; it was impossible. The campaign was perhaps to some extent lively. [Laughter] But the day of the election, the quiet -- it's the most beautiful day of the year. But of 4 years -- real democracy.

And out of those ballots came a government. Not everybody is happy. Well, that is human nature. And therefore, believe it when we say we are your stable ally. We mean it completely, because only through the inherent stability of democracy you can keep that stability.

All the other regimes -- something happens and there is upheaval. Not in a democracy. We still have division of peace, Mr. President. Yes, we made peace with Egypt, with our southern neighbor, the largest, the strongest Arab nation. But we want peace with all our neighbors.

Why isn't it so simple to achieve? Because for us, security is not a word, it's not even a concept. It is life itself. With our experience, surrounded on the northern, on the eastern front, still, after the peace, after the sacrifices we gave, we must be so careful. We bear so grave a responsibility, not only a great one in our generation in the wake of the Holocaust, to make sure that our children and our children's children will first of all live, and then live freely.

It is difficult now to believe that it is realistic. All the world is arming to the teeth. Every disarmament conference brings more arms to the world. But our faith is unshakeable. This vision of the prophets will be realized, perhaps exactly as a result of that danger, which is looming over all mankind, of complete destruction. Out of that evil will come real peace and disarmament, and people will live together in good neighborhood -- all of them.

We didn't have one day of peace. Nations fought. There was a war of 100 years between England and France. Ultimately, there was entente cordiale -- a union or alliance -- unwritten, that played so great a role in the years of 1914 and 1918. There was a 30-years war in Europe. In Europe, the saying went around about ``eternal enemies,'' and the eternal enemies are now friends. War can be avoided. Peace is inevitable. But we didn't deviate even one day of peace. What my colleagues and I would like to do for our people is to give them an historic period of peace -- two or three generations at least. Let them have peace and let there be no bereavements. That is our vision, and I believe it will bring us nearer a different reality.

Mr. President, today we achieved much in Washington, thanks to you. I shall leave town knowing that our cooperation in the field of security and strategy -- in the face of a world danger to lose all the values we believe in, which make life worthwhile to live -- will be concrete and close. This is a real achievement, again, thanks to you, Mr. President, to your wisdom and the warmth of your heart.

Now, before I raise my glass, I would like to tell a story. I cannot but tell at least one story after hearing your speech, Mr. President. At least one story. But I must caution my respected listeners that detect a chauvinistic Israeli undertone. [Laughter] I don't like it, and I don't mean it, and I apologize in advance; but the story is interesting, so I will tell it.

Now, Mr. President, neither of us has direct lines to God. I only believe that God listens to the prayer of a Jew and a Christian and of a Moslem -- of every human being. But, if I have to continue with the story, then I will say that when you come, as I do believe, to Jerusalem, I will immediately put at your disposal the red phone. [Laughter] On the house. [Laughter] A local call.

I raise my glass to the President of the United States -- a man of principle, a wonderful man whom we respect and love, the first day we met. [Referring to Mrs. Reagan:] Madam, the first sight. And to a great, devoted friend of the Jewish people and the State of Israel, and to the defender of freedom throughout the world.

Sec. 2. All Federal agencies shall cooperate with the commissions and the member States to achieve an orderly close out of commission activities and, if the member States so elect, to carry out an orderly transition of appropriate commission activities to the member States.

Sec. 3. To the extent permitted by law, the assets of the commissions which the Federal Government might otherwise be entitled to claim are to be transferred to the member States of the commissions, or such entities as the States acting through their representatives on the commissions may designate, to be used for such water and related land resources planning purposes as the States may decide among themselves. The terms and conditions for transfer of assets under this Section shall be subject to the approval of the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, or such Federal agency as he designates, before the transfer is effective.

The President. Well, ladies and gentlemen, the Prime Minister and I have had 2 days of friendly and useful and productive talks. I'm greatly encouraged by the common purpose that I have sensed throughout our discussions, and especially pleased by the friendship and complete candor that has developed between us from the very outset of our meetings.

Your views, Mr. Prime Minister, have been invaluable, and your grasp of issues that concern us is truly impressive. We've made progress in charting a course that we'll be following in the peace process in the months ahead. We'll work together to maintain the peace that was concluded between Israel and Egypt and to build on that peace and broaden it.

The United States stands ready to help advance the peace process in any way that is useful to the parties concerned. In our discussions about the strategic situation in the Middle East, it's only natural that we've found much common ground. As friends and as partners in peace, we share a determination to oppose all forces that threaten the freedom, integrity, and peace of our nations.

The United States will remain committed to Israel's security and well-being. We will work together with you and with our other friends in the region to counter Soviet aggression and to strengthen security of all the countries in the area.

Mr. Prime Minister, this is the first of what I know will be many warm and productive meetings between us. I'm delighted to have had this opportunity to come to know you and to discuss the partnership between our two countries. Through our conversations, I believe we've created new bonds of understanding between the United States and Israel, renewed and strengthened our very special friendship.

So, while I know that you are going to continue a few days longer, and while we part, but you will be here longer, I wish you a very pleasant, continued stay in the United States and, above all, a very safe return to Israel.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen of the press, I subscribe without any qualification to the appreciation of the talks we held in Washington with the President and his advisers. The American delegation and the Israeli delegation spoke with candor, in detail.

All of us made our work well-prepared, and, therefore, the results can really be considered unanimously by both the President and his advisers and my colleagues and myself as very fruitful. We draw a distinction, a clear distinction, between problems of defending our country when it becomes necessary and the community of moral values and of direct interests between the United States and Israel, as far as the threat to freedom of many nations in the Middle East and elsewhere is concerned.

As far as defense of Israel is concerned, it is our problem. We will never ask any nation to send its soldiers to defend us. Our army will do its duty. We hate war. We hate bloodshed. We want peace. We gave great sacrifices for the sake of peace. We hope to achieve that peace with the other neighbors. But if it should come at any moment when we will have to defend our independence and our liberty and our land, then our young people will do so as they did in the past, in the spirit of self-sacrifice and, I don't hesitate to say, in heroism.

But, there is another problem in our time: a clear community of interests vis-a-vis a clear and present danger to every free nation by a totalitarian and an expansionist regime. On this issue, we work together, we will plan together, we will execute those plans together, in agreement, for the benefit both of the United States and Israel and the free world at large.

Mr. President, we are all grateful to you for the wonderful hospitality you accorded to us. To you and to your gracious lady, Mrs. Reagan, I can only repeat again, ``We will be awaiting your visit to our country and to Jerusalem.'' With God's help you will come. And we shall give you the heartiest reception by a people who have got so great a respect for you as anybody who came to see you, to listen to you, to feel your warmth, your friendship, your readiness to give brotherhood to human beings, can feel.

We honor today the memory of Douglas MacArthur and the legend that was his life. It was a legend that began on cavalry outposts in the Old West, where the son of a Civil War hero and Medal of Honor winner first heard the sound of drums and shout of cadence. He would hear those sounds again when he was graduated from West Point with one of the highest academic averages in history and with the Academy's greatest honor, First Captain of the Corps, Douglas MacArthur.

As a young officer on a secret and highly dangerous intelligence mission in Mexico, he would win his first recommendation for a Congressional Medal of Honor. Wounded twice in France during World War I, he would be decorated repeatedly for his gallantry under fire and become one of the youngest and most popular generals in American history. As a superintendent of the Military Academy he would bring much needed reform to the West Point curriculum, upgrading scholastic standards while emphasizing the importance of sports. Words he spoke then are even now inscribed at West Point in stone, "Upon the fields of friendly strife are the seeds that upon other fields, on other days, will bear the fruits of victory."

In the early thirties, as the youngest Army Chief of Staff in history, he warned the Congress of the need for military readiness and a modern army featuring strong armored and air forces. While bearing the brunt of the Japanese attack in 1942, he would win the Congressional Medal of Honor for his heroic defense of the Philippines. And when ordered by President Roosevelt to leave the Islands, he would thrill the Free World with his defiant pledge, "I shall return."

During his brilliant military campaigns in the South Pacific, his island-hopping, hit-'em-where-they-ain't strategy won quick victories with limited resources, victories that saved thousands of American lives, electrified his countrymen, and confounded the enemy. As a post-war ruler of Japan, he showed himself a wise and compassionate statesman who won forever the affection of the Japanese people, even as he brought about one of the most remarkable achievements in the history of self-government. Then in Korea, in the face of brutal aggression, he accomplished one of the most brilliant maneuvers in military history, the Inchon Landing. And in 1951, before a Joint Session of Congress, he would give one of the most memorable speeches in American history, a speech in which he warned, and we must always remember, "In war, indeed, there can be no substitute for victory."

But then came that unforgettable speech, a speech in which he reminded those young soldiers that duty, honor, country were three hallowed words that reverently dictate what you ought to be, what you can be, and what you will be. "They are your rallying points," he said, "to build courage when courage seems to fail, to regain faith when there seems to be so little cause for faith, to create hope when hope becomes forlorn."

He spoke of his pride in the Long Gray Line that has never failed us. He told the cadets that his last waking thoughts would be of the corps and the corps and the corps. He was extraordinarily proud of his country's uniform. He said of it once, "I suppose in a way this has become a part of my soul. It is a symbol of my life. Whatever I've done that really matters, I've done wearing it. When the time comes, it will be in these that I journey forth. What greater honor could come to an American and a soldier?"

Well, today, a new generation of young officers are asked to defend our nation, just as a new generation of young Americans -- to whom World War II, Korea, and even Vietnam are not even within memory -- seek to define their own ideals and search for their own answers to ageless questions. Surely, as the tide of time recedes from his era, this new generation will see in Douglas MacArthur an unflinching idealist, an eloquent warrior, a visionary soldier, a gentle conqueror, an authentic American hero.

The General had some words for you young men. He said once that, "Being young meant a temperamental predominance of courage over timidity, and an appetite for adventure over love of ease."  He added that, "Nobody grows old by merely living a number of years. People grow old by deserting their ideals."

As long as America affords her brave a place of honor, as long as we as a people seek to keep alive the ideals of selflessness and freedom, as long as we look to the wise and the just for inspiration, our thoughts will turn to the General and the General and the General.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Richard F. Staar to be Representative of the United States of America for Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions Negotiations, and his intention to nominate Mr. Staar for the rank of Ambassador. He would succeed Jonathan Dean.

What makes it really special is that it was all put together to honor a truly great American, Lionel Hampton. And the gathering here on the South Lawn of the White House is more than appropriate. This house, I've said before, belongs to the people of the United States. And it's fitting that a man who has contributed so much to the enjoyment and cultural betterment of his fellow citizens should be honored here.

Lionel stands for what's best about America. With raw talent and hard work he became one of the most respected men in American music. I understand when back in his younger days, before he went on to the vibraharp, the older musicians liked to play in groups with Lionel because he was a good-time drummer -- he knew how to keep a beat. Well you know, Lionel, I don't think you've missed a beat in all these years. And this happens to be especially true when it comes to courage and decency. This man has always been an example for all of us. He's used his talent and his energy tirelessly, to advance the cause of brotherhood. And I think his strength of character and integrity come through in his music.

There are many ways that people make contributions to their country. What you've given to America over these many years can never be taken away. What you've done is make this country a happier place and, I think, speaking for all of us, it's deeply appreciated.

Tonight, as you enjoy yourselves, all of you and those wonderful performers who have been up here with you and those that you introduced in the audience, at the Kennedy Center, the hearts of your fellow citizens are with you, hearts that are a little lighter because of the music you've provided.

Now, I'm going to stop making a speech because, unfortunately, the clean air board wouldn't give us permission to light the barbecue -- [laughter] -- so you're all invited inside for refreshments. Please join us in there.

The true test of civilization, it's been said, is not the census or the size of cities or the crops, but the kind of people the country turns out. And ours is a country that was born of heroes. And now in the first decade of our third century, tried by all the challenges those years could hold, our moral fiber is stronger still.

These nine young Americans are proof of that fiber and that strength. It's now my honor and my privilege to be able to present the Young American Medals for Bravery and Service to nine of our citizens who make all Americans very proud.

The President. You're Darryl? Wade? Turn around and let these people see you here. Let me tell you what's on the citation just briefly. These two young men here are awarded the Medal of Bravery for their exceptional courage, presence of mind, and swiftness of action. On the fourth day of March 1975, regardless of their personal safety, they rescued Mrs. Isaiah Carr in actual imminent danger of losing her life in a fire in Virginia Beach, Virginia.

The President. The citation there, in greater length than I'm reading here today, determines that these two young men were given the Medal of Bravery for having exhibited exceptional courage, presence of mind, and swiftness of action, and again, regardless of their own personal safety, on the fifth day of August 1975, they rescued nine injured occupants from a burning vehicle near Thorp, Wisconsin.

The President. Donna Lee Slack is awarded this medal for the same courage and the same swiftness of action and the same disregard for her own personal safety on the 20th day of March 1976, in rescuing three small children when a tornado demolished their home in Bloomfield, Michigan.

The President. Just a minute here. Somehow, I have lost a paper. But anyway, we know what it is for, and it is no less heroic: young people that are willing to give of their time and their effort in public service to their fellow man, the young people and those who need our help on a voluntary basis. This is one of the things that we hope we are going to see revived in America, more voluntarism, more effort expended by people in a neighbor-to-neighbor way and less of the officialdom of government intervening in that field.

The President. Joel, welcome up here. This was December 1978, 3 years ago. Joel, in great danger and risk to himself, laid down on the ice and pulled himself across the ice to rescue his friend who had fallen through the ice on the Eau Claire River and was in imminent danger of drowning, and certainly was disregarding his own personal safety in doing this.

The President. Jerome, congratulations. And here again is a young man who demonstrated that bravery, that disregard for his own welfare, in rescuing two small children from a burning house in Baltimore, Maryland.

The President. And here again, Carmen Maria Hernandez Rodriguez is recognized again for that equally heroic task, the long hours in devoting her full time in service to her fellow man. We're deeply grateful to you.

Note: The President spoke at 11:34 a.m. at the presentation ceremony in the Rose Garden at the White House. The ceremony was attended by friends and relatives of the award winners, Justice Department officials, and several Members of Congress.

Today's shipment by Catholic Relief Services will provide food for thousands of children, the aged, and the infirm who have experienced severe shortages during the past months. Through the initiative of Catholic Relief Services, the spirited people of Poland will feel the compassion of the American people, who have frequently demonstrated their willingness to lend a hand to the needy around the world.

The milk shipped today was purchased by Catholic Relief Services from the U.S. Government at a favorable price using funds collected in Catholic churches throughout the United States. The distribution in Poland will be handled by the Catholic bishops there and will be based solely on need, rather than on religious or political considerations. I am happy that we are able to be a part of this important humanitarian effort. It is through voluntary agencies like Catholic Relief Services that the American people can express their concern for those who suffer the indignities of hunger and poverty.

I appreciate the spirit in which you have reached this agreement, and firmly believe that we have struck the balance necessary to assure both an increasingly strong defense and the economic health on which defense and wellbeing depend.

After extensive discussions, President Reagan this afternoon sent a directive to the Secretary of Defense and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget regarding future defense outlays. The President's decision calls for a reduction in defense outlays of $13 billion over fiscal years 1982 through 1984. Based upon initial analyses, Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger reported this afternoon that those outlay reductions are likely to result in reductions in total obligational authority of some $21 to $22 billion over the 3-year period.

The Secretary indicated that those figures are preliminary. The final reductions in obligational authority -- and I would stress the difference between obligational authority and outlays; the outlay figure of $13 billion is firm -- will depend upon the ultimate choice among specific, programmatic, and management alternatives for achieving the outlay reductions.

In the discussions that have occurred over the past several days, the President and his advisers have also considered the defense budgets for fiscal years 1985 and 1986, as previously submitted. The President decided that he would not seek any reductions in those budgets.

After signing this directive at Camp David this afternoon, the President reemphasized that his decision reflects his continuing commitment to two major goals of his administration -- a strong economy and a strong national defense.

These changes in the defense budget are, of course, the first reductions on plans previously announced by the President to identify savings in the overall spending that will help to bring the Federal budget into balance by 1984 and, in the process, achieve economic recovery. I might note that this is the defense increment with regard to those reductions. The reductions with regard to other departments will be those that will be forthcoming in the near future. In other words, this is the defense portion of those additional savings that were to be identified.

At the same time, as he reemphasized at Camp David this afternoon, the President believes that it is essential to the security of the nation to embark upon a major, long-term buildup in American defense forces. The President's decision today is intended to ensure that as the nation moves toward a sounder economy, we also restore the margin of safety for the United States.

Mr. Gergen also announced that the President had met in the Oval Office on September 11 with Secretary of Defense Caspar W. Weinberger and David A. Stockman, Director of the Office of Management and Budget. A tentative decision as to the size of the defense budget outlays was reached at that meeting. The President telephoned Secretary Weinberger and Mr. Stockman after making his final decision on September 12.

Good morning, and welcome to the White House. Nancy and I and Vice President Bush and Mrs. Bush are delighted that you could all join us here today for the signing of this proclamation and for the opening of the exhibit appropriately called ``The Bicentennial Victory at Yorktown.'' Now, we don't plan to fire any cannons, although we did offer you fife and drum corps. But this little ceremony is our way of, if you will, of kicking off the big celebration that culminates in Yorktown October 19th -- the 200th anniversary date of the American victory there.

Yorktown, of course, represents, as we know, much more than just a military victory. It meant the end of the revolutionary struggle, the beginning of independence, and the gateway to the Constitution. And this triumph pointed the way toward a bright and exciting new future for the rest of the world as well.

The days ahead will be filled with colorful parades and music and fireworks and great fanfare. But amidst all this celebrating, let's not forget Freeman's message, and let's not forget that our Revolution lasted 8 long years and that it was an uphill battle all the way.

Our soldiers faced overwhelming odds. They endured disaster, and right up to the moment of Yorktown their cause seemed hopeless. But these men were no sunshine patriots. It was their bold vision of liberty and their resolve to win it that filled them with courage to endure, and ultimately to prevail.

History tells us that 56 men signed the original Declaration of Independence in '76, pledging their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor. By the Battle of Yorktown in 1781, some had given their lives, most had given their fortunes, but all had preserved their honor.

We Americans today are not often asked to make such sacrifices. Most never have known the kind of winter that our forefathers suffered through at Valley Forge. Nevertheless, it will take new determination, new resolve, to preserve the treasures of our Revolution.

We live in a precarious world threatened by totalitarian forces who seek to subvert and destroy freedom. The peace we enjoy is maintained only by our strength and resolve, and it's our duty to fortify both.

At home, our enemy is no longer Redcoats but red ink. You figured that I'd get to that, didn't you? [Laughter] You know, this is a little bit like the fellow at the wedding when the minister got to that portion of the ceremony where he said, ``If any one can show just cause why these two should not be wed, let him speak now or forever hold his peace.'' And in the moment of silence that followed, a voice in the back says, ``well, if no one wants to say nothing about the bride and groom, I'd like to say a few words about my home State of Texas.'' [Laughter] I'm going to say it: After 19 deficits in the last 20 years, with a national debt of nearly a trillion dollars, we face a choice of taking drastic action or inviting economic calamity.

Our administration, and I think the American people, have the resolve to do what we know is right and what we know must be done. And make no mistake -- we will. But for those in and out of government so quick to carp and complain, so ready to retreat even before the program has begun, I have just two questions: If not us, then who? And if not now, when?

I believe the spirit of Yorktown, the spirit of our Revolution, is still alive and well in America. I'm confident that if we work together, reason together, and stick together, then just like our forefathers, we'll be all right.

And now we invite you to get in out of the hot Sun and join us in the East Foyer for the official opening of the White House exhibit commemorating the Yorktown Bicentennial. We hope it will be an additional indication to citizens visiting the White House of the historical significance of this event in our nation's birth. So, we shall go and cut the ribbon and see the exhibit.

As the King's troops came slowly down the road to the surrender field, legend has it that they struck up the tune, ``The World Turned Upside Down.'' And, indeed, the old order was to be turned upside down, for the creative powers of democracy were about to be released on an unsuspecting world.

This year marks the two hundredth anniversary of the surrender. October 19, 1781, was a major date in the development of America and her freedoms; and today, two centuries later, it remains an important reminder of our identity as a nation. The anniversary is also an appropriate time to recall the assistance France gave to America's revolutionary struggle. We, as Americans, are the product of many victories, many sacrifices, and many hopes. The campaign at Yorktown is a historic example.

The Congress has enacted a joint resolution (Public Law 96 - 414) designating October 19, 1981, as a ``Day of National Observance of the Two Hundredth Anniversary of the Surrender of Lord Cornwallis to General George Washington at Yorktown, Virginia.'' It is fitting that we reflect upon our victory at Yorktown and commemorate it in such a manner as to inspire love of country and devotion to ideals by recalling to this generation the struggles of the past. We can do this at the same time as we give thanks for the great bond of friendship which exists between ourselves and Great Britain.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of Sept, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President today announced the appointment of Joseph W. Canzeri to be Assistant to the President and Assistant to the Deputy Chief of Staff. Mr. Canzeri will serve as a general-purpose assistant to the Deputy Chief of Staff, while continuing to coordinate White House scheduling and advance operations and all Presidential travel. He will also serve as liaison with former Presidents.

In his new position, Mr. Darman will have increased responsibility for the coordination and integration of White House staff activities. He will at the same time continue to serve as Deputy to the Chief of Staff, as White House Staff Secretary, and as coordinator of the Legislative Strategy Group. He will also retain overall management responsibility for the White House operating units.

The President today announced the appointment of Craig L. Fuller to be Assistant to the President for Cabinet Affairs. Mr. Fuller will advance from his present position as Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of the Office of Cabinet Administration. He will continue to coordinate Cabinet activities and will report directly to Presidential Counsellor Edwin Meese.

The President today announced the appointment of Helene von Damm as Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of Presidential Personnel. Mrs. von Damm, currently Special Assistant to the President, will succeed John Herrington who is assuming the post of Assistant Secretary of the Navy.

As Director of Personnel, Mrs. von Damm will be responsible for the day-to-day internal management of the complex White House appointments process. In addition, the President intends to continue to rely on her personal assistance as may be required.

Ms. Small, Deputy Assistant to the President and currently serving as Deputy Press Secretary, will direct the Office of Media Relations and Planning, which will have responsibility for long-range planning in communicating the President's programs, media liaison with editors and broadcasters across the country, and the White House Speakers' Bureau.

Mr. Roussel's primary duties will be in the domestic area, providing guidance on issues both to the Press Office and the press. He will also have other duties as assigned. Mr. Roussel will report directly to Larry Speakes, the Principal Deputy Press Secretary.

Prior to his Washington service, Mr. Roussel was affiliated with the Houston advertising/public relations firm of Rives, Dyke and Co., and worked in numerous Texas political campaigns, including serving as media adviser in Senator John Tower's successful 1966 reelection effort. He has written and produced national award-winning documentary films and published articles.

Mr. Allin's responsibilities will be in the area of foreign affairs, providing guidance on issues and assisting in the coordination with the National Security Council, the State Department, and the Defense Department. He will also continue to serve as Press Office liaison with members of the foreign press corps. Mr. Allin will report to Larry Speakes, Principal Deputy Press Secretary.

The Public Affairs Office will have the responsibility for the coordination of public affairs offices in the various departments and agencies of the administration, as well as the operation of a central research and information center to serve the White House staff.

Prior to this association with SOHIO, he was vice president for two affiliates of the Chamber of Commerce of the United States -- the National Chamber Foundation, a public policy research group, and Citizens Choice, a national grassroots taxpayers lobby. Prior to his experience with the U.S. Chamber, he was a management consultant in Boston, specializing in corporate community affairs and organizational development. He also worked for two private foundations -- the C. S. Mott Foundation in Flint, Mich., and the Associated Foundation of Greater Boston, in Boston, Mass.

Mr. Rosebush has a B.A. in business administration from the Principia College in Elsah, Ill., and an M.A. in public affairs from Boston University. He has taught at Georgetown University and George Washington University on the subject of corporate/public issues management and the history of philanthropy.

I was preparing some remarks, and I didn't know whether to have some facetious remarks in which I would say, ``They were better at their jobs than they are on the court,'' or whether I was to be generous and say, ``Well, they're just as good at their jobs as they are here,'' -- and that could be taken wrong. So, anyway they settled that for me.

We are pleased to have you here. Tennis, of course, in recent years, beginning about 1968, really, has stepped off and become one of the great national sports. There are now, as I believe, 92 tournaments. And we're very proud to have the Davis Cup team, the Wightman Cup players, team, here. We were very proud of what our ladies in the Wightman Cup did to the British, and we were proud of the Davis Cup team in defeating last year's champions, the good Czechoslovakian team, in New York. And we're all going to be watching them next month and rooting for them in that.

Section 1. The Secretary of Education shall supervise annually the development of a Federal program designed to achieve a significant increase in the participation by historically Black colleges and universities in Federally sponsored programs. This program shall seek to identify, reduce, and eliminate barriers which may have unfairly resulted in reduced participation in, and reduced benefits from, Federally sponsored programs. This program will also seek to involve private sector institutions in strengthening historically Black colleges.

Sec. 2. Annually, each Executive Department and those Executive agencies designated by the Secretary of Education shall establish annual plans to increase the ability of historically Black colleges and universities to participate in Federally sponsored programs. These plans shall consist of measurable objectives of proposed agency actions to fulfill this Order and shall be submitted at such time and in such form as the Secretary of Education shall designate. In consultation with participating Executive agencies, the Secretary of Education shall undertake a review of these plans and develop an integrated Annual Federal Plan for Assistance to Historically Black Colleges for consideration by the President and the Cabinet Council on Human Resources (composed of the Vice President, the Secretaries of Health and Human Services, Agriculture, Labor, Housing and Urban Development, and Education, the Attorney General, the Counsellor to the President, and the White House Chief of Staff).

Sec. 3. Each participating agency shall submit to the Secretary of Education a mid-year progress report of its achievement of its plan and at the end of the year an Annual Performance Report which shall specify agency performance of its measurable objectives.

Sec. 4. Prior to the development of the First Annual Federal Plan, the Secretary of Education shall supervise a special review by every Executive agency of its programs to determine the extent to which historically Black colleges and universities are given an equal opportunity to participate in Federally sponsored programs. This review will examine unintended regulatory barriers, determine the adequacy of the announcement of programmatic opportunities of interest to these colleges, and identify ways of eliminating inequities and disadvantages.

Sec. 5. The Secretary of Education shall ensure that each president of a historically Black college or university is given the opportunity to comment on the proposed Annual Federal Plan prior to its consideration by the President, the Vice President, and the Cabinet Council on Human Resources.

Sec. 6. The Secretary of Education, to the extent permitted by law, shall stimulate initiatives by private sector businesses and institutions to strengthen historically Black colleges and universities, including efforts to further improve their management, financial structure, and research.

Sec. 7. The Secretary of Education shall submit to the President, the Vice President, and the Cabinet Council on Human Resources an Annual Federal Performance Report on Executive Agency Actions to Assist Historically Black Colleges. The report shall include the performance appraisals of agency actions during the preceding year to assist historically Black colleges and universities. The report will also include any appropriate recommendations for improving the Federal response directed by this Order.

But we're gathered today because all of us want to nourish and protect an American institution that has served this Nation well. And I am, of course, referring to the traditional black colleges and universities. Hundreds of thousands of young Americans received training at these schools over the last 100 years, expanding their opportunities as individuals and laying the foundation for social progress.

It should never be forgotten that when educational opportunities were denied elsewhere, these institutions offered hope to black Americans -- hope for a better life and hope that someday they would break the bonds of prejudice and discrimination.

These educational institutions did their job well. They have produced 50 percent of the black business executives, 75 percent of the black military officers, 80 percent of the black judges, and 85 percent of black physicians in this country.

The Black colleges and universities in America have offered black citizens a variety of opportunities to develop their skills and talents, and it's through such diversity that freedom flourishes. And it is through education, the education they offer, that individuals can make themselves into the type of people they choose to be and not what some central planner says they should be.

In pursuit of equal opportunity for black Americans, economics becomes as important as education. For a long period of our history, black people were prevented the chance of bettering themselves not only because they were denied the opportunity to learn, but because job opportunities were limited as well. It will do no good to educate young people if there are no jobs for them once they get out of school. And you, more than any of our citizens, know how important a vibrant economy is to the progress of black Americans, particularly, and all Americans as well.

Now I believe that our economic program will provide more opportunity for all Americans, including black college graduates. Most black progress has occurred during times of prosperity in America, and we're working to create a new era of prosperity for everyone.

Economic dislocation hurts institutions as well as individuals. America's colleges and universities have been hard-pressed to maintain standards in the face of inflation that increases the cost of everything from books to typewriters. It doesn't help very much when government regulations have multiplied to the point that a president of a modest-sized college or small university told me one day that just complying with government regulation paperwork had increased his administrative overhead in that department from $50,000 a year to $650,000 a year. That will buy a lot of courses and a lot of teaching and training -- that kind of money.

With this in mind, with a serious commitment to protecting these unique educational institutions, we've made certain that in an era of budget cuts, black colleges and universities will actually receive a $9.6 million increase in Federal title III funds. Now, this is a jump of almost 8 percent. In our continuing review of Executive orders, we found a need to improve upon an existing order on historically black colleges, and that's why I was happy today to sign that new order that will strengthen the Federal commitment to the historic black colleges, while seeking new ways for the private sector to increase its support for these vital institutions.

Our commitment takes several forms. First, the Executive order commits us to increase black college participation in federally sponsored programs. Secondly, this order mandates governmentwide coordination to ensure that these colleges and universities are given a full opportunity to participate in federally sponsored programs. Now, we all know that the Federal Government has a troublesome history of issuing reports with no teeth in them. Well, this administration believes in setting measurable objectives and then turning loose the creative resources to meet them. To ensure that the annual Federal plan called for in this order gets results, I am directing Secretary of Education Bell to submit an annual performance report on executive agency actions to carry out their plans. This is management by objectives in action. And the report card prepared by Secretary Bell will be reviewed by the Cabinet Council on Human Resources, the Vice President, and me.

You know, I've never forgotten the President who once stood in this room and said that sometimes he had wanted to find out when he issued an Executive order where out there in the bureaucracy did it just sink into the sand like water and disappear and never be heard from again. Well, this one is going to be heard from again with an annual report card, as I say -- and they better pass.

Now, to reinforce this administration's commitment, I'm asking Vice President Bush to play a special role. He will work with the heads of Federal agencies to help ensure the fullest cooperation possible in conducting a special policy review to serve as a basis for all our future planning on black colleges and universities. He will then discuss the findings with the presidents of the historically black colleges.

And finally, this Executive order breaks new ground by calling on the Secretary of Education to encourage private sector initiatives in assisting these historic black institutions. The Federal Government's role can be to provide equal opportunity, but the private sector has an even greater potential and a challenging responsibility to provide direct assistance to these institutions.

We should remember that just as in the past, the future of these schools will depend more than anything else on the efforts of black Americans. What has been accomplished already is a tremendous source of pride, but now is not the time to rest on past accomplishments. The future depends on an even stronger commitment to excellence and diversity in education. And to paraphrase the motto of the United Negro College Fund: Let us recognize that America's historic black college is a ``terrible thing to waste.'' And we're not going to allow it to be wasted.

Thank you, thank you all very much. It's a privilege to welcome you here to the White House this evening. You and those you represent were not only the key to the successes of our bipartisan coalition, you're the key to economic recovery of this Nation.

I see many familiar faces -- just as we hurried through the crowd here -- and I met with many of you as we pushed for the largest tax and budget cuts in our history. But I know that all of you here worked very hard to make those goals a reality. You and your neighbors and coworkers wrote letters and made phone calls and visited your Congressmen to get them passed. And Members of Congress later spoke of being overwhelmed by the outpouring of support. They spoke of it; they screamed about it. [Laughter] They said no one could get through on their phone lines.

But we do owe you a great vote of thanks. But you didn't do all of that work for a thank you, as you better than most see the necessity of restoring free enterprise to American life. You understand the bottom line of profit and loss, and you know that people, businesses, and governments must live within their means. Representing all aspects of American life, you know the opportunity in store for all of us if we reawaken our entrepreneurial spirit.

For too long there's been an adversary relationship between government and its own business community. The freedom to take a risk, to reap its rewards, to work harder for a better wage, to climb as high as your own ambition and effort will take you -- that kind of freedom is basic to the dream that is America and essential for the return of economic health in this country.

After decades of big government spending, there were some who didn't believe that the American people would take action to change that -- but they did. And when I first came to office there were some who said the people didn't care enough to insist if Congress went along -- but they did. And now there are those who doubt the staying power of the American people, who don't understand our commitment. And for those doubting Thomases, I have a message -- they're wrong again.

I think what must have been a thrill to you, and has been the biggest thrill to me in all these months, was to discover how the American people believe in America and in themselves. There's a great deal of confusion at the moment, I know. Yes, our economic recovery program has been passed by the Congress, signed into law, but it's not yet in effect.

The legislation that was passed this summer was historic, but that was only a beginning. We've only started on the long, hard road toward recovery, yet suddenly we hear some saying that our programs aren't working. Well, of course they're not; they don't start until October 1st. [Laughter] And when they do start, they're aimed at reversing three decades or more of mistaken economic policy, and they're not offered as a quick fix. It isn't going to happen overnight. But they will work.

I'm as committed today as on the first day I took office to balancing the budget, freeing the people from punitive taxation, and making America once again strong enough to safeguard our freedom. And I'm surer today than I ever was that we can achieve all three of those things. We'll continue to make budget adjustments as needed, and we'll hold the line. And I hope we have the same kind of bipartisan support that we had in passing the program, as we now have a need to resist the efforts to increase spending through appropriation bills. As for myself, with regard to that, I will not hesitate to use the veto to block any such efforts.

And let me silence those, those who would scare our older Americans. The budget will not be balanced at the expense of those dependent on social security. That system has serious problems; but we have sent our proposals to the Congress, and we have no plans to change them.

Now, I thank all of you for all that you've done to give our country a new beginning, but I remind you there are many trials yet ahead. I hope we can count on your help, the help that was so invaluable in the past. Together, I think that we're equal to our challenges, and together, we'll surmount them. So again, it's just a heartfelt thanks.

And now I have a couple of presentations to make. You know, there were a lot of people -- you and all the help, as I've said, that you gave -- but here in Washington, there were a few people that before the fight was over must have wondered why they made the decision to come here in the first place. And so I have a couple of presentations to make.

Two people that had to have worked as hard as anyone in the world were Dave Stockman, Office of Management and Budget -- and he put in more hours than there really are -- [laughter]. And this is just a little souvenir we thought that you might like. It contains the first page and the last page of that great reduction in government spending, the one where you put your name and make it legal, and one of the pens that was used to sign it. Dave? There you are.

And then someone else who must have wondered if he shouldn't have second thoughts, but he was one of the heroes of getting this done, equal in the number of hours, day after day, and doing a great job of selling all the time. This is the front page and this is that last one, the bottom line, where the signatures go. To Don Regan. And this is the tax program that reduced our taxes.

Well, there is no way to measure what they did and the work that they put in, and it's a shame to just have to say that that was only a battle -- the war still goes on. [Laughter] So, they'll be still at it for months and months to come, not only in getting this '82 budget passed, but then, as we said before, we are working on the unspecified cuts that must be made in the budget for '83 and '84, and we're going to now make them specific.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Edgar F. Callahan to be a member of the National Credit Union Administration. Upon confirmation, the President intends to designate Mr. Callahan Chairman. He would succeed Harold A. Black.

The Constitution establishes the Congress, the Executive, and the Judiciary, and through a deliberate allocation of authority, it defines the limits of each upon the others. It particularizes the liberties which, as free men and women, we insist upon, and it constrains both Federal and State powers to ensure that those precious liberties are faithfully protected. It is our blueprint for freedom, our commitment to ourselves and to each other.

It is by choice, not by imposition, that the Constitution is the supreme law of our Land. As we approach the bicentennial of this charter, each of us has a personal obligation to acquaint ourselves with it and with its central role in guiding our Nation. While a constitution may set forth rights and liberties, only the citizens can maintain and guarantee those freedoms. Active and informed citizenship is not just a right; it is a duty.

I also proclaim the week beginning September 17th and ending September 23rd, 1981 as Constitution Week, and I urge all Americans to observe that week with appropriate ceremonies and activities in their schools, churches and other suitable places.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Thank you very much, and buenas tardes. I had to say that because the reason I was late today -- and I apologize to all of you -- is because I had a very distinguished visitor in the office. And he had a presentation to make, and it did run over the time, but it was the Patriarch of Antioch -- I'm trying to think again exactly what his title is -- but of the Maronite Christian people in Lebanon. It was fascinating, the story that he was telling. But what fascinated me the most was that he conducted the almost 30 minutes of message to me in our language, in English, and he had simply just sat down and learned English in order to make this trip. And I had to confess that if I was going to Lebanon -- [laughter] -- I couldn't do what he did. But anyway, it couldn't be interrupted, so I was late.

But as a Californian, it's a special pleasure for me to welcome you here to the White House. And I know it probably wouldn't be technically proper for me to say mi casa es su casa, because this is already su casa -- [laughter] -- I just am a temporary tenant here. But all of us from the West have a special place in our hearts for Hispanic culture. Incidentally, as long as I was talking about language, the day after tomorrow, I'm going to be speaking to an audience in Denver, Colorado, and I was going to tell them a little story that happened to deal with a visit that, when I was Governor of California, I made to Mexico on behalf of the then administration in Washington.

But coming from the West and having Hispanic culture in our hearts, it's so much a tradition in the Southwest that moving here to Washington was a bit of a culture shock. I understand that whenever there's Federal business to be done in any of the Southwestern States there is fierce competition among the Californians on my staff to get the assignment. It has something to do with enchiladas and refried beans and the fact that you don't just get those every day in Washington, D.C. In fact, I don't know where you can get them. Somebody, I'm sure, will tell me there is a place when I leave here.

But seriously, all of this has given me a deep appreciation for Hispanic culture, including its music, food, and qualities, but more than that, the qualities of character that it engenders, especially the sense of personal honor and integrity.

In the past election, I talked about five important values -- family, neighborhood, work, peace, and freedom. Campaigning in Hispanic areas, I never felt more comfortable about those values. During the last two decades, when our traditions and values were under attack as never before, Hispanic Americans held firm to their beliefs like a solid rock amidst a stormy sea. They demonstrated a commitment to family, a reverence for God, as well as the pride and self-respect that comes from hard work.

Today, all of us are rediscovering those values, but the Hispanic community never lost them. And this dedication is beginning to bear fruit. Progress made by Hispanics can be described as nothing less than phenomenal. After years of adversity and, yes, discrimination, there is no doubt that Hispanics are taking their rightful place in American society. In my own administration, they're playing an invaluable role. Eighty Hispanics have already received appointments at all levels, and 18 of them in major positions. And I'm happy to say in looking back over the records to see how we're doing, that these first few months tops anything that has happened in the entire administrations that have preceded us. But across this land, in the private sector you're making your way into positions of influence and leadership. And all of this is a tremendous source of pride for a people that have worked so hard to overcome the obstacles before them.

A most admirable quality is the sense of honor and duty that is rooted so firmly in that culture. Few others can claim the patriotism demonstrated by our Hispanic citizens. Consistent with this, they've received awards for heroism and bravery far in excess to their proportion of the population. Two of my first ceremonial functions as President were, interestingly enough, directly related to heroism of Hispanic Americans.

First, I was honored to welcome back the hostages from Iran, and two of the Marines had been especially heroic. Both of them were Hispanic Americans. One of them, Jimmy Lopez, is remembered not only for risking his life to help several Embassy employees escape but also for his spirit of defiance in captivity. Before they left to come home, he wrote on his cell wall, in Spanish, which the Iranians did not understand: ``Viva la roja, blanca, y azul.'' [Long live the red, white, and blue.] His devotion will not be forgotten.

And then on February 24th, we discovered that there had been neglected for several years the presentation of a Congressional Medal of Honor, given only for service above and beyond the call of duty. And it was to go to a brave man, Master Sergeant Roy Benavidez, raised on a farm down near the border in Texas. His heroism in Vietnam earned him that highest award, the Congressional Medal of Honor, and I had the honor to present it to him. I had the honor to sit and visit with him for awhile about this, and let me just say a word or two about it. If you tried to put it in a television show, no one would believe it.

Well, the proclamation that we celebrate today about the strength that the Hispanic people have given to this country -- all of this is based on the strength of character which I spoke of earlier. Recognizing this, I am proud to have proclaimed this ``National Hispanic Heritage Week.'' In doing so, I hope that all Americans will reflect on how lucky we are to have such a wonderful people as a part of our country and a part of ourselves.

Mr. James is a self-employed farmer and manager of cotton gins and grain elevators for the A.C. Riley Co. Since 1972 he has worked with various levee and drainage boards in Missouri and was employed with the Kentucky Department of Water Resources engineering office while attending the University of Kentucky in 1971.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Cystic fibrosis is an hereditary, metabolic disease primarily affecting the respiratory and digestive systems. Tragically, the disease attacks the young. It imposes enormous economic, physical and emotional burdens on both victim and family. The disease is the leading genetic killer of young Americans; yet, its cause and cure are unknown. In addition, there is no test for determining who is a carrier -- and there are up to 10 million sympton-free individuals who might pass cystic fibrosis on to their children.

Nevertheless, there is ample reason for hope. There have been important advances in the treatment of cystic fibrosis. Twenty-five years ago, children affected by the disease seldom reached school age. Today, half of those afflicted with the disease will live into their twenties, and the quality of life during these additional years has been significantly improved.

Supported by the National Institutes of Health and private voluntary agencies, researchers throughout the world are focusing their efforts on cystic fibrosis. Improved methods of diagnosis, detection, treatment and control are being examined and attention, as never before, is being paid to this cruel disease.

Since early diagnosis can prolong life, public awareness is critical. To increase this awareness and commemorate the progress being made in controlling cystic fibrosis, and to emphasize the need for a continued effort to defeat it, the Congress has, by Senate Joint Resolution 62, designated the week of September 20 through September 26, 1981, as National Cystic Fibrosis Week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of September in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Section 1. Before any agency or officer thereof submits to the Congress, or to any committee or member thereof, for approval, appropriations, or legislative action any report, proposal, or plan relating to a Federal or Federally assisted water and related land resources project or program, such report, proposal, or plan shall be submitted to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.

Sec. 3. When such report, proposal, or plan is thereafter submitted to the Congress, or to any committee or member thereof, it shall include a statement of the advice received from the Office of Management and Budget.

Millions of Americans will follow us to this place, and like us, they will find history here. They will relive in their own minds or through their children's eyes dramatic and critically important moments in our nation's life. Here they will reflect on the achievements of the 38th President of the United States. They will dwell on what Gerald Ford brought to this Nation and what he gave to his country and his people. Some of those who come here will bring, just as many of us have today, personal memories. I have my own.

I couldn't help but recall, as we prepared for this trip, that the first time he and I encountered each other was in Michigan. Well, it wasn't exactly an encounter, and we certainly didn't have any awareness of each other. I was a young sports announcer for station WHO of Des Moines, Iowa. I was broadcasting an Iowa-Michigan football game. The center on that Michigan team was a fellow named Jerry Ford. Candor and a decent regard for history force me to admit that was about 47 years ago, and Michigan won.

Mr. President, other, less humorous similarities between us have occurred recently. This came home to me when I ran across this description of the American economy: ``the worst inflation in the country's peacetime history, the highest interest rates in a century, the consequent severe slump in housing, sinking and utterly demoralized securities markets, a stagnant economy with large-scale unemployment in prospect, and a worsening international trade and payments position.'' That description comes from the New York Times, and I thought you would like to know the date was the summer of 1974. Gerald Ford had just become President of the United States.

During his first few months in office, he made the battle against inflation, growing unemployment, and a stagnant economy his first priority. He didn't hesitate to point to the causes of this economic crisis. He noted that in a 10-year period, Federal spending had increased from over 100 billion to over 300 billion dollars; in a 15-year period, direct and indirect Federal payments to individuals had gone from 24 percent of the Federal budget to 46 percent, while spending for defense fell from 49 percent of the budget to 26 percent.

Well, as President, Gerald Ford made his choice. And when he left office, the economy was again moving in the right direction with inflation shrunk to a yearly rate of 4.8 percent. And his decision to carefully rebuild America's defense and his willingness to protect American interest and lives abroad began to reestablish our international prestige. He showed it can be done.

Well, these are the facts, the objective criteria by which the success of the Ford Presidency can be judged. Yet the legacy left his countrymen by General [President] Gerald Ford is something deeper and something more profound.

In 1787, shortly after the Constitutional Convention concluded its work, Benjamin Franklin was asked what had been accomplished, and we all know he said: ``We've given you a Republic, if you can keep it.'' For two centuries this has been the challenge before all Americans, a challenge that has always been met, but not without uncertainty, moments of doubt and danger.

During the first transition of Federal power from one party to the other in 1800, fierce acrimony, vows of retribution, and even talk of succession filled the Nation's Capital. And in 1861 another great internal crisis shook our nation. And this time the dissolution of the Union was not only threatened; it was, for a time, a reality. In both cases the steadiness, the fortitude, the personal ease, and quiet confidence of our Presidents saw us through.

On August 9th, 1974, when the nation was experiencing another traumatic test of its institutions, Gerald Ford, as it's been said several times here today, took the oath of office in the East Room of the White House and spoke of the ``extraordinary circumstances never before experienced by Americans.'' He spoke of a time of ``trouble'' and ``hurt,'' and he told us ``our long national nightmare is over.'' He woke us from that nightmare. We've heard repeated here today dramatic statements that were made as evidence of that. He did heal America, because he so thoroughly understood America. His was and is an unquestioning belief in the soundness of our way of governing and in the resiliency of our people.

And during our Bicentennial, he reminded the American people of the collective wisdom of their ways and the remarkable achievements of their past and the fact that we can meet in solemn gatherings like this and go right on without being bothered a bit by a few raucous voices from beyond.

Today many of us in public life, from this country and others, have come here to speak words of tribute to Gerald Ford. The millions of Americans who will soon hear or read these words will not long remember them, but can be sure that in their minds and hearts there will be a flash of recognition and a swell of gratitude, feelings that if put into words would result in a simple statement by his countrymen about Gerald Ford: He was a good President who led us well, a good man who sought to serve others.

I am, of course, grateful for your support and counsel on this matter, but I would remind you that if today 229 million Americans can look forward to that future you speak of, it is because you brought us through difficult and trying times and helped us to believe again in ourselves.

Not too long ago, on the 200th anniversary of Paul Revere's famous ride, you offered a prayer, Mr. President, in the Old North Church in Boston. You said you hoped that those who follow us might say of our generation, ``We kept the faith, freedom flourished, liberty lived.'' That's a worthy prayer, Mr. President, and we offer it again today in a spirit of gratitude for your Presidency and affection for you.

But today you're the ones who deserve the applause for the support that you gave us in passing the recent budget and the tax bills. When I signed that legislation, I used 24 pens. And the reason it took 24 pens was not because they were government issued -- [laughter] -- they were for some of the people who had helped get the bills through the Congress. But, you know, if I had pens for everyone who assisted us, there would be thousands and thousands of Americans who would have received them -- who phoned and contacted their Congressmen. They worked in our behalf, and ultimately they won a great victory for our country.

When you think about it, that should really be a surprise -- or no surprise, I should say, because long ago the great philosopher and commentator, De Tocqueville, came here to America from France, and after a long look at our country he wrote: . . . if anyone asks me what I think the chief cause of the extraordinary prosperity and growing power of this Nation is due to, I should answer, it is due to the superiority of their women. I would add, especially our Republican women.

We've tapped many fine Republican women to serve in the administration. And in spite of the mistaken notions we are somehow lagging in women appointments, the truth is just the opposite. After 8 months in office, we have selected as many women to serve in top policymaking posts as the previous administration had at the end of the first entire year, and more appointments will follow. What this means is that for a comparable period of time, we've appointed more women to substantive jobs than any other administration in history. And let me assure you this is only the beginning.

Of course, one accomplishment that I'm especially proud of as President is the appointment to the Supreme Court of Sandra O'Connor. [Applause] Thank you. Thank you very much. She is an outstanding example of the qualified women living all across this country whose talents and energies are so helpful in Washington. And let me say that one of her good qualities is the fact that she was a member of this organization before she joined the bench.

I can tell you I firmly believe that she is imbued with the philosophy that we put into our platform at the convention in Detroit. And I'm convinced she'll make a fine Justice, not just because she's the first woman on the Court but she also brings, as I say, a philosophy with her that I believe is especially appropriate for the Court. As she said in her testimony before the Senate, ``. . . the proper role of the judiciary is one of interpreting and applying the law, not making it.'' I believe that Mrs. O'Connor's commitment to judicial restraint will help to redefine the Court's role in our daily life. Sandra O'Connor is a new Justice for a new American era.

Today I want to discuss an issue, though, that affects you as Republicans, as women, and as Americans. During last year's campaign, I made a pledge to the American people, a pledge to return this Nation to economic health and vitality. I have never taken a commitment more seriously, with the possible exception of the one I made nearly 30 years ago to you know who. [Laughter] This afternoon let me review the progress that we've made in meeting that economic commitment to the people and what we must still accomplish.

Eight months ago we were bogged down with Federal regulations, heavier and heavier taxation, and the lowest level of investment and savings in the industrialized world. Few of us could keep our heads above the rising inflation rate. Our economy was sinking and taking most Americans with it.

With bipartisan support, we passed the largest spending and tax reductions in the history of this Nation. We also launched one of the largest regulatory relief rescues ever attempted. The economic recovery package is a dramatic contrast to years of bland, halfhearted, and ineffective efforts.

This summer I received a letter from a young black man in Los Angeles who had just become the proud father of a little girl. I well know that feeling. And he said that even though he grew up in a Democratic family, he was now wholeheartedly supporting our recovery program for the sake of his daughter's future. And he said, ``Our livelihoods depend on the total economic viability of America.'' Well, we're determined to make the economy viable for all Americans, and we're determined that his little girl's economic opportunities are going to be abundant.

Our economic plan is to begin with the 1982 fiscal year on October 1st. I'm as convinced today as I was when we introduced the package that this economic plan is as good as money in the bank, and if I were a betting man, I would wager the rent money on it.

Yes, the persistence with which high interest rates go on has made our task more difficult, and yes, additional budget cuts must be made in the years ahead, but we've known that and spoken of it for months, ever since we submitted the program. We referred to those unspecified cuts that we were later to specify, which we're going to do. Let me say that we did not sweat and bleed to get the economic package passed only to abandon it when the going gets a little tough.

We will not practice dilettante economics. We're committed to the economic plan, and we're committed to achieving it by holding to a firm, steady course for the long run. I told the American people we were going to turn this economy around, and we're going to do it.

Some of those Chicken Littles I mentioned got that way because over the past decades they've heard government talk of economy and saving, but at the end of each fiscal year, spending had exceeded revenues, and we went deeper and deeper into debt. Well, this is what we're going to change.

We're rapidly approaching a trillion dollar debt, a debt so large that it can only be compared to the universe because it, too, is incomprehensible in its dimensions. Think of it: The government owes a thousand billion dollars and must pay interest every day on that gargantuan amount. The interest on the debt was $74.8 billion last year alone. That's better than a billion dollars a week.

This enormous debt has been built up year by year by Congresses that consistently promised that they were -- well, they promised more money than they had to give. The Federal budget has been something like a runaway truck coming down a steep mountain road. Obviously, we can't stop it all at once without doing a great deal of damage, but what we have done is get ready to apply the brakes on October 1st, when the new fiscal year begins. There will be more pressure added on January 1st, and in fiscal 1983 we'll shift to a lower gear, and in the following years we intend to bring it completely under control.

Now, as some of you know, I've traveled the mashed potato circuit for years speaking of the need for fiscal responsibility and a balanced budget, and I'm not about to stop this long crusade after only 8 months in Washington. This administration is committed to a balanced budget, and we will fight to the last blow to achieve it by 1984.

Now, in attempting to slow the budget, we estimated that the 1982 deficit would be $42\1/2\ billion. But since that deficit, some things have changed. The interest rates have risen, increasing the cost of borrowing to fund the deficit and the debt that we've inherited. The Congress didn't give us quite all the deductions that we asked for, although we were very happy to get what they did pass after a long struggle. So, that leaves our $42\1/2\ figure bigger than that if nothing is done.

But something will be done. We will not sit on our hands and watch helplessly as the deficit swells and swells. We'll make further reductions in the 1982 budget and millions of dollars of additional spending cuts in the '83 and '84 budgets.

The cutbacks in spending will be shared by all departments of government, including the Department of Defense. But let me assure you, the defense budget will still increase significantly. There is no alternative to a stronger defense. Study after study and expert after expert have testified to our nation's need for a more muscular military.

The Soviet Union is the most massive and menacing -- they had that buildup -- in history. It is spilling over with military hardware. The Soviets have not built a society; they've built an arsenal. And we in the West can no longer turn our head or avert our eyes. For too many years the Pentagon was treated as the Federal Government's poor relation while domestic programs thrived and grew fat. We simply must rectify that imbalance. We will not cut defense spending to the point that it interferes or slows our plan for our national security.

All of us -- the administration, the Congress, and the American people -- are going to be bone-tired from the budget battles over the next few years. But these battles, no matter how exhausting, must be fought and must be won for the sake of our future. We cannot falter in our resolve and see the progress already made turn to dust. We must have the determination and patience.

And let me say to our friends in the financial markets, I hope the people on Wall Street will pay attention to the folks on Main Street. If they do, they'll see there's a rising tide of confidence in the future of America. It took us years of fiscal mismanagement to get where we are today, and our economic recovery program is not designed to provide instant gratification.

I've actually read statements that our plan isn't working. And yesterday on one of the morning television shows, former Vice President Mondale said, ``Well, it was an interesting idea, but it just didn't work.'' Well, of course it didn't work. It doesn't go into effect until October 1st.

As I said before, I can understand the pessimism of those who remember past promises that were never kept. May I just interject here, the debt, the deficit that we will know of on the last day of this month when the fiscal year ends could, with the off-budget items, be as much as $80 billion -- the '81 budget. That was the budget that the previous administration told us was going to be balanced. So, until people out there in the financial market know the annual debits are reduced and eventually eliminated, I guess the interest rates will remain high; so will inflation. And it isn't easy to reduce Federal spending, but we're going to do it. And when the financial markets see the evidence of this, their tune will change.

I remember the fears and the cries of disapproval by those who opposed our decision last January to decontrol oil prices, and they said that inflated energy prices would be the result. But what has been the result? Americans have curbed their driving, their demand for oil. This in turn has helped the nation's balance of trade, which in turn has strengthened the value of the dollar overseas. And these benefits have occurred with very little effect on the consumer. The price of gas in July was the same as it was last February, and in some places it was even lower. And today's paper, the business section said, ``We've reduced again our imports of oil.'' And we can do that because there has been a great increase in exploration and discovery of more oil here in our own land without going abroad.

The economic recovery program will prove as successful as the oil decontrol decision. I firmly believe that our tax incentives will act as a new battery for the American economy, recharging and energizing the nation with economic opportunity. The across-the-board tax cuts will result in across-the-board improvement in our economic health. Without that tax rate reduction, the taxes would have gone up $91\1/2\ billion in 1982 and nearly $300 billion over the next 3 years. The Federal Government was turning the taxpayer into an economic sharecropper, with the rewards earned by the sweat of the taxpayer's brow going to government. It simply had to stop.

We also passed various incentives for saving and investment, like reduced capital gains tax, the all-savers certificates, and various stimuli for business. These measures are going to spark jobs, an estimated 3 million more jobs by 1986, in addition to the 10 million that are already expected by way of natural growth. And productive jobs not only provide take-home pay; they provide self-respect.

I'm really optimistic about the individual retirement accounts. These are savings accounts that will be opened to those also covered by an employer pension plan, where the individual wants to contribute something above that pension plan to his own retirement nest egg. This will be deductible earnings that he can put aside. It will provide people with the feeling of security that, according to the polls, social security is not providing.

Now, I noticed that the theme for this convention is ``We're changing -- changing the future.'' Well, that's exactly what our economic program aims to do as well -- change the future, change it so that our people and industry will have the incentive to be productive again.

Now, you've assisted us already with the initial spending and tax efforts, but I'm going to ask for your help again. I know what the members of this federation can do when you put your minds to it. The National Federation of Republican Women is known for raising the banner of the Republican Party, by raising campaign funds as well as candidates. You're also known for raising your voice to speak out on the issues vital to America.

In the weeks and months ahead, the Congress will need to hear your voice. There are great pressures building to stop our economic program while it's still taxing down the runway. Yet once we clear the fenceposts at the end of the field, this economy is going to soar. We'll have restored a healthy balance between government and free enterprise.

Now, I know I've talked a lot this afternoon about the dry, dusty figures of budgets and deficits, economic matters. It's essential to do so, of course. But I would like to take a moment and talk about somethng else. I'd like to speak of the heart of America.

I don't know whether I can explain or Nancy can explain what we feel living there in that great historic house. In Washington, surrounded and imbued with that history, there are moments when you feel that you're very close to the great heart of America. You can hear the sound of its beat. You're aware of its great depth and steady strength.

Well, there is another letter that just a few days ago reached my desk. It's from a small town in Iowa -- speaking of that heart of America. I just thought I'd like to read it to you and share it with you.

May I, ladies and gentlemen, first of all thank you very much for being here. You know, it's unusual for someone who grew up in politics -- you're not supposed to reach for your checkbook; I want blood this time -- [laughter] -- new blood.

We need to pick your brains very much. All of you here are engaged, in addition to your own work, in volunteer work with organizations of various kinds that are serving the public. And I have a distinct feeling, and have for a long time, that we have drifted, as a people, too far away from the voluntarism that so characterized our country for so many years. And we have, in a sense, abdicated and turned over to government things that used to be functions of the community and the neighborhood. And now with what we're doing here in our economic plan, there is a great need to return to that.

From the old raising-of-the-barn when someone's barn went up in flames, in the farm days, to every kind of activity in recent days, more modern times, I remember -- now that government has gotten so greatly involved, and with the best of intentions -- I don't fault their intentions -- but we know, and you know better than anyone else with what you're doing, that if you take the various ways of helping people, the one with the least overhead is the private effort; next is the community or local effort if it is a public effort, but the highest of all is the Federal Government.

In addition to that, trying to form rules and regulations that will fit all of the various problems around the country ignores the diversity of this land of ours. I can tell you of an example when I was Governor. In our neighboring State of Oregon, up in Portland, Oregon, people like yourselves in the business community, dealing with the very real problem of high school dropouts, had formed an organization that was tremendously successful in preventing and reducing this rate of dropout. And then the Federal Government adopted a program, and one of the first places they dropped in on was Portland, Oregon. And the first task was to drive that private organization out of business and take over, and they weren't nearly as successful as the private group had been.

There's one of you here at this table, Mr. Monson [Elder Thomas S. Monson, Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-Day Saints.] -- I don't know how many of you are familiar with what, in his church, has occurred, with the literally providing of a welfare program that I believe is far superior to anything the government has been able to manage -- taking care of their people, but based also on the work ethic. Because one of the other things that government has done with its good intentions is violate that old rule that you can give a hungry man a fish and he'll be hungry tomorrow, or you can teach him to fish and he'll never be hungry again.

In California there is an aircraft plant that all on its own, in a nearby high school, heard about the dropout problem, instituted a program of its own, where young people who have to be imminent dropouts in their school are given afterschool work at this plant and training, on-the-job training, because they found that one of the great causes of dropouts is lack of money, need for money.

It's a two-way street for the company by this time, because not only do they prevent the dropouts -- because the requirement is they can only have those jobs as long as they stay in high school; they can't drop out -- then, diploma in hand, they have a pretty well-trained cadre of young people coming along who get permanent jobs after graduation in their company. I didn't mean to deal so much on dropouts. There are any other number of things.

I've talked to some clergymen who are beginning to recognize that the churches have stood back and let government do, in the realm of neighbor-helping-neighbor, what really should be the individual function of their members. Some are investigating the idea of child care centers. How easy it would be. Working mothers within a church and other mothers and women who would like to volunteer and do some good work, the church has the facilities to bring them together and say: Let's establish that with volunteer care here in our own church.

The possibilities are limitless for what we can take over that government has once been doing. Why you're here is, as I say, for us to find out from you who are already engaged in that, how we can work out a plan. We intend to go forward. Jim Rosebush is going to remain here with you after I have to leave. He's going to be the executive secretary of the commission that we will form, the committee, for the very purpose of finding out plans and ways that voluntarism in the community can take over and do many of the things that are not being very well done by the government today.

I have one last example of what can happen when it begins officially, other than doing it the community way -- again, while I was Governor, and again, I'm sorry that the example has to do with dropouts. There was a Federal program where they paid students who would be given jobs in the school doing work that needed to be done, washing the blackboards and all that sort of thing, after school was over. And then they came in and found that some of the students weren't juvenile delinquents, and therefore they were fired. They couldn't have those jobs. Now, if anyone can think of a better temptation for a kid to go out and break a window simply to get back on the job and get paid, I don't know what it would be. No reward for those who were doing what they should do; plenty of reward for those who weren't.

Well, that's enough of that. Now I'm going to sit back for the time that's left, and I'd like to hear from you on the ideas and the thoughts that you might have. And when the schedule says that I have to go, Jim will remain here as long as you can give of your time to this. But we are going to make it a major project. I intend to be speaking, making a major address on this, very shortly, to the business community to find out how we can step in and resolve some of these problems.

I am pleased to transmit the information required by the Refugee Act of 1980 in preparation for the consultations on refugee admissions for Fiscal Year 1982. As noted in my July 30 statement, immigration and refugee policy is an important part of our past and fundamental to our national interest. With other countries, we will continue to share in the responsibility of welcoming and resettling those who flee oppression. At the same time, we will seek new ways to integrate refugees into our society without nurturing their dependence on welfare.

The documents transmitted today include proposed admission levels and allocations among groups of special humanitarian concern to the United States or whose admission is otherwise in the national interest. My final determination on admission levels and allocations will be made after taking Congressional and other views expressed at the consultations into consideration.

Judge O'Connor is, as I have come to know personally, a very warm and brilliant woman who has had an outstanding career in Arizona. I know the Court and the nation will benefit both from her lifetime of work, service, and experience in the legal profession, and from her solid grasp of our Constitution, which she reveres. This truly is a happy and historic day for America.

Judge O'Connor's judicial philosophy is one of restraint. She believes, as she said in her Senate testimony, that a judge is on the bench to interpret the law, not to make it. This philosophy of judicial restraint needs representation in our courtrooms and especially on the highest court in our land.

Let me also say that Judge O'Connor's confirmation symbolizes the richness of opportunity that still abides in America -- opportunity that permits persons of any sex, age, or race, from every section and every walk of life to aspire and achieve in a manner never before even dreamed about in human history.

Protecting the integrity of our electoral system and the voting franchise, I think, is of concern to all Americans. What is happening in California, if not corrected, could damage fairness at the polls for a generation of Californians, attacking the heart of our system of representative government. While all States struggle with reapportionment, the situation in California seems to have gotten out of hand. For this reason, I'm signing petitions today that will place the issue of reapportionment before the voters of California. I do so sadly, because I feel that had members of the California Legislature met their responsibility, this petition drive would be unnecessary.

The reapportionment plan as it now stands effectively disenfranchises large numbers of California voters. It is not just unfair to Republicans, it's unfair to the people. Given the opportunity, we're certain the voters will reject this power play and opt for fairness. And that's exactly what this drive is -- an appeal for fairness. This signature drive wouldn't be necessary if the majority of the California Legislature had done their duty to enact a reasonable reapportionment plan.

I can't help but wonder if the time hasn't come to take reapportionment out of politics and have it done by a blue ribbon citizen committee on the basis of what is good for the people, not just the party that happens to be in power.

Note: The President spoke at 11:21 a.m. in the Rose Garden at the White House. The petition signing ceremony was attended by national and California State Republican leaders, and members of the California congressional delegation.

The technical arrangements for the establishment of the security account were concluded on August 17 by the Central Bank of Algeria, Bank Markazi Iran, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, and the N.V. Settlement Bank of the Netherlands, a subsidiary of the Netherlands Central Bank. In connection with the arrangements, the U.S. agreed to provide special liquidity support of up to $500 million to the Netherlands Central Bank if lawsuits or other proceedings involving the security account impair the bank's ability to defend the guilder.

On August 18, the funds were transferred by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York to the Settlement Bank. Because of the delay in concluding arrangements for the security account, this transfer was delayed one month from the original transfer date of July 19 contemplated under the agreements.

As now constituted, the Claims Tribunal consists of three Iranian, three U.S., and three neutral arbitrators (two from Sweden and one from France). The Tribunal has held preliminary organizational meetings and is expected to receive claims during the three-month period beginning October 20.

Thank you very much. It's a pleasure for Nancy and myself to be here, to stop by and be able to see these beautiful paintings. This gallery is a tribute to something that I look forward to seeing improve in our country, and that is private initiative.

Duncan Phillips built this collection, and when he died, he left it for our enjoyment -- over 2,500 paintings, 200 of which are on display here at any one time while the others are circulated to museums and galleries throughout the United States. And thanks to Mr. Phillips' kindness, people from all over the world, since the museum opened in 1921, have come here to see this collection of American moderns and French impressionists.

It's often overlooked that Americans like Duncan Phillips who made money in steel, in that industry, have a keen interest in the arts. This particular museum was left an endowment to take care of its needs. However, inflation and other economic problems have taken a toll, and that's why we're all here tonight.

You are individually doing your part, making your contribution to art, and that's the kind of effort that's in keeping with the spirit that we're trying to recapture in these days. I met with a group of our citizens the other day, one of whom is involved in addition to his own particular career, in heading up some very worthwhile, nonprofit endeavor in the country. And I hope that we can stimulate that and see a great increase in that sort of thing. Personal involvement -- it makes this a better place to live.

I'm particularly proud of the role that Carolyn Deaver is playing to keep this gallery going. It's an admirable project, and I wish her and all of you the best, and just, I think on behalf of everyone in this country who wants to see things like this go on, to say a ``thank you'' to all of you.

Much attention has been focused on our budget proposals as of late. I don't know why; it's just something that happens every year. [Laughter] But this event and similar efforts to directly involve the private sector in solving problems are the flip side of reducing the growth of government.

We advocate more than budget cuts. We advocate personal commitment and a tapping of a vast under-used resource -- human compassion. For too long the American people have been told that they are relieved of responsibility for helping their fellow man because government's taken over the job. Now, we don't believe in totally eliminating government's role in humanitarian efforts, but we are trying to recapture that spirit of generosity that suffocates under heavy taxation and bureaucratic redtape.

Over our history, Americans have always been willing to lend a hand. In the aftermath of earthquakes, floods, plagues, typhoons and other natural disasters, Americans were there to help. Helping one another is a part of our heritage: The government was so far away, our earlier settlers depended on each other. And often people forget that the religious convictions of our forefathers went a little beyond puritanism. The Bible talks of faith, hope, and charity, and the greatest of these is charity.

Americans took this admonition seriously, just as they did the parable of the Good Samaritan. If you remember, the Samaritan walking along on the other side of the road from the beaten pilgrim didn't take a look and then hurry on to the nearest town where he could find a local official and tell him there was someone out there that needed help. He crossed the road and went to the aid of the fallen traveler. The real meaning of the parable has always been not so much the benefit that was done to the beaten man, but the good that accrued to the Samaritan.

Well, tonight we're gathered together to help those afflicted by multiple sclerosis -- another of those brutal diseases that has yet to be conquered. Support by private companies and corporations for fighting this disease is in the finest tradition of which I just spoke. The Multiple Sclerosis Society has been collecting voluntary contributions to support research and patient services since 1945. Eighty clinics and 134 multiple sclerosis chapters throughout the United States are helping those who have contracted the disease as well as their families.

But this degrades the meaning of charity and is counterproductive to efforts to help those in need. And today, as I've said, we seek to re-ignite that spirit of direct involvement, to recapture the energy that comes when people are helping because that's what they want to do, and to encourage people to care about each other.

Thanks to the diplomatic community for what you've done tonight to help fight this dreaded disease. And a very great ``thank you'' to those who organized this event for letting Nancy and me, at least for a few minutes, come here and play a part.

We've just been to one place where they hadn't had dinner yet; we've now interrupted you in the middle of dinner; and now we'll move on. [Laughter] It's quite a switch for a fellow that's been on the mashed-potato circuit as an afterdinner speaker for so many years.

But even though the ``R'' stands for retired, that's not quite the way to describe you. Someone said that the only true retirement is of the heart, and you certainly haven't retired in that regard. You've given not only your heart to volunteer activities but your minds and hands as well.

But wherever there's a need, you have the expertise to fill it. Now I, myself, have some volunteer work for you. When you return to your hometowns, would you tell your fellow volunteers that we intend to keep our promise to restore social security's fiscal integrity? In addition to that, the system can only be as strong as the economy, and we're attempting to make the economy strong so that social security will also be strong.

Thomas Carlisle said that the work of an unknown good man -- or woman, I might add -- is like a vein of water flowing hidden underground, secretly making the ground green. Well, you are making so many things green and growing with your volunteer work. And I imagine your work has probably made your lives a little greener, too.

Someone else once said that life begins when you begin to serve, and I've found there's some truth in that, also. [Laughter] But let me also just add this one thing: that with all the hard things that we have to do to restore this economy, the cuts of many things that we wish didn't have to be cut, we at the same time are just embarking on a program where, from the White House, we are going to take action and form a task force throughout the country to mobilize volunteers and the force of the public sector -- or the private sector, I should say -- to contribute, to take up the slack in many of the things that government perhaps shouldn't have been doing in the first place, that should have been left to that kind of work. And we're going to see if we can't mobilize that kind of a voluntarism back in our society again.

This period has been marked by substantive presentations in the negotiations by both sides. The Turkish Cypriot negotiator submitted proposals on August 5 and the Greek Cypriot representative on September 9. These proposals are comprehensive in scope addressing the basic constitutional and territorial questions that lie at the core of the disagreements dividing Cyprus.

We have welcomed developments of this nature as indicative of a continuing commitment by both communities to resolve their differences by peaceful negotiation and a spirit of compromise. We hope that during the period ahead the discussion under the aegis of United Nations Secretary General Waldheim will lead to a just, fair and lasting resolution of the Cyprus problem. The intercommunal negotiations have now passed the one-year mark, and it is time for the parties to reinvigorate their efforts to bring the hopes stimulated by their inception to fruition.

For more than 20 years, the Cuban people have been controlled and manipulated by a totalitarian Marxist-Leninist dictatorship dedicated to promoting armed violence and undermining the interests of the Free World. The standard of living of the Cuban people has deteriorated since 1975 as the Cuban leadership has broadened and intensified these efforts, sending tens of thousands of troops to Africa, bringing violent revolutionaries and terrorists from dozens of countries to Cuba for training, and stepping up its subversion in Latin America.

Cuba's extensive international troublemaking is made possible by, and is all the more dangerous because of, its alliance with and dependence on the Soviet Union, which provides Cuba with massive economic and military support in exchange for Cuban promotion of Soviet interests. Cuba's Communist leaders have kept the Cuban people ignorant of this campaign of international violence by systematic manipulation of information. The regime in Cuba, like all totalitarian regimes, has in large measure governed the Cuban people through its control of the media. The Cuban revolution, in fact, has often been described as a revolution through the media.

One of the boasts of the Cuban Government is that the Cuban media never lie. The Cuban media, however, have lied throughout the two decades of the revolution, they lie today, and will continue to lie to the Cuban people. The truth about the costs borne by the Cuban people as a result of their government's grandiose international involvement and repression of basic human rights has been shrouded in lies and half-truths. The truth about underdevelopment and mismanagement despite massive Soviet subsidies and direction of the economy is not known in Cuba.

Cubans, like all peoples, yearn for the truth. Even Cuba's leaders rely on the Western press and wire services, the Voice of America, and BBC for factual, unbiased information about the world they live in. But these sources, because they cover events around the world, cannot satisfy the Cuban people's thirst for reliable information about their own country.

This administration has decided to break the Cuban Government's control of information in Cuba. It will do this by supporting establishment of Radio Broadcasting to Cuba. In Spanish, it will be called Radio Marti, after Jose Marti, the father of Cuban independence. This radio service will tell the truth to the Cuban people about their government's domestic mismanagement and its promotion of subversion and international terrorism in this hemisphere and elsewhere. It will tell the Cuban people that these activities cost in terms of living standards for them and their children and will correct the false image they have been given of Cuba's international reputation.

They're darned good at that for Easterners. [Laughter] Well, I think everyone out here has told you how grateful we are. We have been superbly entertained. We've been superbly entertained, but I think everyone would agree, also, we've also tonight been inspired. Thank you.

I want you to know the truth: We're all guests. Not only the Statler Brothers but that wonderful dinner. Our friends, the Santa Ynez Barbecuers from Santa Ynez, California -- [applause] -- I don't know whether the custom exists anyplace else, but out in California in a number of communities, there are people like themselves for whom this is a hobby. But I don't think they've gone quite so far as this group has gone, because they came here as volunteers, and they brought the meat, and they brought the stuff to burn to cook it, and everything else, and we're all -- -- [applause].

Well, to all of you, Nancy and I are delighted that you have been here. We've enjoyed this, and I know from the way you've reacted that you have also. [Applause] And I think that for that lady they sang about, that if we just remember that every once in a while we cross a lot of State lines and we cross a lot of party lines, but if we just remember that if every once in a while we get together and break bread and realize how much we have in common, we'll discover that everything will be all right as long as we talk to each other instead of about each other.

Well, Nancy and I are honored to welcome you all to the White House today -- you who have met the exacting standards of integrity, fairness and intellect required for Federal judgeship. You provide reassurance for all of us that our ideals of liberty and justice are alive and well in the United States of America.

Wisdom is the quality we look for most in our judges. In an age of mounting judicial workloads and increasing technicality, we demand of our judges a wisdom that knows no time, has no prejudice, and wants no other reward. The challenge seems impossible, and yet you've dedicated your lives to it.

We've entrusted you with our ideals and our freedom, and our future depends on the way you define it today. It's a sacred trust whose burden can only be carried by the highest quality of men and women. Your determined commitment to the preservation of our rights is a commitment that often requires the lonely courage of a patriot. On behalf of all Americans, I want to express our often-neglected thanks. I assure you, your commitment is returned. I pledge to do everything in my power to enhance the prestige and quality of the Federal Bench.

In a society founded on law, we must take all reasonable steps to ensure that the best among us accept the call to serve and are able to serve for life. Our heritage of individual liberty is dependent on the rule of law. As the inscription over the door of the Department of Justice says, just a few blocks from here, it reminds us, ``Law alone can give us freedom.'' You who interpret it, who administer it, are the guardians of freedom for generations yet unborn. It's a privilege to welcome you here today.

The President has authorized the resumption of negotiations with the Governments of Palau, the Marshall Islands, and the Federated States of Micronesia, which are intended to result in the termination of the last United Nations Trusteeship -- one under which the United States has administered the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands since 1947.

The President's decision marked the completion of a 6-month-long policy review conducted by an interdepartmental group under the chairmanship of James L. Buckley, Under Secretary of State for Security Assistance, Science and Technology. Mr. Buckley will head the United States delegation at a meeting in Hawaii proposed to begin October 3, which will mark the resumption of negotiations with the three Micronesian Governments.

The policy review concluded that the United States should move promptly to terminate the United Nations Trusteeship on terms satisfactory to itself and to the Government and peoples of Micronesia. It also endorsed a new political status in which the three Micronesian Governments would enter into relationships of free association with the United States. The three Micronesian Governments had earlier indicated their preference for that status by initialing with the United States, in late 1980, a Compact of Free Association. The political status of free association is distinguishable both from independence and from an extension of United States sovereignty; under it, plenary defense rights and responsibilities would remain vested in the United States, and the Micronesian Governments would enjoy full internal self-government and substantial authority in foreign affairs.

The Micronesian political status negotiations began under the Nixon administration and continued through each of the two subsequent administrations. They have been in a state of informal suspension, however, pending the completion of the Reagan administration's policy review.

In deciding to go forward on the basis of the Compact of Free Association and five agreements subsidiary to it which were also initialed late last year, the administration stipulated that 11 remaining subsidiary agreements would have to be completed to the mutual satisfaction of the negotiating parties before any of the documents could be considered complete.

Secretary Buckley's delegation to the proposed Hawaii meeting will present and explain these and other administration decisions to the chief executives and political status negotiators of the Micronesian Governments. Administration representatives will also seek to establish a schedule for completing work on the remaining subsidiary agreements, a process which is expected to require several months.

The delegation also plans to discuss with Micronesian officials the procedures by which the negotiated documents will ultimately be approved. The process envisions a plebiscite by the voters of Micronesia under U.N. observation, action by their governments in accordance with constitutional processes, and approval by both Houses of the United States Congress and enactment of the Compact into public law.

The Northern Mariana Islands, a fourth component of the Trust Territory, voted in 1975 after similar negotiations to become a commonwealth in political union with the United States. The Northern Marianas are now self-governing, but U.S. sovereignty will extend to those islands -- and the islanders will become U.S. citizens -- only when the Trusteeship Agreement is terminated.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, we've been very pleased today to have with us a man who has two most important posts -- President Moi, of Kenya, but also Chairman of the Organization of African Unity. The President has ably served in the demanding position as Chairman, and his work has helped bring about solutions to some grievous problems. Let me express my appreciation, Mr. President, for your wise thoughts and candid insights during our discussions, and let me assure you of this administration's interest in and the deep concern for Africa.

I hope our meeting today will be taken as a sign of that interest and concern. We seek the closest of ties with the nations of Africa, and with our allies, are determined to press on in our efforts to find an internationally accepted settlement for Namibia. We've contributed to the African Refugees Conference in Geneva, to the Zimbabwe Donor's Conference, and despite our own domestic belt-tightening, I've asked Congress for significant assistance levels for Africa. We look forward to cooperating with you on many additional initiatives.

And I also want to take this final opportunity to publicly thank your government and nation for its continuing cooperation with the United States. The United States and Kenya have an impressive list of cooperation -- or history, I should say -- of cooperation and good relations. Under President Moi's leadership this has continued and been strengthened. We share common interests and values, a belief in the democratic form of government, a belief in the free market processes. And Mr. President, your continuing commitment to these values merits emulation and holds the promise to the Kenyan people of continued freedom and increasing prosperity.

In our discussions today, we touched on several areas of common concern and interest. I believe these talks have laid a foundation for expanding cooperation in which the United States can continue its contribution to peace and economic well-being not only in Kenya but elsewhere in Africa. I understand that following talks with Vice President Bush, Secretary Haig, Secretary Weinberger, and others, that you will be quickly moving on to the Commonwealth Conference, so let me wish you, as you leave for Australia, Godspeed and out best wishes.

President Moi. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, we have had very useful discussions with the President of the United States, President Reagan, on a number of issues ranging from bilateral to the continent of Africa. We have discussed those matters which are of great concern not only for the two nations but also of international concern. We have discussed those matters that are of urgent concern, that is, the southern part of Africa and elsewhere, including economics and matters touching developing countries in Africa, the continent I represent as Chairman of the Organization of African Unity.

We have reached a greater understanding on these matters, and the United States of America being a great nation, cherishing those ideals of human dignity and human rights and other related matters, I feel that a solution now may be found in that part of Africa. I wish him and the other five nations a success in their discussions.

I thank him for receiving us in this great country, and I hope that the cooperation between not only us, Kenya and the United States, will prosper for the welfare and prosperity of the peoples of the two nations, and also that of Africa and the world at large.

Note: President Reagan spoke at 1 p.m. at the North Portico of the White House. Earlier in the day, the two Presidents held a meeting with their advisers in the Oval Office. The meeting was followed by a luncheon in the Family Dining Room.

During the 1970's many businesses, especially smaller ones, experienced severe increases in their product liability insurance premiums. Others had difficulty obtaining needed coverage. The Interagency Task Force on Product Liability, chaired by the Department of Commerce, and its successor, the Task Force on Product Liability and Accident Compensation thoroughly studied the problems. The Product Liability Risk Retention Act is an outgrowth of the Federal Government's efforts to address the concerns identified by the Federal task forces and numerous citizen groups.

This act is a marketplace solution designed to provide product manufacturers, distributors, and sellers with affordable product liability insurance. In keeping with this administration's policies, this goal is accomplished without imposing any new Federal regulations or expenditures. The act, respecting the rights of States to regulate the insurance industry within their borders, utilizes existing mechanisms of State insurance departments, streamlined to address the specific needs for regulating this type of insurance. In particular, the act removes selected State regulatory barriers so that product sellers can form self-insurance cooperatives or purchase product liability insurance from commercial insurers on a group rate basis.

By making product liability insurance more easily available and affordable, the best interests of the consumer are also served. Not only will participating companies have lower insurance costs, and hence lower operating costs, but consumers will also benefit by the added protection provided to them through more widespread utilization of product liability insurance.

This has been a bipartisan effort. Members of both the House and Senate deserve a great deal of credit for forging a solution which is so widely supported by the small business, insurance, and legal communities.

The President. I don't know, but it started down yesterday. It rose six points yesterday morning, then before the end of the day, it started down, and I guess it is continuing on down. I don't know what the reason is, but I'm sure not going to take the blame.

The President. Because I'm going to go by the phone calls and the telegrams and so forth that have been coming in since last night's speech, and they are running three and four to one and better in our favor on the speech, in support of what we advocated.

The President. We're going to do everything we can. And what we're aiming at mostly is what we have found by experience is true, and that is that there are programs that are being abused by people, who through technicalities and loopholes in the structure of the program are getting benefits they are not entitled to. In the school lunch program, we're simply trying to direct toward those who are in need, and not provide it to families with more affluence that don't really need it. And this is true of all of the other programs.

The President. I am going to depend on Secretary Weinberger, because my own experience with him as my finance director in California -- I know that if there is any place he can find, he would propose it, if it would be one that would not hurt the program of building that we are going forward with. And I want to point out to you that long before this, he found several billion dollars that reduced the amount of increase that we would have to have, that he translated from fat to muscle. So, he was busy at getting at that angle in the Defense Department long before we came to this point of additional cuts.

The President. I don't know whether it is possible. I don't really think that we have been to bat yet on this. I'm surprised at the attitude of a number of the Senators about this program, because I think if they reverse this decision to sell, they are literally doing away with our ability to continue to try to bring peace to the Middle East. This is what we're trying to do, and I believe that Saudi Arabia is essential to that process.

The President. We have Americans now that are maintaining it. We're talking about planes that won't be delivered for 4\1/2\ years. In that 4\1/2\ years, having kept faith with them, I believe that they can be persuaded as they were in the Lebanon crisis. There would have been no ceasefire had they not heeded our plea and injected themselves into a temporary cessation.

The President. We are going to find out if there is anything that can persuade these people up there without in any way presuming upon the good will of the Saudi Arabians, anything that can persuade some of these people to see common sense in this.

It's a privilege to stand here today with those who command the front lines in America's battle for public order. You have a tough job and a dangerous one. Believe me, I know. I mean no irreverence when I mention that I once played a sheriff on TV who thought he could do the job without a gun. [Laughter] I was dead in the first 27 minutes of the show. [Laughter] And I should have included in my greeting here, and I know, the sheriffs, also, who are present.

You and I have a few things in common. Harry Truman once said about the job that I have that being President is like riding a tiger: A man has to keep on riding or he'll be swallowed. [Laughter] Well, that's a pretty good description of what you do for a living. Society asks you simultaneously to protect the innocent, ensure the legitimate rights of property; that you must converse with the multitude, and oversee them, of social services that police captains provide and sheriffs provide for the public, and all the while balance the interests of your department with those of your community, the government, and its citizens. And none of this is easy. The pressures are enormous. You must be administrator, financier, social worker, public relations expert, even politician, and still, somehow, always be a cop.

In preparing these remarks, I had an opportunity to go back and look over some of the comments I've made to law enforcement officials on other occasions. The topic of those discussions was a subject with which you have more than a passing familiarity -- the steady, ominous growth of crime in our Nation.

In one speech some years ago in Las Vegas, I once wondered about what was happening to America, and I noted the fear and the anger of the citizenry as they locked themselves in their homes or refused to walk the streets at night. I spoke, too, about a phenomenon known as the ``youthful offender,'' the astonishing percentage of crimes that they were estimated to be responsible for.

Then there was a speech in Dallas where I mentioned the effect of narcotics on the crime rate and the appalling estimates that drug addicts were responsible for the economic increase of certain crimes.

I don't mention these speeches now because they show any gift of insight on my part; the truth is, what I said then was well known at the time, certainly by you. The speech in Dallas was delivered in 1974; the speech in Las Vegas in 1967. The frightening reality -- for all of the speeches by those of us in government, for all of the surveys, studies, and blue ribbon panels, for all of the 14-point programs and the declarations of war on crime, crime has advanced and advanced steadily in its upward climb, and our citizens have grown more and more frustrated, frightened, and angry.

You're familiar enough with the statistics. The cases that make them up cross your desk every day. In the past decade violent crime reported to police has increased by fifty-nine percent. Fifty-three percent of our citizens say they're afraid to walk the streets alone at night. Eighty-five percent say they're more concerned today than they were 5 years ago about crime.

Just during the time that you and I are together today, at least 1 person will be murdered, 9 women will be raped, 67 other Americans will be robbed, 97 will be seriously assaulted, and 389 homes will be burglarized. This will all happen in the span of the next 30 minutes, or while I'm talking. Now, if by stopping talking I could change those figures, I'd stop. But you know that they will continue at the same rate throughout every 30 minutes of the 24 hours of the day. And I don't have to tell you, the men and women of your departments will be the first to cope with the mayhem, the wreckage, the suffering caused by those who consider themselves above the law with the right to prey on their fellow citizens.

Crime has continued on the upswing. It has gone on regardless of the efforts that we make. Crime has increased in that thing that I mentioned, of the youthful offender, between 18 and 21. And that other problem I mentioned years ago, the incredible impact of drug addiction on the crime rate, continues. Studies of prison inmates have found that at least half admitted to using drugs in the month prior to their arrest. And it's still estimated that 50 to 60 percent of property crimes are drug-related.

From these statistics about youthful offenders and the impact of drug addiction on crime rates, a portrait emerges. The portrait is that of a stark, staring face, a face that belongs to a frightening reality of our time -- the face of a human predator, the face of the habitual criminal. Nothing in nature is more cruel and more dangerous.

Study after study has shown that a small number of criminals are responsible for an enormous amount of the crime in American society. One study of 250 criminals indicated that over an 11-year period, they were responsible for nearly half a million crimes. Another study showed that 49 criminals claimed credit for a total of 10,500 crimes. Take one very limited part of the crime picture, subway crime in New York City: The transit police estimate that 500 habitual offenders are actually responsible for 40 percent of those offenses.

Now, I fully realize that the primary task for apprehending and prosecuting these career criminals, indeed, for dealing with the crime problem itself, belongs to those of you on the State and local level. But there are areas where the Federal Government can take strong and effective action, and today I want to outline for you some of the steps that we're going to take to assist you in the fight against crime.

First, this administration intends to speak out on the problem of crime. We will use this, what Teddy Roosevelt called a ``bully pulpit'' of the Presidency, to remind the public of the seriousness of this problem and the need to support your efforts to combat it. I believe that this focusing of public attention on crime, its causes, and those trying to fight it, is one of the most important things that we can do.

Second, in talking out about crime, we intend to speak for a group that has been frequently overlooked in the past -- the innocent victims of crime. To this end I will soon be appointing a Task Force on the Victims of Crime to evaluate the numerous proposals now springing up regarding victims and witnesses. We will support legislation that will permit judges to order offenders to make restitution to their victims. The victims of crime have needed a voice for a long, long time, and this administration means to provide it.

Now, let me also emphasize that our efforts will not be confined to law enforcement. The problem of drug abuse is one that reaches deeply into American society. We need to mobilize our religious, educational, and fraternal groups in a national educational program against drug abuse.

One of the most effective groups in this effort has been more than 1,000 parent groups. And these groups have worked closely with the law and law enforcement agencies. They have recently formed a national federation to spread their work. This administration will do all in its power to encourage such efforts.

Let us recognize that important as intercepting the drug traffic might be, it cannot possibly equal the results in turning off the customers, the users, and making them take a different course in deciding to no longer be customers.

Sixth, violent crime is a major priority. But we fully understand that crime doesn't come in categories; all crime is related, and an effective battle against street crime can hardly be waged in a vacuum. The street criminal, the drug pusher, the mobster, the corrupt policeman or public official -- they form their own criminal subculture; they share the climate of lawlessness. They need each other; they use each other; they protect each other.

We will continue to focus Federal efforts on sophisticated forms of crime, similar to those emphasized by the FBI under Judge Bill Webster. And that's why I want to say a word today to those Federal agents and prosecutors who have done so much in recent years to expose the problem of organized crime and public corruption. The existence of syndicates of highly organized criminals and public officials who peddle their sacred trust are blots on American history. I can assure you, no administration has ever been more anxious to work toward wiping away these blots. So, to those in the field who fight this frustrating, sometimes disheartening battle against highly sophisticated forms of crime: This administration stands behind you.

In discussing these forms of sophisticated crimes, we see again the emergence of the problem of career criminals -- those who make a conscious decision to pursue illicit professions, a decision based on a belief that crime does pay. I believe the emergence of this problem of career criminals has seriously undermined the notion that criminals are simply products of poverty or underprivileged backgounds.

At the very same time that crime rates have steadily risen, our nation has made unparalleled progress in raising the standard of living and improving the quality of life. It's obvious that prosperity doesn't decrease crime, just as it's obvious that deprivation and want don't necessarily increase crime. The truth is that today's criminals for the most part are not desperate people seeking bread for their families; crime is the way they've chosen to live.

A few weeks ago, Esquire magazine published an article that gained widespread attention. Possibly some of you saw it. It was written by a young novelist who, with his psychiatrist wife, had moved into a section of Venice, California, that had become crime-ridden. In explaining why his wife and he -- two educated, urbane people -- ultimately decided to arm themselves, he described in chilling terms the burglaries, rapes, holdups, gang fights, and murders that have become commonplace in their neighborhood.

Well, let's face it: There is an arrogance to the criminal mind, a belief in its own superiority over the rest of humanity. The slang of organized crime is instructive here. It isn't surprising that some of these criminals habitually refer to themselves as ``wise guys,'' and the honest people are ``working stiffs.'' They do really believe that they're better than the rest of us, that the world owes them a living, and that those of us who lead normal lives and earn an honest living are a little slow on the uptake.

How accurate those words by that young novelist about career criminals: ``They do it because they believe no one will stop them, and they're right.'' The truth is that criminals in America today get away with plenty, and sometimes, quite literally, they get away with murder. Only 40 percent of the murders ever end with a suspect being imprisoned. In New York City, less than 1 percent -- no, I'm sorry, one-sixth -- of reported felonies even end in arrests. And 1 percent of these felonies end in a prison term for an offender.

I would suggest the time has come to look reality in the face. American society is mired in excessive litigation. Our courts today are loaded with suits and motions of every conceivable type. Yet, as our system of justice has become weighed down with lawsuits of every nature and description, as the courts have become the arbiters of all kinds of disputes they were never intended to handle, our legal system has failed to carry out its most important function -- the protection of the innocent and the punishment of the guilty.

It's time for honest talk, for plain talk. There has been a breakdown in the criminal justice system in America. It just plain isn't working. All too often, repeat offenders, habitual law-breakers, career criminals, call them what you will, are robbing, raping, and beating with impunity and, as I said, quite literally getting away with murder. The people are sickened and outraged. They demand that we put a stop to it.

What is especially disturbing about our failure to deal with crime is the erosion it has caused in public confidence in our judicial system. In one recent poll, 70 percent of the people said they had little or no confidence in the ability of our courts to sentence and convict criminals.

The legal profession, one of the most highly regarded in this country, is now in deep trouble with the public. One ABC-Harris poll found that law firms finished last, after the Congress, the press, and the labor unions, in a list of 13 institutions which the public was asked to rate. Similarly, lawyers received favorable mentions from only 13 percent of those interviewed, half the percentage that did so in a 1973 survey.

This decline in public confidence in our courts and in the legal profession remains a threat to one of our most important traditions, traditions as Americans: the heritage of our independent judiciary, free from public or political influence, and a legal profession with a reputation for high, unassailable ethics.

Commissioner McGuire has put his finger on the problem. Controlling crime in American society is not simply a question of more money, more police, more courts, more prosecutors; it's ultimately a moral dilemma, one that calls for a moral or, if you will, a spiritual solution. In dealing with crime, new programs may help; more law-and-order rhetoric may be justified; the studies and surveys may still be needed; the blue ribbon panels may keep investigating. But in the end, the war on crime will only be won when an attitude of mind and a change of heart takes place in America, when certain truths take hold again and plant their roots deep in our national consciousness, truths like: Right and wrong matters; Individuals are responsible for their actions; Retribution should be swift and sure for those who prey on the innocent.

We must understand that basic moral principles lie at the heart of our criminal justice system, that our system of law acts as the collective moral voice of society. There's nothing wrong with these values, nor should we be hesitant or feel guilty about furnishing [punishing] those who violate the elementary rules of civilized existence. Theft is not a form of political or cultural expression; it is theft, and it is wrong. Murder is not forbidden as a matter of subjective opinion; it is objectively evil, and we must prohibit it. And no one but the thief and murderer benefits when we think and act otherwise.

Again, let me point to something that I hadn't included in my remarks but I am reminded of -- the whole problem of capital punishment. Well, I had an answer to that on my desk for several years while I was Governor. It was a list of the names of 12 criminals, 12 murderers, who had all been sentenced to prison, who had all served their terms or been paroled, and released. And at the time the list was on my desk, their total number of victims then was 34, not 12. I think capital punishment in the beginning might have reduced that figure considerably.

A tendency to downplay the permanent moral values has helped make crime the enormous problem that it is today, one that this administration has, as I've told you, made one of its top domestic priorities. But it has occurred to me that the root causes of our other major domestic problem, the growth of government and the decay of the economy, can be traced to many of the same sources of the crime problem. This is because the same utopian presumptions about human nature that hinder the swift administration of justice have also helped fuel the expansion of government.

Many of the social thinkers of the 1950's and '60's who discussed crime only in the context of disadvantaged childhoods and poverty-stricken neighborhoods were the same people who thought that massive government spending could wipe away our social ills. The underlying premise in both cases was a belief that there was nothing permanent or absolute about any man's nature, that he was a product of his material environment, and that by changing that environment -- with government as the chief vehicle of change through educational, health, housing, and other programs -- we could permanently change man and usher in a great new era.

Well, we've learned the price of too much government: runaway inflation, soaring unemployment, impossible interest rates. We've learned that Federal subsidies and government bureaucrats not only fail to solve social problems but frequently make them worse.

It's time, too, that we acknowledge the solution to the crime problem will not be found in the social worker's files, the psychiatrist's notes, or the bureaucrat's budgets. It's a problem of the human heart, and it's there we must look for the answer. We can begin by acknowledging some of those permanent things, those absolute truths I mentioned before. Two of those truths are that men are basically good but prone to evil, and society has a right to be protected from them.

The massive expansion of government is related to the crime problem in another, less obvious way. Government interference in our lives tends to discourage creativity and enterprise, to weaken the private economic sector, and preempt those mitigating institutions like family, neighborhood, church, and school -- organizations that act as both a buffer and a bridge between the individual and the naked power of the state.

Well, as for the weakening of family values, Michael Novak, theologian and social critic, recently said that: ``The family nourishes `basic trust.' And from this springs creativity, psychic energy, social dynamism. Familial strength that took generations to acquire can be lost in a single generation, can disappear for centuries. If the quality of family life deteriorates,'' he said, ``there is no `quality of life.' "

What these commentators are saying is that for all our science and sophistication, for all of our justified pride in intellectual accomplishment, we must never forget the jungle is always there waiting to take us over. Only our deep moral values and our strong social institutions can hold back that jungle and restrain the darker impulses of human nature.

In order to return to this sense of self-imposed discipline, this concept of basic civility, we need to strengthen those private social institutions that nurture them. Our recent emphasis on voluntarism, the mobilization of private groups to deal with our social ills, is designed to foster this spirit of individual generosity and our sense of communal values. For this reason, we have moved to cut away many of the Federal intrusions of the private sector that were preempting the prerogatives of our private and independent institutions. That's why we've been willing to make some hard decisions in Washington about the growth of government. We've laid out a program for economic recovery. We'll stand by that program and see it through. We are determined to put an end to the fiscal joyride in Washington, determined to bring America back to prosperity and stability.

Assuring this kind of lawful society is an individual responsibility and one that must be accepted by all of us. This, too, is a matter of attitude -- the way we live our lives, the example we set for youngsters, the leadership that we show in our profession.

Now, what was your first reaction? Did you just say to yourself, remembering your own times sitting in the grandstand, ``Why didn't he keep his mouth shut? He could have gotten away with it.'' But should he have kept his mouth shut? Some day he may represent you in the Congress or in the White House or even the statehouse. He might even be on the Supreme Court. And what then? Do you want him to keep his mouth shut, to make a decision on the basis of political expediency, or do you want him to be guided by the same kind of inner moral conviction that made him tell the referee the truth? Where does it start?

I think every one of us would like to think that maybe his son has a chance to play football someday under that young man, who has now grown up and is a coach. But where does it start? I think it starts inside each one of us. If each of us lives up to our responsibilities in our personal lives, professional capacity, we can foster a greater respect for the law, for the principle of truth and justice. You have to make decisions every day that require moral courage -- the courage not to ignore that rumor of corruption about someone under your command, or to refuse a favor for a powerful politician or influential attorney, or just give in to weariness and not pursue a criminal case you know should be vigorously prosecuted.

Again, I commend you for manning the thin blue line that holds back a jungle which threatens to reclaim this clearing we call civilization. No bands play when a cop is shooting it out in a dark alley.

Well, Dave brought up -- the Governor brought up a little nostalgia here. And I've been sitting here feeling a little nostalgia, also, to see here in this place a group like you, who, as he said, have paid the tab that you've paid for a Republican fundraiser. My nostalgia was going back to 1964, when there was no thought in my mind of ever being in public life or holding public office at all. But I came down here to help a man named Charleton Lyons, who said that his goal -- he knew the election was impossible -- but his goal was to see if we could not establish a two-party system here. And how happy he'd be to see how well it has been established here.

And you know, government's been doing that for a long time. They've been slicing away at our bread, more and more, and they've gotten all the way up to where they're just on the verge of grabbing the whole loaf. And I think that we have gone back to two slices, just recently, with the changes that have been made.

We had a great victory with the passage of that budget and that tax bill, and yet I think we should remember a Japanese proverb: ``After a victory, tighten your helmet strap.'' Well, I started tightening ours Thursday night, because you've all got to be bone tired. We couldn't have had that victory without you. Believe me, it was for quite some time the talk of Washington of the extent to which the Capitol heard from the people of this country, and that's what made the victory possible.

And yet we're all going to be bone tired before we get through, because we have to continue, and we have to do more. And we made no secret of that fact. We said at the time it was passed that there had to be tens of billions of dollars more cut out in the next 2 years before we could get down to what should be the normal thing in our country, and that is a balanced budget. Our States have to do it; there's no reason why the Federal Government shouldn't have to do it. And we're going to keep going until we do.

And yet some of our opponents, those who dug in their heels and fought the hardest against what we were trying to do, are those who over the years have persisted in this system we've had of spending more than we take in. Before next week is out, our national debt will be over a trillion dollars. That's 16 -- not 16 -- but that's a thousand billion dollars. It's incomprehensible.

I told some of the crew the other night when we were doing that television speech, I said, ``I was going to do an example here and hold, if I could get from the Treasury, a 4-inch stack of thousand dollar bills and tell the people, `That's a million dollars.' And I was going to then show them what a trillion dollars was in a stack of bills, but I couldn't, because that would be about 63 miles high.'' I may be wrong with my arithmetic, but I did it very hastily in my head. [Laughter] But it would be up to about that size.

Anyway, those people who opposed that didn't offer any alternative, and now that it's passed, they're insistent on saying that it won't work. As a matter of fact, a couple of them have even said it hasn't worked. Well, it hasn't; it doesn't start until Thursday, and much of it doesn't start until January 1st, the beginning of the new year -- many of the most important tax incentives that were built into the structure.

So, one thing that I think we have to remember is that the budget deficit at the end of 1982, whether we meet our target exactly or not -- and we're determined to keep on trying that we will -- would have been $35 billion bigger than it will be because that's how much we got in the package of cuts that have already been adopted. And the same thing is true of the years it would be $130 billion -- those cuts spread over the next 3 years.

So, I think we have made a start, and yes, we are asking for more cuts, as I said. And I believe that our program will work. I believe it with all my heart. It's based on sound principles of a free marketplace, providing incentive for the entrepreneur, for the working person, for all the way up, yes, to the corporations, so that they can provide the jobs our people must have, and to remove the excessive interference by government in our personal and private lives.

And we've made a big start in that. George Bush is heading up a task force that has already cut the increase in government regulations in half. And we're not going to be satisfied until we have cut the existing regulations -- I don't know whether in half or what it will be -- but we're going to get rid of all the unnecessary, the complicated, the duplicative regulations.

But I'll say one last thing. As you know, we'd tried to do something that I had promised to do about the integrity of social security. We had hoped that our opponents would join us and make this a bipartisan effort because, as the program stands now, there is a long-term collapse of the program simply on the basis of the actuarial imbalance that exists within it. But there is an immediate problem in which the trust fund from which the benefits are paid will be out of money before the end of next year, if something isn't done.

Now, it is true that temporarily we can stave that off by borrowing from the other funds, as I said Thursday night in the broadcast. But I also said -- and I don't think this was really a retreat -- again, one last effort to get the kind of bipartisan cooperation we need, and that is if they will join us in establishing a task force to come up with a settlement that will do two things: that will restore the fiscal integrity of social security, but at the same time will guarantee that no one presently dependent on social security is going to suffer any loss or any harm or change in the benefits that they're presently receiving.

But whatever speculation you've read or seen or heard or anything else, I was only built with one gear. We are not going to retreat from this program, because we know it is going to restore America to the economic stability that this nation -- -- [applause].

Thank you all very much. And as Dave said, if you really want to do something for us in 1982, in addition to continuing to help as you have in the past, you send them some more teammates and give us the people that we need up there to continue with these programs. And we'll be forever grateful to you for that. They're very much needed, although I must say, we have had great cooperation from some people who are certainly spiritual brothers of ours, even if they do have a different party affiliation, and I think we can hold that group together to continue what we're doing.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Every year this Nation experiences needless loss of life and property. America's fire losses are a great waste of our precious resources and must be minimized. Destruction of property and what we pay for fire protection totals over $21 billion each year. But even worse, 7,500 American deaths annually can be attributed to fire.

Installing and properly maintaining smoke detectors and practicing fire escape plans can reduce loss of life and property. If each of us would take a few simple precautions, fewer Americans would suffer disfigurement, the agony of injury, or the mental anguish of the sudden loss of loved ones.

Furthermore, I congratulate the fire service for their fire prevention efforts and support their continued work. The National Fire Protection Association, the Fire Marshals Association of North America, fire chiefs, and fire fighters deserve our thanks for their sponsorship of this year's fire safety observance.

I direct the Federal Emergency Management Agency to work with all levels of government, industry, service organizations and volunteers to encourage the broadest possible use of smoke detectors across the Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 28th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Diabetes is a serious and widespread public health problem, resulting from the inability of the body to convert nutrients into energy. This debilitating and often fatal disease affects about 10 million Americans and is occurring among all age and socio-economic groups at an increasing rate. More than 35,000 people die from diabetes every year, and the disease contributes to deaths from heart attack, stroke, kidney failure and blood vessel disorders. It is the leading cause of new blindness. The cost of diabetes is measured in the billions of dollars, but by far the highest price is paid in the suffering and shortened life span of its victims.

Fortunately, there is hope. Through advances in medical research, we are learning more about diabetes, its cause, and improved methods for its control and management. Prospects for better prevention and treatment appear brighter than at any time since the discovery of insulin more than 50 years ago.

I am pleased that in cooperation with private, voluntary organizations, the Federal Government plays a valuable role in support of this research. It is my fervent hope that continued efforts will improve the quality of life for all our Nation's diabetics and eventually lead to the prevention and cure of this difficult and cruel disease.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation We have all heard the saying, ``As the twig is bent the tree inclines.'' This maxim is especially true for the minds and bodies of our children. The physical and mental health of the child prepares the way for the physical and mental health of the adult.

Our future as a Nation lies in the healthy development of our children. That development must be fostered from the earliest stages so that our twigs and saplings will grow into straight and strong trees.

We must actively promote child health through the positive approach of preventive care, such as early prenatal care for mothers, assured immunization against dangerous childhood illnesses and early identification of handicapping conditions.

In this effort to improve the well-being and future of our children, I earnestly call for cooperative and voluntary action from all those who make maternal and child health their profession, from the States through their health care resources, from the organizations of private citizens who devote themselves to the health of mothers and children, and particularly from parents themselves, whose attention to their children's needs and personal examples of healthful behavior are vital factors in the protection of child health.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation For blind Americans, the white cane is an important sign of independence, symbolizing their ability to travel in our Nation's cities and towns with great confidence and safety. For motorists, the white cane symbolizes caution, and reminds them that their courtesy and consideration insure the safety of the visually disabled.

We should always be aware of the significance of the white cane and extend every courtesy to those who carry it. By doing so, we will respect and ensure the right to independence of the visually disabled as they pursue a productive and fulfilling life.

I urge all Americans to mark this occasion by giving greater consideration to the special needs of the visually disabled, and, particularly, to observe White Cane Safety Day with activities that contribute to maximum independent use of our streets and public facilities by our visually handicapped population.

The United Nations has assisted in bringing stability to troubled areas and will surely do so again. United Nations peacekeeping forces are on duty in the volatile Middle East and have contributed to maintaining the peace in other places.

The problems addressed in this world forum are diverse, and the United Nations cannot resolve all matters it considers. But it has helped. This year it held a major conference for the purpose of pledging assistance to refugees in Africa. The United States made a substantial pledge, consistent with our historic support for United Nations refugee programs.

The United Nations is the world's meeting place. It brings together representatives of virtually all countries to discuss a multitude of subjects. These meetings afford opportunities for bilateral discussions, often at a high level, as an extra benefit. Today, much of the world's diplomacy takes place under the aegis of the United Nations.

The United States will continue to play a prominent role and champion the values and ideals that originally inspired the United Nations. We will further those activities that strengthen the capacity of the institution to serve the good of mankind.

On behalf of the American people, I am delighted to welcome you to Washington for your 36th annual meeting. It seems that your deliberations take on added importance each year, and this year will be no exception.

I believe your meeting can strengthen the national resolve and international cooperation required for the global economic recovery and growth that we're all striving to achieve, and I'm very grateful for this opportunity to address your distinguished group.

It's customary to begin a speech before this annual meeting with a portrait of the serious problems and challenges we face in the world economy. Those problems and challenges are certainly there in force, and I will get back to them in a minute and review them. But first, let me just take a moment to salute the institutions that you represent. The IMF and the World Bank group have contributed enormously to the spread of hope of a better life throughout the world community. In the process, they have proved themselves capable of change, of adapting to new circumstances and the needs of new members.

Your institutions have worked tirelessly to preserve the framework for international economic cooperation and to generate confidence and competition in the world economy. They have been inspired by the ideal of a far better world in which economic growth and development would spread to all parts of the globe. For more than three decades, they have worked toward these goals and contributed to results that are now clearly visible to all.

We need to recognize our progress and talk about it more in our conversations with one another. This in no way denies the immense problems that we face. But without some sense of what we've achieved, without some encouragement to believe in our mission, we will succumb to defeatism or surrender to ill-advised solutions to problems that can never yield to grandiose schemes.

To look at the challenges before us, let us recall that vision we originally set out to reach through international cooperation. The Second World War had left us with the realization, born out of the suffering and the sacrifices of those years, that never again must human initiative and individual liberties be denied or suppressed.

The international political and economic institutions created after 1945 rested upon a belief that the key to national development and human progress is individual freedom -- both political and economic. The Bretton Woods institutions and the GATT established generalized rules and procedures to facilitate individual enterprise and an open international trading and financial system. They recognized that economic incentives and increasing commercial opportunities would be essential to economic recovery and growth.

We who live in free market societies believe that growth, prosperity and, ultimately, human fulfillment are created from the bottom up, not the government down. Only when the human spirit is allowed to invent and create, only when individuals are given a personal stake in deciding economic policies and benefiting from their success -- only then can societies remain economically alive, dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

Trust the people. This is the one irrefutable lesson of the entire post-war period, contradicting the notion that rigid government controls are essential to economic development. The societies which have achieved the most spectacular broad-based economic progress in the shortest period of time are not the most tightly controlled, not necessarily the biggest in size, or the wealthiest in natural resources. No, what unites them all is their willingness to believe in the magic of the marketplace.

Everyday life confirms the fundamentally human and democratic ideal that individual effort deserves economic reward. Nothing is more crushing to the spirit of working people and to the vision of development itself than the absence of reward for honest toil and legitimate risk. So let me speak plainly: We cannot have prosperity and successful development without economic freedom; nor can we preserve our personal and political freedoms without economic freedom. Governments that set out to regiment their people with the stated objective of providing security and liberty have ended up losing both. Those which put freedom as the first priority find they have also provided security and economic progress.

The United States is proud of its contributions to the goals and institutions of post-war development. You can count on us to continue to shoulder our responsibilities in the challenges that we face today. We see two of overriding importance: restoring the growth and vitality of the world economy and assuring that all countries, especially the poorest ones, participate fully in the process of growth and development. But let us remember, the most important contribution any country can make to world development is to pursue sound economic policies at home.

Regrettably, many industrial countries, including my own, have not made this contribution in the recent past. We've overspent, overtaxed, and overregulated, with the result being slow growth and soaring inflation. This ``stagflation,'' as the IMF annual report notes, is one of the two basic problems we must quickly overcome. The United States has set its course to economic recovery. Our program is comprehensive, and as I reminded the American people last Thursday evening, it will require effort and patience, but the reward is worth working for.

By reducing the rate of government spending, honoring our commitment to balance the budget, reducing tax rates to encourage productive investment and personal savings, eliminating excessive government regulation, and maintaining a stable monetary policy, we are convinced that we will enter a new era of sustained, noninflationary growth and prosperity, the likes of which we haven't seen for many years. And as the world's largest single market, a prosperous, growing U.S. economy will mean increased trading opportunities for other nations.

America now receives half of all non-OPEC, developing country exports of manufactured goods to all the industrialized countries, even though we account for only one-third of the total gross national product of those industrialized countries. Lower U.S. inflation and interest rates will translate into increased availability of financial resources at affordable rates. Already, capital markets in the United States are more accessible to the developing countries than capital markets anywhere else in the world. No American contribution can do more for development than a growing, prosperous United States economy.

The domestic policies of developing countries are likewise the most critical contribution they can make to development. Unless a nation puts its own financial and economic house in order, no amount of aid will produce progress. Many countries are recognizing this fact and taking dramatic steps to get their economies back on a sound footing. And I know it's not easy -- I have a few scars to prove that fact -- but it must be done.

Only with a foundation of sound domestic policies can the international economic system continue to expand and improve. My own government is committed to policies of free trade, unrestricted investment, and open capital markets. The financial flows generated by trade investment and growth capital flows far exceed official development assistance funds provided to developing countries. At the same time, we're sensitive to the needs of the low-income countries. They can benefit from international trade and growth in the industrial countries because they export many raw materials and primary products the industrial world needs. But they also depend upon our aid to strengthen their economies, diversify their exports, and work toward self-sufficiency.

The United States recognizes this. Over three decades, we've provided more than $130 billion in concessional assistance. The American people have proven themselves to be as compassionate and caring as any on Earth, and we will remain so.

We strongly support the World Bank. And because of our strong support, we feel a special responsibility to provide constructive suggestions to make it more effective. We believe these suggestions will permit it to generate increased funds for development and to support the efforts developing countries are making to strengthen their economies.

Taking into account our budgetary constraints, we are committed to providing the Bank and IDA resources for them to continue and improve their contributions to development. We know that stimulating private investment is also critically important. The International Finance Corporation plays the leading role in the Bank family in support of such investment. Given the importance of this role, we hope it can be enhanced. We believe all facets of the Bank can play a more active role in generating private resources and stimulating individual initiative in the development effort.

The IMF also plays a critical role in establishing conditions to encourage private capital flows to deficit countries. By reaching agreements with the IMF on a sound, comprehensive stabilization program and by demonstrating its determination to implement that program, a borrowing country signals private markets of its intent to solve its own economic problems.

We're committed to a pragmatic search for solutions to produce lasting results. Let us put an end to the divisive rhetoric of ``us versus them,'' ``North versus South.'' Instead, let us decide what all of us, both developed and developing countries, can accomplish together.

Our plans for the Caribbean Basin are one example of how we would like to harness economic energies within a region to promote stronger growth. The design and success of this undertaking depends upon the cooperation of many developed and developing countries. My colleagues and I also look forward to the upcoming summit meeting at Cancun, Mexico. That occasion will provide us with fresh opportunities to address the serious problems we face and encourage each other in our common mission.

In conclusion, each of our societies has a destiny to pursue. We've chosen ours in light of our experience, our strength, and our faith. We, each, are ultimately responsible for our actions and the successes and failures that they bring. But while individually responsible, we're also mutually interdependent. By working together through such institutions as the IMF and World Bank, we can all seek to collaborate on joint problems, share our insights, and encourage the common good.

These institutions have reflected a shared vision of growth and development through political freedom and economic opportunity. A liberal and open trade and payment system would reconstruct a shattered world and lay the basis for prosperity to help avoid future conflicts. This vision has become reality for many of us. Let us pledge to continue working together to ensure that it becomes reality for all.

I speak for all Americans in expressing our heartfelt sadness at the death of Romulo Betancourt. While he was first and foremost a Venezuelan patriot, Romulo Betancourt was an especially close friend of the United States. During the 1950's he considered the United States a refuge while he was in exile, and we were proud to receive him. We are honored that this courageous man whose life was dedicated to the principles of liberty and justice -- a man who fought dictatorships of the right and the left -- spent his final days on our shores. We join the Venezuelan people and those who love freedom around the world in mourning his death.

The Convention represents an effort by the two Governments to confront the serious law enforcement problems posed by the theft of vehicles and aircraft, primarily along our shared border, and the subsequent use of some of them in the commission of felonies in the two countries. It would supersede the 1936 Convention for the Recovery and Return of Stolen or Embezzled Motor Vehicles, Trailers, Airplanes or Component Parts of Any of Them, which has been found inadequate to meet present law enforcement needs. I recommend that the Senate give favorable consideration to this treaty at an early date.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation The ongoing migration of persons to the United States in violation of our laws is a serious national problem detrimental to the interests of the United States. A particularly difficult aspect of the problem is the continuing illegal migration by sea of large numbers of undocumented aliens into the southeastern United States. These arrivals have severely strained the law enforcement resources of the Immigration and Naturalization Service and have threatened the welfare and safety of communities in that region.

As a result of our discussions with the Governments of affected foreign countries and with agencies of the Executive Branch of our Government, I have determined that new and effective measures to curtail these unlawful arrivals are necessary. In this regard, I have determined that international cooperation to intercept vessels trafficking in illegal migrants is a necessary and proper means of insuring the effective enforcement of our laws.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Section 1. The Secretary of State shall undertake to enter into, on behalf of the United States, cooperative arrangements with appropriate foreign governments for the purpose of preventing illegal migration to the United States by sea.

Sec. 2. (a) The Secretary of the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating shall issue appropriate instructions to the Coast Guard in order to enforce the suspension of the entry of undocumented aliens and the interdiction of any defined vessel carrying such aliens.

Sec. 3. The Attorney General shall, in consultation with the Secretary of State and the Secretary of the Department in which the Coast Guard is operating, take whatever steps are necessary to ensure the fair enforcement of our laws relating to immigration (including effective implementation of this Executive Order) and the strict observance of our international obligations concerning those who genuinely flee persecution in their homeland.

In Jewish places of worship the world over, the stirring call of the ram's horn, the shofar, will be heard symbolizing as it has for centuries the observance of Rosh Hashanah. On this most solemn occasion, Nancy and I express our warmest greetings to the Jewish people and join with you in your prayers for the New Year.

Well, Nancy and I are very pleased to have you here with us. During our time in Washington I've been to the Hill so frequently that I thought maybe it was fitting to have you as our guests over here for a change.

During the days immediately before the summer break there was such a flurry of legislative activity -- you probably remember that -- [laughter] -- there was no time to thank you properly for supporting the economic recovery package. Just to make it official, the whole country is grateful to you for what you accomplished this summer, and that includes us.

For the last few years, we've all faced an ever more grave economic situation with dismay and frustration -- sort of a truck on the way downhill, as I said the other night, without any brakes. Many of our citizens were resigning themselves to permanent economic hardship. But what you achieved this summer, I think, has put us in a position to get control of the situation. And for the first time in years, there are signs of hope and renewed confidence emerging among our people.

What we accomplished -- the spending and the tax rate reduction -- I think were proud and historic moments. In the last two decades the Federal Government has grown almost 500 percent, and that's several times as much as the country has grown. And so did the income tax payments of individual Americans.

Every generation faces its responsibility and ours, I think, is bringing government growth and taxation under control before it destroys everything that we hold dear. Now, you knew something had to be done, so did the people.

There are those who underestimate the American people. I was in an industry that I thought did that for years. I used to think that most producers, the only time they ever saw America was from 30,000 feet on their way back and forth from New York to Hollywood. And I thought they underestimated a great deal. And that was a big mistake. But I think there have been accounts recently of citizens all over the country who are willing to sacrifice a bit now to get America back on the right track. Some of the press in reporting this seemed to be astounded by that fact. There shouldn't be any surprise on our part or theirs.

If there's one thing the American people aren't lacking, it is courage. At times they've been misled, but they can be counted on to do what has to be done. And right now from what I'm hearing, they're happy that you're making some tough decisions rather than taking the easy way out. The public knows that it took a number of years to get us into the economic mess, and it'll take time and hard work to set things right. So, when others start to panic, remember that the people are still on our side. And as long as we're sincerely trying to put America's house in order, they'll stay on our side.

Now, I expect some good economic signs within a few months of the start of our program. There's got to be a pony in here somewhere. [Laughter] I think with the tax incentives, there's going to be a dramatic jump in the money available to loan. And coupled with some of the new budget proposals -- you didn't think I was going to let you out of here without mentioning them -- [laughter] -- coupled with the budget proposals, the interest rates should come down. As a matter of fact, we've seen some nibbling on that already.

Furthermore, I think the oil situation looks good. Spurred on by decontrol -- you remember, that was going to destroy everything -- we've witnessed the biggest spurt in exploration in the nation's history. In an astonishing reversal, oil production in the lower 48 States has just increased for the third month in a row. And coupled with a more manageable inflation rate, the growth in total employment -- you know that there are a million more Americans working now than there were just a year ago at this time -- we're as confident today that the Nation's economic problems can and will be overcome as the day we proposed our program.

Now, I know it's not always going to be clear sailing, but we've come a long way and there's still much to do. So, let's never lose sight of the common goal -- a healthy and a strong America. And I just want each of you to know what an honor it's been for me to work with all of you and a great pleasure.

And I'm happy to see that there's a young lady right here in front who's really, I think, a pretty good reason for everything that we're doing, to see if this country won't be as good to her and her friends her age as it's been to all of us.

Mr. Ambrose was employed during World War II and until 1955 at the Naval Research Laboratory (NRL), where he was involved in the early development of ship and airborne radar systems, semiconductors, nuclear weapons and reactors. In 1955 he joined the Lockheed Corp., missile systems division, where he studied and proposed efforts on satellites and ballistic missile projects. In late 1955 he became one of the principals in a new systems engineering firm, Systems Research Corp., which was subsequently acquired by Ford Motor Co. This acquisition was later merged with Philco Corp., and is currently operated as a wholly owned subsidiary of Ford, called Ford Aerospace and Communications Corp. Mr. Ambrose has spent over 36 years in these organizations in technical management assignments primarily related to defense equipment and systems, space programs, and major communications, command, and control systems. For the last 13 years of his career prior to retirement, he was vice president for technical affairs for Ford Aerospace and Communications Corp.

Christopher C. DeMuth was today appointed Administrator for Information and Regulatory Affairs at the Office of Management and Budget. The President also announced the appointment of Mr. DeMuth to be Executive Director of the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief.

Since 1977 Mr. DeMuth has been lecturer in public policy at the Harvard School of Government and director of the Harvard Faculty Project on Regulation, which has conducted research on health, environmental, and economic regulation. He is the author of several articles on regulation and other aspects of government policy.

Following college, he served as staff assistant to the President in 1969 - 70, working first on urban policy matters and then as chairman of a White House task force on environmental policy. After leaving the White House in September 1971 to attend law school, he served as a member of the Legal Advisory Committee to the Council on Environmental Quality and of the Secretary of State's Advisory Committee for the United Nations Conference on the Human Environment.

These events once again point up the need for reconciliation and restoration by the Government of basic human rights in Poland. The fact that demonstrations involving thousands occurred in eight major cities in the face of Government warnings that security forces would use violence to put them down and dole out summary punishments vividly illustrates and demonstrates the strength of the dedication of the Polish people to free trade unions and other basic liberties.

The Polish Government's actions against the demonstrators are the latest manifestation of martial law in Poland and dramatize the significance of the policies which the President announced last December.

He is director of six corporations and a member of several business and civic organizations. He is chairman of the Business Council, director of the Economic Council of New York, a member of the Advisory Committee on Reform of the International Monetary System, and a trustee of the American Enterprise Institute.

I'm glad to join all of you on this final weekend of the summer. Family vacations are now ending, kids are going back to school, and communities all over the Nation are preparing for Labor Day parades. And, by the way, this year marks the 100th anniversary of the first Labor Day parade. It isn't true that I was in that first parade; I've just read about it.

On Monday, we celebrate the dignity and productivity of America's working people. Our country has prospered because we're a nation of workers, and today there are nearly 100 million at work -- more than 100 million according to the unadjusted figures and 99.8 million in the seasonally adjusted figures. Now, if that confuses you, well, I'm confused, too.

Many who are unemployed feel caught up in something they don't understand and over which they have no control. And they're right. It's not the fault of the laid-off fellow in Detroit that he's out of work. It's not his fault the autos aren't rolling down the assembly line. It's not the fault of the unemployed mother in Delaware that the printing plant closed down, throwing her out of a job.

The fact is unemployment has been gaining on us for years. Since 1976 the unemployment rate in this country has averaged over 7 percent -- far higher than in earlier postwar years. It was only 2.9 percent in 1953.

I'm convinced that in these last few decades the increased intervention by government in the marketplace, tax policies that took too great a percentage of overall earnings, plus burdensome and unnecessary regulations reduced economic growth and kept us from creating new jobs for newcomers entering the job market.

Today the unemployment rate is 9.8 percent, and still the number of people with jobs is a higher percentage of those of working age than we had in times of full employment -- higher than in 1953 when, as I said, unemployment was only 2.9 percent. I guess what I'm trying to point out is that our unemployment problem is due to more than just the present recession. We must not only work our way out of the recession, we must adopt policies that will stimulate economic growth and create new jobs for the increased numbers entering the job market.

This is the goal of our economic recovery program. Yes, it marks a decided turnaround from government tax-and-spend policies of the past four decades -- deliberately so. And I believe it'll work. Indeed, the signs are there that it's beginning to work.

Now, I know this is hard to see because prices keep going up. But they aren't going up as fast or as much as they were. What we're all waiting for is that zero rate when they stay where they are or even drop a little. Well, that, too, is what our program is designed to accomplish. And the leading economic indicators by which we know whether the economy is improving or getting worse have climbed for the fourth month in a row. That hasn't happened for a long time.

Clearly, the most important question now before us is whether we have the will and determination to hold our course. The next test will come when the Congress returns to Washington and decides whether to sustain my veto of a supplemental spending bill that would drive up spending once again. I hope we can work together to develop a more responsible bill.

Here in America on Labor Day, we hold parades to support the principles of freedom. In Poland a few days ago, the people peacefully gathered to mark the second anniversary of Solidarity -- a labor movement which revived our hope that nonviolent change and basic human rights could come to a closed Communist community. Their parade was met with guns, concussion grenades, tear gas, and water cannons.

I wish to express to you my deepest gratitude for your message of support for the proposals which I outlined in my address on September 1. It is particularly important to have your endorsement of my approach to peace. You are not only a recognized and respected Palestinian leader, but you represent Bethlehem which has been a glowing symbol of peace and brotherhood throughout the world for the past two thousand years. May God bless you and your efforts on behalf of your people and peace and security for all in the region.

I wish to convey to you, Mr. President, from the little town of Bethlehem, our support for your plan to find a comprehensive solution to end the sufferings of the Palestinian people and to bring peace and security for all nations in the Middle East. Please be assured of our sincere desire for peace with freedom and for peace with a homeland. May God give you the strength and wisdom to fulfill our expectations.

Day. This occasion brings deserved attention to those who have toiled to build our nation and to shape a prosperous life out of the dreams of early immigrants. Today we recognize the honor and value of all work and the great distinction that flows from a job well done.

From those who first carved a nation out of the wilderness to those who helped cross, settle, and build this country, the working people have made immeasurable contributions to the advancement of our way of life. Through their spirit, minds, and muscles, America's workers have created a modern industrial giant. They have sustained the traditional values of family, work, and neighborhood while serving as the bulwark of American democracy and lending support to the fundamental tenets of our free enterprise system.

As champions of collective bargaining, our workers have furthered a process that has played a major role in America's economic miracle. The legal and proper use of collective bargaining is of primary importance to the continuing development of our nation and the quest for human dignity.

We face many challenges to the future we all seek for this land -- challenges this Administration has addressed through our efforts to revitalize the economy. Following the dictum of Thomas Jefferson not to ``take from the mouth of labor the bread it has earned,'' we have reduced taxes and improved incentives for expansion that will rekindle economic growth. By working together we can successfully deal with the problems facing us and usher this nation into a new era of achievement and progress that will be a beacon to all the world.

Mr. Fleischer has been awarded the Man-of-the-Year award from the St. Louis construction industry, and the Associated General Contractors of St. Louis awarded him a plaque for outstanding services in the construction industry in the community.

Ambassador Philip Habib, our Special Emissary to the Middle East, is a sterling example of the highest standards of the Foreign Service. His career is the story of a lifetime committed to the service of his country and to the resolution of conflicts between nations. And the most recent chapter of that story tells of his efforts to free Lebanon from warfare and armed occupation.

Phil accepted this challenge without hesitation, despite the great personal sacrifices involved both for himself and, I might add, for a brave and patient wife, Mrs. Habib. She has just seen him today for the first time in almost 4 months.

By his skillful diplomacy and tireless activity, Phil has led the efforts of this Government to build a framework in which the leaders of Lebanon could once again protect the right of their people to security and freedom. What he accomplished was the vital first step which made it possible for launching a fresh start in the quest for peace, not only for Lebanon but for Israel and her other Arab neighbors as well.

Phil might say that he and the rest of you were only doing your jobs. In fact, he has said that to me about what he's been doing for all these many months. I say that your efforts give vital support to the foreign policy of the United States, and our nation owes you all a debt of gratitude.

As the President's Special Emissary, Ambassador Philip C. Habib came out of retirement in 1981 to serve his country in the pursuit of peace and justice in the Middle East. His successful negotiation of the cease-fire in Lebanon and the resolution of the West Beirut crisis stands out as one of the unique feats of diplomacy in modern times. Ambassador Habib's efforts conducted in the most difficult and trying of circumstances over a period of months, not only brought honor and respect to the United States but also won for him world-wide admiration. Of the greatest importance, Philip Habib's mission saved the City of Beirut and thousands of innocent lives and brought us one step closer to a peaceful resolution to the Arab-Israeli conflict.

But, Phil, I just want to say on behalf of all the people of America, thank you for, really, service above and beyond the call. And this goes for your wife, who, I know, sat here with the rest of us watching television sometimes when we wondered if we hadn't ought to be giving you combat pay. [Laughter] But thank you, and God bless you.

But the team was a great one, and there was no one on the team that I and Morris appreciated more than you, Mr. President, for the very simple reason that you told us what to do, and then you gave us the leeway to do it. And George Shultz, Secretary Shultz, backed us completely in those very tense days of the last few weeks. And in the end, we succeeded in doing what you had asked us to do.

It's particularly fitting, considering that my mother and father came from Lebanon, that their son had something to do with bringing a bit of peace to that harried land. There still is a great deal to do. The situation remains extremely tenuous. Each morning I pick up the traffic and read it, wondering if something might go wrong so we have to start all over again. But, so far, we're on track.

I am a chronic optimist, Mr. President, and I'm convinced that it's going to stay on track. And it's going to stay on track partly because of the initiative you most recently took with respect to peace in the Middle East.

There is no more worthy cause. There is no more subject worthy of greater concern on the part of the United States than the cause of peace in the Middle East. Peace and justice for all the nations in the Middle East is what all of us have striven for for many years. And, under your leadership and that of Secretary Shultz, I would hope that it'll be with us very soon.

Earlier this session the Congress agreed to reduce projected deficits substantially over the next 3 years. The bill I vetoed was a supplemental bill to fund part of the Government for only 1 month -- yet that 1 month was nearly $1 billion over budget on certain domestic items. The American people have a right to ask how their Government will honor its commitment to reduce deficits over 3 years if it is unwilling to hold the line for 1 more month.

The Congress must shoulder its responsibility, sustain the veto, and return to me a spending bill within our budget if we are to continue bringing down inflation and lowering interest rates. Only through discipline can we spur economic growth and put our people back to work.

Tomorrow's vote in the House of Representatives on my veto will be another important signal to the American people of whether Washington has the will to discipline Government spending. I urge Members of the House to support this veto and thus support our economic recovery.

A broad spectrum of concerned Americans are joining with me in calling upon the Senate to bring to an end its debate on Senator Helms' anti-abortion amendment to the debt ceiling bill. Senator Hatch, whose Constitutional Abortion Amendment I continue to support, has generously joined in the call for a vote on the amendment now before the Senate.

But this is the first clear-cut vote in this Congress on the humanity of the unborn, and it is crucial that a filibuster not prevent the representatives of our citizens from expressing their judgment on so vital a matter.

Beyond the matter of cloture, it is vitally important for the Congress to affirm, as this amendment does, the fundamental principle that all human life has intrinsic value. We must never become a society in which an individual has the right to do away with inconvenient life. I ask that you keep these thoughts in mind when you vote your conscience on the amendment.

Ohio. She was associate director of development at Wright State University. She also served as executive director of Wright State University School of Medicine Foundation. She is serving as chairman of the Ohio Commission for Children and is a member of the board and of the executive committee of the United Way.

President Reagan. Madam President, Your Royal Highnesses, and distinguished guests: It's indeed a pleasure for me to welcome you to the White House this afternoon and to play a part in the inauguration of Scandinavia Today, a program which underscores the contributions of Nordic culture and the ties between the United States and the five Scandinavian democracies. It is, certainly, a noteworthy occasion when we're able to host a chief of state, representatives of three royal houses, and the array of distinguished government leaders who are assembled here today.

Madam President, a special greeting for you. This is the first time a President of Iceland has visited our country. And it is also your first visit as well. I know you and your colleagues will see firsthand just how much your countrymen have contributed to the cultural, economic, and social development of this nation.

Charles Lindbergh, the great pioneer in aviation, once said that short-term survival may depend on the knowledge of physicists and the performance of their machines. But, and I quote, ``Long-term survival depends, alone, on the character of Man.'' Today, we recognize together that Scandinavians were and continue to be a significant force in the shaping of our American character. Lindbergh himself, who represented the best qualities of America to so many, was the son of Scandinavian immigrants.

It's no mere coincidence that your five nations share with the people of this country strong democratic traditions. Madam President, your country, Iceland, boasts a history that includes a republican constitution and an assembly as far back as the year 930. Now, that's going back pretty far, even by my way of counting. [Laughter] And just as we've been home to many Scandinavian settlers over the years, your own nation of Iceland was settled by proud and independent Nordic people from the European continent.

Our peoples share traits that are the product of our common frontier heritage. But something all of us in this room share is our love of liberty and our respect for the rights of individuals, values which place our nations on the front lines of freedom and democracy. Along with this freedom, Iceland and other Nordic countries experience cultural advances that will be highlighted by Scandinavia Today.

In one of Europe's oldest collections of literature, ``The Edda,'' there is a saga with a message that speaks clearly to us even after a thousand years. ``Cattle die, kinsmen die,'' the ancient poem says, ``the self dies. But a reputation will never die for him who gains a good one.'' Today, we celebrate the reputation of the Nordic culture. We're thankful to have you here to join with us in this celebration.

It has long time been my conviction that the best gift we receive from society is the gift of literacy. The capacity to read is a richness beyond measure by our usual standards of wealth. Yet, too often it is taken for granted. This gift opened up for us new worlds. It is an incentive for our imagination. And through the gift of reading is given knowledge, knowledge about other peoples.

The people of America and the Nordic people share the fortune of being literate from an early age. Through reading, children can imagine what the world around them looks like. Thus, it is almost half a century since I began to imagine through books what the United States of America were like.

People had come from mountains and now had nowhere to hide, not even a rock or a bush. I have never been here before, yet some things look familiar to me through the depiction and the paintings of your great artists of the world.

To the best of my knowledge, most of the great literature works of America writers have been translated into our Nordic tongues, works that have inspired our own writers and widened our own horizons. Eugene O'Neill, Arthur Miller, just to name a few of the giants of the theatrical arts which we have in common, Mr. President, suddenly become kinsmen to us at the moment their words are translated into our own tongues.

But the sweetness of the dew and the abundance of grapes are not the only things Nordic people have sought in the New World. Our scientists have come here for knowledge and know-how to this land of scientific ingenuity, a land known for its great achievements, in fact, achievements so unbelievable that none of my generation would have imagined them when I was growing up.

Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, our nation is a nation of great spiritual and practical -- I would say, your nation is a nation of great spiritual and practical achievements, not to mention its vastness and power. What then have we, the smaller nation, to say to the greater ones? Perhaps the individual belonging to a small nation is more conscious that he or she can contribute to the contemporary world. In a small nation, every single creative mind is needed. Indeed, each skillful hand that can contribute to the achievements of a worthwhile common aim is welcome.

Whatever the judgment will be, we have given the future a great gift, the capacity to read about us. American or Nordic, I have this great ambition for us all: Let us give our descendants words to think about, deeds to remember, a culture to build upon. Let us give the future a picture of ourselves that can be reproduced at least as a fragment of an ideal.

Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, please accept our heartfelt thanks for the hospitality you have shown to my country and all the other Nordic countries today in your renowned home. We know that the welfare of our nations is deeply linked as well as the welfare of other nations in the world. It is my sincere wish that our children and forthcoming generations will be able to read about how magnificent peacemakers we were, realistic as we are about the world situation today.

President Reagan. I thank you very much. And maybe I should have incorporated this in my toast, but it gives me an opportunity now in thanking all of you to say that this morning -- some of our days that we observe here people think are just automatic -- but every year by proclamation they are reproclaimed. And I signed the proclamations today declaring Columbus Day and Leif Erikson Day.

Nordic seafarers. Charged by King Olaf I to spread religion among the Greenland settlers, he helped expand mankind's knowledge of previously uncharted territory. In carrying European culture to the new world, he enhanced that culture when his adventures gave rise to the great medieval sagas, some of the finest literature of their period.

Americans will have the rare privilege of seeing the original saga manuscripts this year as part of an extraordinary program of Nordic culture. With the opening of Scandinavia Today on September 8, our country will pay special tribute to the people and accomplishments of the Nordic countries, and the legacy of Leif Erikson will be shared by our countrymen in exhibits and programs throughout the United States.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 8th. day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Nearly five centuries ago, an Italian navigator in the service of Spain opened the way to the founding of these United States. In this historic feat, Christopher Columbus embodied for us the qualities which we Americans hold dear and which are representative of us as a people: daring, determination, vision, and the courage to pursue a dream.

Although Columbus undertook his epic voyage long ago, his adventurous spirit continues to inspire us. As we reflect on the elements which made this journey one of the finest moments in history, it is fitting that we rededicate ourselves to our search for new horizons, ever mindful of Christopher Columbus and those brave seafarers on the Nina, the Pinta, and the Santa Maria.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 8th day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The white cane serves notice to the nation's drivers to be cautious and to the pedestrians to be courteous and considerate of the special needs of the severely visually handicapped. It may also in a special way be considered an extension of their bodily functions, providing courage, strength, confidence, hope and independence as well as mobility.

To make all Americans more fully aware of the special significance of the white cane and the need for extra care and courtesy when approaching its user, the Congress, by a joint resolution approved October 6, 1964, has authorized the President to proclaim October 15 each year as White Cane Safety Day.

I ask all Americans to mark this day with concern and respect for the special needs of the severely visually handicapped and, especially, to note the white cane, in order that our busy streets will be safer for all.

According to the terms of the proposed agreement with the Bank, the ESF will provide credit facilities to the Bank in an amount of $600 million for a term of three months, with a possibility of three three-month renewals, to expire no later than August 23, 1983. The Bank's obligations under the agreement will be unconditionally guaranteed by the Government of Mexico.

The ESF agreement is part of the multilateral effort involving other major countries, acting through the Bank for International Settlements (``BIS''), the ESF and the Federal Reserve System to provide short-term facilities amounting to $1.85 billion to the Bank. Under the agreement between the Bank and the BIS, the ESF and the Federal Reserve System will share with the BIS in the proceeds of drawings by Mexico from the International Monetary Fund (IMF) and in certain other arrangements to assure repayment of this multilateral financing. The Mexican Government has undertaken to arrange a major program of economic adjustment in cooperation with the IMF, which will serve as the basis for IMF balance of payments financing for Mexico during the next three years. The multilateral arrangement, of which the ESF agreement is an integral part, is designed to provide immediate support for Mexico's external position while the IMF arrangement is being negotiated and other sources of financing are being arranged by Mexico.

Mexico at present faces extreme balance of payments problems of a magnitude and character which, if not addressed through the measures outlined above, could lead to substantial disruption of international money, financial, and exchange markets. The provision of financing by the ESF is a key component of a multilateral effort, centered on an economic adjustment program to be agreed between the IMF and Mexico, to strengthen Mexico's economic and financial position.

Mexico's economic adjustment measures begin to take effect, it may take more than six months before Mexico is able fully to repay credit advanced by the ESF. The mobilization of resources by other participants in this multilateral financing arrangement effort also recognizes this possibility.

The United States Pavilion will explore the Exposition theme, ``Fresh Water as a Source of Life,'' spotlighting in all its aspects the crucial link between fresh water and life on Earth, and calling attention to the need to conserve and protect our fresh water resources from the hazards of increasing demands, diminishing supplies, pollution, and ecological disruption.

Louisiana, with its unique mix of cultures and its world-renowned hospitality, is particularly well-suited to host an international event of this kind. It is a State rich in history, scenic beauty, and visitor appeal. Moreover, the ``river'' theme is ideal, reflecting the close relationship of the Mississippi and the countless bayous, lakes, and marshes to the social, economic, and artistic lives of its people. Louisiana ports are a vital link between the rich industrial heartland of America and the nations of the world.

Jazz Heritage Festival, and the Sugar Bowl all involve tremendous logistical effort. Year after year, these events go on safely and successfully, reflecting the experience and cooperation of State and local government. I am confident that New Orleans, and the State of Louisiana under the leadership of Governor David Treen, will rise to the occasion once again in 1984.

Lebanon and the prospects for our Middle East initiative. I want to begin by reaffirming our principal objectives in Lebanon: first, the removal of all foreign military forces from Lebanon; second, the strengthening of the central government and the establishment of its authority throughout the country; third, Lebanon must not again become a launching pad for attacks into Israel. Indeed, the security of all the states in the area can only be guaranteed through freely negotiated peace treaties between Israel and its neighbors. And, finally, I call on all the parties in Lebanon to maintain the cease-fire so that diplomacy can succeed.

In the course of his briefing, Phil told me that a peaceful resolution of the Beirut crisis would not have been possible without a multinational force that included United States' forces. With the evacuation complete and the authorities asserting their control throughout Beirut, I am pleased to announce that the multinational force will commence its withdrawal from Beirut, Friday, September 10th, day after tomorrow. And the United States Marine contingent should be among the first to leave. We're therefore keeping our commitment to have them out within 30 days.

I also am announcing the formation of an interagency steering group on Lebanon. This group, under the chairmanship of the Deputy Secretary of State, will coordinate the political, economic, and security assistance dimensions of our policy. Peter McPherson, Director of AID, will assume responsibility for reconstruction efforts in addition to his role as my personal representative for relief in Lebanon. And Morris Draper, Phil's right hand in Lebanon, has been accorded the personal rank of Ambassador, and he will manage the political working group and shortly return to Lebanon to continue his work. And I want to express my appreciation to him for what he has done and what he is going to continue doing.

And once again, I want to extend my heartfelt congratulations to Phil Habib for his superhuman efforts throughout the past year and a half. Phil's successful diplomacy is one reason why we're now able to inject a fresh start into the peace process.

Phil would like to make some remarks, I know, and I know many of you would like to ask him questions. So I'm going to leave Phil and Morris to you, and I have a date back in the office that I must now keep and return to work. So, thank you for being here. And, Phil, again, thank you.

The President. I think that I'll let these gentlemen handle the questions and take a question from that. My own personal reaction is that because I stressed negotiations as the settlement to many of these troublesome issues there, I think that we have to understand sometimes that maybe positions are being staked out with those negotiations in mind.

But I'm particularly gratified that the President is continuing his personal interest in the Lebanese situation. It's going to require continued high-level attention in our government as we pursue the objectives that the President has laid down for us. And in that regard he and Secretary Shultz have given Morris and myself our instructions. Morris has his marching orders. He'll be taking off very shortly. And then later in the month, I'll go out for the inauguration of the new President and spend a few days with him.

But basically, we're going to be trying to build upon the initial -- I wouldn't call them successes as much as I would call them the initial progress that's been made in the Lebanese situation. There is a fair, good chance that we can see a sovereign, integral, free, pluralistic Lebanon, once again sovereign within its own territories. And that's what we're basically going to be working for.

I know we here today, and a majority of the American people agree on one point: We're not saying we have a terrible problem and Government must find a solution. We're saying Government is the problem and the people have the solution -- a constitutional amendment making balanced budgets the law of this land.

We in the administration have been working hard to keep pressure on the Congress to get this initiative passed. Back on July 12, I held a bipartisan meeting with key congressional leaders and urged their support. Then, on July 19, we joined our fellow Americans for a big rally on the steps of the Capitol.

I'll never forget that afternoon because it had to be one of the hottest days of the summer. I think some of the Members of Congress felt the heat, too. Shortly after the rally, the Senate did its job and passed the amendment.

This afternoon I have just met with a bipartisan group of Congressmen who are co-sponsors of the amendment, but who have not yet signed the discharge petition. I'd like to think some of them now will.

It is absolutely essential that the House leadership allow a vote on this issue. We're counting on the American Lobby and other grassroots organizations to help us mobilize the country before the November elections, so we can make the Congress heed the will of the people and get the budget monster under control once and for all.

Now I know it's fashionable to say that the amendment isn't relevant now, because it won't take effect until the second fiscal year after its ratification. Well, that's nonsense. Ratification will produce an immediate impact. From that moment on, the watchword to Washington will be: Start shaping up, or you may be shipping out.

With your help, we can make this amendment the economic lifeline to millions of American families who still believe in the American dream. Thank you again for your invaluable support. We know this is not a partisan issue. It is the people's crusade. With your help, we will make Washington understand that we intend to do whatever it takes to make our Government, once again, the faithful servant of the American people.

For generations, grandparents have strengthened the fabric of the family, preserving and enriching our national heritage. It is fitting that we pay special recognition to our nation's 20 million or more grandparents, and Congress has designated the first Sunday after Labor Day as National Grandparents Day.

Research has shown what many of us know from personal experience -- that the emotional attachment between grandparent and grandchild is a special legacy handed down from one generation to the next. Grandparents often fill roles as surrogate parents, care-givers, tutors, decision-makers, confidants, counselors, story-tellers, and family historians. They also help by sharing their wisdom, knowledge, and experience. In turn, the love and care that grandparents give enhances their own sense of usefulness.

With Americans living longer than ever before, three- and four-generation families have become increasingly common. An estimated one-third of all persons who have grandchildren have at least one great-grandchild. Of prime importance is the building of bridges between younger and older Americans, a lifelong process involving such institutions as our schools, colleges, churches, synagogues, and, most important, the family.

Henry Ward Beecher once wrote, ``There are only two lasting bequests we can hope to give our children. One of these is roots . . . the other, wings.'' Grandparents give us both bequests and help instill in future generations the values which make America great.

This bill designates the first new wilderness area to which I have had the pleasure of granting statutory protection. Cumberland Island is the largest and southernmost of Georgia's offshore barrier islands. It was designated as a national seashore to protect its outstanding natural, historical, cultural, and recreational values, and to provide a continuing source of outdoor recreation for the American public.

The bill designates certain lands on Cumberland Island as wilderness and sets aside certain other lands as ``proposed wilderness,'' to be designated at a future date, when nonconforming uses of them have ceased. Within the area being designated as wilderness are an underground power line, several maintained access roads, and a number of residences and other structures. Within the area identified as proposed wilderness are several estate access roads and two parcels which contain structures of possible historic significance. Because of these intrusions, neither of these areas is wilderness within the meaning of the 1964 Wilderness Act, and their inclusion in this legislation should not in any way be deemed as an implied amendment to the Wilderness Act.

Including areas into the National Wilderness Preservation System which do not meet the suitability criteria of the Wilderness Act System will necessarily create conflicts in management of the area. Such is the case with Cumberland Island. Management of Cumberland Island is further complicated due to the ambiguity created by the language of the bill itself and legislative history which accompanies it. The bill states that the island is to be managed in accordance with the Wilderness Act subject, however, to valid existing rights. The House and Senate reports attempt to catalog such rights by listing the various manmade intrusions in the area and at the same time set forth how the area will be managed with these intrusions. In light of the conflict between the requirements to manage the island in accordance with the Wilderness Act and to protect valid existing rights, I am directing the Department of the Interior to manage Cumberland Island in a manner similar to wilderness, to the maximum extent practicable consistent with the other uses for the area set forth in the legislative history.

Development of this facility may require continued enforcement of restrictive easements over lands that are now to be designated wilderness. Additionally, I note that some have suggested a need to reduce flights of aircraft over the island. These are also valid existing rights that are to be protected. Designating Cumberland Island as wilderness must not be allowed to interfere with military operations over the island. I do not view wilderness designation as incompatible with any of these rights. Accordingly, I am asking the Secretaries of Defense and the Interior to enter into a memorandum of understanding, to provide for the continued exercise of these rights.

Similarly, there are concerns about the continued use of a portion of the island not proposed for wilderness designation as a site for the disposal of dredged material by the Army Corps of Engineers. Development of King's Bay by the Navy may necessitate additional dredging in the area, as well as a potential diversion of the Atlantic Intracoastal Waterway around several of the smaller islands that comprise a portion of the Cumberland Island National Seashore, conducted in accordance with the usual environmental permits. These activities would also involve valid existing rights, protected under this legislation, and would not be incompatible with wilderness designation.

Finally on Cumberland Island, I would like to state that, although there have been some areas included in the National Wilderness Preservation System previously which did not meet the statutory definition of wilderness, I am reluctant to support this practice in the future. Wilderness legislation should designate only those areas which are truly pristine, in order to prevent the type of management conflicts in wilderness areas as are evident with Cumberland Island. Nevertheless, Cumberland Island is an important resource which should be given the added protection management that the Wilderness Act provides.

The other provisions contained in S. 1119 revise the boundary of Crater Lake National Park to exclude certain land which was erroneously included within the park boundary by an earlier Act of Congress, despite the fact that the land was subject to a prior-existing timber sale contract. In so doing, the legislation will eliminate this potential conflict and protect the scenic and recreational values which have made this unique and world-renowned park such a popular tourist attraction.

It's a special pleasure to be with you today, wonderful to be back home on the range. You know, sometimes living in that big white house in Washington can leave you feeling a little fenced in and isolated. But there is a tonic: visit a State where tall wheat and prairie grass reach toward a wide open sky; be with people who are keeping our frontier spirit alive, people who work the soil but who still have time to dream beyond the farthest stars. Here in the heartland of America lives the hope of the world, and here words like ``entrepreneur,'' ``self-reliance,'' ``personal initiative,'' and, yes, ``generosity'' describe everyday facts of life.

Right now another fact of life in this heartland is the enormous burden carried by those who produce the food and fiber essential to life itself. And I want with all my heart to see that burden lifted, to see America's farmers receive the reward they deserve. I agree with your native son, Dwight Eisenhower, who said that without a prosperous agriculture there is no prosperity in America.

I feel doubly honored to be with you here in this particular place. Kansas State University epitomizes the leadership that Abraham Lincoln wanted when he established our first land-grant colleges. Schools like Kansas State serve as an entrance to the world, not an escape from it. And you deserve great credit for the rigorous academic program you offer your students and the research efforts you are making to benefit humanity.

Today is, as has been said, also a homecoming of sorts for me. It was 15 years ago I participated in this Landon Lecture Series for the first time, so I can see and am aware of the remarkable growth of the university. And as an ex-sports announcer, I've also been following the Wildcats' victories in basketball. Now, it just happens that football was my game, and I know that there have been some trials and shall, I say, some misfortunes in football. You've tasted the agony of defeat. And I know that taste. And by coincidence, when I knew that taste, I was wearing a purple jersey at the time. But I happen to be a believer in ``purple power,'' so go out there and turn it around. Your State motto says, Ad astra per aspera -- to the stars through difficulties.

My other honor today is joining you in paying tribute to an outstanding American -- a wise, effective, and revered leader, and a personal friend. And you know, in all my years in Hollywood, I was never a song and dance man; that's how I wound up an after-dinner speaker. [Laughter] But I just wonder if we couldn't all sing ``Happy Birthday'' to the best darn horseback rider in the State of Kansas -- Governor Alf Landon.

Governor, if you'd invite me back here to speak 5 years from now and if I should happen to be still living in the White House, you could join me on Air Force One, and we'd light the candles on your 100th birthday cake in Washington so all of America could join in the celebration.

But today I want to talk about our challenge to take freedom's next step and lift mankind another rung on the ladder of human progress. And if you detected a note of optimism in those words, you read me right.

I do not dismiss the dangers of big deficits, nuclear conflict, or international terrorism. Each could destroy us if we fail to deal with them decisively. But we can and will prevail if we have the faith and the courage to believe in ourselves and in our ability to perform great deeds, as we have throughout our history.

Let's reject the nonsense that America is doomed to decline, the world sliding toward disaster no matter what we do. Like death and taxes, the doomcriers will always be with us. And they'll always be wrong about America.

Let me, if I could, just jog your memories for a moment. It was just a short time ago when those doomcriers were telling us that food and fuel supplies were running out. It was only a question of time before famine and misery would engulf America and the world. Price increases in America, they predicted, would zoom up at double-digit rates for the rest of this decade. The price of crude oil would race to $100 a barrel. Interest rates would break all the old records and soar to 25 or 30 percent or even higher. Runaway inflation and interest rates would break the back of the free enterprise system, destroy the value of our currency, the savings of our people, and the ability of our country to project power, promote freedom, and defend peace.

But already Americans are proving every one of those predictions wrong. So many so-called experts lack faith in the American people. They just don't seem to understand there is no limit to what a proud, free people can achieve. We see it here, where the first plow turned the prairie sod and the prairie became a fertile wonder of the world. I'm told that in 1820 a farmworker produced enough food products for himself and three other people; today he feeds 77.

We're not running out of food and fuel, because we haven't run out of ideas. We're going to feed the world. We're developing new energy resources. Last year we discovered more crude oil than any time in the last 12 years. We've declared war on high interest rates and inflation, and we're winning that war. The American dollar is no longer a condemned currency; it's sought again as a rock of strength and stability. In the last 2 years, it has risen about 25 percent against other major currencies. And yet, I can remember just a short time ago a friend returning from a trip abroad very depressed. He told me what a blow it was and how he felt, because at that time he was in places abroad where they refused to accept American money; they had lost such confidence in it.

Across the world, Americans are bringing light where there was darkness, heat where there was once only cold, and medicines where there was sickness and disease, food where there was hunger, wealth where humanity was living in squalor, and peace where there was only death and bloodshed.

So many delight in downgrading everything American when there is so much in our land to be proud of. We don't occupy any countries. We build no walls to keep our people in. But we provide more food assistance around the globe than all the other nations combined. And no other nation works harder -- or, I might add, more effectively -- than the United States to end bloodshed and suffering and bring about lasting peace in troubled areas like the Middle East.

Yes, we face awesome problems. But we can be proud of the red, white, and blue, and believe in her mission. In a world wracked by hatred, economic crisis, and political tension, America remains mankind's best hope. The eyes of mankind are on us, counting on us to protect the peace, promote new prosperity, and provide for them a better world. And all this we can do if we remember the great gifts of our Revolution: that we are one Nation under God, believing in liberty and justice for all.

Well, let this be our banner. But to be freedom's protector, to be a force for good, we must, above all, be strong. And to be strong, we must offer leadership at all levels of government, in our communities, in our families. We must mobilize every asset we have -- spiritual, moral, educational, economic, and military -- in a crusade for national renewal.

We must restore to their place of honor the bedrock values handed down by families to serve as society's compass. Our time-tested values have never failed us when we've had the courage to live up to them. Speaking here 15 years ago, I was asked, following the speech, a question from the audience, if our young people of that day were not turning away from our traditional values. And I replied that maybe those young people just didn't think we were living up to them. There was a roar of approval from the students present that indicated agreement. They hadn't abandoned those values; they just didn't think that our older generation cared any more. So, it's up to us to make sure they realize we do.

Today I wonder sometimes if we're infecting another generation with negativism. When the tough but necessary decisions to cut back on spending are made, they're described so often in negative terms -- how much less government will spend, how many fewer benefits will be given away, how many fewer programs will survive. But cutting back on the runaway growth of government can be a profoundly positive step, like performing necessary surgery on a patient to save his life.

This Federal Government of ours, by trying to do too much, has undercut the ability of individual people, of communities, churches, and businesses to meet the real needs of society as Americans always have met them in the past.

For nearly 50 years, those who have taken unto themselves the label ``liberal'' have argued that government has a duty to help people solve their problems -- which it does. Conservatives, on the other hand, have argued that such help can be a threat to individual freedom -- which it can. Both sides seem to agree that the two main categories of American society are government and the individual -- and never the twain shall meet.

But from our earliest days, there have been other crucial dimensions of our society that transcend these narrow labels. Look around you: There's so much more to America than government on the one hand and individuals with nowhere to turn for help but to government on the other. Between the government and the individual, there are a great number of natural, voluntary organizations which people form for themselves -- like the family, the church, the neighborhood, and the workplace, where people learn, grow, help, and prosper. And even individual citizens and institutions like the thing that I have just read -- the announcement of the largest Federal savings and loan here in Kansas which has reduced the interest rates for home mortgages down to where, once again, maybe something can happen in the homebuilding industry and people can again live that American dream of owning their own home.

The ultimate and overwhelming positive goal of my administration is to put limits on the power of government, yes, but to do it so that we liberate the powers and the real source of our national genius which will make us great again.

I said that we were a nation under God. I've always believed that this blessed land was set apart in a special way, that some divine plan placed this great continent here between the oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth who had a special love for freedom and the courage to uproot themselves, leave homeland and friends to come to a strange land, and where, coming here, they have created something new in all the history of mankind -- a land where man is not beholden to government; government is beholden to man.

Government exists to ensure that liberty does not become license to prey on each other. We haven't been perfect in living up to that ideal, but we've come a long way since those first settlers reached these shores asking nothing more than the freedom to worship God. They asked that He would work His will in our daily lives, so America would be a land of fairness, morality, justice, and compassion.

There was a conviction that standards of right and wrong do exist and must be lived up to. The institutions of family, community, and school would play critical roles in the shaping of character, the acquisition of knowledge, and the search for truth. We passed thousands and thousands of laws in our two centuries as a nation -- millions, maybe -- and yet if we simply adhere to the Ten Commandments that Moses brought down from the mountains -- and he didn't just bring down 10 suggestions -- and the admonition of the Man from Galilee to do unto others as you would have them do unto you, we could solve an awful lot of problems with a lot less government.

Our first President, George Washington, Father of our Country, shaper of the Constitution, and truly a wise man, believed that religion, morality, and brotherhood were the essential pillars of society, and he said you couldn't have morality without the basis of religion. And yet today we're told that to protect the first amendment we must expel God, the very source of our knowledge, from our children's classrooms. One court has recently ruled that in one place in our land children cannot say grace on their own in the school cafeteria before they eat. Now this was done as being in accord with the Constitution. But was the first amendment written to protect the American people from religion, or was it written to protect religion from government tyranny? No one will ever convince me that a moment of voluntary prayer can harm a child or threaten a school or a state. From the beginning of this administration, I've made it clear that I believe America's children have the right to begin their day the same way the Members of the United States Congress do -- with prayer.

The time has come for this Congress to give a majority of American families what they want for their children, a constitutional amendment that will make it unequivocally clear that children can hold voluntary prayer in their schools. Now I urge the Congress to work with me in passing an amendment that we can send to the States for ratification.

I know now what I'm about to say will be very controversial, but I also believe that God's greatest gift is human life and that we have a sacred duty to protect the innocent human life of an unborn child. Now I realize that this view is not shared by all. But out of all the debate on this subject has come one undisputed fact, and this, out of the debate, has been the uncertainty of when life begins. And I just happen to believe that simple morality dictates that unless and until someone can prove the unborn human is not alive, we must give it the benefit of the doubt and assume it is.

As a nation, we're struggling to guide ourselves safely through stormy seas. We need all the help we can get. I think the American people are hungry for a spiritual revival. More and more of us are beginning to sense that we can't have it both ways. We can't expect God to protect us in a crisis and just leave him over there on the shelf in our day-to-day living. I wonder if sometimes if he isn't waiting for us to wake up and that he isn't maybe running out of patience.

Within our families, neighborhoods, schools, and businesses let us continue to reach out, renewing our spirit of friendship, community service, and caring for the needy -- a spirit that flows like a deep and mighty river through the history of our nation. But to the lawbreakers and drug peddlers who would harm and prey on innocent citizens, who make our people live in fear, we also have a message: We will demand justice, and justice includes swift and sure punishment for the guilty.

You know, someone once asked, ``Which role will you play? Will you be the wrecker who walks your town, content with the labor of tearing down, or will you be the builder who works with care that your town may be better because you've been there? '' With the caliber of leadership from people like your president, Duane Acker, KSU's answer is loud and clear. You have every right to be proud.

Let me give you another example of a down-home, private sector initiative that impressed me very much. Just recently -- I mentioned the savings and loan,the Federal savings and loan here -- but just recently 25 Kentucky banks voluntarily reduced their prime lending rate to around 12 percent, so local borrowers would have more investment capital to create jobs, and families could afford home mortgages. The banks also challenged other State banks to do the same. Imagine how many jobs could be created if the number of banks in America making that kind of voluntary gesture was not 25, but 50 times 25.

As we lift our spirits, we must continue to lift the yoke of economic oppression that has penalized hard-working families, weakening our strength, threatening our security in the last 19 months or longer than that. I just started in the next sentence too early without a period. [Laughter] In the last 19 months, a coalition of Republicans and Democrats has begun to rein in a government that is careening out of control, pushing us toward economic collapse and, quite probably, the end of our way of life. This is no exaggeration. Over a 22-year period, the Federal Government has managed to balance the budget only once. It has increased spending more than 600 percent, increased taxes more than 500 percent, and mortgaged our future by pushing the national debt over $1 trillion.

Yes, recovery has been sighted, but these statistics that I just mentioned are cold comfort to someone who is still out of work. Unfortunately, unemployment is just about the last indicator to turn around after a recession. The other problem is: Unemployment has been gaining on us for years. Since 1976 the unemployment rate in this country has averaged over 7 percent, far higher than in earlier, postwar years. High inflation and interest rates pushed more and more families to seek a second income. To charge that our administration is trying to reduce inflation on the backs of the unemployed is to stand truth on its head. More than anything else, it was those record interest rates and double-digit inflation that led inevitably to this recession -- and it started quite a while ago -- and that's what we're trying so hard to turn around. And until we do, we have a responsibility.

You may have read the passage in the Psalms which says: ``Weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.'' The American people have endured a long and terrible night, lasting more than a decade and filled with one economic disappointment after another. And today, that long night is ending. We will see a new dawn of hope and opportunities for all our people.

With the help of your senior Senator, Bob Dole, we've just passed a tax reform and spending reduction bill that, along with the budget resolution, can reduce projected deficits by nearly $380 billion over the next 3 years. And we've done this without canceling the tax cut passed last year, which will save taxpayers $335 billion in those same 3 years. That means the average family next year will pay $788 less in personal income taxes. But we still have one major hurdle to clear. We must summon the courage to get control of the spending programs which have been the major cause in recent years of budget hemorrhaging and spiraling deficits and the high interest rates.

Well, it seems to me that Republicans and Democrats alike want an end to runaway government spending, even if that means pruning some popular programs. The people have something that is often in short supply in government -- common sense. And they understand that making this government live within its means will ultimately do more to protect their earnings, bring down interest rates, and put our unemployed back to work than anything else we could do.

There's one other goal on the horizon that we should all work together to reach. We should go much further in reducing tax rates and make that whole jigsaw puzzle of a tax system more simple and fair for all. I had someone make out my income tax, and when I read it, all made out, I couldn't understand it.

Everything we're trying to do -- from eliminating wasteful spending and regulations, to reducing tax rates and returning power and resources to the States and communities and honoring the roles of families, churches, and schools -- boils down to putting you, the American people, back in charge of your country again. We want you to enjoy more opportunities and to have a much greater say in shaping America's future.

Apply that philosophy to agriculture. American farmers were hurt badly and still have not recovered from the disruption their markets suffered from the grain embargo against the Soviet Union. We believe that government's proper role is to act as friend, partner, and promoter of American farmers and their products around the world. And, as promised, we lifted the embargo.

Again, I want to salute Kansas State University for its invaluable research efforts and the many contributions that it makes with such programs as International Grains and the Food and Feed Grain Institute. Looking to the future, big challenges await us in the growing markets of high-valued products and in the development and mastery of electronics in the agricultural field.

We're a peaceful country. We seek a more peaceful world, where liberty and enterprise can flourish, bring greater fulfillment to people who are now deprived and oppressed. On the recent trip to Europe, I had the privilege of personally promising His Eminence Pope John Paul II that America will do everything possible for peace and for genuine arms reduction.

But to keep the peace and to keep our freedom, we must stay strong. I have seen in my lifetime, and many of you in yours, how despots took the world to the brink because they thought the spark of freedom had died in our hearts. Sons and daughters of Kansas, as well as the rest of our country, brave war heroes like Bob Dole, proved how wrong those despots were.

To those today who would charge us with being imperialistic or warmongering, let them be reminded of a little history. After World War II, we were the last great power undamaged by the war, our industry intact. We occupied Germany and Japan, our erstwhile enemies. We alone had the ultimate weapon, the atom bomb. We could have very easily dominated the world. But that's not what America's all about. We used our power as a force for good, to take freedom's next step, and with our Marshall plan lift mankind another rung. And we applied it to our erstwhile enemies as well as to our friends.

Well we can do that again, and as you have before, you can help us by leading the way. You have a special gift. I remember how the historian Carl Becker wrote about his first visit to your State, to Kansas. He didn't want to come. He missed the green hills of New England. He sat on the train and described the ``dreary yards'' of Kansas City. But then he noticed a young girl gazing silently out the train window for a long, long time. And finally she turned to her companion, and with deep feeling said just three words: ``Dear old Kansas.'' And it was then that Becker said that he realized Kansas is a State, a philosophy, a religion, and a way of life, all in one.

You have within you a deep well of goodness, strength, and inner peace that can carry America forward. And I know you will. And to all of the young people who are here today, we not only have faith in you and are going to welcome you out into this society of ours to help with the problems, but there are some of us that hope with all our hearts that we can start making payments on that massive debt so that you and those who come behind you will know that we don't intend to selfishly leave it all to you.

Note: The President spoke at 11:16 a.m. in the Ahearn Field House and Gymnasium at the university in Manhattan, Kans., following remarks by Governor John Carlin and Dr. Duane Acker, president of the university. Following his remarks, the President was joined at the podium by Governor Landon for the presentation to the President of a saddle blanket by Bill Rogenmoser, president of the student body.

I was deeply saddened last Saturday, as I'm sure all of you were, when I learned that we had lost a fine and a great statesman, typical of the kind of men and women that Kansas contributes to our nation, a good friend, Keith Sebelius. I know that his wife and all of you here in Kansas must be very proud and must miss very much this fine man. We're united today around the principles that he fought for for six terms in Congress.

We have started, and I think in this less than 2 years -- it's been about 20 months now -- I think that this party, because it has been a team effort right from the grassroots, from all of you who've done the work, for all of you who have, when it was necessary, contacted Representatives as to what you wanted -- have made a start that I don't think any of us in our wildest dreams thought could have been made in just this short 20 months.

The taxes had doubled in the last few years before we got there. The interest rates were 21\1/2\ percent. Inflation had been double digit for 2 years in a row, and was then at 12.4 percent. There were other things that were going on.

Unemployment -- bad as it is today, and it is bad, and it's worse than it was. The only thing that we can say is it had been steadily coming on, an increase in unemployment, since 1976, showing that there was something basically wrong in the pattern that was being followed. And it was almost 8 percent by the time our administration started. Yes, now it is at 9.8 percent, and it is tragically the last thing that recovers when you come out of a recession.

Well, now that increase in the rate of spending by government is down to less than half of what it was 20 months ago. The interest rate is 13\1/2\. And if you think I wasn't happy this morning on the way in, to see the Topeka Capital-Journal, where the Capital Federal lowers the new home mortgage rate to 12\3/4\ percent, well below the figure that it's been before. Henry Bubb is doing his bit there -- because one of the great sources of unemployment in our country is the slack in the housing industry that has been created by the high interest rates -- to once again bring back and help bring back that dream of everyone owning a home.

Congress -- another one from another district, but we'll talk about the one, Morris Kay, who is here for this district, and why we need them so much. In addition to some of the things that I've just mentioned that have taken place in Washington -- a whole turn -- when you stop and realize that for almost 20 months -- after 20 years of government debating how much it was going to spend on what -- for 20 months, the argument and the debate in Washington is over how much we're going to cut. No, we didn't get all the cuts we asked for -- not in the give-and-take of the legislative process. But when you come up with about 80 percent of what you asked for, you figure you'll come back next year and pick up the rest, plus some more which we're going to do in 1983 and in 1984.

I know that your candidate for Governor, Sam Hardage -- I know that his opponent, the incumbent, suggests that the way out of the economic problems for Kansas State government is a tax or taxes. Sam Hardage says you can do it by reducing wasteful spending. Well, I'm heart and soul with him on that. I know that to improve the business climate, to encourage more business activity here in the State and more to come to this State, he's formed, already, a commission of citizens to find out ways to improve the business climate.

All they needed was to find out that someone needed them and wanted them to come in. And we had, for 117 days, more than 250 volunteers from the business community, the top experts in their fields, who went into 64 agencies and departments of State government and came back and told us how government could be made more economical and more efficient by adopting modern business practices which government had not done.

Well, let me tell you something about the Federal Government and why we need Morris Kay there at that end. We have just had a report in our Cabinet Room after all that we've done in the 20 months and the cutting back in big spending programs. But we have been surveying -- and with help from the private sector -- the machinery of Federal Government. And we have discovered where there are literally thousands of people doing by hand what in every business institution in America is now being done electronically. We have found that the business practices are from another age, and we're going to work on that and make the changes that will not only make government more effective, more efficient, but more economical.

There's been a great deal of talk, and I'm sure it must have disturbed many of you, that in our cutting that we have picked on the helpless, the needy, the poor, and that in some way we're seeking to deprive them of the things that they must have because they have no place else to turn.

They must depend on the rest of us for help. Well, that is not true. What we have really been getting at is the excessive amount of bureaucracy that it takes to deliver a dollar to a needy person or a helpless person in this country. And it takes more than the needy person is getting. The war on poverty created a great new upper-middle class of bureaucrats that found they had a fine career as long as they could keep enough needy people there to justify their existence.

Well, this is going on and, as I say, it's kind of fun. It causes a lot of surprise in Washington. Well, any time you apply common sense in government, it causes some surprise. [Laughter] So, we're going to keep on with that.

Bob Dole, because we discovered after last year's victory in budget cutting and our great -- over a several year period -- tax cut that was to come in installments with the third cut due next year -- and, incidentally, I understand that Morris' opponent doesn't think that you should get that tax cut next year, and he would take it away from you. We'll die in the streets fighting before he does.

Well, we didn't really point out, and I don't think Bob has pointed out, that when we submitted our tax cut program last year, it underwent some changes on the way through the legislative process. The tree had some additional ornaments hung on it. So, many of the things that are in the recent package that was just passed, of budget cuts and tax increases they were called, was getting rid of some of that baggage that we hadn't asked for. And a full third of that tax increase is not an increase at all. It is a plan we have for collecting taxes from people that owe them and are not now paying them.

So, we're going to cut the spending or reduce the deficits over the next 3 years by $380 billion -- is our projection. And thanks to the engineering of Bob Dole and his cohorts there on the Finance Committee, even with this last tax package which caused a great deal of controversy, even with that, your tax cuts over the next 3 years will amount to $335 billion, in addition to the reductions in spending.

The average American today has $400 more in his pocket because of the cuts in taxes so far. Next year that will be $788 for the average citizen. But they have even more than that. Because of the cut in inflation, a family of four with an income of $15,000 has a thousand dollars more purchasing power today, just from the reduction of inflation, than they would have had had inflation stayed at the 12.4 we found when we got there 20 months ago. So, I think that we've been doing a few things.

Secretary Cap Weinberger, who are in the Defense Department going through, doing what I told you we did in California, to see where there are areas in which legitimate savings can be done -- not the kind of savings advocated by our opponents and the kind of savings advocated by Morris' opponent, which would just simply cut out weapons systems and reduce our ability to defend ourselves.

When we took office 20 months ago, on any given day half the airplanes in our military could not fly for lack of spare parts. Almost the same percentage of naval vessels couldn't leave port, either for lack of spare parts and machinery or lack of full crew to send them out.

Switzerland, who are negotiating with the Soviet Union for outright reductions in strategic nuclear weapons. Nuclear freeze, yes -- after we have reduced the number of weapons in the world and reduced the Soviet Union to no more than we, ourselves, have.

But again, to those who say that that is so extravagant, may I point something out: Our defense budget is 29 percent of the total budget, and 53 percent of our budget goes to those social needs, those human needs that help other people who must have help. Well, if we go back to the days of Camelot and to the late John F. Kennedy, his military budget was 46 percent of the total budget, and only 27 percent was being spent on the social needs. And ours is reversed -- 29 percent for military and, as I say, 53 percent for those other needs.

The volunteer military is working. There has been an upgrading in the quality of the young men and women who are enlisting in the service. We have a full complement. We're not short as we've been in the past because, again, in a little spending and with that defense budget, we decided to try and pay the people who wore the uniform to defend their country something commensurate with the job we were expecting of them, instead of treating them as draftees, which they weren't.

Our goal is peace -- world peace. And we can only have it if we show them we have the determination. None of the four wars that I mentioned ever took place because America was too strong; they took place when other people thought that for one reason or another we were unwilling to defend ourselves.

Now, the reason for being here, believe me, please send this man to the statehouse and his runningmate, Dan Thiesen, to help him. Send those others that he's going to need there to help him in that job that has to be done, because the other part of our program, the federalism, that is the program in which we're going to restore the tenth amendment of the Constitution. And that is the amendment that says the Federal Government shall do only those things specifically called for in the Constitution, and all others shall remain with the States and with the people. And it isn't going to work if it just starts out in Washington and you don't have people like this at this end that believe in it and want it and want to make it work. And he will.

And, of course, you know we not only intend to send those functions back that belong, we intend to send the sources of revenue to pay for them. We're not going to just dump them on the States and the local communities.

And you send Morris back there to Washington because you may have suspected that we need a little help in the House of Representatives. [Laughter] We've been doing pretty well over there in the Senate, and in fact, very well. We couldn't have accomplished what we have if we did not have for the first time in twoscore years one house of the Legislature, the Senate.

And now we need that help over there on the House side. We need it because bottled up in committee there in the House right now is the amendment for a balanced budget, which we must have. There's no reason why the Federal Government should be free to spend out of control, beyond its means, knowingly and willingly, and then foist off on our children and grandchildren a trillion-dollar-plus debt.

My dream is that before we leave that place, we will have -- if we could only even have made the first installment on starting to reduce that national debt and let our children know that we don't intend to leave it all to them.

And so we need them. We need their help. We need the other amendments of which I've spoken this morning, the right for prayer in school. I feel, even though it's controversial, that until someone can prove, as I said this morning, that the unborn child is not a living creature, then simple morality dictates that we assume the unborn child is a living creature, and that can be corrected in Washington, also.

Prayer in schools, balanced budget amendment -- all of those things remain to be done, plus the continued whittling down of that giant behemoth, the Federal Government, bringing it back to size and making it just halfway as efficient, if we can, as you are in your daily work and your daily businesses. And there's so much to do, and we just need their help.

The President. Well, because maybe there are more people in the Congress that want to spend than want to save. I'm hopeful with regard to the Senate tomorrow. But however it goes I'm going to keep on doing what I said I would do to the people, and that is, I am going to veto any time there's an attempt to bust the budget. And I promised to curb spending and to maintain the national defense, and I'm going to keep on trying to do that.

Q. Mr. President, you had a delegation of people from the administration on the Hill yesterday trying to work out a compromise that would lower the amount you are willing to accept. How much farther are you prepared to go to get an appropriation bill?

The President. Well, I don't think that's anything to talk about now, although, yes, obviously there were things in that bill I vetoed that I wanted. My own Caribbean Initiative was in there. I dream of the day when maybe Washington gets smart enough to give a President the right of a line-item veto.

Q. Mr. President, how serious a setback is this? This is one appropriations bill at the end of another budget year. Last year you were very frustrated by the budget process. How bad a setback is this one?

The President. I said what I said yesterday. Yes, it's a disappointment. But it doesn't change my mind any about what I'm going to do. I have said and I intend to vote [veto] budget-busting bills, and I will continue to do that.

The President. No, no, not at all. But you ought to be asking questions about this, because I think this is one of the great examples in America today of what we've been talking about -- about what the people could do for themselves if they hadn't been dragooned into believing that government was the only answer to this.

Here is an entire industry, as you can see. It is manned by volunteers, people from the church. The foodstuffs that are here are raised by volunteers, picked by volunteers. They're brought here, they're canned, they're put up in whatever packages are appropriate, and they're used to distribute to those people who have real need here in the State of Utah and all over the country, for that matter -- people from the church. And you wonder why others haven't thought of the same thing and been able to do this same thing -- so much more efficiently with so much less bureaucracy, in fact, virtually no bureaucracy, as compared to government's attempt to do this. This is all available for the needy, and all produced by volunteers.

The President. Yes, when I visited a similar institution as Governor in Sacramento, California, doing much the same thing there, the same group. And in my home State of Illinois, they have a shoe factory that is manned by volunteers from the church.

The President. No, no. That's why we have a task force -- and we have representatives of the task force here, the task force headed by Bill Verity on seeking out ways that -- the Private Initiatives Task Force -- to seek out ways in which the private sector, the people themselves, can meet some of these problems.

I thought Tip O'Neill might have arranged to take me out of circulation for awhile. [Laughter] But now with this badge that they gave me, maybe I can stop some of the highway robbery that's going on in Washington.

You know, it's always a pleasure to come here to your State, but this morning I had an extra pleasure. You know that I've talked for a long time about Americans doing for themselves, about the private initiative, about citizens' groups doing so many things that government thinks only it can do. And I have just toured a cannery -- part of the program of the Latter-day Saints -- they have for meeting the needs of people who must depend on the rest of us in times when they have to have help. And here were people working in this cannery, doing everything that has to be done -- peeling of the tomatoes, and the sorting for those for juice and those for canning, and everything else, and they're all volunteers from the church -- [noting a problem with the sound system] -- Tip is here -- [laughter] -- doing all of that; all of the things that are canned. All of the produce is raised, again, by volunteers from the church, picked by the volunteers from the church, and then brought in, and the church distributes this to people who truly have a need for it. No costly bureaucratic overhead. And those who make this program possible, work at the same time to help the needy among you become self-supportive, while they care for them until that can take place.

Now I know that you're delighted that we have Mrs. Hatch with us today. Maybe you're wondering where the Senator is. Well, we flew out here together yesterday afternoon, and he was to be here and would be speaking to you now. But last evening, word came that the Senate might be short of votes to sustain the veto that I had made of a spending bill, and a bill that I felt could begin to set a pattern for future budget-busting. And without any hesitation, Orrin climbed on a plane and went back to Washington where he was needed. So, your Senators are there, where they voted.

I regret to tell you that his trip proved fruitless. It would have required 31 votes to block the override of the veto. We got just 30 votes, so the veto was overriden. But I want to tell you something: They'd better practice at that because they're going to get a chance to do that every time they send an appropriation down that is over the budget -- I'm going to veto it again.

One of the reasons I came here today -- I'm sure you know how essential it is for all that we're trying to do in Washington and to tell you what Orrin is doing, your Senator, and why you should send him back there. His proposal for a constitutional amendment to balance the budget is one of the most important bills to pass the Senate this year. And I defy anyone to tell me why it doesn't make common sense that the Federal Government should start restricting its spending to be within the limits of its revenues.

Washington. Well, with Orrin Hatch as chairman, that committee now has been responsible for 25 percent of the budget cuts that we got last year. And in addition to that, he serves on the Budget and Judiciary Committees and is a member of the Select Committee on Small Business. He was floor leader of the balanced budget amendment when it passed the Senate. I think he deserves a second term.

Now we've started to turn America to a different course. Do you want to continue on the course of reducing the size and cost and power of the government, or do you want to go back to the course we've been on for the last 30 years of tax-and-spend that led us into the present economic trouble? I think I know your answer.

In Kansas, yesterday, we were informed that one of the top half dozen Federal savings and loan organizations in the country, the Capital Federal Savings and Loan, there, had just brought down its own interest rates to 12\3/4\ for people who wanted to borrow for mortgages and investments.

In Kentucky, 25 banks got together and made loans available at well below the on-going or the present rate of interest for people who wanted to buy automobiles. Ninety-day Treasury notes a few weeks ago were 15\1/2\ interest that we were paying on those notes. Today, it is less than 8.

In the House of Representatives, where we're still a minority, Jim Hansen and Dan Marriott have been instrumental in reducing this burden of government. They played a major role in getting our economic recovery program through the House last year. In all the previous recessions since World War II, the Democrats' leadership had resorted to the quick fix, the artificial stimulants of government spending. And we've had only one balanced budget in 22 years. Our debt is more than a trillion dollars. And after each quick fix, it seemed that there would be a recovery. But in about 2 years, there would be another recession, and it would be deeper and worse than before, with more unemployment and a higher inflation rate.

But the answer lies in a solid recovery that is based on reduced government spending, on a reduction of the percentage of the peoples' earnings that government is taking in taxes, and incentives to get the wheels of industry turning again.

Congressmen helped so much with, as did Orrin and Jake Garn -- Orrin Hatch and Jake Garn -- our opponents said that the program was a failure. But they were a little ahead of themselves, because the program didn't go into effect until last October, and they were saying this in July and August and September.

Well, the first phase went in in October, and already I've told you of the changes that have taken place in inflation and the interest rates and so forth. But there are others. Last month, housing starts went up 34 percent. Four months in a row -- we've had the economic indicators that indicate whether you're coming out of a recession -- for 4 months in a row, they've been going up, and that hasn't happened for a long time. The real earnings of the people, discounting for inflation, the real earnings are going up and have been going up now for the first time in a number of years.

We've been the lowest among the industrial savings [countries] in the ability of our people to save any of the money that they earn. What that means is billions of dollars over a period of time in the capital pool that can be called upon for investment, so that when government has to borrow for the deficit -- we'll still continue for awhile -- we won't be taking all of the money and making it impossible for business to expand and provide the jobs that we need.

In spite of the recent tax reform, which was only an adjustment of the tax cut that was passed last year, you will be getting over the next 3 years $335 billion in additional tax cuts. This year, if it was averaged out, the average person has $400 more in tax savings because of that program than they had before. And next year, even with this tax reform, that will go up to $788. And following that, indexing is to come, which is going to make it impossible for government to profit from inflation by shoving people up into higher income tax brackets just because they get a cost-of-living pay raise. But the measure that we passed a few weeks ago will cut the deficit over these same 3 years by $380 billion.

We're canceling regulations that are unnecessary, that have burdened the American people and business and industry with unwanted and unnecessary paperwork. So far, the task force that's doing that under George Bush has saved the people of this country 200 million man-hours of filling out government forms. So far, it has saved $6 billion.

We have another task force that is working on fraud and waste. They have brought thousands of indictments; they have done thousands of audits; they have found thousands of people receiving government benefit checks who've been dead for 7 years. They have saved, so far, in the last 6 months, $5.8 billion.

Will the foundation of our land still be solid? We've just been building a house of cards on it so far. Today we're returning to the principle that I saw this morning in that cannery and that we are beginning to come back to, and that is the principle of reward for honest toil, living within our means, and paying heed to the spiritual values that have always been the inner strength of America.

Hatch knows that it isn't someone in Washington that he represents; he's not beholden, as possibly his opponent is, to outside special interest groups or a labor hierarchy in the Nation's Capital far away. He is responsible to the workers and the ranchers and the people of this, his own State of Utah. And I can assure you, the people of Utah, that he has your best interests always in mind.

There are other very important problems to be dealt with, and I'll make it fast, because it is beginning to get damp, isn't it? But these are things that perhaps don't have so much to do with the economy. They have to do with our role in the world in regard to peace. I just talked this morning by radiophone to the commander of our marines. They are safely back on board the ships in the 6th Fleet in the Mediterranean now, after the great duty that they performed in Beirut.

And I don't know how many of you noticed, but I was very proud. It was a multinational force, other forces from other countries went ashore as did ours, and that's fine. But ours was the only force that when it landed did not raise the American flag on foreign soil. It raised the flag of Lebanon, showing our intention that Lebanon must once again be an independent nation with its own government and in charge of its own affairs.

But there are other matters that all of us up here must take up. The matter of prayer in schools. I don't think God should ever have been expelled. There is that balanced budget amendment that we must have. There is tuition tax credits for those parents who are sending their children, perhaps, to a church school or an independent school at the same time they pay the full burden for supporting the public school. And I think they should get some recognition of that fact and some relief for the fact that they are supporting two school systems.

And there is another problem very close to my heart: that more than a million unborn children every year are being denied the right to life. And I think it is time that we decide that unless and until someone can prove to us that the unborn are not truly living creatures, then we morally should adopt the principle that they are, until it can be proven otherwise.

In their triumph yesterday when the House overrode my veto, the leadership, Tip O'Neill and his cohorts, went public with their statements that I was hard-hearted and that they were standing in the way of my imposing on the poor and the needy and so forth. Well, what do they think that their inflation over these last 30 years has done to the poor? I know this: that our reduction of inflation has made a family at the poverty level have $400 more in purchasing power than they had before inflation went down. The best social reform program in the world is a job. And the best way to help the people of this country is to stop taking excessive percentages of their earnings away from them and to allow them not only to keep their earnings and to have a job to work at but to see that the dollar that they've put in their savings is worth as much 2 or 3 years from now as it was when they put it in, and not having 10 cents or 12 cents in value taken off every year by way of inflation.

Well, these are some of the things we're trying to do and some of the things that I think so far we've been succeeding in doing, but let me make it plain: We couldn't do a single thing without your support and help. It is you, the people. And when they hear in Washington from you, the people, they heed what it is you want.

Very simply, the policy of our administration is: This government of ours was created to be a convenience for the people, serving at the behest of the people. It was not supposed to be the master of the people. And we're going to get it back to being as convenient as we can and get rid of that master complex as quickly as we can. We owe that much to all of you for your having sent us there.

Today I want to talk with you about a subject that's been very much on my mind, even as we've been busy with budgets, interest rates, and legislation. It's a subject I know you've been thinking about too -- crime in our society.

You have every right to be concerned. We live in the midst of a crime epidemic that took the lives of more than 22,000 people last year and has touched nearly one-third of American households, costing them about $8.8 billion per year in financial losses.

During the past decade alone, violent crime rose by nearly 60 percent. Study after study shows that most serious crimes are the work of a relatively small group of hardened criminals. Let me give you an example -- subway crime in New York City. Transit police there estimate that only 500 habitual criminal offenders are responsible for nearly half the crimes in New York's subways last year.

It's time to get these hardened criminals off the street and into jail. The primary responsibility for dealing with these career criminals must, of course, rest with local and State authorities. But I want you to know that this administration, even as it has been battling our economic problems, is taking important action on the Federal level to fight crime.

We can and must make improvements in the way our courts deal with crime. The administration-backed omnibus anticrime bill, introduced in the Congress last year and given important leadership by men such as Senator Thurmond, would help to achieve this vital goal by cracking down on hardened criminals through important legal reforms. These include revising the bail system so that dangerous offenders, and especially big-time drug pushers, can be kept off our streets.

We also want to stop abuse of the parole system by making jail sentences more certain. And we've been pushing for stronger criminal forfeiture laws, a powerful weapon that would take a lot of the profit out of drug pushing and other forms of organized crime. We've also asked the Congress for tougher Federal penalties for drug trafficking.

Other important legislation would require a judge to take into account the suffering of the victim when it comes time to sentence a criminal, would make it a Federal crime to kill, kidnap, or assault senior Federal officials, and would extend the ability of the Federal Government to transfer property to the States, free of charge, for use as prison facilities.

The day after tomorrow, Monday, I will send to the Congress another package of major anticrime measures. These will include suggested revisions of the exclusionary rule. Now, this is the rule that can force a judge to throw out of court on the basis of a small technicality an entire case, no matter how guilty the defendant or how heinous the crime. Our bill would stop this grievous miscarriage of justice by allowing evidence to be introduced where the police officer was acting in good faith. This position has already been taken by some enlightened Federal judges, and I'm asking the Congress to make it the law of the land.

The measures I send to the Congress Monday will also include important revisions of Federal procedure that will cut down on interference by Federal courts in State criminal proceedings and reduce the great number of cases which now overburden our court system and slow the wheels of justice.

I wish there was more time to talk with you about these steps and many others we're taking, such as our national strategy for fighting drug abuse. I'll have to save that for some of our future get-togethers. But in the meantime, I hope we can count on your support in our war on crime and our efforts to protect the innocent and put the professional criminals in jail where they belong.

For most of the period since the Beirut agreement was reached last month, all parties have demonstrated considerable restraint in their military activities. However, in the past week there have been a growing number of incidents which can only harm the chances for advancing the peace process.

During the coming days, Ambassador Morris Draper will be meeting with the parties to discuss ways to reduce the tension still remaining in Lebanon and to help strengthen the authority of the central Lebanese Government.

Since the early days of this administration, we've been working to make America a safer place for all our citizens. Last year we launched the Attorney General's task force on crime. Based on their proposals, we worked with the Senate Judiciary Committee to develop an omnibus anticrime package which revises the bail and parole systems and requires tougher Federal penalties for drug trafficking. The measure also requires a judge to take into account the suffering of the victims when it comes time to sentence a criminal.

On other fronts, we've appointed a Task Force on Victims of Crime. And that group will begin hearings this week here in Washington. In the near future, you'll also be hearing more from us about what we can do to stem narcotics crime.

Today, we're sending to the Congress another important installment in our fight against crime. It's a legislative package that I believe offers great hope for improvements in the way that our courts handle criminal cases. These measures will simplify the justice system and make it more likely that those who commit crimes pay a price. The American people want a system of justice they can understand and they can have confidence in. And this is our goal, as well. Working with the Congress, I believe we can deliver a serious blow to the criminal elements in our society.

Crime is clearly one of the most serious problems we face today. Crime -- and the fear of crime -- affect the lives of most Americans. Government's inability to deal effectively with crime diminishes the public's confidence in our system of government as a whole. Last year alone, one out of every three households in the country fell victim to some form of serious crime. By 1981, according to one survey, nearly eight of ten Americans did not believe that our system of law enforcement discouraged people from committing crimes -- a fifty percent increase in just the last fifteen years.

That important legislative initiative addresses many of our most pressing needs: bail reform, victim-witness protection, strengthened drug penalties, protection of federal officials, sentencing reform, expanded criminal forfeiture, donation of surplus federal property to State and local governments for needed correctional facilities, and a series of miscellaneous improvements in federal criminal laws.

The attached legislative proposal that I am now submitting would reform three additional areas of federal law affecting the criminal justice system. First, it would limit the insanity defense so that only those who did not have the mental state which is an element of their crime would escape responsibility for their acts. Second, the proposal would reform the exclusionary rule to prevent the suppression of evidence seized by an officer acting in the reasonable, good faith belief that his actions complied with law. Although the argument for retaining the exclusionary rule in any form is, at best, tenuous, this proposal eliminates application of the rule in those cases in which it most clearly has no deterrent effect. Finally, the bill would reform federal habeas corpus review of State adjudications to ensure greater deference to full and fair State judicial proceedings and to limit the time within which habeas corpus proceedings may be initiated. Habeas corpus reform would conserve scarce federal and State judicial and prosecutorial resources.

This new proposal and the Violent Crime and Drug Enforcement Improvements Act of 1982 represent a legislative program to protect all our citizens. These are not partisan initiatives. They are far too important to the Nation's well-being. In my view, they provide the basis for a renewed effort against the menace of crime. They will help restore the balance between the forces of law and the forces of lawlessness. I join with all Americans in urging the Congress to give both these legislative proposals its immediate attention and to begin the process of reclaiming our communities from criminals.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Edmund Stohr to be the Representative of the United States on the Council of the International Civil Aviation Organization. He would succeed John E. Downs.

One of the greatest challenges facing our Nation is to make careful and wise use of our natural resources. At the same time, we must protect other national treasures -- wild, free-flowing rivers and wilderness areas -- for this and future generations to enjoy in their natural, undeveloped state.

The comprehensive bill that I am transmitting today to add these rivers to the System will also make changes to the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act to enhance our ability to manage such rivers efficiently and effectively.

System. These include portions of the San Francisco River in Arizona, the Moyie River in Idaho, and the Salt River in Arizona. Finally, after reviewing the Elkhorn Wilderness Study Area in Montana, the Secretary of Agriculture has determined that this area is not suitable for inclusion in the National Wilderness Preservation System.

Interior and Agriculture regarding all of these rivers and wilderness proposals. I concur in all of these recommendations, and urge the Congress to act expeditiously and favorably on the proposed legislation, so that the natural resources of these areas may be protected and preserved.

Our best research shows that both the supportive atmosphere parents create at home and the high expectations of motivated teachers will find positive expression in the academic achievements of students.

Within our parent-teacher associations across the Nation, the combined concern of parents and teachers focuses on encouraging excellence in the education of our children. The National Parent Teacher Association, representing over twenty-nine thousand State and local units with more than six million active members, is a volunteer organization that has made substantial contributions to that goal. The ultimate beneficiary is the Nation itself, through enhanced student achievement and a citizenry better prepared for its future.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th. day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Of these objectives, employment is one of the most important. To lead more successful lives, disabled Americans must be part of the work force. Progress has been made; many more employers are hiring these quality workers. These employers are part of the growing number who realize they are not ``giving'' someone a job, but increasing the value of their company or business by hiring a dedicated, skilled employee.

Despite these advances, employment of disabled men and women lags behind that of the general working-age population. There is an urgent need for the private sector to take the lead in offering jobs that provide individual dignity and enable disabled men and women to support their families.

There is also a need for state and local governments to employ fresh approaches and renewed energy in cooperation with the private sector to expand handicapped employment opportunities, and for the Federal government to streamline regulations in order to afford maximum benefit for handicapped persons with a minimum of administrative burden.

We need to affirm the dignity and worth of all people in our society, whether or not they suffer from physical or mental disabilities, and we must firmly reject attitudes that deny the worth of handicapped individuals.

I urge all governors, mayors, other public officials, leaders in business and labor, and private citizens to help meet the challenge of the future by ensuring that disabled people have the opportunity to participate fully in the economic life of the Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th. day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Hospice provides a humanitarian way for a terminally ill patient to approach death with dignity, in relative comfort in a supportive atmosphere, and surrounded by family members. Its most important element is concern for patients and their families. Hospice advocates personal care and concern, living comfortably until death, the absence of pain, maintenance of personal control, and the close fellowship of the family unit.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th. day of Sept, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The wisdom and foresight of our Founding Fathers set in motion the greatness of America and the personal liberties we enjoy today. These blessings have thrived because of the value succeeding generations have placed on knowledge and education. For this reason alone, few matters are as critical to the future of our country than the continued success of our educational system.

Part of our national strength is the fact that parents have the right to oversee their children's education. While our states provide public schools and state and local educators assist parents in achieving educational goals, it is clearly the right and duty of parents to supervise these functions.

Schools.'' Every American should take this theme to heart and give renewed support to our schools, be they public, private, or synagogue or church-affiliated. Strong community support results in effective schools. Effective schools help assure that our democratic society will flourish.

These members shall have particular knowledge and expertise in the field of telecommunications and represent elements of the Nation's telecommunications industry. Members of the Committee shall be appointed by the President.

The President. Well, this is Ronald Reagan. And, Alex, I'm kind of familiar with the place where you are right now. I played football a few times there in Bloomington against Illinois Wesleyan a long time ago. But now as honorary president of the Boy Scouts of America, it's a pleasure to join with all those gathered in Bloomington today to congratulate you on becoming the 1 millionth Eagle Scout in our nation's history.

The President. Well, listen, this accomplishment not only represents a major achievement in your own life, but it also demonstrates the important contribution that scouting continues to provide to so many young people. You, I know, must be very proud. And, indeed, you should be very proud of this outstanding honor, as I'm sure your parents and your friends are.

The President. Well, your hard work and high ideals have carried you on a successful journey through the ranks of scouting. And along the way, I know you've learned many valuable lessons and have built a framework on which to constructively lead the rest of your life.

The Eagle Award is the Boy Scouts' top advancement award and has been earned by only 2.5 percent of those young men who enroll. It was first awarded in 1912. Alex Holsinger is an eighth grade honor student from Normal, Ill. For his service project, a part of the Eagle Award requirements, he directed the restoration of an abandoned and historic cemetery in Shirley, Ill.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Richard T. Kennedy to be Ambassador at Large. Mr. Kennedy will serve as Special Adviser to the Secretary of State on NonProliferation Policy and Nuclear Energy Affairs and will coordinate and direct U.S. nonproliferation efforts.

Mr. Meese.  [Edwin Meese III, Counsellor to the President]  Mr. President, we've just been having a discussion that's kind of a follow-on to your speech in Kansas on American values, and we've discussed some of the legislative issues that are related to those values. So, you might want to say a few words yourself on the subject.

The President. Well, all right. Yes, I will. I think my timing is terrible, though. As an after-lunch and after-dinner speaker, I can tell you that one of the great hazards that always drives me up the wall -- I happen to be a dessert man myself. [Laughter] And usually I hear the toastmaster introducing me just as they're putting the dessert in front of me, and I have to get up and walk away from it. [Laughter] I feel as if I've done that to you. But go ahead and, please, go ahead and eat while we're talking.

I'm delighted that you're all here, and I know that you've been briefed and had a briefing on the subject of our legislation for tuition tax credits. And I expect to make another strike and try for a breakthrough in that today and hope to get it out of the Senate committee and onto the floor, because I'll be meeting very shortly with Senators Dole and Moynihan and Roth and Packwood on this particular subject.

I know there's been a lot of debate and discussion about the issue. I doubt if there's much opposition among you -- I hope not -- to this idea. I don't know whether Ed or Karna [Karna Small Stringer, Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of Media Relations and Planning] told you about a survey that we've just come across, research done in 54 parochial schools, that found with regard to -- I say this as an answer to those people that, again, have just automatically tagged this proposal as ``something for the rich.'' All they think of when they think of private -- that's why I try to avoid the word ``private'' school. I try to refer to it as ``independent'' school, because all they think about is someone sending a child to a high-class, expensive finishing school or prep school. And that isn't true. That isn't what we're really talking about. There are so few of those compared to the general parochial schools, independent schools, throughout the country.

But in this survey of 54 schools, they found 56 percent in these parochial schools of the student body were black; 31 percent of those were Protestant. Now, I know there are Protestant schools represented here as well as the Catholic schools. But what they also learned was -- and the parents, incidentally, of most of these children, the overwhelming majority, are not anywhere up on the economic scale. As a matter of fact, the average tuition of those schools worked out to $300. That was a true hardship at the economic level of the parents who, wanting something better for their children, as parents have from time immemorial, and wanting the best education they could provide for them, were willing to sacrifice and pay a tuition to a private school because they no longer had confidence in the public schools in their areas, that they could get the training that they would need to advance. And they found that it was not religion that had prompted the overwhelming majority to choose a religious school, whether Protestant or Catholic; it was the desire and the belief that they would get a better education there than they could get in the present-day public schools.

Now, I'm a product of the public schools, myself, in a small town in Illinois. But I believe all of us are aware that there have been changes. I happen to believe that as long as there is independent education in this country, all the way from the lowest grade on up through college and university, then we have academic freedom. I would hate to see the day when all education in our country was tax-supported and, therefore, under political guidance and rule. And I think, also, the best chance to improve the quality of education -- which on the record has very definitely established that in public schools, under whatever pressures or crowding or whatever, has slumped in comparison to the schools that we're talking about -- the best chance we have of raising that level is through competition.

The fairness of it -- the fact that families are paying their full share of the taxes to support the public school system and are still willing to sacrifice on top of that and pay fully the cost for sending their child -- there's no way that this can be construed, as some are trying to do, as an assault on the public schools, or that in any way it is taking anything away from the support of the public schools. And if anyone wants to do a little arithmetic, let them sit down and figure out if these independent schools disappeared tomorrow, and the public schools had to pick up the burden of all of the students presently being educated in these other schools, what would happen to the taxes of everyone? Where would the public facilities come from -- school facilities?

So, I've gone on longer than I wanted. If someone here had just -- I know I've only got a second or two before I've got to cross the hall. But if there was a question or two that hasn't been answered in the briefing, or that you'd like to throw at me just because I'm here, fire away.

The President. Well, I have to believe that since this will be a tax credit, and by the government, I have to believe that, obviously, such schools would have to meet the standards of integration and be open to all. And I haven't seen any evidence that that isn't already taking place. The figures that I just gave a moment ago ensure that that's taking place in the schools that we're talking about.

There is financial aid in recent years to some of these schools. And, as a matter of fact, being able to remember when that began, it was the usual thing of the Federal Government claiming that there was distress after the Federal Government had usurped most of the tax sources in the country. And, having created the problem, then, for local rule, the Federal Government said, ``Oh, we must help you.'' And in the beginning educators opposed that, because they thought that it would interfere with academic freedom. And the Federal Government insisted, ``Oh, no.'' It just wanted to help them out financially.

Federal level, and he said they had absolutely no intention of interfering in any way. And some of the educators who were debating this issue had proposed a tax credit idea of contributions to schools, whether public or independent, of a certain amount, and said let the government -- they'd know better -- set the amount. And wouldn't this be direct aid, then, financially? -- a tax credit for a contribution to a school, whether public or private, keeping open the competitive idea. And why wouldn't such a thing work? And after days and days of debate, Mr. Kepple gave away more than he'd intended. He suddenly grew impatient, and he blurted out, ``Well, under such a system we couldn't achieve our social objectives.'' This was from the man that had said there wouldn't be any government social objectives, there would just be financial aid.

No, I think the Federal Government has done what it can to ensure that in the running of the public schools, they must live up to our Constitution, which they did not always do, as we know, and some years ago there had to be some rather drastic action to bring that about. That is the function of the Federal Government -- to ensure that anyone's constitutional rights are being observed and to go wherever the government has to go to see that that does take place.

Federal Government has more than matched its financial aid with interference in the running of schools. And I believe that this is what has led to the deterioration of quality; that the Federal Government has imposed out of all proportion -- I think the Federal Government puts up about 8 percent of the cost of public education, but it interferes far more than 8 percent in the things that it imposes and demands of the public schools.

The President. Well, the one that is presently being blocked by a filibuster I know has been in a sense cluttered up with a lot of extra and extraneous other resolutions, which have weakened support for it, and probably is one of the reasons that we're apparently not able to get cloture to shut off the filibuster. If that continues, then the only outcome can be for the leader of the Senate to table that particular amendment, which then opens the floor for several others that are waiting on that same subject.

My own feeling is I'm going to fight as long and hard as I can. And what I said in Philadelphia recently about that -- I've been a little critical sometimes to myself, not openly, about some of the human life groups, because, first of all, they have not rallied behind a single measure. They've been divided behind these several -- in support of these various, several members, and that's what's kept us from bringing this to the floor and getting a determination.

If we came upon a body in the street that was unconscious, and we weren't sure whether it was unconscious or dead, we wouldn't say, ``Let's bury it.'' We'd wait until someone assured us that it wasn't alive.

And I think the same thing goes of the unborn child. I happen to believe the unborn child is a living human being. I think the fact that children have been prematurely born, even down to the 3-month stage, and have lived to -- the record shows -- to grow up and be normal human beings, that ought to be enough for all of us. And I just don't think there's anything other than self-protection, the protection of the mother's life, that justifies taking of a human life. We condone it in self-defense. We can condone it in no other way. And I'm going to -- I intend to fight it out in that line if it takes all -- [laughing] -- all 4 years.

The President today asked Federal workers in the National Capital area to join wholeheartedly in supporting the Combined Federal Campaign to support nearly 300 private, voluntary health and welfare organizations.

There is no better way for this Nation to invest in its future than by fostering the health of its children. We can best do this by encouraging children to develop good health habits and attitudes and by giving them the protection of immunization. Good health habits and practices begun in childhood are the prelude to positive health throughout life.

Healthy children foreshadow vigorous adults whose communities will benefit from their energy and productivity. All of us should know how the personal choices we make can help prevent disease and promote good health and to transfer this knowledge to our children. By working together, parents, schools, private and voluntary organizations, and government can effect a beneficial and lasting change in the health of our Nation and the lives of our children.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Two hundred and three years ago the Polish and American patriot General Casimir Pulaski fell at the battle of Savannah while fighting for the principles of freedom and equality in our young Nation's struggle for independence. His example of dedication to democratic ideals has provided continuing inspiration to all of us. His name and deeds remain alive in the hearts of the Polish people, never more so than in this difficult time when so many of their basic rights are being denied to them.

In remembrance of General Pulaski's heroic sacrifice and his dedication to the ideals of freedom, we pay tribute to him and to the Polish nation of which he was such an esteemed son. In doing so, we also honor the contributions made by generations of Polish-Americans to the greatness of America.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Second World War. From the outset, the United States, one of the principal architects and founders of the United Nations, has worked to make it a forum for debate among all peace-loving nations and to support its purpose of preventing war and conflict through conciliation and cooperation. Because that goal has not been fully achieved and because the U.N. has been misused, today's world is too often fraught with strife, division, and conflict. But, despite the abuse and shortcomings, the United Nations can still be instrumental in facilitating and overseeing agreements to end conflict, in providing a center for reducing tensions through dialogue and debate, and in addressing the problems of underdevelopment which can spur conflict.

Americans can take pride in having provided significant moral, political, and financial support for the United Nations since its inception. That support will be maintained and the United States will continue to play a prominent role in the organization, using it to champion the values and ideals which underlie our own society and which originally helped to inspire the formation of the United Nations.

As we strive to improve our military preparedness to further our goals of a lasting peace and freedom, we look for special inspiration to our disabled veterans who have so nobly sacrificed for these ideals. Few others have so fully demonstrated great courage or endured such hardships for their country and the cause of liberty.

All Americans owe a great debt of gratitude to the over two million service-disabled veterans. The immense personal adversity suffered by these our fellow countrymen is incalculable in terms of diminished health, lost career opportunities, and restricted personal fulfillment. We are also keenly aware of the substantial tragedy these injuries pose for the families of these veterans who, along with their loved ones, must shoulder the weight of this burden.

The important contributions to the national welfare made by these gallant men and women, not only in their military service but also in their later civilian activities, are a source of pride and admiration to each of us and serve as an illuminating lesson in valor and fortitude.

Monaco because she was a compassionate and gentle lady who had a deep and abiding affection for her adopted country and people. As an American, Princess Grace brought character and elegance to the performing arts and always found time to make important contributions to her craft.

President Reagan today designated Nancy Reagan to lead the United States Delegation to the funeral services for Her Serene Highness, Princess Grace of Monaco, a cherished friend of the First Lady's for many years.

The news of the cowardly assassination of Bashir Gemayel, President-elect of Lebanon, is a shock to the American people and to civilized men and women everywhere. This promising young leader had brought the light of hope to Lebanon. We condemn the perpetrators of this heinous crime against Lebanon and against the cause of peace in the Middle East. Our deepest sympathy goes to Mrs. Bashir Gemayel and their son, the entire Gemayel family, to President Elias Sarkis, to his government, and to the people of Lebanon. We join with them in mourning.

We have been in frequent touch with senior officials of the Government of Lebanon and with other prominent Lebanese personalities. Our support for their efforts to maintain order should be clear. We have also contacted Israeli officials in Beirut, Washington, and in Israel. They told us that their military moves are limited and precautionary. We have urged they do nothing to increase tensions.

Sarkis, Prime Minister Wazzan, and other Lebanese Government officials to explore ways we can support their efforts to maintain stability. We adhere to the goals we share with the Government of Lebanon of internal unity and withdrawal of all foreign forces.

While we deplore the shocking assassination of President-elect Gemayel, it is essential that we not lose sight of these important objectives which Lebanon has set for itself. The restoration of central government authority remains key to Lebanon's future. We will do everything we can to assist this process through this difficult period in the country's history.

Ambassador Draper has the full support of the President and will continue to work closely with the Government of Lebanon in pursuit of its objectives. Those objectives parallel our own support for: the withdrawal of all foreign military forces from Lebanon; the strengthening of the central government and the reestablishment of its authority throughout Lebanon; the creation of conditions which ensure that Lebanon will never again be a launching pad for attacks against Israel; and the promotion of national unity and reconciliation, along with strengthening of all national institutions, including the army.

I have to let you in on a little secret here. I'm late, and I apologize for being late. You're never supposed to open your remarks with an apology, but I have to. But I've learned a little secret. If you start the day, as I did today, with a meeting with Members of Congress, you are behind schedule for the rest of the day. [Laughter] And it's been that way so far.

We're delighted to celebrate with you National Hispanic Heritage Week, honoring the many contributions that Hispanic men and women have made to American history. The many Hispanics who've come here as immigrants, as well as those who've been born and raised here, have greatly enriched our culture and given fresh vibrancy to our national life.

Castillo rang the bells in his village church to announce the peoples' desire for freedom. We're told that he didn't live to see his victory. But the sound of those bells still rings today in the hearts of all freedom-loving peoples around the world. I know it rings in your hearts.

American Hispanics are bound by strong ties of language, religion, family, and culture. In your lives, you demonstrate the importance of real work: producing things of real value, building communities of shared values that enrich America and keep us strong and free. You work long and hard to own your homes, your farms, and business enterprises -- your piece of America.

And when America's been threatened by dark clouds of war, Hispanics defended our nation with pride and courage. Thirty-seven of them have received the Congressional Medal of Honor, America's highest military decoration, given only for service above and beyond the call of duty.

Incidentally, on our way over to the Pentagon for that ceremony, he was telling me of the incident. He saved eight wounded men's lives, going under enemy fire to bring them one-by-one to a rescue helicopter. He was shot four times and finally was attacked hand-to-hand by a man with a rifle and a bayonet that he had to fight off, after he put down the wounded man he was carrying. And when we were talking about this -- and I think you'll appreciate this -- as we were riding over -- and when he was attacked by the man with the rifle and bayonet, he said, ``I'd been shot four times already.'' He said, ``That's when I got mad.'' [Laughter] And he got mad enough to complete that rescue.

We're trying to maintain that position in Washington, or that tradition, with Hispanics playing a major role in our administration since day one. We've already appointed more Hispanic men and women at top-level executive positions, more than 50, than any previous administration.

Your families feel strongly about the moral values maintained by our country's religious school systems. Our tuition tax credit plan will provide relief to the many Hispanic families who send their children to independent schools, while supporting public schools with their taxes.

By extending the Voting Rights Act, we've locked in guarantees of full constitutional and political equality for Hispanic Americans. And getting control of runaway government means hard-working Hispanic families can keep more of the money they earn, and the rate of inflation and interest rates can keep heading in the right direction. They're going down, and they're going to stay down.

Mexico and our other friends to the south. I think we've developed a new rapport with Mexico, based on mutual respect, that is better than any time in the history of our two proud nations. I'm also very enthusiastic about our Caribbean Initiative, which will break down trade barriers and provide new incentives for commerce and economic growth.

We are a nation of freedom, living under God, believing all citizens must have the opportunity to grow, create wealth, and build a better life for those who follow. If we live up to those moral values, we can keep the American dream alive for our children and our grandchildren, and America will remain mankind's best hope. With your help, I know we can and we will.

To tell the truth, though, I hope you never will completely adjust to Washington. A short time here, say 4 years or 8 years -- [laughter] -- can be very educational, even inspiring, can stir your feelings for this great country of ours. It's after that that you have to be careful -- careful that you aren't too willing to accept things as they are, instead of as they should be.

And that came home to me just a little while ago, standing here thinking about the recent crackdown on dissidents in the Soviet Union, repression in Poland, the attack on press freedom in Nicaragua. Yet, here we are and you are with all the wizardry of American technology and, in the robust tradition of American journalism, about to bring something new to the world of communications, a potentially great newspaper. Forgive me, but I can't help but feel that this is a testimony to the kind of dreams free men and women can dream and turn into reality here in America.

A few months ago, I said at a Captive Nations' ceremony in the Rose Garden -- that will take some getting used to, too -- there aren't any rose bushes there. [Laughter] But I said that day to those people that the systematic and growing repression of freedom under Marxist-Leninist regimes was the most important news story of our time. And I still think that's true.

It's a pleasure for Nancy and me to be here with you tonight. We know that you're in the forefront of one of the most important political battles of this election season, and we're with you heart and soul.

Now, I know that there are those who have accused the Republican Party of writing off the black vote. Well, I'm here to tell you that we're not writing off anyone. And, Mr. Claiborne, [Clay J. Claiborne, founder and national director of the National Black Silent Majority Committee of the USA] Maria Montessori once said that if she were trying to climb a ladder and a dog was snapping at her heels -- [laughter] -- she could stop and kick the dog or climb the ladder. And you have encouraged Nancy and myself to keep on climbing the ladder.

I'm sensitive to the unique and sometimes difficult position in which you often find yourselves as black Republicans. What you're doing takes great vision and true courage. Under the superb leadership of individuals like your chairperson, Legree Daniels, black Republicans have been performing above and beyond the call of duty. The rest of us in the GOP are grateful for your commitment and deeply impressed by your tenacity.

For too long now, black Americans seem to have been written off by one party and taken for granted by the other. And for the vast majority of black Americans, that's been a strictly no-win situation. Changing it will require a commitment from all of us. So, tonight I want you to know that the Republican Party stands ready and willing to reach out to black Americans.

This conference is part of that outreach effort, as are the regional conferences and our support for black congressional candidates. And this is only the beginning of the outreach efforts. Perhaps if we failed at anything in the past as Republicans, it's been a failure to let black America know us -- to know our hearts and our sincere dedication to improving the well-being, expanding the opportunity, and protecting the rights of every American. And while there's been a certain lack of communication on our part over the years, the other party seems to have capitalized on the rhetoric of compassion. They don't accomplish much, but they sure do talk about it.

It's time to set the record straight. When I first ran for Governor of California, I ran against an incumbent with impeccable liberal credentials. And then I was elected and discovered that in 8 years, he had made only a handful, a tiny handful of minority appointments, all to relatively minor positions in State government. I figured it was time to play catch-up. I appointed more blacks and other minorities to executive and policymaking positions in State government than all the previous 32 Governors of California put together. And my continued commitment at the national level is no 11th hour conversion.

So far, we have placed blacks in over 130 top executive policymaking positions. But more important, these appointments are not on the basis of color. They have been made because of ability and skill, and they cover a wide range of responsibilities.

When it comes to improving the economic well-being and protecting the rights of all our citizens, our party doesn't play second-fiddle to anyone. When I entered office less than 20 months ago, we were in the midst of an economic catastrophe from which we're just now beginning to recover. All of us were suffering, especially the poor, the elderly, and the disadvantaged. Some of our political leaders were even saying that nothing could be done and that we had to accept a lower standard of living and that America's best days were behind us. Well, to those on the bottom end of the economic ladder, that kind of talk is disaster. It robs them of hope and condemns them to a life of dependency and deprivation.

Our economic hardship is not some kind of mysterious malaise suffered by people who have suddenly lost their vitality. The problem is that the liberal economic policies that dominated America for too long just didn't work. It was not that those in power lacked good intentions; in fact, most of the compassionate rhetoric I mentioned a moment ago was not about accomplishments -- it was about the wonderful intentions of the costly liberal programs. Well, too often the programs didn't do what they were supposed to and in many cases, they made things worse.

The record is there for all to see. This country entered the 1960's having made tremendous strides in reducing poverty. From 1949 until just before the Great Society burst upon the scene in 1964, the percentage of American families living in poverty fell dramatically from nearly 33 percent to only 18 percent. True, the number of blacks living in poverty was still disproportionately high.

With the coming of the Great Society, government began eating away at the underpinnings of the private enterprise system. The big taxers and big spenders in the Congress had started a binge that would slowly change the nature of our society and, even worse, it threatened the character of our people.

By the end of the decade, the situation seemed out of control. At a time when defense spending was decreasing in real dollars, the Federal budget tripled. And, to pay for all of this spending, the tax load increased until it was breaking the backs of working people, destroying incentive, and siphoning off resources needed in the private sector to provide new jobs and opportunity.

Inflation had jumped to double-digit levels. Unemployment was climbing. And interest rates shot through the roof, reaching 21\1/2\ percent shortly before we took office. Perhaps the saddest part of the whole story is that much of this Federal spending was done in the name of helping those it hurt the most, the disadvantaged. For the result of all that big spending and taxing is that, today, those at the lower end of the economic ladder are the hardest hit of all.

It's ironic that if the economic expansion and low inflation of the years prior to the Great Society had been maintained, black families and all Americans would be appreciably better off today. In fact, if we had just maintained the progress made from 1950 through 1965, black family income in 1980 would have been nearly $3,000 higher than it was after 15 years of Great Society programs.

In 1980 the American people sent a message to Washington, D.C. They no longer believed that throwing tax money at a problem was acceptable, no matter how good the intentions of those doing the taxing and spending.

In 1980 the people turned to the Republican Party because we offered hope. Setting things straight would not be an easy job. Bringing back real growth to our economy and real increases in our standard of living would not be easy. But we Republicans knew it could be done, and we still know that. America's best days are not behind her, and we're moving forward to tackle the serious problems just as we said we would.

Having said all that, you can see that 20 months ago, when I started my current job, there were some tough decisions that had to be made. It wasn't easy. But together, we've laid the groundwork for better economic times ahead.

Yes, there have been other indicators saying the economy isn't well yet. But we've managed, despite all the gloom and doom spouted by our opponents, to instill a new spirit of confidence in the country.

Our critics to the contrary, the poor and disadvantaged are better off today than if we had allowed runaway government spending, interest rates and inflation to continue ravaging the American economy. A family of four, for example, on a fixed income of $15,000 would today be $833 poorer, that much weaker in purchasing power, if we hadn't brought inflation alone down as far as we have from the double-digit rates that we inherited. A similar family living at the poverty level would be $472 poorer if inflation had continued at the 12.4 percent rate. It's been 5.4 percent since January.

When one considers that the poor spend most of their family budgets on necessities -- food, shelter, and clothing -- leaving few ways to cut back to beat inflation, the importance of solving inflation is better understood.

It should also be noted that we've taken steps, along with our basic program which is aimed at restoring health to the economy in general, to make certain that economic stimulus is channeled into the areas of greatest economic need.

Since the end of the Second World War, too many of our major cities have become stagnant and depressed, enclaves of despair even when times were good. Federal spending programs didn't make a dent in the problem. For example, from 1965 to 1974, the Federal urban renewal program spent over $7 billion and ended an abysmal failure, destroying more housing units than it replaced.

On March 23d of this year, I proposed a new, experimental approach to the problem -- enterprise zones -- which would harness the energy of the private sector and direct it toward providing economic opportunity for some of our most needy citizens. By removing regulations and offering tax incentives, we seek to accomplish what hundreds of billions of tax dollars and millions of hours of bureaucratic planning failed to do.

The plan seems to have popular support. Fourteen States have already passed their own enterprise zone legislation, not even waiting for action from the Federal level. Hundreds of cities across the country are already mapping out enterprise zone sites. And in a recent survey of Fortune 500 chief executive officers, 67 percent said they would seriously consider investing in the zones after seeing the final version of the legislation. Most of those who responded said they wouldn't have invested in depressed areas before considering the incentives offered by our enterprise zone initiative.

Congress would be anxious to move on an innovative idea to tackle such a serious national problem. Well, think again. The liberal leadership of the House of Representatives has refused to even put the bill before hearings of the main committees responsible for it. The blatant politics surrounding enterprise zone legislation, politics at the expense of some of our most needy citizens, is a disgrace.

The liberals have had a decade to tackle the problem of urban decay and failed. It's time for them to give a chance to some new ideas, even if it runs against their ideological obsession for ever bigger and more expensive government. Or is it the coming election? Do they want the economy to remain stagnant so they can use that as a campaign issue?

Later this month, I'll announce a program which will promote minority business development. Of course, the most important item for minority businessmen, as with all small businessmen, is the tax and regulatory reforms we've instituted over the last 20 months. Yet beyond these, we've committed the Federal Government to promote an economic environment in which minority entrepreneurs can fully marshal their talents and skills to make a go of it in the marketplace.

There are many things that we can do to help minority business take root. Part of this administration's overall initiative for minority enterprise will include a plan for the Federal Government to procure substantial amounts of the goods and services during fiscal years '83, '84, and '85 from minority businessmen -- [applause]. Thank you very much.

And beyond that, we're going to bring the leaders of American industry together with minority businessmen, something that should prove valuable to both parties. This is the type of approach which will strengthen the economic underpinnings of the minority community and strengthen the overall economy as well.

Putting the American economy back on the right track has clearly been the top priority of this administration. But I think it's important for all of us to understand that at the same time we haven't forgotten the Federal commitment to civil rights. Thomas Jefferson once said that no man ever leaves the Presidency with as good a reputation as he brought into the job. [Laughter] Well, that's because even in Jefferson's day there was a constant barrage of wild, politically motivated charges aimed at the man in the White House. Well, usually I try to ignore personal attacks, but one charge I will have to admit strikes at my heart every time I hear it. That's the suggestion that we Republicans are taking a less active approach to protecting the civil rights of all Americans.

There's no room in the Republican Party for bigots, and the record shows that we've been firm in protecting civil liberties ever since entering office nearly 20 months ago. And what we've been doing is nothing new. In 1888 Frederick Douglass, an adviser to President Lincoln and one of the first great black Republicans, expressed our party's commitment at the Republican Convention.

In this administration, I've appointed individuals for whom I have the deepest trust and admiration to head the Department of Justice, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, and the Civil Rights Commission. They are committed, as I am, and as every other member of this administration, to protecting the civil rights of all Americans to the fullest extent of the law. Again I say, look at the record. The level of activity of this administration in investigating and prosecuting those who would attempt to deny blacks their civil liberties by violence and intimidation has exceeded the level of every past administration.

The Department of Justice has, since we came to Washington, filed 62 new cases charging criminal violations of civil rights laws and has conducted trials in 52 cases. And these numbers are greater than those in any previous administration. In addition, the Justice Department has filed nine new antidiscrimination cases against public employers and has reviewed more than 9,000 electoral changes to determine compliance with the Voting Rights Act. And that, too, is a higher level of activity than in any prior administration.

Voting Rights Act since its enactment. As I've said on many occasions, voting is the crown jewel of our liberties, and it's something that we as Republicans and Americans will never permit to be infringed upon.

Under the first full year of this administration, the Commission dramatically increased its activity over the previous year. The number of charges of discrimination processed by the Commission increased by 25 percent. The number of persons assisted through negotiated remedies increased by 15 percent. And total backpay and other compensation provided in negotiated remedies increased by 60 percent.

Similarly, the number of suits filed by the Commission increased by 13 percent. And the number of suits settled by voluntary agreement increased by 25 percent. And in this era of necessary budget cuts, we've maintained the funding levels necessary for this vital protection. Over $531 million is proposed for fiscal year 1983. The difference between 1980 actual expenditures and proposed 1983 expenditures shows a 24-percent total dollar increase for the Civil Rights Division at the Department of Justice and 15 percent increase for the EEOC.

More than 85 percent of black lawyers and doctors, for example, finished their undergraduate training at these schools. We have done our best to ensure that even in these times of necessary cuts, historical black colleges not only will survive but progress and will serve future generations of black Americans, as they have so faithfully for the last 100 years.

Now these are more than numbers. They represent this administration's solid, unshakable commitment to civil rights and human betterment. In the coming months, getting the message out about the progress being made on the economic front and our continued commitment to civil rights will be a major challenge for all of us in the Republican Party. We've got a story to tell and a record worth standing on. We Republicans are the hope for all those who seek expanded opportunity. You and I know that most of those trapped in welfare dependency would like nothing better than a chance for dignity and independence.

Alexander Hamilton, one of our greatest Founding Fathers, once said that ``a power over a man's subsistence amounts to a power over his will.'' What we've seen in too many cases in the inner city is the broken will of people who desire to be as proud and independent as any other American.

And perhaps unintentionally, many government programs have been designed not to create social mobility and help the needy along their way, but instead to foster a state of dependency. Whatever their intentions, no matter their compassion, our opponents created a new kind of bondage for millions of American citizens.

Now, together, we can break this degrading cycle and we can do it with fairness, compassion, and love in our hearts. No other experience in American history runs quite parallel to the black experience. It has been one of great hardships, but also one of great heroism; of great adversity, but also great achievement. What our administration and our party seek is the day when the tragic side of the black legacy in America can be laid to rest once and for all, and the long, perilous voyage toward freedom, dignity, and opportunity can be completed -- a day when every child born in America will live free not only of political injustice but of fear, ignorance, prejudice, and dependency.

Earlier in the program you sang, ``Lift Every Voice and Sing.'' The third verse to that beautiful hymn ends with the words, ``May we forever stand true to our God and our native land.'' Tonight, let us make that pledge. Let us be true to our God and native land by standing by the ideals of liberty and opportunity that are so important to our heritage as free men and women. Let us prove again that America can truly be a promised land, a land where people of every race, creed, and background can live together in freedom, harmony, and prosperity. And let us proclaim for all to hear that America will have brotherhood from sea to shining sea.

The values for which we struggled -- independence, liberty, democracy, justice, equality -- are engraved in our constitutions and embodied in our peoples' aspirations. Today our ties remain strong, benefiting each of us over the full range of our relations. Politically, we tend to view many world issues the same general way. Yours, Mr. President, is a respected voice for reason and moderation in international forums.

The Philippines with its ASEAN partners has taken the lead in search for self-determination for the people of Kampuchea. In that vein, let me also pay tribute to you and Mrs. Marcos' personal leadership and commitment to the care of refugees in Southeast Asia. Under your direct sponsorship, the Philippines' refugee processing center has become a model of its kind in encouraging the development of self-sufficiency and the restoration of human dignity.

The Philippines and you, Mr. President, play an important role in addressing the problems of economic development in the world. At Cancun, we made a new start toward a more effective and practical dialog and improved cooperation among industrial and developing countries. Your leadership in that area, Mr. President, is vital and widely respected. Under your leadership at home, the Philippines can boast a record of solid economic growth over the past decade, attributable in significant part to its hospitable attitude toward free enterprise and private initiative.

Your country's dedication to improving the standard of living of your people is an effort in which we've been delighted to participate through bilateral and multilateral economic assistance. Your continuing interest in better nutrition has led the Philippines to achieve self-sufficiency in food grain production.

You can also point with pride to the success of your rural electrification program, now bringing benefits to an increasing number of remote regions. And I find it a matter of personal satisfaction that your country and my home State of California are both pioneers in developing geothermal power to replace expensive energy imports.

The United States remains the Philippines' leading trading partner, and American firms are the largest foreign investors in your country, reflecting their confidence in your progress and prospects for economic growth.

We have welcomed the growing two-way trade between our nations and have been pleased that we've been able to keep our markets for the products of your growing manufacturing and industrial sector the most open of any country in the industrialized world.

America considers itself especially fortunate to have nearly one million persons of Filipino heritage now residing in our country. They bring with them their energy and their talents, and they contribute enormously to the rich diversity of American society. Similarly, thousands of Americans, enchanted by the beauty of your nation and by its people, have chosen to live in the Philippines.

Our security relationship is an essential element in maintaining peace in the region and is so recognized. This relationship, one of several we have in the Western Pacific, threatens no one but contributes to the shield behind which the whole region can develop socially and economically.

Mr. President, under your leadership the Philippines stands as a recognized force for peace and security in Southeast Asia through its bilateral efforts and through its role in ASEAN, which is the focus of our regional policies in Southeast Asia.

This great and beautiful city that is one of the few cities that was built as a capital for a great nation is, indeed, as has been written, the key to knowing the secret of America, and this house of the American people, an American frontier that never vanishes. Your beautiful city with its grand memorials, its monuments, its walks, is indeed a city that memorializes the great achievements of your people for the past two centuries. But more than that, it keeps offering to the enterprising and the talented, the courageous and the strong, the rewards of effort and of initiative.

At the same time as I stand here on American soil, I realize that I stand on what may be the center of the Government of the United States of America -- here, where, as I have often stated, the future is being born. The future is being born depending upon the man who is in the White House.

For, Mr. President, I come from that part of the world wherein the poorest of the world's population live. I come from that part of the world that cherishes an image of America with its ideals, its dreams, its illusions. I come from the Philippines, a part of Asia which has been molded along the principles of American democracy. We learned to love these ideals and principles, and we lost a million of our people fighting for them in the last war.

We have always stood by these ideals. We shall continue to do so, whatever may be the cost -- at the risk of our fortunes, our lives. But more important of all, our honor will stand for the ideals of democracy that is our legacy from the United States of America.

I have said in many a speech before my own people and before the world, fate and destiny has decreed that the United States of America be the trustee of modern civilization against the threat of a possible second Dark Ages. And America cannot fail. And therefore, we, the Filipino people, come and bring to you a prayer that God, in His divine providence, may grant you guidance, strengthen both your heart and hand, so that that hand may be strong on the lever of power and save our humanity.

If America fails, then the world is lost. And thus, Mr. President, I can assure you that throughout all of Asia, there is nothing but a reservoir of good will for you, the American people, and the United States of America.

As the Jewish New Year commences, Jews throughout the world will begin a period of introspection and atonement and a reexamination of their personal relationship with God. The stirring sound of the Shofar will echo in prayer services everywhere, calling out to all of the Jewish Faith. Nancy and I join with you in the spirit of this solemn holiday and in your prayers for the New Year.

Our heartfelt wish is that at the conclusion of the Days of Atonement, each of you may be inscribed for a good year in the Book of Life and that we may work together to build a world of peace for our children and freedom for all mankind.

We want Lebanon -- after all these years of disruption and warlords, each one with his own militia fighting each other in that country -- now that the PLO has been moved out, we want to see all foreign forces removed and see Lebanon go forward with a government and once again be in control of its own destiny.

And I'm sure that that's what Israel wants, also. It is true that what led them to move back in was the attack -- after the assassination on the elected President there -- the attack on his forces by some of the leftist militia that are still there in west Beirut.

But I think that the Lebanese Army of the government, which is the official government, will move in and take over those positions held by the Israelis. I think they'll withdraw. And we hope it will be very soon, because we've made great progress since my speech the other night about a plan for the Middle East, great progress with the moderate Arab States, and I think that we're on the way with hope for a solid peace in the Middle East.

And at the same time, let me say one thing: At the same time I say all of that, and even though we're at this moment urging Israel to move, that doesn't mean that we've moved one step away from our moral obligation to the preservation of Israel as a sovereign state.

Our people include every race, creed, and ethnic background, yet we're bound by shared values and a love of freedom. Somewhere in the history of every American family is a person like you, who became an American not by birth but by choice. The original colonists came here driven by a hunger for freedom and have been followed in every generation by immigrants possessed of the same hunger and the courage that it takes to tear up roots and start again in a new land. We're a nation of dreamers who've come here, as you have, in search of an ideal: respect for the liberty and dignity of man.

Those words are especially true today. You're now a part of a great nation in the midst of renewal. We're eager to add your strength and your spirit and your dreams to our own. In the week that begins today, Citizenship Day, some 10,000 will take the oath that you have just sworn.

And the number will have reached nearly 200,000 by the year's end. Together, you will infuse our people with renewed appreciation for liberty and pride in being an American. Give to us all your energy, your drive, and your determination. We'll share with you this precious freedom that we keep in trust for all mankind.

There are places in the world today, as there have always been, where human rights are recognized only as selective favors to be doled out by the state. As we meet today at a Polish freedom hall, we cannot help but think of the iron hand of repression still firmly gripping a people who have struggled and sacrificed for liberty throughout their history. Remember the proud people of Poland on the day that you take the oath of allegiance to our land of freedom.

Moscow [Ukrainian] Helsinki Monitoring Group, a human rights organization, was forced to disband because of persecution. But let us remember the continuing struggle for even the most basic rights in the Soviet Union as we celebrate the 195th anniversary of the signing of the American Constitution.

You know, I have to say one thing about that. In the countries that all of us came from, there are constitutions. And I don't claim to know all the constitutions of the world. But I do know that there is one thing that is different in ours from virtually all of the other constitutions. All of the other constitutions are a declaration of the rights that will be allowed to you by government. Our Constitution is a declaration of the rights that we, the people, allow to government, and it can have no power or rights that we, the people, have not freely given to it.

During the last two centuries, some 50 million people from every corner of the globe have flocked to our shores. Some of them crawled over walls, under barbed wire, through minefields, or risked their lives in leaky, makeshift boats to escape oppression. As we go about our daily lives, let us remember the price that so many are willing to pay for freedom.

We who enjoy liberty should understand that, as Thomas Paine wrote, ``Those who expect to reap the blessings of freedom must . . . undergo the fatigue of supporting it.'' It's our duty to work together for a strong America -- morally strong, economically strong, and strong enough militarily that we might preserve this precious heritage.

The Governor of this State, Thomas Kean, said during his inauguration that for America to prosper, we must ``draw upon the diversity of our people and tap the strength inherent in that diversity.'' I believe with him that the key to our national renewal lies in the character of our diverse citizenry. As you begin lives as Americans, remember that freedom rests, and always will, on the individual -- on individual talent, on individual integrity, and individual effort. We need all that you can give us. If only we believe in ourselves and live up to our individual potential, then together there isn't anything that we can't achieve.

On behalf of all your countrymen, I welcome you and urge you to cherish the rights and privileges you now share. And if for a second you were thinking back to the land of your birth, when I said countrymen, I mean your American countrymen. I also call on the rest of America to renew with you today this compact of freedom, this duty and blessing that is our American citizenship.

Citizens' Club. Prior to the President's remarks, the oath of allegiance was administered to the candidates for citizenship by Judge Clarkson Fisher, Chief Judge of the U.S. District Court for the District of New Jersey. The President then presented each of them with citizenship certificates and led in the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance.

Following the naturalization ceremony, the President went to the Ryland Inn for a meeting with the Republican State chairmen from 11 northeastern States, the District of Columbia, and the Virgin Islands.

During the last campaign, I spoke frequently of the crucial values of family and work, neighborhood, religion, and personal freedom. And some critics claimed that it was an attempt on my part to appeal to various ethnic and religious voting blocks. Well, in a way, they were right. I happen, though, to believe in the values that so many of this nation's ethnic groups hold dear. I believe in the family; I believe in the faith that binds families together; I believe in tradition, and I don't mind sharing those beliefs one bit.

Perhaps some of you will remember that just a few years ago, those basic values were being forgotten at the highest levels of our government. The machinery of government even, at times, actively opposed them. Government intrusion into the life of the family and the community had reached unparalleled heights. And I don't think that government can exactly become a substitute for parents when it comes to raising a family.

By the time we came to Washington, Federal spending had tripled in the last 10 years. Federal taxes doubled in only the last 5 years. But somehow, all that taxing and spending and regulating wasn't making our values any stronger or our people any better off.

Now, these statistics are cold comfort, I know, to someone who's still out of work. And every night when I turn in, I don't think anything is on my mind more than the people who want jobs and can't find them. Unfortunately, unemployment is just about the last indicator that perks up after a recession, and this is the eighth recession we've had since World War II. Well, let me tell you, we're going to knock that unemployment rate down just like we're knocking down interest rates and inflation. But in the meantime, unemployment benefits for those whose payments would otherwise have run out have been extended.

Another threat to the family is crime. Many of you have written to me how afraid you are any more to walk the streets at night. Many older citizens are frightened to go out even during the daytime. It's time to get the hardened criminal off the street and into jail. And right now before the Congress is an omnibus anticrime package. Now in case -- maybe some of the younger people here don't know what ``omnibus'' means. That means it's big. And it means that we're serious about fighting crime. It means we are going to give the victims the break instead of the criminal.

What government must always keep in mind as it legislates and administers is the sanctity of the family, our basic social unit. If it is not sound, then our society is not sound. And the world at times may seem cold and dark, but the family is the light in the window. It guides us and offers warmth. Family, faith, and freedom are the cornerstones of American life. This festival today is a celebration of those very ideals and a celebration of America's belief. So, I thank you for allowing me to be a part of it. I know that you're going to return these Representatives to the House of Representatives. I know that you're going to send Millicent Fenwick there to be your Senator.

All people of decency must share our outrage and revulsion over the murders, which included women and children. I express my deepest regrets and condolences to the families of the victims and the broader Palestinian community.

During the negotiations leading to the PLO withdrawal from Beirut, we were assured that Israeli forces would not enter west Beirut. We also understood that following withdrawal, Lebanese Army units would establish control over the city. They were thwarted in this effort by the Israeli occupation that took place beginning on Wednesday. We strongly opposed Israel's move into west Beirut following the assassination of President-elect Gemayel, both because we believed it wrong in principle and for fear that it would provoke further fighting. Israel, by yesterday in military control of Beirut, claimed that its moves would prevent the kind of tragedy which has now occurred.

We have today summoned the Israeli Ambassador to demand that the Israeli Government immediately withdraw its forces from west Beirut to the positions occupied on September 14. We also expect Israel thereafter to commence serious negotiations which will, first, lead to the earliest possible disengagement of Israeli forces from Beirut and, second, to an agreed framework for the early withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon.

Despite and because of the additional bloody trauma which adds to Lebanon's agonies, we urge the Lebanese to unite quickly in support of their government and their constitutional processes and to work for the future they so richly deserve. We will be with them.

This terrible tragedy underscores the desperate need for a true peace in the Middle East, one which takes full account of the needs of the Palestinian people. The initiative I announced on September 1 will be pursued vigorously in order to achieve that goal.

Rosh Hashanah also reminds us of the rich and varied religious heritage we Americans are blessed with. More than any other nation, ours draws inspiration from the creeds of many peoples from many parts of the world. They came to our shores from different ports of origin at different times in our history. But all of them -- from the men and women who celebrated the first Thanksgiving more than three and a half centuries ago, to the boat people of Southeast Asia -- came here with prayers on their lips and faith in their hearts.

At every crucial turning point in our history Americans have faced and overcome great odds, strengthened by spiritual faith. The Plymouth settlers triumphed over hunger, disease, and a cruel northern wilderness because, in the words of William Bradford, ``They knew they were pilgrims.

And just as prayer has helped us as a nation, it helps us as individuals. In nearly all our lives, there are moments when our prayers and the prayers of our friends and loved ones help to see us through and keep on the right path. In fact, prayer is one of the few things in this world that hurts no one and sustains the spirit of millions.

Yet today we're told that to protect that first amendment, we must suppress prayer and expel God from our children's classrooms. In one case, a court has ruled against the right of children to say grace in their own school cafeteria before they had lunch. A group of children who sought, on their own initiative and with their parents' approval, to begin the schoolday with a 1-minute prayer meditation have been forbidden to do so. And some students who wanted to join in prayer or religious study on school property, even outside of regular class hours, have been banned from doing so.

With this in mind, last May I proposed to the Congress a measure that declares once and for all that nothing in the Constitution prohibits prayer in public schools or institutions. It also states that no person shall be required by government to participate in prayer who does not want to. So, everyone's rights -- believers and nonbelievers alike -- are protected by our voluntary prayer measure.

I'm sorry to say that so far the Congress has failed to vote on the issue of school prayer. Just this week, however, I asked Senate Majority Leader Howard Baker to bring this measure to a floor vote. I'm happy to say he told me he'll do everything he can to accomplish this. However, passage requires a vote by the House of Representatives, as well. So, I call on the House leadership to make an equal effort.

As an honored veteran of the trade union movement, David Dubinsky earned the respect of employers and employees alike. A man of courage, vision, and integrity, he was a staunch foe of injustice whether its source was foreign or domestic, and he fought long and successfully to cleanse the American labor movement of both internal corruption and subversion by alien ideologies. In a long life, David Dubinsky served his adopted land with energy, dedication, and total loyalty. His passing will be mourned by all Americans who cherish the values of honesty, patriotism, and social justice.

I am pleased to sign into law today H.R. 3663, the Bus Regulatory Reform Act of 1982. One of the basic policies of my administration is that private enterprise should be as private as possible -- guided by the market judgments of business managers rather than by the dictates of government regulators. Enactment of this legislation is a significant milestone in our efforts to deregulate one of our country's most vital economic sectors, the surface transportation industry.

Since the intercity bus industry was first regulated in 1935, it has been subject to Federal review and approval of business decisions on what markets to serve, where to pick up and drop off passengers, how much to charge for a ticket, and even how much to spend on interior decoration.

The result, increasingly apparent in recent years, has been that the industry has paid a great price in terms of regulatory delay, inefficient operations, and stifled innovation. The price, of course, has ultimately been borne by the bus passenger.

Regulatory standards will be simplified and procedures expedited. Carriers will be able to enter into new markets much more easily. ``Closed-door'' restrictions, which prevent carriers from picking up or letting off passengers at intermediate points, will generally be removed. Carriers will not have to apply separately for authority to carry packages as well as passengers.

Along with freer entry, there will be freer exit. Carriers are naturally reluctant to enter new markets or offer innovative services if they fear the government will not allow them to withdraw if their business judgment indicates they should. This new act recognizes that forcing a carrier to continue to operate unprofitable service does not make sense and will facilitate withdrawal from such markets.

In the important area of rates, this legislation provides for a gradually increasing zone within which carriers may raise or lower rates without seeking Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) approval. The act will also phase out antitrust immunity for collectively set single-line and joint-line rates. After 3 years, ICC authority over rates that are not set collectively will end, except for continuing authority over predatory pricing.

With this legislation, we can expect to see better service to large and small communities across the Nation. We can expect to see more price options available to the consumer. And we can expect to see a more profitable and more efficient intercity bus industry, one which is governed by competitive market forces rather than by inefficient and protective government regulations.

With the Bus Regulatory Reform Act of 1982, the intercity bus industry will also have the benefits of deregulation. While I believe that there is still too much Federal regulation of the transportation industries, this act is nevertheless a step in the right direction.

The bus industry and the people it serves represent a large and diverse group. Consequently, many parties with different interests have been concerned with this legislation. To ensure the interests of all these parties have been well served has required the highest degree of skillful negotiation and a willingness on the part of all to reach legitimate compromises. I am aware of the personal interest and hard work of the leadership of the House and Senate, of Secretary of Transportation Drew Lewis, and of Chairman Reese Taylor of the Interstate Commerce Commission in developing this legislation. Particular appreciation is due to Senator Packwood, Senator Cannon, and Senator Danforth, and to Representative Howard, Representative Clausen, Representative Anderson, and Representative Shuster for the expeditious handling of this legislation.

Reform Act and pursuant to my authority as President, with the intent of resolving the transborder trucking issue. A copy of my determination is attached and will be transmitted to the Congress and published in the Federal Register.

It imposes a moratorium on the issuance of certificates or permits to motor carriers domiciled in, or owned or controlled by persons of, a contiguous foreign country. I am authorized to remove the moratorium in whole or in part for any country or political subdivision thereof upon determining that such action is in the national interest. I must also provide written notice to the Congress of such removal or modification before it becomes effective. Sixty days' advance notice to the Congress is required whenever the removal or modification applies to a foreign contiguous country or political subdivision thereof which substantially prohibits the granting of motor carrier authority to persons from the United States. I hereby determine that this sixty-day advance notification provision is not now applicable to Canada.

States and Canada and between the United States and Mexico. Because of the importance of fair and open competition in this important service sector, I am today instructing you, as my Trade Representative, to intensify our efforts to negotiate a fair and equitable resolution of this issue with both Canada and Mexico.

I regret that with respect to Mexico there has not yet been progress sufficient to justify a modification of the moratorium. A substantial disparity remains between the relatively open access afforded Mexican trucking service coming into the United States and the almost complete inability of United States trucking interests to provide service into Mexico.

In the case of Canada, our trucking industry is not now, nor has it been, precluded from providing services into that country. However, our regulatory schemes do now differ. Since the United States deregulation legislation, Canadian trucking interests could have an opportunity to provide single-line service into the United States more easily than their United States counterparts can provide into Canada. In addition, United States firms seeking to become established in Canada may be subjected to investment restrictions not facing their Canadian competitors.

Therefore, under my authority to remove in whole or in part the moratorium imposed in Section 6 of the Bus Regulatory Reform Act which prohibits issuance of certificates or permits to motor carriers domiciled in, or owned or controlled by persons of, a contiguous foreign country, I hereby find that it is in the national interest to modify the moratorium by suspending it insofar as Canada is concerned as set forth below.

Commerce Commission (ICC) to grant authority to motor carriers under the appropriate sections of 49 U.S.C. subtitle IV. This suspension is expressly conditioned upon the Commission, in making determinations on whether the proposed transportation serves a ``useful public purpose'' or is in the ``public interest,'' according great weight to the national transportation policy, particularly the mandates to promote ``economical and efficient transportation,'' and ``to encourage sound economic conditions in transportation including sound economic conditions among carriers.'' Such determinations by the Commission shall be consistent with the directives of the United States Trade Representative concerning the international trade policy of the United States; (2) The moratorium in regard to Canadian applicants is further modified by suspending it to permit the ICC to issue temporary and emergency temporary authority, and to issue certificates in motor carrier merger, consolidation, and acquisition of control proceedings, and motor carrier restriction removal proceedings; (3) The moratorium is further modified by suspending it insofar as issuance of ICC authorities to Canadian carriers for domestic traffic in the United States under the appropriate sections of 49 U.S.C. subtitle IV is concerned. Canadian-owned, controlled, or domiciled firms will be able to apply for and receive ICC authority for operations wholly within the United States.

Finally, having directed you to seek an understanding with Canada that will ensure the fair and equitable treatment of both Canadian and United States trucking interests on both sides of the border, I further direct you to report back to me within sixty days on those discussions. It is my expectation that such time should be sufficient for an appropriate understanding to allow me to finally remove the moratorium.

The President today announced the second annual President's Volunteer Action Awards, a program designed to honor outstanding volunteer achievements and to call public attention to what can be accomplished through voluntary action.

The President will present the awards in April at a White House ceremony. Awards will be made in 10 categories: jobs, health and mental health, the environment, material resources, education, public safety, arts and humanities, human services, international volunteering, and the workplace.

VOLUNTEER is the primary national organization supporting greater citizen involvement in problem-solving. It provides a broad range of technical assistance services to volunteer-involving organizations, public agencies, unions, and corporations. It works closely with a network of approximately 225 associated Voluntary Action Centers and over 1,000 other local, State, and national organizations.

ACTION serves to stimulate voluntarism and to demonstrate the effectiveness of volunteers in addressing social problems. Its major programs include the Foster Grandparent, Retired Senior Volunteer, and Senior Companion programs for the elderly, and a variety of programs for youth.

In our efforts to help build a more stable and peaceful world, there is no more essential objective than to shape defense and arms control policies which will guarantee the safety of our nation and of our allies. Shortly after assuming office, I called for a comprehensive evaluation of our arms control policies and proposals for new initiatives. In doing so, I outlined the general principles which should guide formation of our arms control policies.

In each of these three negotiations the United States has presented considered and equitable proposals which seek to establish a military equilibrium at reduced levels, eliminate the most destabilizing factors in the existing military balance, and enhance the security of both sides. When our national security and that of our allies is at stake, we must approach arms control realistically.

This administration's reductions proposals for strategic and intermediate-range nuclear forces, and for conventional forces, reflect this approach. We are encouraged by the serious and businesslike conduct of these negotiations thus far. Although much hard bargaining lies ahead, I am determined to bargain in good faith until our objectives can be realized. We urge on our Soviet negotiating partners equal seriousness of purpose.

Prior to their departure, Ambassadors Rowny and Nitze will brief the Congress on the negotiations. Such regular consultations are also an essential part of our approach. This administration can have no higher purpose than to achieve progress toward meaningful arms control which promotes international peace and security.

The long prison terms meted out to members of the Ukrainian Helsinki Monitoring Group for their courageous activities to secure greater freedom in Ukraine are graphic testimony to the inability of Communism to compete with the principles of freedom in the marketplace of ideas.

The flagrant persecution and imprisonment of Ukrainian citizens for their attempts to exercise basic human rights is an international embarrassment to the Soviet Union and proof that the Soviet Union has failed to live up to its pledges to honor the understandings embodied in the Helsinki Accords.

Group, we renew our determination never to forget the valiant struggle of the peoples of Ukraine for their inalienable rights, and we pledge to do all we can to ameliorate the plight of those Ukrainians who have been persecuted by the Soviet authorities for attempting to assert their rights.

On this day Americans are reminded of the preciousness of our own freedom, and we reaffirm our cherished hope that the aspiration for freedom will ultimately prevail over the morally bankrupt rule of force which denies human rights to so many in the world today.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 21st day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

York State Council of the Arts and the Junior Council of the Museum of Modern Art. She is a member of the board of directors of the E. F. Hutton Group. She is married and has three children. She will succeed Kathrine Dulin Folger.

Now, Dave Emery is in a tight race, but let me remind you of what he himself has proved so well in these past 8 years. Dave Emery is a winner. He's a man who's right for Maine. With your full support, I'm convinced that Dave Emery will be a winner again, putting all his judgment and experience to work as the next Senator elected from Maine.

The greatest challenge we face is to get unemployed Americans back to work. With Dave's support we've made solid progress against the two biggest barriers to a growing economy. I'm talking about double-digit inflation and high interest rates. It was those twin evils that we inherited which brought our economy to its knees and threw so many people out of work.

You know, we tend to forget that. Some of us who were campaigning back in 1980 when the other fellows were here have to remember back. What is it we were talking about in that campaign? Well, I remember campaigning in the Midwest, in one particular hard-hit State, and referring to it as a depression. And the then-incumbent President took me to task and said, ``Oh, no. Technically, it was a recession.'' Well, where I was it was a depression.

And the other day, the mayor of Detroit was in the White House to see me, and he told me unemployment was 20 percent in Detroit. And I couldn't resist. I said, ``Mr. Mayor, 2 years ago when I was campaigning there it was 18 percent -- almost up to that 20.'' But it was those high interest rates in two industries, either one of which can virtually cause a recession by itself -- the automobile industry and homebuilding.

Well, I believe with all my heart that our progress against inflation and interest rates puts us much closer than we were 2 years ago to a stronger, more prosperous economy, without inflation for all our citizens. But this is an election year, and the air is filled with liberal voices talking big talk about fairness and compassion. They would urge the American people to turn their backs on everything that we've accomplished together. And to listen to their horror stories about budget cuts, you'd have to like horror movies.

When they talk about fairness, I have to ask them, where have they been? It was just less than 2 years ago, as I say, when they turned over control of the Government to us, and we were left to cope with the worst combination of high inflation and high interest rates and taxation in more than 100 years, and we didn't hear any words about fairness then.

The other question is, where would they take us now? And the answer is right back to the same swamp that we're trying to get out of. They're not promoting fairness; they're selling the same old snake oil. The truth is -- and this is what makes it so tough -- they don't know it's snake oil. They honestly can't see that their policies brought us to the brink of disaster. And yet, they want another blank check to spend more money. They resist a constitutional amendment against red-ink spending, even though 80 percent of the American people think it's a good idea. and they want to take away the third year of the tax cut and indexing -- two provisions which benefit low- and middle-income families the most.

On each of these issues, Dave Emery comes down for fairness -- fairness to the people who pay the government's bills, while they struggle to pay their own. His opponent would tax the family budget, and the Federal budget would continue to grow and grow. We just have to save his opponent from himself. And we're not going to let ourselves be dragged back down into the swamp. With Dave Emery's help and with your help, we're going to make it to the high ground and make America strong and prosperous and keep her free.

Well, it's a pleasure for me to have all of you back with us at the White House to commemorate the first anniversary of Executive Order 12320 and to reconfirm this administration's ongoing commitment to historically black colleges and universities.

During these times when we're all trying to pull our country out of an economic disaster brought on by a decade of irresponsibility, we want to make certain that your institutions, colleges and universities which are so significant to the heritage of black America, are not damaged by economic conditions that you had no part in creating. That was an important reason behind our decision last year to move forward decisively in this area.

Today, I want to reaffirm this administration's continued commitment -- not only so that your institutions will survive but so that they will flourish. Last year when we gathered to announce the issuing of the Executive order, I don't doubt that there were skeptics who took a wait-and-see attitude. Last week when I spoke to a gathering of black Republicans over at the Shoreham Hotel, I told them we should look at the record.

Well, I understand that Secretary Bell and Secretary Pierce and others have been reviewing with you the record of the last 12 months. I deeply believe it's a record of real accomplishment, a record of promises kept.

Although I don't want to go over ground that's already been covered, I'd like to mention that I'm particularly proud that we were able to come to the aid of Meharry Medical College when circumstances threatened its survival. Together, we were able to keep this vital door open into the medical profession as it befits the black community. Meharry, a school that has trained 40 percent of all black physicians, was facing an avalanche of problems. And we became aware of the need and acted. Among other things, it was in danger of losing its accreditation because it lacked access to a sufficient number of patients to provide its students with the proper clinical training.

Federal departments and agencies that will clarify and strengthen Executive Order 12320 and ensure the continued attention to the issues that affect you most. We're directing the Federal departments and agencies to target Federal program funds to improve the administrative infrastructure of historical black colleges. Agencies are further directed, even in this era of necessary budget cuts, to strive to increase the percentage of total available funds that black colleges and universities will receive. Third, they're to step up efforts to eliminate regulations in policies that are barriers to your full participation in Federal programs.

The last and potentially most important part of this directive focuses on the need to further enlist the resources of the private sector in our efforts to support historically black colleges and universities. The emphasis on the private sector is consistent with the general philosophy of this administration. We happen to believe there are vast untapped resources out there, because for too long people have looked only to government. I want to especially acknowledge all Vice President Bush has done to get this ball rolling. He's held receptions on two occasions in his home, playing host to many of you, and also the chief executive officers of 50 major corporations.

We now need to move toward campus-based action programs, and I'm counting on the private sector office in the White House to provide you with the guidance and creative energy necessary to tap the vitality of the private sector, so it can be used where it'll do the most good.

Secretary Bell has provided superb leadership, and with him in the Department of Education there's another man who has been doing a magnificent job in your behalf. And I am, of course, referring to Dr. Tom Melady -- Melady, I should say. That wasn't mispronunciation, that was just not seeing good -- [laughter] -- my own notes.

But, Dr. Melady, I want to congratulate you on a job well done. I understand you'll soon be returning to your duties as president of Sacred Heart University. We'll miss you, but we can appreciate that there are others who need your talent. And although Dr. Melady is going, we can all count on the continued efforts of such fine people as Dr. Ed Elmendorf, Dr. Margaret Seagears, and Dr. William Butts, who'll be working directly with Secretary Bell on issues concerning historically black colleges.

Finally, the emphasis on the directive I'm issuing today is, as I mentioned, channeling the power of the private sector into this area of concern. If you'll pardon these private thoughts, our goal is to get you through a particularly rough time -- not only a time of economic uncertainty, also a time when you're reexamining your fundamental role in American education. We fully expect that as our program is successful, due to your efforts as well as ours, your operations will become self-sufficient. That's our ultimate goal, and I'm certain that it's yours as well.

Over the last few decades, no greater harm has been done than by government programs designed so poorly that they maneuvered people in need into a terrible dependency. Instead of strengthening recipients and helping them along the way, many well-intentioned programs did nothing but destroy pride and create a feeling of helplessness among those who needed encouragement and hope.

Perhaps this is why your institutions are so important for us to preserve. You are a symbol that even in times of great adversity, men and women can work together and improve their lot. In a shameful period of American history, you offered hope and provided a vehicle for advancement to millions of Americans. Your story can serve to inspire all those who struggle to better themselves.

Nation celebrates Black College Day, that you'll share with others the legitimate concern that this administration has shown towards your problems and our sincere dedication to equality of opportunity for all Americans.

Universities participation in Federal programs and accelerate activities to single out policies or regulations which inhibit full participation in such programs by Historically Black Colleges and Universities.

Additionally, I have directed that the White House Office of Private Sector Initiative work in cooperation with the Department of Education's White House Initiatives staff to place special emphasis on increasing development of private sector support for Historically Black Colleges and Universities.

Your support for the efforts mandated by Executive Order 12320 is vital. We must all communicate clearly and sincerely through our actions our intention to preserve a measure of security for Historically Black Colleges and Universities while we work together toward developing strength through independence and institutional self-sufficiency.

Administration. This addition to the six existing Cabinet Councils will exercise White House control and supervision over the ``Reform 88'' Task Force, a long-term (6+years) program to improve the management and administrative systems of the Federal Government. It will also monitor implementation of the recommendations of the President's Private Sector Survey on Cost Control and formulate government-wide policies pertaining to such executive branch management, administrative, and personnel issues as may arise from time to time.

Other Departments will be invited to participate when appropriate. A Cabinet member may attend meetings of the Cabinet Council on Management and Administration if the items under discussion are of interest. When the situation warrants, other agency heads will be invited to participate.

Today I am submitting to Congress the ``National Debt Retirement Act of 1982.'' When enacted, this law will place in the Treasury proceeds from the sales of surplus Federal real property for use solely to retire the national debt.

Order 12348 I established a Property Review Board to improve the management of Federal real property and to accelerate the sale of unneeded property. The revenue from the sales should be directly applied to help reduce the burdens on our nation's taxpayers and not be used for more spending.

Although the congressional calendar is crowded, I believe that the Congress shares my concern that the continued growth of our national debt can have a crippling effect on our economy. This is a problem that can be solved in part by the bill I am submitting today. The sales of surplus property cannot alone retire the debt; however, it demonstrates our commitment and is an all-important first step.

As you know, my Administration has recently undertaken a number of policy initiatives with respect to the disposal of surplus Federal real property. For example, on February 25, 1982, I signed Executive Order 12348, establishing the Presidential Property Review Board, which has been given the responsibility for developing Federal property disposal policy to ensure that surplus Federal real property is identified and made available for sale at its fair market value.

The enclosed legislation eliminates a barrier to using the proceeds of the sale of surplus real property to retire the national debt. Under current law, receipts from the sale of such property are deposited in the Land and Water Conservation Fund of the Department of the Interior. Our proposed legislation amends present law to state that, notwithstanding any other requirement of law, cash proceeds from the sale, lease, or other disposition of such property are to be covered into the general fund of the Treasury. This proposal does not affect the statutory requirement that there be an annual income level of $900 million for the Land and Water Conservation Fund.

I have just signed into law Senate Joint Resolution 250, a bill that ends the 4-day-old national railway strike. There are many elected officials in Washington -- and I am one of them -- who prefer to keep the government out of the collective bargaining process. But we're also committed to protecting the vital national interest, and we must protect the jobs of our people and keep both factories and farms at work.

American economy close to a billion dollars a day. Within 10 days, steelplants and additional auto factories would begin to close. And by far, the most important consideration for me is jobs. If this strike were prolonged, nearly a million Americans would face a threat of unemployment. We cannot afford such losses. It's been imperative that we act and act quickly.

I want to commend Members of the Senate and House for addressing this issue swiftly, decisively, and on a bipartisan basis. I'm also pleased that this measure won the support of many people of different views outside the Congress. It shows once again that when we face difficult times, difficult issues, that we Americans can unite for the common good.

You have our pledge that the United States will remain a staunch partner and friend to Lebanon as you set out upon the difficult and challenging tasks ahead. The American nation and I extend to you and all Lebanese our very best wishes for the future.

One of the first things I learned in public speaking class was that you should never open with an apology. And I was wondering how I was going to explain that we had to get out of here before the meeting was over, and you took care of that. Thank you very much.

Nancy and I are delighted that you could all come and be with us for what I know we all agree is a wonderful and very worthy cause, the James S. Brady Presidential Foundation. As you know, the foundation will honor Jim in recognition of the tremendous sacrifices that he and Sarah and their family have made. It will also provide assistance to other individuals wounded or killed in an assassination attempt on national figures and will provide assistance to that individual's family.

Now, these good things don't just happen. They depend on the active support of fine people like yourselves -- all of you who have worked so hard, and on the leadership of the foundation's nonpartisan board of directors. I won't name all the members, but I do want to pay a special tribute to three particular individuals, and one is Jim Lynn, the president of the foundation, and the two who are cochairing the fundraising effort, Joe Rodgers and Bob Strauss.

Now, since Bob and Joe both are such good numbers men -- [laughter] -- and since this is the election season, I confess I got a little nervous. But I am assured that they are dedicated to this worthy and noble cause.

The James S. Brady Presidential Foundation is a public foundation that was established to provide assistance to any needy individual wounded or killed in an assassination attempt on any senior Federal official, Presidential candidate, or family member of the President and Vice President, and to provide assistance to the individual's family. The foundation also is authorized to create certain scholarships as a tribute to such victims or to encourage young people to enter government service. The idea for the foundation grew out of concern by a number of national business and political leaders for the need to provide special assistance to persons whose lives are placed in danger simply because they are at the scene of an assassination attempt. The foundation was chartered in November 1981, under the name ``The Stand By Fund.'' It was later renamed ``The James S. Brady Presidential Foundation'' in honor of the Press Secretary to the President and in recognition of the inspiration he has given to others.

The situation in the Middle East -- I will go over some details that have been talked about in part or maybe in full at both Defense and State earlier today. We're still working out the details of what the marine force will do when they arrive and consultations with the Italian and French liaison officers in Beirut.

The MNF (multinational force) is to provide an interposition force at agreed locations and thereby provide the MNF presence requested by the Government of Lebanon to assist it and Lebanon's armed forces in the Beirut area. This presence will facilitate the restoration of Lebanese Government sovereignty and authority over the Beirut area and thereby further its efforts to assure the safety of persons in the area and to bring to an end the violence which has tragically recurred.

The National School Lunch Program -- now in its 36th year -- operates to provide nutritious and well-balanced meals for needy young people of our country. School lunch is an outstanding example of a close partnership of the Federal government with State governments and local communities to provide food, funds, and technical assistance for our efforts to provide nutrition assistance to these students.

The children and youth of our Nation are our greatest resource. The School Lunch Program demonstrates our awareness, our concern, and our willingness to work together to promote the health and well-being of our needy youth.

There are over 23 million lunches served every day in over 90,000 schools throughout the country. In an era of limited public resources, this effort is being met by resourceful and creative efforts at all levels of government and through the cooperation of parents, teachers, and civic groups.

By joint resolution approved on October 9, 1962, the Congress designated the week beginning on the second Sunday of October in each year as National School Lunch Week and requested the President to issue annually a proclamation calling for observance of that week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 23rd day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Today, as we look forward to the year 2000, we have the knowledge to make the most of our forests and to make them more productive and to protect them more effectively. We need them to be prepared to meet increasing demands for homes, for wood, for paper, and for forest recreation.

Under careful management, our forests can produce more than twice the volume of timber now being grown, without damaging our environment. This means that we can meet our own increasing demands and still export wood products, thus strengthening both our economy and our independence.

Our forests can also be managed to provide not only abundant timber, but also water, wildlife and fish, recreation, paper resources, grazing for domestic livestock, and even mining -- while still ensuring a quality environment.

As Americans we are fortunate in having a very large base of public forestlands that are managed for all our people. These forests are serving us well and can meet more of our immediate and future needs than they do now, with careful management. We also have millions of acres of private lands that must be managed to help meet future needs -- needs that are not just economic and material, but inspirational as well. The human spirit needs the beauty, solitude, and renewal that are found in forests.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 23rd day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Possession must be knowing and conscious. Possession inherently includes the power or authority to preclude control by others. It is possible, however, for more than one person to possess an item simultaneously, as when several people share control of an item. An accused may not be convicted of possession of a controlled substance if the accused did not know that the substance was present under the accused's control. Awareness of the presence of a controlled substance may be inferred from circumstantial evidence.

The burden of going forward with evidence with respect to any such exception in any court-martial or other proceeding under the code shall be upon the person claiming its benefit. If such an issue is raised by the evidence presented, then the burden of proof is upon the United States to establish that the use, possession, distribution, manufacture, or introduction was wrongful.

Examples of evidence which may tend to support an inference of intent to distribute are: possession of a quantity of substance in excess of that which one would be likely to have for personal use; market value of the substance; the manner in which the substance is packaged; and that the accused is not a user of the substance. On the other hand, evidence that the accused is addicted to or is a heavy user of the substance may tend to negate an inference of intent to distribute.

Today I am calling upon the Congress to bring to a swift and final conclusion efforts to enact a new job training bill for unemployed Americans. This important initiative will chart a new course for job training in America, providing real hope by serving as a handup, rather than a handout, to our disadvantaged citizens. Over a million Americans a year will receive training when this program begins.

Work on this legislation has just been completed by a joint Senate-House Conference, and I am hopeful that the Congress will act on it before recess so that it may go into effect as quickly as possible.

Several principles which I consider absolutely essential are at the core of this proposal. The delivery system for job training incorporates the block grant funding approach of our new federalism. The private sector will take the lead in planning and implementing programs. Some 70 cents on every Federal dollar is to be spent on training, and 30 cents will be spent on support services and administrative costs. And there will be no make-work public service employment.

I believe that by directing the highest possible percentage of Federal funds toward actual training and by emphasizing the roles of the States and the private sector, we can give participants the best chance of securing lasting, productive jobs in the private sector.

The President. Well, good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. Thank you for letting me be a part of this program honoring five very deserving young people and, also, for supporting the fine efforts of COSSMHO's National Hispanic Youth Institute. Your work is a model for community projects that can make a real difference to the future of our country.

To these five young people and to all of you, mi casa es su casa. And in this case it really is su casa. [Laughter] It belongs to you and all Americans, and we're happy to have you with us here today.

Today, of course, we focus on youth -- our nation's most precious resource. The future of our nation will be determined more than anything else by the character of our children. And particularly significant is the role Hispanics are playing in shaping the future of America. The makeup of your community is the most youthful of any American ethnic group. Over 50 percent are under age 25. So the guidance and inspiration you offer is very significant. The five young people that we honor here today are fine examples of the values and traditions for which your community is known. Their families, their country, and their President are proud of them.

Born in Puerto Rico, he graduated from Charlestown High School in the Boston area and is now on active duty in the United States Navy. He's studying to become a fire control technician and is learning how to work sophisticated electronic equipment. He's always been close to his family, particularly his grandparents, whom he credits with instilling in him a deep respect for religion.

He is currently enrolled in New Mexico State University and is working toward a degree in business administration. Over the years he's had a number of jobs, ranging from selling chili to janitorial work and clerking. On top of all of that, he's been a volunteer, helping at nonprofit church bingo for the last 7 years. In high school he was captain of the soccer and basketball teams.

The President. And finally, there is Rodolfo Rene Fuentes of Weslaco, Texas, currently a junior in high school and in the top 10 percent of his class. Simultaneously -- and get this -- while going to high school, this young man is enrolled as a freshman in Pan American University and plans to have completed 30 hours of college credit by the time he graduates from high school. In high school, he has been active in debate, football, drama, and track.

The President. I congratulate all five of you for all you stand for. Because of your courage and hard work, you're not only bettering your own lives but offering other young people examples of what they can accomplish.

I thank, again, the members of COSSMHO and all of you here today for doing your part in a very worthwhile program and wish you the best of luck at the festivities tonight. Gracias, muchas gracias to all of you.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Carmine R. Lavieri to be a member of the National Council on the Handicapped for the remainder of the term expiring September 17, 1983. He would succeed Henry Williams.

But it's wonderful to have you all here today. The readership of your magazines is a unique and influential one, and you, yourselves, represent a cross section of business and industry as well as the country itself. So, to all of you, especially those who are visiting the White House for the first time, I want to extend the warmest welcome.

More than most people, those of you in this room will remember the talk a few years ago about the reindustrialization of America. Most of this discussion was well-intentioned, focused on strengthening America's industrial base. But here and there were the old suggestions about the need for central planning and massive government expenditures to bring all this about.

You don't hear too much of that talk anymore. I think it's an indication of how dramatically the political climate has changed in the past few years. For the first time in a long while, even during the recent recession, the voices of those who routinely called for Federal intervention, wage and price controls, and billions for make-work jobs just haven't had the appeal they had in the past.

Well, in 1980 when traveling our country in the campaign trail, I said what I've said all during the past 20 months -- that the cause of our economic problems and the recession we inherited can be very simply put: Government is too big, and it spends too much money.

They also made their voices heard during all those crucial legislative battles over spending and taxes. I think our people are disillusioned with the policies of big government, with boom and bust, with high inflation followed by higher unemployment.

Think back to 1980: interest rates -- 21\1/2\ percent; double-digit inflation for 2 years in a row; productivity and the rate of growth in the gross national product dropping for the second year in a row. Almost 8 million people were unemployed, and business failures were increasing.

Well, in 6 days our economic program will have been in place 1 year. It has brought down interest rates. It's gotten the gross national product going in the right direction. It's given us the first real tax cut for individuals in almost 20 years and gotten inflation -- only a year ago the number one economic concern of most Americans -- down from 12.4 percent in 1980 to an annual rate of 5.1 percent since January.

Maybe it's time to ask Speaker O'Neill and the liberal leadership of his party if they really want a return to the policies that gave us a trillion-dollar debt. Are they willing to pledge to the American people that when a new Congress begins next year, they won't try to take away the income tax cuts and the historic reform of indexing taxes to inflation -- which probably was the biggest tax increase over the years this nation has ever had?

You might have noticed the rhetoric from our liberal critics has already reached a crescendo. The trouble is that they call their compassion a solution. The perfect illustration of what they call -- I should say, their compassionate solution is the perfect illustration of why the United States is suffering from such deep-rooted problems. Last week, they stampeded the House with another temporary, public make-work program for, at best, 200,000 people. It would carry all the old flaws of that wasteful, discredited CETA program. Most important, it's no answer for the man or woman laid off, sitting around the table at nights wondering how they'll put their future back together again.

We've taken a different approach. Beginning way back in February, we started working on a program that would meet criteria for a real, long-term solution. The Senate-House conference just acted yesterday, and I called on the entire Congress to act next week, to pass this legislation that will provide job training for 1 million people or more per year in the private sector.

Two-hundred thousand or 1 million? Make-work or training for lasting jobs? A political solution of spend and spend, borrow and borrow or real economic opportunity for people looking to us for effective help and leadership?

But beyond issuing this challenge and citing the statistical evidence of how far we've come, we intend to remind the American people of an even more important change. In this administration, we haven't talked about the era of limitations, or no growth, or learning to do with less. We've talked about, instead, incentive, opportunity, and expansion. We're emphasizing the all-important goal of capital formation as the way to expand and renew our industrial base. We haven't tried to get government to redistribute a shrinking economic pie; we've come up with a recipe for a bigger and better pie that all Americans can share in.

Now, incidentally, let me interject that -- with all this economic talk -- that this morning, some of the press began speculating that somehow recent attempts on some social issues, such as the place of prayer in school and the abortion problem and all, were somehow just a political gimmick, and now we'd discarded that and were moving on to something else. I believe this country is hungry for a spiritual revival. I also believe that what Teddy Roosevelt said once is true -- ``The Presidency is a bully pulpit.'' And we're not going to give up on those social issues that have to do with the morals of this country and the great standards that made this country great. We'll be working for them, too.

Now, just one other thing: We're rebuilding America's military and strategic strength. We've adopted a foreign policy that speaks openly and candidly about the failure of totalitarianism, a foreign policy that advocates the moral superiority of Western ideals like personal freedom and representative government, a foreign policy that calls for a global crusade for freedom and democracy.

It's this combination of strategic strength and rhetorical candor that for the first time in years has taken American foreign policy off the defensive. Most important, it's strengthened the chances for a lasting peace by providing a credible base for important new peace initiatives, especially in the arms control area and in regions like the Middle East.

A new political consensus, the support of the American people, has made all of this possible. Our institutions are working again, and this time for the people and not against them. I don't mind saying, I think that's a record to be proud of. I think it's something the American people want continued, and that's the message we're going to get to them this fall.

Following a summer recess, the intercommunal negotiations resumed discussion and analysis of the United Nations ``evaluation'' of the talks. In recent sessions, the negotiators completed initial discussion of those sections of the ``evaluation'' dealing with aspects of the possible executive, legislative, and judicial structure of a federal government. The negotiators have maintained a serious and positive attitude.

Representative on Cyprus, Ambassador Hugo Gobbi, to narrow the differences between positions and to promote negotiating progress. We fully support the United Nations effort to reach a mutually acceptable agreement for the Cyprus problem and firmly believe that the intercommunal negotiations provide the most useful path towards that goal. On September 17 the negotiators announced a recess; negotiations are scheduled to resume on November 2.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 24th day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

In our country today there are approximately 20,000 to 30,000 young people afflicted with cystic fibrosis -- a genetic disease that will prevent most of them from reaching full adulthood. Cystic fibrosis is the most common fatal genetic disease that strikes American children; its cause and cure are still a mystery, and its effects pose formidable obstacles to normal activity throughout its victims' brief lives.

In the past twenty-five years, medical research has achieved measurable success in treating the symptoms of cystic fibrosis and in extending the lives of children born with the disease. The promise of further advances and the courage demonstrated each day by the suffering victims spur intensified research efforts.

With continuing attention to the many scientific questions yet to be answered and improved public awareness of the benefits of early diagnosis of this disease, there is good cause for optimism that cystic fibrosis can be overcome. The combined efforts of dedicated researchers and volunteers committed to the challenge of cystic fibrosis are a wellspring of hope for patients and their families, and the millions of Americans who may unknowingly carry the genetic trait that produces cystic fibrosis.

Acknowledging the progress of the last twenty-five years, and recognizing the compelling need to expand on past efforts to combat this fatal disorder, the Congress has, by Senate Joint Resolution 186, designated September 19 through 25, 1982, as National Cystic Fibrosis Week, declaring it as a time to consider the profound impact of the disease and the growing sense of hopefulness for the future of cystic fibrosis victims.

Systemic lupus erythematosus (lupus) is a serious disorder that can affect many different parts of the body, including the skin, joints, kidneys, heart, central nervous system, and other internal organs. While no one person has all symptoms, and they may occur in varying combinations, there are recognizable patterns of illness that identify patients with lupus.

It is estimated that 500,000 Americans have lupus -- most of them young women. Fortunately, because of the progress that has been made in recent years toward better understanding and increased public awareness of the disease, there is more hope for its victims. Although research has yet to find the cure for lupus, the outlook for patients has improved greatly. Through advances in medical research, including better diagnosis and more effective drug treatment and medical management, many patients with lupus can now look forward to living more productive and happier lives. It is my fervent hope that continuing advances in medical research will improve the quality of life for all lupus patients and eventually lead to the prevention and cure of this serious and distressing disease.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 24th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Memories fade quickly. Only a short time ago we were told double-digit inflation was here to stay for the rest of this decade. At one point in 1980, inflation was zooming at an annual rate of 18 percent. I'll always remember traveling this country and seeing how many people were frightened that our way of life was slipping away from us. And indeed, between 1978 and 1980 the buying power of the average weekly paycheck declined almost 9 percent. Putting food on the table, keeping families warm and healthy, filling our cars with gas, and, for our elders, preserving the value of pensions -- all these things were getting harder and harder to do.

That was the desperate situation we faced when our administration took over in January of 1981, and that's why we've had to make some tough, even unpopular decisions to get runaway spending under control. As I mentioned a moment ago, we're winning the war the experts said was hopeless. In these less than 2 years, inflation has been cut more than in half, down to 5.1 percent so far this year.

I know this isn't easy for people to see. You go in to buy, and the price is higher than it was the last time. But it hasn't gone up as much as it did in each of those last few years. That's why, for the first time in quite a while, real after-tax income is increasing; your paycheck buys more than it did.

Some of you are probably thinking, well, what concerns us today is jobs, and I agree. We have a bill in the Congress which will provide job training for a million unemployed people or more per year for permanent jobs in the private sector. This legislation is needed, but it's only a partial remedy.

Rising inflation pushed up interest rates in the late 1970's, and together they hit us like a one-two punch, sending shock waves through the economy. It became more difficult for families to get home mortgages, for consumers to carry auto loans, for firms to modernize their machines and keep their product prices competitive. To make matters worse, as high inflation and interest rates were crippling the economy's ability to provide jobs, they were forcing more families to seek a second income. Well, this all came home to roost in 1980, when inflation reached double digits for the second straight year and interest rates soared to 21\1/2\ percent -- their highest peak in more than a century. Again, that's the mess we inherited.

I don't believe that it follows that those who took us to the edge of economic Armageddon are automatically best qualified to lecture us now on the most fair, effective way to end the crisis. And when those same individuals charge our administration fights inflation by putting people out of work, I say they're exploiting helpless people for their own political gain. It's the most cynical form of demagoguery.

How does making people able to buy more cause some other people to lose their jobs? Creating more jobs requires getting interest rates down further and keeping them down, and that can only come from continued progress against inflation. We've beaten down those 21\1/2\-percent interest rates to 13\1/2\. And we can -- and must -- do better. But if the public senses we're giving up the fight against inflation, those who lend money will demand higher interest rates, and we'll be right back in the soup with even higher unemployment.

There's only one major cause of our economic problems: government spending more than it takes in and sending you the bill. There's only one permanent cure: bringing government spending in line with government revenues. We have not had 21 red-ink budgets in 22 years because you the people are not taxed enough. The Government has run more than $1 trillion into debt because too many politicians spent too much of your money for too long.

Many liberals have made it clear they want to take back the third year of your tax cut and the indexing. This will only give government more money to spend, weaken savings, and hurt those who need help most -- lower- and middle-income taxpayers, the backbone of this country. Well, we're not going to let them do it. We need less spending.

So far, I have not received for my signature one appropriations bill for the fiscal year that begins this coming Friday. The leadership in the House is also sitting on an historic measure already approved by the Senate and supported by 80 percent of the public -- a constitutional amendment requiring balanced budgets. This amendment offers us our best chance of getting control of runaway spending.

We want to welcome each of you to the White House. We gather together to draw attention to an issue that is as vital to the future of this country as any that we face. No one should doubt that economic and technological progress will have very little impact unless the spirit of our people remains strong.

Calvin Coolidge, a President whom I greatly admire, once said, ``The government of a country never gets ahead of the religion of a country.'' Fostering the faith and character of our people is one of the great trusts of responsible leadership. I deeply believe that if those in government offer a good example, and if the people preserve the freedom which is their birthright as Americans, no one need fear the future.

Alice were visiting America, she might think she'd never left Wonderland. [Laughter] We're told that it somehow violates the rights of others to permit students in school who desire to pray to do so. Clearly this infringes on the freedom of those who choose to pray -- a freedom taken for granted since the time of our Founding Fathers.

This would be bad enough, but the purge of God from our schools went much farther. In one case, a Federal court ruled against the right of children to voluntarily say grace before lunch in the school cafeteria. In another situation a group of children, again on their own initiative and with their parents' approval, wanted to begin the schoolday with a minute of prayer and meditation, and they, too, were prohibited from doing so. Students have even been prevented from having voluntary prayer groups on school property after class hours just on their own.

Now, no one is suggesting that others should be forced into any religious activity, but to prevent those who believe in God from expressing their faith is an outrage. And the relentless drive to eliminate God from our schools can and should be stopped.

We believe that permitting voluntary prayer in public schools is within the finest traditions of this country and consistent with the principles of American liberty. Neither the constitutional amendment that I've endorsed nor the legislative remedies offered by others permits anyone to be coerced into religious activity. Instead, these measures are designed to protect the rights of those who choose to pray as well as those who choose not to.

I want to thank all of you and all of those who'll gather on the Capitol Mall this evening for what you're doing on this vital issue. And a special thanks to Senator Helms and Senator Thurmond and Congressman Kindness for all that they have done.

And today I'd like to take this opportunity to urge the Senate to move directly on the constitutional amendment now awaiting action. But Senate action is not enough. The leadership in the House has the proposed constitutional amendment bottled up and has, thus far, failed to hold the appropriate hearings. Some suggest we should keep religion out of politics. Well, the opposite is also true. Those in politics should keep their hands off of the religious freedom of our people, and especially our children.

Earlier I quoted Calvin Coolidge. He had some other words I'd like to share with you. ``It would be difficult for me to conceive,'' President Coolidge said, ``of anyone being able to administer the duties of a great office like the Presidency without a belief in the guidance of Divine Providence.

Well, after 20 months I can attest to the truth of those words. Faith in God is a vital guidepost, a source of inspiration, and a pillar of strength in times of trial. In recognition of this, the Congress and the Supreme Court begin each day with a prayer, and that's why we provide chaplains for the Armed Forces. We can and must respect the rights of those who are nonbelievers, but we must not cut ourselves off from this indispensable source of strength and guidance.

I think it'd be a tragedy for us to deny our children what the rest of us, in and out of government, find so valuable. If the President of the United States can pray with others in the Oval Office -- and I have on a number of occasions -- then let's make certain that our children have the same right as they go about preparing for their futures and for the future of this country.

And now I understand that we're to light some candles. I think you children are to go down there and someone is to present me with a -- there it is. These -- [inaudible] -- candles, as I understand it, will start the ceremony tonight on the Mall.

The President today announced his intention to appoint William Henkel to be Special Assistant to the President and Director of Presidential Advance. He will succeed Stephen Studdert, who will serve as a consultant to the White House and to the Republican National Committee.

In the time since I became President, the Congress and I, working together closely, have embarked upon a course that will revitalize the intelligence capabilities of this nation, ensuring that in the coming decades we will have the vital information about our adversaries needed to safeguard American interests at home and around the globe. The intelligence authorization act for the fiscal year now coming to a close constituted the first step in our rebuilding program. The Intelligence Identities Protection Act, which became law in June, was an important second step which ensured that those who arrogate to themselves the right to frustrate legitimate intelligence activities approved by the President and the Congress will be brought to justice. Now, I am pleased to take the next step in our intelligence revitalization program by approving the Intelligence Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1983.

This year's intelligence authorization act authorizes the appropriations necessary to continue improving our intelligence capabilities both quantitatively and qualitatively. The American people can be confident that their hard-earned tax dollars invested now in our intelligence capabilities will pay rich dividends to the Nation in the decades ahead.

Two hundred years ago, the Congress of the United States issued a Thanksgiving Proclamation stating that it was ``the indispensable duty of all nations'' to offer both praise and supplication to God. Above all other nations of the world, America has been especially blessed and should give special thanks. We have bountiful harvests, abundant freedoms, and a strong, compassionate people.

I have always believed that this annointed land was set apart in an uncommon way, that a divine plan placed this great continent here between the oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth who had a special love of faith and freedom. Our pioneers asked that He would work His will in our daily lives so America would be a land of morality, fairness, and freedom.

Today we have more to be thankful for than our pilgrim mothers and fathers who huddled on the edge of the New World that first Thanksgiving Day could ever dream. We should be grateful not only for our blessings, but for the courage and strength of our ancestors which enable us to enjoy the lives we do today.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

It's a pleasure for me to speak to you again. I say ``again,'' because I did last year during your annual meeting. You've achieved a remarkable recognition for an organization established only 18 months ago. Those pessimists who think American business no longer has the energy and the creativity to lead this nation into the 21st century should be here today. And I don't know that I can add anything to what you have just said about this remarkable accomplishment.

You give proof that, with freedom and profit -- the profit motive -- America can still work miracles. Reflecting your vitality, the American Business Conference earned a reputation for its willingness to take tough stands for the good of America, even when those positions might hurt your enterprises in the short run.

And I'm deeply grateful for all the support that you have been to me and to our administration. In particular, I appreciate the leading role you played in mustering business support for the tax bill, even though I was dragged, kicking and screaming, myself, into supporting it. [Laughter] It was a difficult and, yet, an absolutely necessary fight.

American Business Conference.] you both were there when it counted, as all of you have been during our struggle to get spending under control and to put our economy back on the right track. But if we're to find our way out of the economic thicket that we inherited, we have to keep economic progress as our highest priority. Now, I'm afraid we don't see that commitment from some on Capitol Hill. Some of them seem to be more inclined to exploit our problems than to pass the legislation needed to set things right. And by ``exploiting,'' I mean that temptation to say, with an election coming up, it may be better for some if the news stays bad.

Well, I can think of nothing that would do more to reassure our people than if the Congress acted this week on several vital pieces of legislation before it recesses for the campaign. They could start with appropriation bills. They did pass the budget resolution, but then very many people in America don't realize that that actually isn't a binding or meaningful thing. That's supposed to be the overall spending, but then the committee starts sending in the appropriation bills for each particular program.

Secondly, the House leadership might also consider bringing to a vote the constitutional amendment which requires a balanced budget. Passage of that amendment, now bottled up in the House, would do more to convince the American people we mean business when it comes to controlling Federal spending than any other single measure.

The truth is -- I've been on the phone -- there are 203 signatures on a petition for the committee to discharge that. The polls reveal 80 percent of the people want it. I respect congressional procedures, but I also have to recognize when I think a committee arbitrarily is using those procedures to deny the will of the people and of their own members. It takes 218 names on that discharge petition, and I've been calling congressmen to persuade them to sign. And I have to tell you that some of the opposite party have told me they can't because of the pressure from their own leadership.

Now, what is different in this and in some of the things that have been done in the past? Well, I can tell you one thing that's different. The past training bills -- only about 20 percent out of the dollar went to actual training. In this particular bill, 70 percent is going to go to actual training.

The other night I heard a critic complaining, well, all we're doing is suggesting training for jobs that don't exist, this because of the unemployment. But how about every Sunday -- I don't know whether you'd do this -- in any city that you want to name -- I've done it in Los Angeles, I've done it in New York, I've done it in Washington, other cities in the past when I've been out there -- the Sunday paper, turn to the help wanted ads and just count the number of pages. I've counted as many as 65 pages of employers looking for people to fill jobs; and they're back the following week trying again.

We're not training for jobs that don't exist. I have spoken of this before and was criticized for doing it, as if it showed no compassion for the unemployed. There's no one in the world who has more compassion for the unemployed than I do. I was looking for a job in 1932; I'd seen my father lose his on Christmas Eve. What I'm talking about is the percentage of people, particularly young people -- and they have the highest rate of unemployment in America -- that need to be trained because those jobs that are being advertised for in the paper require certain job experiences or skills.

We could make a dent in that unemployment with that. And this bill, again, as I say, we're waiting for that bill to be passed and sent to me for signature. But we've come, I think, a long way. The economy's poised for recovery, but the country needs leadership and responsible action from the Congress. All of us in Washington must prove that there's been a change in these last 2 years, that we can control spending and taxes, and that the people making decisions are capable of thinking of the next generation as well as the next election.

You know, what we're trying to do, they give it names and they start calling it some kind of a new thought or a new program and, in fact, the first complaints that it had failed began before it had been put into effect. But, actually, what we're talking about is the same common sense that you have to use every day in business; and that's why you're successful.

And the alternatives that are being offered are not new either. What is being offered is a return, a return to those 7 years when we spent $66 billion on job programs. And yet in those same 7 years unemployment continued to grow, and averaged over the 7 years, 7 percent or better. They're going back to flooding the market with money, and that that will be the answer -- and it will for a short period of time. And then in about 2 years you will have another recession worse than the one you have just got through fixing with inflation higher and unemployment higher.

Actually, what we're talking about is building a solid base for the economy as the method of providing the jobs the unemployed need, and providing them on a more or less permanent basis instead of just a quick flurry that does no real good but leaves us closer to the brink of disaster than we were before.

I'm confident that with responsible leadership in Washington and men of vision like yourselves in the private sector, we can make America great again. And I won't go on, but I could point to comparisons that I've been drawing up of other democracies, allies, friends of ours like our own, who are continuing down that road of intervention in business -- an adversary relationship with their own business community -- the temporary stimulating with a money flood, higher taxes; and the comparison that I'm drawing is two sets of figures. Their unemployment is greater than ours, their inflation is greater than ours, and you are absolutely right -- it is going to be under 6 percent because for the 8 months right now since last January, inflation in this country is running 5.1 percent. And we think we can even take it down maybe a little lower than that. In 1976 it was 4.8, and then we saw all of those things that the critics are talking about put into effect. And by the time we got here it was 12.4. So, something must be going right.

But again, God bless you for all that you're doing. Stay with it. And I just think that one of the greatest things we can do for the American economy is if we can get the government off your backs so that business can do what business is intended to do and has always done in the past for this country up until these last few decades.

Hardly a day passes that I don't hear from hard-working Americans who, through no fault of their own, face serious financial problems -- the machinist whose plant is closed, the working mother that's worried about the future of her job, the farmer and small businessman caught in the financial crunch. This recession and the long years of government mismanagement that led up to it have taken a heavy toll on the lives of too many of our people. What hurts and angers me the most about this suffering is the fact that it didn't have to be this way. We could and should have solved or prevented these problems years ago by the simple exercise of responsibility in government.

When this administration took office, we found America in the worst economic mess since the days of Franklin Roosevelt. With support from the people, we passed a long-term program to save the economy, promote recovery, and create jobs without re-igniting runaway inflation and higher interest rates.

The overwhelming majority of Americans, especially those 99 million who are working, are beginning to see some real hope. Inflation has been cut more than in half, interest rates are heading down, and there are other signs that we're heading toward a good recovery. We still have a long way to go, but together we've pulled America back from the brink of disaster. We're better off today than we were. And the Congress can spur recovery by acting now to keep inflation and interest rates coming down and to help us create some productive jobs. Before they leave Washington for a campaign recess, I urge Members of the Congress to devote their energies to essential economic legislation.

We need spending bills that hold the line on the budget. Only 3 of 13 regular appropriation bills have passed the House and Senate, with only 2 days left in the fiscal year. A constitutional amendment to balance the budget, supported by the people and passed by the Senate, is bottled up by the liberal leadership in the House. An export trading bill that can create several hundred thousand new jobs without costing taxpayers a cent is delayed in conference. And a private sector jobs training bill that can help more than a million unemployed Americans per year also awaits action this week.

No, we haven't solved 20 years of problems in our first 20 months in office, but we have made a beginning where others failed to act. I just wish those who bear such a heavy burden for overspending and taxing us into this recession could resist playing politics with the problems they caused and work with us to stay on course to lasting recovery.

I don't think that specifically there could be assigned as a responsibility on our part for withdrawing our troops. They were sent in there with one understanding. They were there to oversee and make sure that the PLO left Lebanon. And that mission was completed, virtually without incident, and they left. Then, who could have foreseen the assassination of the President-elect that led to the other violence and so forth.

The President. As I understand it, there were things additional in that inquiry, things that we have never voted for and will not hold still for, such things as sanctions and such things as voting Israel out of the U.N. Now, I can't recall exactly now what it was that caused our vote to be negative on that. But the Lebanese and the Israelis are apparently going forward with such an inquiry.

Q. Mr. President, at least 4 months ago you were saying that a strong and lasting recovery was not far away. Now you're saying that we're heading out of the recession. Inflation and interest rates are dropping, but business failures, unemployment are continuing to rise, and the leading economic indicators seem to be likely to drop. So, what does this say for Republican chances in November? And who should the voters believe? You or the administration's economic figures?

The President. Well, if they will honestly face up to the issue and cut through all the demagoguery and rhetoric that they're going to hear, the things that have been accomplished by this administration were not accomplished before, and all of the things that are still not resolved now had started long before we got here.

Unemployment, for example, has been on the rise for more than a decade, and particularly in about the last 7 years, it started really coming on -- an average 7 percent over those 7 years. In those 7 years under the policies of the past, $66 billion was spent on job programs supposed to solve that problem, and they didn't solve it. And certainly the rate of increase in unemployment in the last 6 months of 1980 was just about as great as it's been at any time since. I remember campaigning, myself, on the very fact that what we were seeing in many parts of the country where I was campaigning amounted to depression, not recession.

Now, if the people will add up who's been in charge, who was running the store -- and this is the eighth time we've had one of these economic crises since World War II, and for most of that time, almost entirely, the Congress until now had been dominated by one party. And while here and there there's been a Republican President, they were handcuffed by a Legislature of the other persuasion. And I think we have to look back and see what brought this on, what brought us to almost a trillion dollars at the time, deficit or debt, and then weigh it against the progress in 20 months that has brought the interest rates down, 21\1/2\. I was going to say to 13\1/2\, but today the Bankers Trust lowered it to 13.

Q. Mr. President, in the upcoming November election, how much of that do you see as a referendum on your Presidency and on your economic programs? And if Republicans don't do well in those elections, how might you modify the economic programs?

The President. Well, first of all, you have to abide a little bit by tradition, that in that first off-year election of any new administration, normally there is a great setback. Now, our opponents are saying that they would hope to achieve 20 additional seats. Now, I think they're saying that because tradition has it that normally they get about 35 or 36, and so they would like to be able to say, ``Oh, look how much better we did than we thought we were going to do.'' Well, all I can tell you is we're going to do our best to see if we can't disappoint them.

Q. Mr. President, do you have a plan for getting the United States out of Lebanon if fighting should break out there, or could the marine presence there lead to another long entanglement such as Vietnam?

The President. No, I don't see anything of that kind taking place there at all. And the marines are going in there, into a situation with a definite understanding as to what we're supposed to do. I believe that we are going to be successful in seeing the other foreign forces leave Lebanon. And then as such time as Lebanon says that they have the situation well in hand, why, we'll depart.

Q. But does any of the blame for the past 18 months? The Democrats in Congress say they gave you your tax program, they gave you almost all the budget cuts you want. You predicted that the very psychological passage of these programs would cause the economy to start up, but it hasn't.

The President. Well, I believe that all the indices that have been true in the other several recessions are there and are evident. For 4 quarters we have seen a growth in the gross national product. We have seen for the first time in several years an increase in real earnings for the people, because of our battle against inflation and, as I've said, the interest rates coming down to where they are. I recall when we started that we were told by experts that inflation was built into the economy and would take at least a decade to get control of it.

The only thing that has kept on progressing is the thing, as I say, started and has been going on over several years, which is the unemployment situation. Now, we know from history that is the last to recover.

But I think we are in, you could call it, a curve or at the corner, going around the corner or the curve, by every indice, the evidence that we are, that we are progressing and on our way out of this. And some 44 blue-chip economists, who get together and pool all of their information and their knowledge as to what is going to happen, have said that they see a solid recovery in the year 1983.

Q. I'd like to ask you a busing question, Mr. President. The Justice Department has said that it's considering asking the courts to dismantle mandatory court-ordered busing in St. Louis and several other cities across the Nation. Were you consulted in advance about this decision, and do you agree with it?

The President. Well, this is no change in policy. It's been presented that way, Jerry. There's no change in policy at all. What the Justice Department has said is that in those areas where there has been court-ordered busing, if the community is seeking to have that changed in court, on a case-by-case basis, depending on the circumstances, the Justice Department would join the community in going into court on that case. But again I say on a case-to-case basis in which there would be -- the Justice Department would decide that the community's case was well taken.

The President. Well, because, I suppose, there has been so much court-ordering and some of it has seemed to be a violation of the rights of a community and the rights of local school boards and so forth that it's time, if communities officially are ready to take this action -- as a matter of fact, in a number of the cases right now, the people that were supposed to benefit from the busing are the ones who are bringing the cases. The black community is the one that is protesting.

Q. Mr. President, it has been reported that you believe that Israel is sabotaging your peace initiative and also that you now believe that Israel has become the Goliath in the Middle East and that the other countries, the Arab countries, are the Davids. Did you say that? Do you believe that?

Goliath. I said that one of the things, as the negotiations approach and we proceed with this peacemaking business, that Israel should understand, as we've come to understand from talking to other Arab States, that where from the very beginning, all of us, including Israel, have thought of them as the tiny country fighting for its life, surrounded by larger states and hostile states that want to see it destroyed, that their military power has become such that there are Arab States that now voice a fear that they're expansionist, that they may be expansionist and they have the military power. So, all I was referring to was that.

The first part of your statement there, though, about Israel and trying to undermine -- no, I don't believe that. I think that both sides have voiced things that they feel very strongly about, and contrary to what I had suggested in my proposal and having been a long-time union negotiator, I happen to think that some of that might be each side staking out its position so as to be in a better position when it comes time to negotiate.

Q. Mr. President, you've described yourself on more than one occasion as very upset with the perception of unfairness, the idea that your programs cut unevenly against the poor. But there's one study which finds that most States which cut social programs, after the funds were cut, are not replacing them at the State level. You and others have talked of the need for even greater budget cuts next year, and you've made it pretty plain that those aren't going to be defense cuts.

And there are stories all the time of people right on the margin, people in margin of poverty denied a benefit here or an eligibility there, while tax cuts make life more comfortable for the middle class. So, my question is, why should you not be held responsible in these cases?

The President. Because in a number of instances those cases have nothing to do with our budget cuts. There was even an entire documentary on the air, and none of the cases that were presented were the result of our budget cuts.

But also, let me point out that you're dealing with human beings on the administering side, also. In my own experience in California and our own welfare reforms, many times bureaucracy will take the ball and run with it, thinking that they're going with what is supposed to be the new system, and they will penalize people. And I've talked as much about that as anyone else has, before I ever came here, on my own radio broadcast -- cases of people that were thrown off of social security disability, and then when they could finally get a hearing, it was determined that they never should've been thrown off in the first place. These are elements of human error more typical, I think, of a bureaucracy in government than they are of private charities that aren't bound in by as much redtape.

Now, as to fairness, Aid for Dependent Children in the decade of the seventies -- their benefits were increased by one-third. In that same decade, because of the inflation that was brought on by the irresponsible government spending, those people actually, with a one-third increase in benefits, had a one-third decrease in their ability to buy food and the necessities of life, because of inflation.

Now, not only those people who are on Aid for Dependent Children find that they have increased purchasing power because of the change in the inflation rate, people at the poverty level have about $600 more in purchasing power; median-income family in America has about $1,500 more purchasing power than they would've had if inflation had stayed at the level it was when we started.

Now, what is more fair -- to embark on a lot of well-intentioned programs -- I don't fault the intention, but, for example, in the $66 billion that I mentioned in those job programs, those that were training programs, only 20 cents out of the dollar went for training. Now, we're asking for a billion-dollar training program particularly for young people, and 70 cents out of every dollar of that is going to go to actual training of those young people. I think that we're being more fair than someone who sits there knowing consciously that inflation is also a tax, knowing that without having to vote for a tax increase the government is getting a tax increase with every percentage point of inflation. And that's been going on for years. I think we're being more fair.

Q. That's very kind of you. I just wanted to ask you, since you said you didn't think that Israel was trying to undermine your peace initiative, whether you are less optimistic about its chances since the massacre and the tragedy in Beirut?

Basically what we have, I think, in this peace proposal is a situation where on one side territory is the goal and on the other side security. And what has to be negotiated out is a kind of exchange of territory for security. And I meant what I said when I proposed this plan, and that is, this country will never stand by and see any settlement that does not guarantee the security of Israel.

Q. Mr. President, you've told us that you're sending marines to Lebanon for a limited amount of time, and yet you haven't told us what the limit is. Can you give us a general idea of how long you expect them to stay there and tell us precisely what you would like to see them accomplish before they withdraw?

One, they're there along with our allies, the French and the Italians, to give a kind of support and stability while the Lebanese Government seeks to reunite its people -- which have been divided for several years now into several factions, each one of them with its own army -- and bring about a unified Lebanon with a Lebanese Army that will then be able to preserve order in its own country.

Now, there we've had declarations from both countries that they want to do that. So, I am reasonably optimistic about that. I had no way to judge about when the Lebanese Government -- the Lebanese Government will be the ones that tell us when they feel that they're in charge and they can go home.

The President. Yes, because I think that's going to come rapidly; I think we're going to see the withdrawal. Our marines will go in tomorrow morning, as said, because the Israelis have agreed to withdraw to that line south of the airport.

Afghanistan, the arms reduction talks that are going on in Europe, the Siberian natural gas pipeline, and the renewed grain sale agreement, how do you assess the United States-Soviet relationship now, 20 months into your term in office?

I can only say this: In 20 months -- and I'm going to knock on wood -- the Soviet Union, which has been expanding over the years vastly in the territory and the people coming under its control, they haven't expanded into an extra square inch since we've been here. So, maybe we do have an understanding of each other.

Now, today I've just had a call from George Shultz [Secretary of State]. He has met for 3 hours with Ambassador Gromyko and he said it was a serious discussion and a wide-ranging discussion and they're going to resume it on Monday. So, we're not standing off and ignoring each other.

The President. Unless there's a palace coup and I'm overtaken -- [laughter] -- or overthrown, no, I don't see the necessity for that. I see the necessity for more economies, more reductions in government spending. And I can't say anything about the 1984 budget, because in 3 days we come to the beginning of the fiscal 1983 year, and we still don't have a budget. I haven't had a single appropriation bill to sign as yet, and they're all going to go home in a few days.

Q. I have a followup there, sir. Your budget director once said that he thought there was a kind of swamp of 10 to 20 to 30 billion dollars worth of waste in the military budget. Those are his words. Are you confident that you can ferret out that much waste in the military budget, or do you think you'll have to adjust social security or cut further into social programs?

The President. I don't know whether the -- when that figure or what it was based on, but I think that in these 20 months great progress has been made due to the Secretary's diligence in that regard, with waste. But at the same time we also have a citizens task force that's going into every department of government, and it is in the Defense Department, looking for management mispractices, for those things that can -- where modern business practices can be put to work to make them better.

Q. Mr. President, shortly before the Israeli invasion of Lebanon, the administration informally notified Congress that it was planning to send more F - 16's to Israel. There's been no formal notification since then. Is the delay linked to difficulties in relations with Israel? When do you think formal notification will go up, and under what conditions?

The President. They're still on tap, and we haven't sent the formal notification up. And, very frankly, it was simply because in the climate of things that were going on, we didn't think it was the time to do it. However, there has been no interruption of those things that are in the pipeline, spare parts, ammunition, things of that kind. The only thing that we have actually withheld after the controversy that came on in Lebanon was the artillery shell, the so-called cluster shell.

The President. Well, I hate to comment on their affairs and involve myself and all. It doesn't seem to have been the consideration for the fan that there could have been and should have been. They do seem to be very apart, however, in their goals. And sometimes I've thought we ran the Screen Actors Guild better than that.

The President. Well, let me tell you, those levels are unacceptable to me as long as there's one person unemployed who wants a job and can't find one. As I've said before, maybe there're some others in the room who remember it firsthand -- job hunting and the Great Depression. I do vividly, and I don't know of anything that bothers me more than this situation.

In those days, of course, there weren't any provisions as there are now for unemployment insurance or help or anything for quite some time. It is possible that we might touch 10 percent. I hope not, but, if we do, I would also like to point out that there is a higher percentage of the eligible workers in the land -- that is considered to be everyone over age 16, man and woman -- that there is a higher percentage employed today than has been true even in the past in times of full employment.

I wish there was an instant answer -- we believe the answer lies in what we're doing to inflation, which in turn will bring down interest rates and which in turn will, as people are able to buy more and people will once again be able to look at home mortgages and build homes, buy automobiles and so forth -- we know that for the last several months there has been an increase in auto sales.

Now, this is not solid. You've got to remember these figures are a little volatile; that you look at what is the chartline. And there are dips in it. There'll come a month, this coming month or when the figures are released -- we think that August has been in a kind of doldrums. And it may show a dip, but that'll be a glitch. It won't be down lower than what it's been for the last several months.

But we believe that, rather than artificial programs that make for dead-end and temporary jobs as we've had in the past, they don't last; they aren't permanent; and they also just delay the bringing back of a solid base to the economy. We think we're on the way to establishing that solid base, and that is the hope for the unemployed.

Now, may I just add something else here? Some of you, I know, have commented that our job-training program was training people for jobs that don't exist. Well, do you remember once up here when I cited how many pages in the metropolitan newspapers on Sunday, how many pages of help wanted ads there are? And if you look at them, they're all for people with particular training or skills and so forth. Well, there are still that many help wanted ads, meaning there are that many open jobs looking for someone to fill them.

And I was misunderstood at the time. I wasn't trying to minimize unemployment, I was suggesting at the time that part of our job must be to train young people, who are the greatest percentage -- I mean, they are in the greatest percentage of unemployed -- train them for those jobs that we know are there and are not being filled. And at the rate of a million a year, we think this is a good investment.

Q. Mr. President, I seem to get the impression from what you are saying about our relationships with Israel that nothing has really changed in the wake of the massacre in Beirut or the temporary rejection, anyway, of your peace plan. Is that correct? Is there no change at all?

The President. There's no change in the sense that we're still going with everything we can. We're going to try and persuade the Arab neighbors of Israel to do as Egypt once did, and Israel, to negotiate out a permanent peace solution, in which Israel will no longer have to remain an armed camp, which is making their life economically unbearable. And at the same time, an answer must be found that is just and fair for the Palestinians. And I don't think anything has happened to change that, if I understood your question correctly. Nothing has changed in our feeling of obligation to bring about, if we can, such a result.

The President. I can tell you one thing it isn't. It isn't what some of you have said or written, that we are deliberately trying to undermine or overthrow the Begin government. We have never interfered in the internal government of a country and have no intention of doing so, never have had any thought of that kind. And we expect to be doing business with the Government of Israel and with Prime Minister Begin, if that's the decision of the Israeli people. I think that Frank Reynolds [ABC News] last night voiced something that we believe, and that is that the Israeli people are proving with their reaction to the massacre that there's no change in the spirit of Israel.

Q. Mr. President, last December when you were making out your budget, you came down very hard against any tax increases then. And yet, 6 months later you were forced to go in for a rather hefty package. Some of your top aides are already speaking pessimistically of the recovery being here in time to affect your budget next year. How can you really afford to stand here and vow that you won't raise taxes, and, if you're not going to, where are you going to take up that slack?

The President. Well, I've expressed my personal feeling about the taxes. We still have a tax cut coming in July of 1983. I believe that that tax cut is essential. So far, the people have had a 15-percent cut. They now have the other 10 percent coming. I think that indexing is vital. Of course, at the same time that I say indexing is vital, I have a feeling that if we can be as successful as we've been and keep on going curbing inflation, then indexing won't make much difference.

Governor Dalton, the Members of the Congress, State Chairman Al Cramer, the delegates and candidates for the House of Delegates, you ladies and gentlemen -- and, oh, how happy I am to see all you young people here. You're what this election is all about -- the country that you're going to have when it's your turn to take over.

Washington state of mind. [Laughter] On this side of the river, only horses suffer from Potomac fever. [Laughter] Hard work, love of families, belief in God are the values at the center of life in Virginia. And with your help and that of your Representatives, we're going to return respect for those values to our National Government.

In this election and throughout this decade, the American people will be asked to reaffirm our difficult course toward national renewal. The vote of every citizen will matter, and every ounce of individual commitment will count. And make no mistake: The choice the American voters have this year is just as important as the one they had 2 years ago. It's a clear choice, as you've been told already, about the kind of nation that we will be -- whether we will continue our sure and steady course to put America back on track, or whether we will slide backward into another economic binge like the one which left us with today's pounding national hangover.

According to them, the economic crisis emerged full-blown by spontaneous generation just a few seconds after I took the oath of office. Well, with all respect to astronomers, let's take a look at history. You heard some already, and it's all true.

In the 4 years before we got to Washington, the entire Government of the United States was in the hands of those today who are the most vocal of our critics. They controlled the Presidency, the United States Senate, the House of Representatives, all the committees of the Congress, the entire executive branch, the hundreds of departments, agencies, and administrative units responsible for running the Federal Establishment -- something no Republican administration has experienced for nearly 30 years.

When my friends on the other side began this power monopoly, America was enjoying economic stability that would be a source of envy today. Inflation was running at 4.8 percent at the end of 1976, as Gerald Ford left office. And the prime interest rate was under 7 percent. You could get a home mortgage for 9 percent.

But in these 4 years of Democratic monopoly -- and let me point something out. When I use the term referring to the opposition party, the Democratic Party, I spent most of my life as a Democrat. I know that others in this room did, and I know there are others in this room who still are members of that party. But what has happened is a great gulf has developed between the leadership of the Democratic Party and millions of rank-and-file Democratic Party members who aren't in lockstep with that leadership.

These were the highest interest rates in over a century. Productivity dropped in '79 and '80, and that was the first 2-year-in-a-row drop in productivity in our recorded history. The savings rate went down. The rate of increase of industrial production dropped every year. The rate of increase in our gross national product dropped for 3 years straight. High taxes smothered the incentives of individuals and businesses. Taxpayers began paying the due bills for runaway inflation, as it kicked them relentlessly into higher income tax brackets.

Democratic President and a Democratic Congress passed the single highest peacetime increase -- tax increase -- in the history of the Republic. The ultimate victims, of course, were American workers and their families and the senior citizens they professed to care so much about. The grim results were that both real wages and weekly earnings decreased between 1976 and 1980. So much for liberal fairness and liberal compassion for the working people of this nation.

Families were driven in the evening to the kitchen table to try and figure out -- they sat around that table -- how to cope with the inflation that robbed their buying power at the same time it reduced their spendable earnings. Young couples didn't dream of new homes; they dreamed of just surviving. Small businesses were hit especially hard. The only sure thing was the unstoppable fattening of the United States Government.

In the year before I took office, Federal spending increased by 17 percent in that single year. How many of our fellow citizens were able to say that their incomes or their pensions or their savings had gone up by 17 percent?

Government could be all things to all people. The Congress had been under virtual one-party control for a quarter of a century, a spendthrift era of busted budgets and fatter and fatter government. For every new tax, there were always plenty of new ways to spend it. The Washington establishment believed that the only good dollar was the one taken out of a taxpayer's pocket. As a matter of fact, they began to talk about, and still talk about, the legitimate deductions that you're permitted by law in computing your income tax as ``tax expenditures,'' meaning that all of your money belonged to them, they only let you keep what they decided you should keep.

Words cannot tell how painful it is to me that each day, for millions of Americans, is one of hurt and indignity because they want to work and can't find a place where they can sell their ability to work.

We all wish there were some quick and easy cure for this terrible economic illness that was so long in the making. For months now I've been biting my tongue while I've listened to all those strident speeches about how we've purposely thrown people out of work. Well, it seems to me that the people who have created the mess we're in, the same politicians who took us down the path of guaranteed economic disaster, are the last ones who should be delivering sermonettes on the cause of unemployment.

From our very first day of office, we've been working to undo the economic wreckage they left behind. As a matter of fact, when I finished taking the oath on that inaugural day, I turned around and went back into the Capitol. We found a table, and I sat down and signed an Executive order right then, freezing the size of the Federal Government.

To get control of the spending, encourage incentives by lowering taxes, to stop the unwise regulations and start America on the road to expansion and growth once again -- that is what we've been trying to do since that January day.

Our first urgent priority was to break the back of inflation, because it touched on nearly every other economic problem we had. And we did. We have more than cut it in half -- 3.3 last month, but since January, it has averaged 5.1 percent.

This devastating recessionary virus, one that many economists believe started and has continued since 1979, has begun to show signs of finally running its course. For 4 months in a row now the leading economic indicators have been encouraging. Confidence has soared in the stock market; it's gone up 140 points in the last 7 weeks. These are positive signals. While there may be an occasional blip, the pattern is firmly established.

I believe deeply that we can put this nightmarish economic calamity behind us if we have the strength to stick to our course. But until there's a job for every American who wants to work, and as long as plants and machinery lay idle, we cannot let up in our efforts. From the very beginning I've cautioned that this work of recovery would be arduous and long. Progress would come slowly, but it would come steadily.

This has been a time of great testing, and a time when millions of Americans have displayed enormous courage and patience. The road to economic recovery is never easy, but we have made progress. Yet this election season has brought a clamor of negative voices that nothing seems to please. The cuts in spending, they say, are too deep. Taxes are too low. Their favorite special interests have been hurt. Despite all their failures of the past, they still oppose our comprehensive reform measures, and what is their alternative?

Well, the Congressman was right. As far as anyone can tell, their answers have mostly been recommendations to repeat their own past failures, artificially stimulate the money supply, more spending on what they call job programs, but at the same time raise taxes -- in short, everything they were doing between 1977 and 1980.

Well, I've got news for them. Double-digit inflation is no alternative; 21\1/2\-percent interest rates are no alternative; another trillion dollars of national debt is no alternative; higher taxes are no alternative.

To my liberal friends I say: You can't create a desert and then hand someone in the middle of that desert a cup of water and call that compassion. You can't pour billions of dollars into dead end, make-work jobs and call that opportunity. You cannot build up years and years of degrading dependence by our citizens on the government and then dare to call that hope. And believe me, you can't drive our people to despair with crises that wipe them out or taxes which sap their energies and then boast that you've given them fairness.

We spent in those years -- that 7-year period I've talked about -- we have spent $66 billion on job programs, government job programs, and during those times unemployment continued to increase, and it averaged 7 percent over those 7 years.

That wonderful Old Testament book of Ecclesiastes teaches us that ``to everything there is a season.'' As I've traveled around the country, I've become more and more convinced that today America stands at the dawning of a season of hope. It is the hope which springs from the vitality of the American spirit, a hope that will fulfill the richness of all the promise that is within us.

To these young people I want to say I have a dream that I hope all of you share -- that before we step down and they take over we will at least have made some payments to reduce that trillion-dollar debt. We will not keep on increasing it on down through the years to dump it on their backs.

Virginia is rich in tradition. I think everyone in America knows that and respects the traditions of this great State. You have a 50-year tradition, and certainly it crosses party lines, a tradition that for 50 years you had a Senate seat that was occupied by two Senators in succession, father and son, who were true to all of the things that we've been talking about and all of these ideals of fiscal responsibility and integrity and, yes, the spiritual revival of this country.

The President. Dr. Harvey, as part of our ongoing effort to support historically black colleges and universities, I'm pleased to recognize Hampton Institute with a grant to further your service to the local small business community.

Hampton has a well-earned reputation for opening doors of opportunity, not only to its students but to the residents of your community. And this grant will help you and your efforts to increase local investment and create new jobs on the peninsula.

Paul Trible has told me of the seminars and the programs the Institute provides, training for local residents in management and efficiency. You're doing a fine job, and I join Senator Warner and Congressman Trible in commending you and the Institute for your community service.

Last year when you signed your Executive order, you instructed the Federal agencies to put more money into black higher education. And this has become a reality. Although spending was down for all of higher education, actually the black community -- the black higher educational community received more money; as a matter of fact, about $3 million more than in the previous fiscal year. We thank you, Mr. President, for this support.

Congressman Trible has been a supporter of Hampton Institute for a long time. As a matter of fact, you might be interested to know that for several years he was against the pay raise in Congress. And he didn't get it, and he gave the pay raise to Hampton Institute. So, he's been a supporter for a long time. We appreciate Congressman Trible, and, Mr. President, we appreciate you. Thank you, sir.

The grant for the Hampton Institute Economic Development Technical Assistance Center was to carry out a program of assistance to small business on the southern peninsula of Virginia. It's objectives were to increase investment, stabilize existing employment, create new jobs, and contribute to growth of the peninsula's economy.

The President. No, what I said was that we expected that to take place soon, but that the determination of when we leave will be the Government of Lebanon -- when they feel that they are in charge and can provide for their own security, they will ask us to leave. What I did say was that, based on the assertions of both Israel and Syria and the statements of the Arab allies, that I expect the departure of those other forces to take place probably sooner than Lebanon would be ready for us to.

The President. Well, as I say, my assertion was my expectation that the withdrawal would be coming promptly. I'm not tying that to what Lebanon may decide, but I said that because they've all stated that they want to withdraw, then I expect that withdrawal to take place rather soon.

On September 20, 1982, the Government of Lebanon requested the Governments of France, Italy, and the United States to contribute forces to serve as a temporary Multinational Force, the presence of which will facilitate the restoration of Lebanese Government sovereignty and authority, and thereby further the efforts of the Government of Lebanon to assure the safety of persons in the area and bring to an end the violence which has tragically recurred.

In response to this request of the Government of Lebanon, I have authorized the Armed Forces of the United States to participate in this Multinational Force. In accordance with my desire that the Congress be fully informed on this matter, and consistent with the War Powers Resolution, I am hereby providing a report on the deployment and mission of these members of the United States armed forces.

Beirut. Their mission is to provide an interposition force at agreed locations and thereby provide the multinational presence requested by the Lebanese Government to assist it and the Lebanese Armed Forces. In carrying out this mission, the American force will not engage in combat. It may, however, exercise the right of self-defense and will be equipped accordingly. These forces will operate in close coordination with the Lebanese Armed Forces, as well as with comparably sized French and Italian military contingents in the Multinational Force. Although it is not possible at this time to predict the precise duration of the presence of U.S. forces in Beirut, our agreement with the Government of Lebanon makes clear that they will be needed only for a limited period to meet the urgent requirements posed by the current situation.

I want to emphasize that, as was the case of the deployment of U.S. forces to Lebanon in August as part of the earlier multinational force, there is no intention or expectation that U.S. Armed Forces will become involved in hostilities. They are in Lebanon at the formal request of the Government of Lebanon, and our agreement with the Government of Lebanon expressly rules out any combat responsibilities for the U.S. forces. All armed elements in the area have given assurances that they will refrain from hostilities and will not interfere with the activities of the Multinational Force. Although isolated acts of violence can never be ruled out, all appropriate precautions have been taken to ensure the safety of U.S. military personnel during their temporary deployment in Lebanon.

I believe that this step will support the objective of helping to restore the territorial integrity, sovereignty, and political independence of Lebanon. It is part of the continuing efforts of the United States Government to bring lasting peace to that troubled country, which has too long endured the trials of civil strife and armed conflict.

Thank you very much. Incidentally, a couple of visitors came in with me over here -- Don Kendall and Lou Uhler, who are the cochairmen of the drive out there to help with this very thing that brings us together here today. But I'm here to thank 218 Members of the House of Representatives, Republicans and responsible Democrats, who joined together to sign the discharge petition for the balanced budget tax limitation amendment.

This is an important step forward in a struggle our administration has waged for many months -- the battle to get runaway spending under control as part of our effort to restore America's economic health. Earlier this year in meeting with congressional leaders and at a rally on the Capitol steps, I urged prompt action on the constitutional amendment to require a balanced Federal budget. As you know, the amendment was passed by the Senate some time ago. Until now, however, it's been bottled up in the House.

I know of the concern that the leadership of the House may try to sabotage the passage of this resolution by an 11th-hour sleight of hand. This is no time to subvert the will of the Congress and the vast majority of our people. All Americans deserve to know where their Representatives stand on this balanced budget amendment before the Congress recesses for the campaign.

We've already made important progress in healing a sick economy. The statistics may waiver from time to time, but slowly, surely we are working our way to a recovery that can spare our children the problems that we face today.

Making this government live within its means will do more to bring interest rates and inflation down further, protect the earnings of our people, and put unemployed Americans back to work than anything else the Congress could do at this time.

Republican and Democrat, who signed the discharge petition, and put the national interest before politics. The time to act is now -- for the sake of all of our people, for future generations of Americans whose chances for prosperity and opportunity are held hostage by big government's addiction to red-ink spending.

I am pleased to sign into law today H.R. 4347, a bill reauthorizing construction of the WEB rural water-supply pipeline in South Dakota, providing for study of further water resource developments in South Dakota, and authorizing the use of power generated through the Pick-Sloan Missouri Basin Program for irrigation-pumping for certain Indian lands.

Congressman Clint Roberts of South Dakota, and other leaders in that State for their patient and thorough work in seeing the WEB Rural Water Development Act through to this milestone. I am pleased to add my official approval to this legislative effort, one that attests to the determination of the people of South Dakota and their elected Representatives and also, I believe, to the willingness of this administration to cooperate with the States in finding practical solutions to problems that have too long been ignored.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of Sept. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Before I talk about these wonderful entertainers who have been so generous and kind with their entertainment and so wonderful, I want to thank -- at the beginning of the evening -- I want to thank my good friend from California, and the other good friends with him and his troop, our barbecuers from Santa Maria, California, who came here all the way to barbecue.

I'd thank Roger Williams, except he isn't here to hear that. The reason he came down and said goodby was, he had to catch a plane. So, he's on his way. Ane we appreciate his talent I know, and we certainly all appreciate Tammy Wynette.

I think one of the great pleasures that Nancy and I have had is getting to know so many of you personally in these 20 months that we've been here and to discover that we can disagree and still be agreeable. And on the Republican side, your support and guidance has been a valuable asset. I don't take it for granted. There's one thing, you can't be called a rubber stamp -- [laughter] -- I found that out on the tax bill. It's kind of like a happy marriage though. You have quarrels, and it's still a happy family.

Somebody told me -- this is another news announcement -- that Dave Stockman is getting married. His toughest budget battles lie ahead. [Laughter] If you think he doesn't take the budget seriously, the wedding cake is going to be cheesecake made with surplus cheese.

You were part of, I think, a great philosophical change in direction, and I think it's a tribute to our form of government and to each of you that we can move from one basic economic and social perspective to another without a threat to the political freedoms that we all love so well and which were so beautifully proclaimed by the chorus here. But if there were any doubts, you made it clear that we are Republicans, we are Democrats, but one thing for certain, we are all Americans.

And now, again, under an almost full Moon, the weather turned out, everything was just fine. But this entertainment, Tammy and all of you, and all of you back there, it was just wonderful, and we thank you very much. Thank you.

The President has accorded the personal rank of Ambassador to Leonard H. Marks in his capacity as Chairman of the United States Delegation to the first session of the World Administrative Radio Conference for Planning Use of the High Frequency Broadcasting Bands of the International Telecommunication Union. This rank would be while he is conducting preliminary bilateral and multilateral consultations as well as the first session of the Conference, which convenes from January 10 through February 10, 1984.

I speak for all Americans and for the people everywhere who cherish civilized values in protesting the Soviet attack on an unarmed civilian passenger plane. Words can scarcely express our revulsion at this horrifying act of violence.

The United States joins with other members of the international community in demanding a full explanation for this appalling and wanton misdeed. The Soviet statements to this moment have totally failed to explain how or why this tragedy has occurred. Indeed, the whole incident appears to be inexplicable to civilized people everywhere.

Mrs. Reagan and I want to express our deepest sympathy to the families of the victims. Our prayers are with them in this time of bereavement, and they have my personal assurance that I will make every effort to get to the bottom of this tragedy.

President of the United States of America, that the flag of the United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal Government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and possessions through Sunday, September 4, 1983. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

Today the Department of Labor released figures showing that the unemployment rate for August is essentially unchanged from July. The overall unemployment rate increased slightly from 9.3 percent to 9.4 percent, which is not regarded as statistically significant. The old civilian rate remained unchanged at 9.5 percent.

Employment statistics for August are complicated by a very large increase in the number of workers on strike: 710,000 more persons were on strike in August than in July. Striking workers are not counted among the unemployed, but they also are not counted for payroll employment.

And now, in the wake of the barbaric act committed yesterday by the Soviet regime against a commercial jetliner [Korean Air Lines flight 007], the United States and many other countries of the world made clear and compelling statements that expressed not only our outrage but also our demand for a truthful accounting of the facts.

Our first emotions are anger, disbelief, and profound sadness. While events in Afghanistan and elsewhere have left few illusions about the willingness of the Soviet Union to advance its interests through violence and intimidation, all of us had hoped that certain irreducible standards of civilized behavior, nonetheless, obtained. But this event shocks the sensibilities of people everywhere. The tradition in a civilized world has always been to offer help to mariners and pilots who are lost or in distress on the sea or in the air. Where human life is valued, extraordinary efforts are extended to preserve and protect it, and it's essential that as civilized societies, we ask searching questions about the nature of regimes where such standards do not apply.

Beyond these emotions the world notes the stark contrast that exists between Soviet words and deeds. What can we think of a regime that so broadly trumpets its vision of peace and global disarmament and yet so callously and quickly commits a terrorist act to sacrifice the lives of innocent human beings? What could be said about Soviet credibility when they so flagrantly lie about such a heinous act? What can be the scope of legitimate and mutual discourse with a state whose values permit such atrocities? And what are we to make of a regime which establishes one set of standards for itself and another for the rest of humankind?

We've joined in the call for an urgent United Nations Security Council meeting today. The brutality of this act should not be compounded through silence or the cynical distortion of the evidence now at hand. And tonight I will be meeting with my advisers to conduct a formal review of this matter, and this weekend I shall be meeting with the congressional leadership.

This weekend marks the 89th observance of Labor Day, a special day for all Americans. Before I get to that topic, however, I'm going to speak to you briefly about the recent act of brutality that continues to horrify us all. I'm referring to the outrageous Soviet attack against the 269 people aboard the unarmed Korean passenger plane.

This murder of innocent civilians is a serious international issue between the Soviet Union and civilized people everywhere who cherish individual rights and value human life. It is up to all of us, leaders and citizens of the world, to deal with the Soviets in a calm, controlled, but absolutely firm manner. We have joined in this call for an urgent U.N. Security Council meeting.

The evidence is clear; it leaves no doubt; it is time for the Soviets to account. The Soviet Union owes the world a fullest possible explanation and apology for their inexcusable act of brutality. So far, they've flunked the test. Even now, they continue to distort and deny the truth.

People everywhere can draw only one conclusion from their violent behavior: There is a glaring gap between Soviet words and deeds. They speak endlessly about their love of brotherhood, disarmament, and peace, but they reserve the right to disregard aviation safety and to sacrifice human lives.

Make no mistake on this last point. This is not the first time the Soviets have shot at and hit a civilian airliner when it flew over Soviet territory. Our government does not shoot down foreign aircraft over U.S. territory, even though commerical aircraft from the Soviet Union and Cuba have overflown sensitive U.S. military facilities. We and other civilized countries follow procedures to prevent a tragedy, rather than to provoke one. But while the Soviets accuse others of wanting to return to the cold war, it's they who have never left it behind.

I met with the National Security Council last night. Tomorrow I will meet with congressional leaders of both parties to discuss this issue, as well as the situation in Lebanon, on which the National Security Council met today. We're determined to move forward and to act in concert both with the Congress and other members of the international community. We must make sure that the fundamental rules of safety of travel are respected by all nations, even the Soviet Union.

Those words have meant a lot to me over the years. I've always believed that America can only be true to itself when its promise is shared by all our people. One of the best ways to make sure that happens is to build a healthy, growing economy that opens up more and more opportunity to our people. We've been working at that for more than 2\1/2\ years now. With your help and the help of a bipartisan group in the Congress, our efforts are showing good results.

Just this week, Commerce Secretary Baldrige announced that in July inventories registered their biggest advance in 20 months. That means the economic recovery has boosted the confidence of manufacturers and encouraged business firms to restock. It adds up to more work for people in a wide range of industries and trades and means this recovery will continue to be strong.

Another good way of testing progress is to measure how well the American family, the average family, is doing today. An American family earning $25,000 has $600 more today in purchasing power than it would if inflation were still raging at its 1980 rate. And then there are your tax savings. The typical American family will pay $700 less in Federal income taxes than if the old 1980 rates were still in effect.

Now, I know that for many Americans on this Labor Day, life is still tough. None of us can be fully satisfied until many more of our people find work. And we won't be satisfied until we cut inflation all the way back to zero. But every week, our economy is gaining fresh strength, and that's good news for us all.

Finally, let me say that on this weekend, I hope you'll take a moment to celebrate not only the working people of this nation but something that makes it all possible -- our freedom. As I mentioned at the outset, we've watched with horror these past few days as totalitarianism has shown its ghastly face once again. That's why here in America we must remain a bastion of free men and women working together toward a brighter future.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, this is a photo opportunity. We have been meeting. In fact, all we've been doing for quite some time is meeting. But the Ambassador and I have been meeting with regard to his return tomorrow to the negotiating table in Geneva, by way of some of our allies in NATO, on the intermediate-range nuclear weapons discussions.

The President. I'm going to take one question, because I meant to say this in my opening remarks and didn't. And the only thing is, yes, we are still meeting, and tomorrow we'll be meeting with Congressmen on that particular problem, that issue. And I don't believe that that should reduce the importance of continuing the talks that we hope will lead to a reduction in the number of nuclear weapons in the world. I think peace is that all-important that we shall continue those talks.

The endeavors of today's workers and their unions assure that our country will have an even brighter future. Yet the bounty we have reaped from these labors is not limited to mere products and services. Our workers have been one of the cornerstones of our democratic system. The values they have passed down from generation to generation have strengthened America as the land of opportunity.

Even though the nature of our labor has changed over the years, Americans still believe that all work is noble. In celebrating the efforts of American workers, past and present, we honor this fundamental truth as well.

Americans who want to work. Through my Administration's Economic Recovery Program, we are bringing new hope to Americans. Already this year more than 1.7 million more Americans are employed than last December. The resurgence of our economy is bringing real jobs -- jobs with a future -- in the private sector.

The improved economic climate we now enjoy promises all Americans a prosperous future. I know that the nation's workforce will play a vital role in helping America realize its full economic potential.

September 6 saddened us all. We condemn those responsible for the continuing violence that has claimed thousands of innocent victims. We are proud of our own forces and the important role they are playing to achieve security for the Lebanese people.

The Lebanese Government has issued a call to all parties to unite to restore national dialog. We will continue to work with them toward that end. The goal of a newly united Lebanon, free of foreign forces, is a dream of the Lebanese people, regardless of their religious community.

Together with our Italian, French, and British partners in the multinational force, we are performing a critical role in support of the effort of the central government. No one should mistake our determination to continue in this just cause.

Each year thousands of American lives are lost, billions of dollars in property are needlessly destroyed, and thousands of persons are permanently disfigured or disabled by burn injuries from preventable fires.

Obviously, we must continue to address fire prevention as a national priority, and I strongly urge each citizen to make a personal commitment to aid in the reduction of this senseless and tragic waste of precious lives, property, and natural resources from fire. Through a concentrated effort our Nation can substantially reduce the human suffering and economic losses from fire.

Since most deaths and injuries from fire occur in the home, it is essential that families install and maintain smoke detectors to provide early warning should a fire occur. In addition, each family should establish and practice home fire escape plans. Commercial enterprises and State and local governments should consider installation of fast-response sprinklers to protect lives in residences, hotels, motels, and nursing homes.

An indispensable ingredient of fire prevention is our professional firefighter. Firefighting is one of our most hazardous occupations. We are indebted to the brave men and women who serve communities across the Nation so bravely -- often at the risk of their own safety and sometimes at the cost of their own lives.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The National School Lunch Program -- now in its 37th year -- operates to provide nutritious and well-balanced meals to many young people of our country. The school lunch program is an outstanding example of the partnership between the Federal government and State and local governments to make available the food, funds, and technical support that insures continued nutritional assistance for school students.

The youth of America are our greatest resource. The school lunch program demonstrates the awareness, concern, and willingness to work together that we all share in promoting the health and well-being of our students.

Over 23 million lunches are served daily in some 90,000 schools throughout the country. This effort is being conducted by resourceful and creative food service managers and staff in cooperation with government, parents, teachers, and civic groups.

By joint resolution approved October 9, 1962, the Congress designated the week beginning on the second Sunday of October in each year as National School Lunch Week and requested the President to issue annually a proclamation calling for the observance of that week.

It is fitting that Americans honor those individuals who have altered the course of history in this country by exhibiting great moral character and courage -- men and women who have contributed to the development of personal liberties we enjoy today. Thus, it is especially appropriate that I urge all Americans to honor one of those individuals, Christopher Columbus.

Columbus was a bold and adventurous navigator who left Europe in 1492 in search of new lands and first recorded the sighting of the North American continent. In this sense he personifies the courage and vision so many explorers exhibited during this period. Yet he is more than this. He represents a spirit, the spirit of the Renaissance which contributed to the development of America.

Since Columbus discovered America, numerous families have exhibited that same courage and fortitude in setting sail across the seas to become American citizens. By taking that step into the new and unknown, those same families created an opportunity to realize increased prosperity and greater freedom here in these United States. The accomplishments and contributions of Christopher Columbus provide an example of the rewards that can come from taking initiatives.

Of course Columbus Day is a day of special importance to Americans of Italian heritage. It is a day when all Americans should join in recognizing the great contributions of Italian-Americans to this country's cultural, scientific, athletic and commercial achievements, and religious vitality.

On October 11, 1779, the Polish and American patriot Casimir Pulaski was mortally wounded while leading his troops in battle at Savannah, Georgia. Pulaski died fighting in our American Revolution so that we could live as a free and independent Nation.

It is fitting that we should pay tribute to this martyr for freedom and that free men and women everywhere should take this occasion to rededicate themselves to the principles for which Pulaski gave his life. The power of the ideal of freedom remains vital, both in Pulaski's homeland and in his adopted country. In paying tribute to Casimir Pulaski, we pay tribute as well to all those Poles who have sacrificed themselves over the years for their common goal: the freedom of that heroic nation.

One of the great blessings of life is to be able to move at will from place to place unhampered by fear for one's personal safety. For those who are blind, the white cane helps to make such freedom of movement possible. It enables the blind to use our streets and public facilities with maximum safety and thereby know the joys of self-reliance and independence and experience a more fulfilling life.

All Americans should be aware of the significance of the white cane and extend every courtesy and consideration to the men and women who carry it. In this way, we respect the privacy of the visually disabled and contribute to enlarging their mobility and independence.

Throughout our history, our Nation's abundant forests have served us in so many vital respects that we sometimes forget this extraordinary renewable natural resource. The growing and harvesting of trees, and the work force that turns them into useful products, make a valuable contribution to the Nation's economic well-being, and to providing homes for our people.

Familiar and useful items ranging from furniture to grocery bags to turpentine were once parts of trees in the forest. Our forest lands also provide water for homes, agriculture, and industry and pastures for grazing animals. Our forests serve us in many other ways. They provide a home for wildlife and are a source of recreational activities ranging from driving through and enjoying the scenery, to mountain climbing and backpacking in our numerous parks and wilderness areas.

We recognize that maintaining a healthy environment and a healthy economy are essential and complementary goals. We can be proud of our success and commitment to effective forest management, which strikes a vital balance between preservation and development of our forests.

But she's participating in a recognition ceremony for volunteers working in Operation LIFT, a literacy organization supported solely by the private sector. And yesterday, I had the pleasure in my office of meeting Sherman Swenson. He's the chief executive officer of Dalton Booksellers, and that corporation has launched a program nationwide on this very subject.

I know that Barbara would be as encouraged as I am at the broad array of groups and individuals represented here today -- leaders from the Congress, from education, business and industry, church and service groups, and State and local government. This is heartening, because it will take a united effort by all our people to achieve our goal: the elimination of adult functional illiteracy in the United States.

In this decade, America faces serious challenges on many fronts -- to our national security, our economic prosperity, and our ability to compete in the international marketplace. If we're to renew our economy, protect our freedom, we must sharpen the skills of every American mind and enlarge the potential of every individual American life. Unfortunately, the hidden problem of adult illiteracy holds back too many of our citizens, and as a nation, we, too, pay a price.

Conservative estimates are that 23 million Americans, one in five, are functionally illiterate -- a statistic that includes men and women of every race, religion, and economic status, and every region of the country.

I asked Secretary Bell to explore with you the best ways and means to erase adult illiteracy from our country, and the result is this initiative that we announce today. Some of the key points in the initiative are: to provide initial Federal funding for the Coalition for Literacy and support the National Ad Council in its awareness campaign; to establish a national adult literacy project identifying model literacy programs and developing and testing new programs, materials, and methods.

Initiatives to enlist more nongovernment support. An additional $310 million has been requested for college work-study programs to include students in our effort, and I have also asked the Department to recruit literacy volunteers on college campuses. Federal employees will also be encouraged to volunteer, and the Department of Education will conduct a series of national meetings and conferences to increase awareness and promote cooperation.

Across this great land, let those of us who can read teach those who cannot. Let the lights burn late in our classrooms, our church basements, our libraries, and around our kitchen tables -- wherever we can gather to help others help themselves to the American dream.

I appreciate all that you've already done, but today I'm asking you for more. Together, we can rouse the spirit of our people and apply our enormous national will to the task at hand. If we succeed, we will have come an important step closer to making America great again.

As the shofar calls Jews to their places of worship during this period, our thoughts and warm good wishes will be with you. May the year 5744 bring health, prosperity, and peace to you and your families.

As Under Secretary of State Lawrence Eagleburger said yesterday, the international community is being asked to accept that the Soviet Union is not bound by the norms of international behavior and human decency to which all other nations subscribe.

United Nations in particular -- that the Soviets provide a full accounting of what transpired, an unequivocal apology for Soviet actions, restitution for the victims' families, full cooperation with international efforts to investigate this tragedy and recover its victims, and assurances that the Soviet Union will take specific steps to ensure that the massacre of August 31 not occur again.

Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs with primary responsibility for liaison with the Nation's Governors. He will succeed James M. Medas, who has been appointed Deputy Assistant Secretary of State in the Bureau of European and Canadian Affairs.

The President has also reaffirmed the suspension of Aeroflot flights to and from this country which has been in effect since January 5, 1982. The impending Board decision would prevent Aeroflot from marketing any of its services through U.S. carriers or their American agents.

The duration of these measures in the civil aviation area will be for a period of time, in part dependent upon the extent to which the U.S.S.R. demonstrates its willingness to honor essential standards of civil aviation, makes a full account of its shoot down of the airliner, and issues an apology as well as compensation to aggrieved parties.

Eagleburger informed Soviet Ambassador Dobrynin today that the Soviet airline Aeroflot must close its offices in the United States by September 15. Aeroflot airline officials must depart this country by that date.

Section 1. Establishment. (a) There is established the President's Task Force on Food Assistance, which shall be composed of not more than fifteen persons, who shall be appointed by the President from among citizens of the United States who are not full-time officers or employees of the Federal Government.

Sec. 2. Functions. The Task Force shall analyze Federal and other programs intended to render food assistance to the needy and shall make recommendations to the President and the Secretary of Agriculture with respect to how such programs may be improved. The Task Force shall submit its report to the President within ninety days of its first meeting.

The last time such a policy paper was released was in July of 1977 -- more than 6 years ago. Since then, we have come to view international investment which responds to market forces as a vital and necessary ingredient in a stable, growing world economy.

International investment flows significantly affect the United States and world economies. With the current environment of widespread international debt problems, foreign direct investment flows take on increased importance. As the preeminent home and host country for foreign direct investment, we have a substantial interest in the conditions under which those flows occur.

The statement I am releasing enunciates the fundamental premise of our policy -- that foreign investment flows which respond to private market forces will lead to more efficient international production and thereby benefit both home and host countries.

It also highlights three other important points. First, our concern with the increasing use of governmental measures to distort or impede international investment flows. Secondly, our strong support for the concept of national treatment which extends to foreign direct investors in the United States. And finally, an enumeration of specific multilateral and bilateral steps the administration has taken, and will take, to help liberalize international investment flows.

A free and open international investment climate will play a key role not only in sustaining our own economic recovery here at home, but also in resolving many of the current international debt problems.

International direct investment plays a vital and expanding role in the world economy. To ensure its maximum contribution to both global and domestic economic well-being, the United States believes that international direct investment flows should be determined by private market forces and should receive non-discriminatory treatment consistent with the national treatment principle.

The United States opposes continued and increasing government intervention that impedes or distorts investment flows or attempts to shift artificially the benefits of these flows. These measures include trade-related or other performance requirements, fiscal or financial incentives, and discriminatory treatment of foreign investment.

To counter such measures, the United States will pursue an active international investment policy aimed at reducing foreign government actions that impede or distort investment flows and at developing an international system, based on national treatment and most-favored-nation principles, that permits investment flows to respond more freely to market forces. The United States will work to protect U.S. investment abroad from treatment which is discriminatory or otherwise inconsistent with international law standards. Under international law, no U.S. investment should be expropriated unless the taking is done for a public purpose, is accomplished under due process of law, is non-discriminatory, does not violate previous contractual arrangements, and is accompanied by prompt, adequate, and effective compensation.

The United States believes that a combination of multilateral and bilateral efforts will contribute to a more open global climate for investment and thus enhance the prospects for economic growth in the United States and globally.

The United States believes that international direct private investment plays a vital and expanding role in the U.S. and world economies. It can act as a catalyst for growth, introduce new technology and management skills, expand employment and improve productivity. Foreign direct investment can be an important source of capital and can stimulate international trade. Both home and host country economies benefit from an open international investment system.

International direct investment can provide particular benefits to developing countries. Foreign investment capital can help to expand the domestic resource base, augmenting locally generated investment and foreign concessional flows. Foreign direct investment may be of particular value to developing countries in that it contributes to domestic productive capacity without increasing the debt service burden. Further, developing countries may look to foreign direct investment to create new employment opportunities and to provide needed managerial and technical skills that cannot be gained through foreign trade.

Under present circumstances, however, international direct investment is being prevented from making its full contribution to global economic growth. While the current world trade and monetary systems (as embodied in the GATT and the IMF) developed after World War II remain an important foundation for the long-term growth and prosperity of the world economy, there unfortunately exists no comparable system for international direct investment. There has been inadequate collective restraint on widespread and distortive interventions by both developed and developing governments, attempting to control the flow of foreign direct investment and the benefits associated with it. While the effects of intervention are difficult to quantify, the impact can be negative for home, host, and third countries because intervention distorts international investment and trade flows, thereby preventing the most efficient allocation of resources.

Useful attempts have been made to address this problem, particularly in the OECD, but progress has been slow. The inability to arrive at an international consensus on these issues has created pressures in many countries, including the United States, to abandon more traditional economic policies based on market forces and to move toward still greater government intervention.

In light of these developments, it is important that there be a clear understanding both at home and abroad of U.S. policies with respect to international direct investment issues and how the United States intends to implement these policies.

The United States has consistently welcomed foreign direct investment in this country. Such investment provides substantial benefits to the United States. Therefore, the United States fosters a domestic economic climate which is conducive to investment. We provide foreign investors fair, equitable, and non-discriminatory treatment under our laws and regulations. We maintain exceptions to such treatment only as are necessary to protect our security and related interests and which are consistent with our international legal obligations.

The United States believes that U.S. direct investment abroad should also receive fair, equitable, and non-discriminatory treatment, consistent with international law standards. The basic tenet for treatment of investment is the national treatment principle: foreign investors should be treated no less favorably than domestic investors in like situations. Exceptions should be limited to those required to protect national security and related interests. In these cases, foreign direct investment should be accorded treatment consistent with the most- favored-nation principle.

The United States opposes the use of government practices which distort, restrict, or place unreasonable burdens on direct investment. These include such measures as trade-related or other performance requirements (such as local content, minimum export, and local equity requirements), fiscal or financial incentives. Interference with the market mechanism can cause serious distortions in trade and investment flows, encourage the retaliatory use of similar measures by other governments, and precipitate a downward spiral in global investment flows.

The United States intends to continue its efforts to reduce or eliminate measures that restrict, distort, or place undue burdens on international direct investment flows. In this regard, the United States will make a particular effort to prevent the introduction by other countries of new measures of this type. Moreover, the United States will continue to attempt to deal with this issue on a multilateral basis, although non-multilateral approaches may be appropriate on a case-by-case basis.

The United States will continue to work for the reduction or elimination of unreasonable and discriminatory barriers to entry of investment. The United States believes that foreign investors should be able to make the same kinds of investment, under the same conditions, as nationals of the host country. Exceptions should be limited to areas of legitimate national security concern or related interests. Because establishment questions are not adequately covered in existing multilateral instruments relating to investment, the United States will encourage broader exploration, identification, and discussion of these issues in the OECD and elsewhere.

The United States is particularly concerned with foreign investment rules that prohibit service industries from doing business abroad. Service sectors are among the most dynamic in today's economy, but there exists a number of limitations that inhibit export opportunities. For many service sectors, there is a universal requirement of establishment in host countries, with the competitive success of these industries heavily dependent upon the presence of branches to meet peculiar regulatory requirements. Thus, the investment policies of foreign countries have special importance to the service sectors.

The United States recognizes that international direct investment frequently serves as a vehicle for transfer of technology and can benefit the economic development goals of both home and host countries. Technology transfers should be carried out on a sound commercial basis, subject to national security and foreign policy considerations.

Under international law, no U.S. investment should be expropriated unless the taking (a) is done for a public purpose; (b) is accomplished under due process of law; (c) is non-discriminatory; (d) does not violate any previous contractual arrangements between the national or company concerned and the government making the expropriation; (e) is accompanied by prompt, adequate, and effective compensation.

The United States accords foreign investors open access to investment opportunities. What we seek is similar access for United States investors abroad. A major objective of our international investment policy is acceptance of the national treatment principle.

Korean Air Lines Massacre. Two hundred sixty-nine innocent men, women and children, from 13 different countries, who were flying aboard KAL flight 007, were stalked, then shot out of the air and sent crashing to their deaths by a missile aimed and fired by the Soviet Union.

Good and decent people everywhere are filled with revulsion by this despicable deed, and by the refusal of the guilty to tell the truth. This was a crime against humanity that must never be forgotten, here or throughout the world.

In their memory, we ask all people who cherish individual rights, and who believe each human life is sacred, to come together in a shared spirit of wisdom, unity, courage, and love, so the world can prevent such an inhuman act from ever happening again.

The President announced today a nuclear-powered Trident fleet ballistic missile submarine will be named U.S.S Henry M. Jackson in honor of the late Senator Henry Martin Jackson of Washington State. Senator Jackson, who died September 1, was elected to the House of Representatives in 1940 and to the Senate in 1952. ``During his unique career of national leadership, he was a bipartisan champion of personal freedoms and of a strong national defense. One of his many legislative accomplishments was serving as principal congressional advocate and sponsor of the Trident submarine program,'' the President said.

During my first press conference 9 days after being sworn in as your President, I was asked a question having to do with Soviet intentions. In my answer I cited their own words -- that they have openly and publicly declared the only morality they recognize is what will further world communism; that they reserve unto themselves the right to commit any crime, to lie, to cheat, in order to attain that. And I pointed out that we should keep this in mind when we deal with them.

I was charged with being too harsh in my language. I tried to point out I was only quoting their own words. Well, I hope the Soviets' recent behavior will dispel any lingering doubt about what kind of regime we're dealing with and what our responsibilities are as trustees of freedom and peace. Isn't it time for all of us to see the Soviet rulers as they are, rather than as we would like them to be?

Rather than tell the truth about the Korean Air Lines massacre, rather than immediately and publicly investigate the crash, explain to the world how it happened, punish those guilty of the crime, cooperate in efforts to find the wreckage, recover the bodies, apologize and offer compensation to the families, and work to prevent a repetition, they have done the opposite.

They've stonewalled the world, mobilizing their entire government behind a massive coverup, then brazenly threatening to kill more men, women, and children should another civilian airliner make the same mistake as KAL 007.

John's words: ``You will know the truth, and the truth will set you free.'' The truth is mankind's best hope for a better world. That's why in times like this, few assets are more important than the Voice of America and Radio Liberty, our primary means of getting the truth to the Russian people.

Within minutes of the report of the Soviet destruction of the Korean jet, the Voice of America aired the story in its news programs around the globe. We made sure people in Africa, Asia, the Middle East, Europe and, most important, the people in the Soviet bloc itself knew the truth. That includes every Soviet misstatement, from their initial denials through all the tortured changes and contradictions in their story, including their U.N. representative still denying they shot down the plane even as his own government was finally admitting they did.

That's why they devote such enormous resources to block our broadcasts inside Soviet-controlled countries. The Soviets spend more to block Western broadcasts coming into those countries than the entire worldwide budget of the Voice of America.

America added new frequencies and new broadcast times. But within minutes of those changes, new Soviet jamming began. Luckily, jamming is more like a sieve than a wall. International radio broadcasts can still get through to many people with the news. But we still face enormous difficulties.

One of the Voice of America's listeners in the Middle East wrote, ``If you do not strengthen your broadcasting frequencies, no one can get anything from your program.'' Our radio equipment is just plain old, some of it World War II vintage. I don't mind people getting older; it's just not so good for machines.

More than 35 percent of the Voice of America's transmitters are over 30 years old. We have a similar problem at Radio Free Europe and Radio Liberty. We have 6 antiquated 500-kilowatt shortwave transmitters. The Soviets have 37, and theirs are neither old nor outdated. We regularly receive complaints that Soviet broadcasts are clearer than ours. One person wrote and asked why it's not possible for a nation that can send ships into space to have its own voice heard here on Earth.

We've repeatedly urged the Congress to support our long-term modernization program and our proposal for a new radio station, Radio Marti, for broadcasting to Cuba. The sums involved are modest, but for whatever reason this critical program has not been enacted.

Today I'm appealing to the Congress: Help us get the truth through. Help us strengthen our international broadcasting effort by supporting increased funding for the Voice of America, Radio Free Europe, Radio Liberty, and by authorizing the establishment of Radio Marti.

Soviet-dominated countries, who understand how crucial this issue is, let your Representatives hear from you. Tell them you want Soviet rulers held accountable for their actions even by their own people. The truth is still our strongest weapon; we just have to use it.

Finally, let us come together as a nation tomorrow in a National Day of Mourning to share the sorrow of the families and let us resolve that this crime against humanity will never be forgotten anywhere in the world.

America's grandparents are truly a national treasure and a living resource. Most of us can remember having long talks with our grandparents and hearing stories of days gone by. They form a link to the past that is far more colorful and personal than what we read in history books. Their knowledge and wisdom come from experience -- they are an invaluable source of advice to us.

The special attachment between grandparent and grandchild is one of love spanning two generations. A grandchild looks up to his grandparents with respect and admiration while grandparents view their grandchildren with great pride and rejoice at their every accomplishment.

In this modern, fast-paced society, it is important that we be mindful of the many contributions of our grandparents. They built our families, and they've helped build America. Because of their persistence and belief in themselves, our country has weathered the bad times as well as the good.

Dixon Township, I know well the role that towns and townships play in America. Incidentally, between Tampico and Dixon there were two other small towns in Illinois in which I lived before I was about 8 years old. Those towns are the cradle of democracy. And if anyone has any doubts about the vitality of American liberty, I would suggest that they visit some of your town meetings.

But this gathering here today is testimony to the fundamental change that's taking place in our country, change for which many are unaware -- or of which many are unaware, and yet it's altering the face of America. What we're experiencing is nothing less than a renaissance of smalltown life. I'm here to tell you that this administration recognizes it and that the days when your role in our country was taken for granted are over.

The influx of people into small towns and rural areas reflects not just the material well-being or desire of that, but the desire for a better, different quality of life. During the 1960's, there were those who scoffed at smalltown values -- at family, the talk of family and God and neighborhood.

And they said those things in which we believe are old-fashioned and corny. Well, there's been some growing up in this country in the last few years, and people are discovering that those basic values we hold so dear are stronger than the fads that make a big splash one day and evaporate the next.

The American system, decentralized and based on guaranteed individual rights, served our country well. And yet, in the last two decades or more something went haywire. The people began turning to Washington with greater and greater frequency. Every problem became something of Federal concern. Worst of all, we were to believe that Federal money came free, and it's taken quite a while for us to realize that Federal money came out of the same pockets as did local and State taxes -- our pockets.

On the other end, well-intentioned individuals thought if they were only given the power they could right every wrong. As I said, they were well-intentioned, but there's a well-known road paved with good intentions. No one likes to go where it takes you.

I think that has a tie-in with some of the things that the government does. [Laughter] But in the last two decades, government expanded with the best of intentions, but we paid a steep price. By the end of the 1970's, average citizens trying to solve even the simplest problems were frustrated by a conglomeration of interlocking jurisdictions and an absence of accountability. Unelected Washington officials were making decisions that rightfully should be made by local people working and talking together. Americans felt that they'd lost control of essential services like schools, welfare, and roads.

Between 1976 and 1981, the Federal tax doubled, draining the private sector of money it needed for investment and the creation of jobs. And by the time the Federal tax vacuum was done, there was little left for local and State government.

The growth of Federal power was stagnating our economy and destroying our hopes for a better future. By 1980 inflation was running at double-digit levels for the second year in a row, robbing our senior citizens of the value of their savings. The poor and middle-class working people saw their real wages and their standard of living begin to shrink.

The spirit of optimism, long the hallmark of our people, turned to pessimism and cynicism. Even our leaders were throwing up their hands, claiming that we were in a malaise and that our problems were unsolvable.

When I got to Washington, we faced the awesome responsibility of changing the direction of government. And that's not easy, and it's not painless. I'd like to take this opportunity to thank George Miller and all of you in the National Association of Towns and Townships for the support that you've given over these 2\1/2\ years. I remember meeting George and your officers in the White House. And believe me, it was expressions of support like the ones I heard that day that kept me going. After our meeting, I told my staff they just had a dose of good old-fashioned grassroots Americanism, and I sense that same spirit in this room today.

It's taken time, but I'm proud to tell you that together we've turned around a desperate situation, and we're never going back to the policies of tax, spend, and inflate that brought our country to the edge of disaster.

Together we've brought inflation from double digits down to 2.4 percent over the last 12 months, and that's the best 12-month record in nearly 17 years. I don't have to tell you what this means to the cost of doing business for our towns and townships.

There's also been progress with interest rates, which are as important to you as they are to business. Just before I took office, they were going through the roof. The prime at the time was 21\1/2\ percent, and today it stands at 11 percent. There will be slight fluctuations in this recovery, but if the Congress acts responsibly interest rates are going to come down even more, and not too far in the future.

We're getting the Federal spending and taxing juggernaut under control. Spending was growing at a rate of 17 percent a year when we got here. We've cut that by nearly 40 percent. And let me say that still isn't good enough.

There's an old saying that in levying taxes, as in shearing sheep, it's best to stop when you get to the skin. [Laughter] Well, by 1980, taxes were making our economy bleed. We've cut the income tax rate of the American people 25 percent across the board. And in 1985 they'll be indexed so that never again will the Federal Government profit from inflation at the people's expense.

There's one part of our tax reform program of which I'm particularly proud, and that is that by raising the exemption on the inheritance tax and by eliminating it altogether for surviving spouses, we've restored the right to American people of passing on their family farm or small business to their children.

From the start, we recognized that excessive Federal regulation was not only strangling American enterprise but preventing you folks at the local level from doing your job. Since we took office, we've freed the business community as well as State and local government of 300 million man-hours -- man- and woman-hours -- [laughter] -- of needless paperwork. And this will save Americans billions of dollars and free you to handle local problems as you see best.

Returning power to levels of government closer to the people has been one of the guiding principles of this administration. Decentralizing remains one of our utmost goals, as George told you, and don't let anyone tell you that we're satisfied with what has been done so far. Phase one of our Federalism program may be accomplished, but that's just phase one.

Again, with your help, we managed to get through the Congress a block grant package that consolidated 57 programs into nine block grants that in 1982 eliminated some 5.4 million hours of work for State and local officials and, in subsequent years, will eliminate some 5.9 million hours a year. We continued this effort with the enactment of the Job Training Partnership Act and the urban mass transportation grants program. This year we've proposed legislation that will consolidate over $22 billion of spending in 34 programs into four block grants. Included among these is the Rural Housing Block Grant, which will give you more control and flexibility over programs costing $850 million annually.

The significance of the block grant, as most of you well know, is that it isn't tied with all the rules and regulations and specifics as to how the program must be managed, as is true in the individual or specific grants. It gives you the flexibility to set the priorities and determine how best that money can be spent.

The biggest resistance to our efforts has been from politicians who simply don't believe that local government is competent to do the job. Their opposition seems to be based on the notion that the Federal bureaucracy has a monopoly on compassion and efficiency, which I think you'd find mighty strange. It's been said that ``A man's intelligence does not increase as he acquires power.

If it was ever true that Federal employees had greater capabilities than their local counterparts, those days are rapidly coming to an end. Today, modern technology is opening up greater and greater opportunities for State and local government. Even small towns have computer services available to them that were out of reach only a decade ago. I know your own organization is moving forward with great training and communications programs that will open up broad new horizons at the local level.

Today, local government across the country is proving itself efficient and responsive to the will of the people. I'd like to see some of the politicians here in Washington who don't think you can do the job try to handle some of your responsibilities. Bart Russell tells me that as head of a local township, you've got to be a parliamentarian, bookkeeper, business manager, ombudsman, and government liaison expert -- all at the same time. And plus, you've got to do all that while keeping the hometown folks happy. [Laughter] And I thought dealing with Capitol Hill was hard.

Well, I can assure you that this administration knows and appreciates the job you are doing. We're taking every care so that in transferring programs back to levels of government closer to the people, you also receive the resources necessary to get the job done.

Of course, transferring revenues is not going to bring lasting change. Real progress will come as a result of creative approaches that harness the power of the marketplace. With this in mind, we've proposed legislation to create enterprise zones to encourage private business to locate in disadvantaged areas. And one-third of the 75 zones in the bill that we've suggested would be in rural areas.

There's enormous support for this concept. Already, 20 States have passed State enterprise zone legislation. The Senate has already passed this bill once, and although it was dropped in conference, we're confident they'll support it again. And in the House we have 181 Members, nearly a majority, who have cosponsored the legislation this time. So far, of course, the House has failed to act, and only recently has the House leadership even agreed to hold hearings. I'd like to take this opportunity to ask you to join us in escalating efforts to pry this legislation out of the House. Just remember, we don't have to make them see the light, just make them feel the heat.

It's about time that you had a fair say in the Federal policies that affect you. I want to assure you that I continue to support strongly, legislation that would provide for a member nominated by your organization to be placed on the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations.

Over the last 2\1/2\ years, we've had to make some tough decisions. And I fully appreciate that the townships you represent have felt the pain of reducing the growth of Federal spending. We couldn't have gone on the way things were, and you've done more than your share. As we move forward, I've instructed my staff to be diligent that your good citizenship is not taken advantage of and when it comes to budget control, towns and townships are treated equally with other segments of American society.

There is every reason for us to be confident. We are still the same people who conquered a wilderness and turned it into a dynamo of freedom and abundance. I think that today there is a greater understanding of the miracle of America, of what made her great and kept her free.

John Foster Dulles once said that, ``If we are faithful to our past, we shall not have to fear our future.'' Well, together we've proven that we can do what is necessary to keep faith with those who came before.

National Hispanic Heritage Week. Americans of Hispanic descent are rightfully proud of their heritage, and I hope this ceremony will draw the entire Nation's attention to the contributions of our Hispanic citizens.

For too long, the contributions of our Hispanic citizens have gone unnoticed, and I thought perhaps the best way I could note this occasion would be by reading the proclamation designating this special week, which I signed on August 25th. And let me read directly from it.

The concluding line is, ``In this spirit, I ask all of our citizens to reflect on the sense of brotherhood that binds us together as one people.'' This was a proclamation I was very happy to set my hand to.

All over this great land, Hispanic Americans are contributing to our democracy, our economy, and our culture. And today, I'm very pleased to announce another contribution that an American of Hispanic descent will be making to this country.

Katherine Ortega, the youngest of nine children, is from New Mexico and the descendant of pioneer families who settled in that State during the 1800's. She is symbolic of the values the Hispanic community represents, and I am honored that she is to become a part of this administration. I intend to nominate Katherine Ortega to the post of Treasurer of the United States.

Katherine is currently serving as Commissioner of the Copyright Royalty Tribunal and was a member of the President's Advisory Committee on Small and Minority Business. She's a certified public accountant, served in a number of important capacities in the financial services industry. Of her many achievements, I might mention one in particular. As past president and director of the Santa Ana Bank, she was the first woman president of a California bank. So, you can see that she's being nominated not just because she is Hispanic, but because she is highly qualified.

I'm delighted by the increased participation of Hispanic Americans in all phases of the political process. Congressman Lujan here is a wonderful model for Hispanic people seeking to become involved in politics. And I'm very proud that my own administration has over 125 Hispanics already in positions and another 20 or 25 who soon will be. We've appointed them to positions that are not just traditionally Hispanic positions. Today, you will find Hispanics at the FCC and the CAB and all over government. They offer professionalism, and we intend to take advantage of that talent. And I look forward to the Hispanic community's sound values influencing the course of government and our nation.

Ms. Ortega. Mr. President, Mr. Secretary, distinguished guests, it is with a deep sense of joy, pride, and gratitude to my President, to my country, and my family that I am honored to be selected for nomination as Treasurer of the United States.

The Hispanic tradition of strong devotion to family is evident here today. I called my brothers and sisters 3 or 4 days ago to tell them about the event here this morning. There was no doubt in my mind they would be here to share this occasion with me, for our parents taught us, and we learned well, not only to work together but to help each other and to share and support each other. And so, I was very confident that they would be here to share this occasion with me.

Since 1928, when my father opened a blacksmith's shop in New Mexico, the family has been working together. For at that time my older brothers, who were then 8 and 10 years of age, were already helping my father.

I have often said I was born a Republican. I am the product of a heritage that teaches strong family devotion, a commitment to earning a livelihood by hard work, patience, determination, and perseverance. And in this great country of ours, it is still possible to achieve upward mobility and success through our economic, social, and political system. And our greatest American treasure is that as a people, we recognize the inherent dignity and worth of the individual human being.

Through his strong leadership and sound economic policies, President Reagan has ensured that this national treasure will flourish, that individual women and men can continue to succeed and progress through initiative, resourcefulness, and equal economic opportunity. And besides building economic stability, the policies of the Reagan administration have strengthened the family values, belief in each other and in God, which makes us the greatest nation in the world.

Reagan and Secretary Regan are presenting the greatest opportunity to prove myself. I accept this challenge and look forward to working with Secretary Regan and the other fine men and women at the Department of the Treasury.

Before joining the Reagan administration, Ms. Ortega acquired extensive experience in the banking and savings and loan industries. She became the first woman to serve as a bank president in California, when she was elected president of the Santa Ana State Bank in 1975.

Improving domestic industrial productivity and competitiveness will depend largely on our ability to create and develop new technologies. Technological advances provide our economy with the means to produce new or improved goods and services at lower cost than those already on the market. Over the last 80 years, the development of new technologies accounted for almost half of the growth in our real per capita income. New technology creates jobs and gives this country a competitive edge. The U.S. computer industry, for example, directly provides jobs for about 830,000 people and is a leader in world markets.

New technologies are seldom created by luck; they are instead the result of private and public sector investments of time, money, and effort. With this in mind, we propose to increase Federal funding of research and development (R. & D.) by 17 percent to $47 billion in 1984 and to encourage private sector R. & D. by improving the economic and legal climate for such efforts.

Recovery Tax Act of 1981, for example, provides a 25-percent tax credit to firms which invest in additional R. & D. And by reducing inflation and interest rates, our economic program has lowered substantially the cost of conducting research.

When enacted, the National Productivity and Innovation Act will improve the legal climate for technological advancement by clarifying and modifying the Federal antitrust and intellectual property laws. Those laws have a substantial effect on private investment in R. & D. The antitrust laws are designed to protect consumers from anticompetitive conduct. Yet we must recognize that while vigorous competition among independent businesses generally serves the economy best, in some areas, like the creation and development of technology, cooperation is necessary if American industry is to compete internationally. Similarly, the intellectual property laws, such as those dealing with patents and copyrights, encourage competition by providing individuals with exclusive rights to their technology.

My proposed legislation will ensure that the antitrust and intellectual property laws are fully compatible with efficient creation and development of technology, while, at the same time, maintaining strong safeguards against anticompetitive behavior.

R. & D. ventures. Joint ventures often may be necessary to lower the risk and cost associated with R. & D. So long as these ventures do not facilitate price fixing or reduce innovation, such ventures should not be considered a violation of antitrust laws. Nevertheless, the risk remains that some courts may overlook the beneficial aspects of joint R. & D. This risk is unnecessarily magnified by the triple damages awarded to an injured private party who wins an antitrust damage suit.

R. & D. ventures. The title mandates that the courts may not find a joint R. & D. venture in violation of the antitrust laws without first considering its procompetitive benefits. In addition, title II provides that a joint R. & D. venture that has been fully disclosed to the Department of Justice and the Federal Trade Commission found in violation of antitrust laws may be sued only for the actual damage, plus prejudgment interest, caused by its conduct.

Title III will ensure that antitrust laws encourage procompetitive intellectual property licensing, which greatly enhances our economy's ability to create and develop technology. Intellectual property owners often cannot obtain their legitimate reward from R. & D. unless they license their technology to others. Such licensing enables intellectual property owners to use the superior ability of other enterprises in the marketing of their technology. This can be particularly important for small businesses that do not have sufficient resources to develop the full range of applications of a new technology discovered through their research efforts.

Recognizing the significance of licensing, we have designed title III to ensure intellectual property owners the fruits of their ingenuity. First, the title prohibits courts from condemning an intellectual property licensing arrangement without first considering its procompetitive benefits.

Second, the title eliminates the potential of triple damage liability under the antitrust laws for intellectual property licensing. Although those who suffer antitrust injury as a result of licensing could still sue, title III would minimize the deterrence that antitrust laws currently have on beneficial licensing.

Similarly, title IV encourages the procompetitive use of intellectual property. Courts will be able to refuse to enforce a valid patent or copyright because of misuse only after considering the economic ramifications.

Title V of the act increases Federal protection for process patents. Currently, if someone violates a process patent outside the country and then imports the resulting product into the United States, the importer is not guilty of violating patent law. Our bill closes this loophole, permitting the owners of process patents to obtain their rightful reward by preventing such unauthorized use of their technology.

This legislation will, if enacted, stimulate the creation and development of new technology, increase this country's productivity, and enable our industries to compete more effectively in world markets, while continuing to protect the interests of American consumers. I strongly urge Congress to move forward on this proposed legislation and, by doing so, encourage innovation and increase the employment opportunities and standard of living for all Americans.

I am transmitting to the Congress today a legislative proposal entitled, the ``National Productivity and Innovation Act of 1983.'' The bill would modify the Federal antitrust and intellectual property laws in ways that will enhance this country's productivity and the competitiveness of U.S. industries in international markets.

As you know, one of the most important goals of my Administration has been to revitalize the competitiveness and productivity of American industry. Tax cuts proposed by my Administration and enacted during the 97th Congress have greatly stimulated economic activity. In addition, our efforts to rationalize Federal rules and regulations have significantly enhanced the efficiency of our economy. For the first time in over a decade, there exists the foundation for a period of strong and sustained economic growth.

The ability of the United States to improve productivity and industrial competitiveness will also depend largely on our ability to create and develop new technologies. Advances in technology provide our economy with the means to produce new or improved goods and services and to produce at lower cost those goods and services already on the market. It is difficult to overstate the importance of technological development to a strong and healthy United States economy. It has been estimated that advances in scientific and technological knowledge have been responsible for almost half of the increase in this country's labor productivity over the last 50 years. New technology also creates new jobs and gives us an advantage in world markets. For example, the U.S. computer industry, which was in its infancy just a short time ago, directly provides jobs for about 830,000 Americans and is a leader in world markets.

The private and public sectors must spend a great deal of time, money, and effort to discover and develop new technologies. My Administration has moved to bolster research and development (R&D) in the public sector by proposing in our 1984 budget to increase Federal funding of R&D by 17 percent, to $47 billion. However, it is vital that our laws affecting the creation and development of new technologies properly encourage private sector R&D as well.

The Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 provides a 25 percent tax credit to encourage firms to invest in additional R&D. Our economic program has helped reduce inflation and interest rates and thus has lowered substantially the cost of conducting research.

The antitrust and intellectual property laws also have a very significant effect on private investment in R&D. The antitrust laws are designed to protect consumers from anti-competitive conduct. While the economy generally benefits most from vigorous competition among independent businesses, the antitrust laws recognize that in some areas, like the creation and development of technology, cooperation among producers, even competitors, can actually serve to maximize the well-being of consumers.

The intellectual property laws, for example, those dealing with patents and copyrights, also serve to promote the interests of consumers. The promise of the financial reward provided by exclusive rights to intellectual property induces individuals to compete to create and develop new and useful technologies.

After reviewing the effect of the antitrust and intellectual property laws on the creation and development of new technologies and after consultations with key members of Congress, I have concluded that the antitrust laws can be clarified in some respects and modified in other respects to stimulate significantly private sector R&D. This can be done while maintaining strong safeguards to protect the economy against collusive actions that would improperly restrict competition. The National Productivity and Innovation Act of 1983, which embodies those changes, is a package of four substantive proposals that deals with all phases of the innovation process.

Title II of the bill would ensure that the antitrust laws do not unnecessarily inhibit United States firms from pooling their resources to engage jointly in procompetitive R&D projects. Joint ventures often may be necessary to reduce the risk and cost associated with R&D. So long as the venture does not threaten to facilitate price fixing or to reduce innovation, such ventures do not violate the antitrust laws. Nevertheless, the risk remains that some courts may not fully appreciate the beneficial aspects of joint R&D. This risk is unnecessarily magnified by the fact that a successful antitrust claimant is automatically entitled to three times the damages actually suffered.

R&D ventures. This title provides that the courts may not find that a joint R&D venture violates the antitrust laws without first considering its procompetitive benefits. In addition, Title II provides that a joint R&D venture that has been fully disclosed to the Department of Justice and the Federal Trade Commission may be sued only for the actual damage caused by its conduct plus prejudgment interest. This combination of changes will encourage the formation of procompetitive joint R&D ventures. And unlike some other proposals currently before Congress, it will do so with the minimal amount of bureaucratic interference in the functioning of those ventures.

If we are to assure that our laws stimulate investment in new technologies, however, it is not enough merely to correct the adverse deterrent effect the antitrust laws may have on procompetitive joint R&D. Rather, we must also assure that the antitrust and intellectual property laws allow -- indeed encourage -- those who create new technologies to bring their technology to market in the most efficient manner. Only in this way can those who invest their time, money, and effort in R&D be assured of earning the maximum legitimate reward.

Titles III and IV recognize that very frequently the most efficient way to develop new technology is to license that technology to others. Licensing can enable intellectual property owners to employ the superior ability of other enterprises to market technology more quickly and at lower cost. This can be particularly important for small businesses that do not have the ability to develop all possible applications of new technologies by themselves. However, the courts have not always been sympathetic to these procompetitive benefits of licensing.

Title III would prohibit courts from finding that an intellectual property licensing arrangement violates the antitrust laws without first considering its procompetitive benefits. In addition, the title would eliminate the potential of treble damage liability under the antitrust laws for intellectual property licensing. Although those who suffer antitrust injury as a result of licensing would still be able to sue for their actual damages plus prejudgment interest, Title III would minimize the deterrence that the antitrust laws currently may have on potentially beneficial licensing of technology.

Title IV would also encourage the procompetitive licensing of intellectual property. Pursuant to this title, the courts may refuse to enforce a valid patent or copyright on the ground of misuse only after considering meaningful economic analysis.

Finally, Title V will close a loophole in the patent laws that has discouraged investment in efficiency-enhancing technologies. Creation of and improvements in the process of making products can be just as important as creating and improving the product itself. Currently, if someone uses a United States process patent outside this country without the owner's consent and then imports the resulting product into the United States, the importer is not guilty of infringement. Title V of the bill would close this loophole so that owners of process patents can earn their rightful reward by preventing the unauthorized use of their technology.

We must not delay making the necessary changes in the law to encourage the creation and development of new technology, to increase this country's productivity, and to enable our industries to compete more effectively in international markets. We must act now. I therefore urge prompt consideration and passage of this legislative proposal.

The United States is constantly reviewing the progress of the negotiations to see how best to move the talks forward, and we are continuing intensive consultations with our allies on the INF talks. The sixth round of these talks has just begun, and the United States is engaged in serious negotiating efforts to obtain an agreement that meets alliance security concerns. Both sides are bound to respect the confidentiality of the negotiations. Press speculation about the substance of the talks is not helpful.

As in the previous round, U.S. negotiators have great flexibility to consider any serious Soviet proposal according to criteria set forth by the President earlier this year. These five criteria remain the basis of our position: equal rights and limits for the United States and U.S.S.R., no compensation for third country systems, global limits with no shifting of the threat from Europe to Asia, no adverse effect on NATO's conventional deterrent, and effective measures to ensure verifiability.

We and the allies remain convinced that the best long-term results of the negotiations would be the elimination of all land-based U.S. and Soviet LRINF missiles, and that as long as the Soviets remain unwilling to accept this outcome, the President's interim agreement proposal provides a flexible framework for progress.

I appreciated your thoughtful letter concerning the impact of arms control questions on public opinion in Europe. Let me assure you that the points you raise are also of great concern to me. It is especially troublesome that NATO's dual-track decision is not clearly understood by young people in Europe, despite our constant efforts and those of our Allies to articulate and clarify it.

During your appearance before the National Press Club in Washington last February you stated clearly and succinctly the principle behind the Alliance decision. NATO did not, as you noted, decide to station new weapons in Europe on its own initiative. NATO's dual-track decision was necessitated by the rapid proliferation of Soviet nuclear forces, especially the intermediate-range SS - 20. The introduction of this highly accurate and lethal missile system threatened to break the security link between the United States and our European Allies. This link has served as the underpinning of European stability for nearly four decades.

In response, the NATO Allies approved the deployment of new intermediate range weapons, while emphasizing their common determination to make every possible effort to limit or make these weapons unnecessary via negotiations with the Soviet Union. We also made it clear that if it proved impossible to achieve a satisfactory arms agreement, we would take the steps necessary to protect our security by proceeding with the missile deployments. Let me underline that we set no deadline to the negotiations; only a small number of the total planned missiles will be deployed at the end of this year and we are prepared to continue negotiations thereafter. Let me stress as well that any missile that is deployed can always be withdrawn, if negotiations are eventually successful.

There are certain facts that receive almost no publicity. For example, the United States has fewer nuclear warheads today than we had fifteen years ago. And over the last three years we withdrew unilaterally 1,000 nuclear weapons from Europe. Moreover, if we are forced to deploy INF missiles, we have agreed with our Allies that for every modern warhead introduced, an existing nuclear warhead will be withdrawn.

Ambassador Nitze prior to his return to Geneva for the current round of negotiations, which we are earnestly pursuing, despite the Korean airline tragedy. But the USSR's approach to negotiating reductions has been disappointing, particularly in that the Soviets have continuously refused to acknowledge the security interest of the nations on their periphery.

As you will recall, Moscow initially refused to negotiate at all. It was NATO's modernization decision that brought the Soviets to the negotiating table. Since commencement of the Geneva talks in 1981 the Soviet Union, however, has refused to move from its insistence on maintaining a missile monopoly despite flexible proposals we tabled aimed at stimulating progress. Our negotiating positions, which have been developed through extremely close cooperation with our NATO Allies, insist only on U.S. - Soviet equality, a principle that the Soviet Union has so far refused to honor. When the Soviets made plain their opposition to the zero option, we proposed parity at the lowest possible level. The Soviets have said this is equally unacceptable. It is Soviet intransigence that is blocking progress.

If, as you say, we will disappoint many of our citizens by beginning deployments on schedule, how many more will be affected if we go back on our joint decision and postpone implementation of the dual-track decision? A delay in our deployments would only encourage the Soviets to believe that NATO's resolve was faltering and that they could stretch our negotiations endlessly without addressing our legitimate security concerns.

I wholeheartedly agree with your point that solidarity among the democracies is our objective, a bond that can only be strong when it is deeply rooted in people's minds. What a striking contrast presented to us by the Soviet example, where the leadership can commit such a horrible deed as the destruction of the KAL civilian airliner and not feel compelled to answer to its people. The Soviet Union openly professes its desire to impose its totalitarian system throughout the world, an objective we can repulse by maintaining our common defense and resolutely promoting our democratic ideals.

I do not believe that the relationship of European youth to their democratic systems is as tenuous as you suggest. In my travels, I have seen strong evidence that young people in both Europe and the United States, and elsewhere respect both the responsibilities as well as the privileges of democracy. Our joint task is to demonstrate to them, through both words and deeds, the meaning and continued validity of Western principles. Securing the common defense is one of the most important of these responsibilities.

I assure you that I am deeply committed to seeking every possibility for peace, in Europe and throughout the world. I know that I can count on you and other leaders to help Europe's young people find their way among the difficult choices facing them today.

Let me make it very clear that I am not interested in publicity. For three months now, I have refused almost all requests for interviews. You will know that in the democratic countries of Europe there are enormous differences in public opinion. But what I consider much more important is that people in these democracies have come to be divided by a deep gap over the armament issue. I am profoundly convinced of your sincere commitment to the idea of peace, but I should like to add that I am equally convinced that Mr. Andropov does not want war. Yet, the experience of a long political career tells me that such events may occur even against the will of leading personalities in powerful states. And I am afraid that something of the kind might happen some day.

The point in question are the Geneva talks for which a deadline has been set. I am not under the delusion that I can make any contribution to these talks, but I should like to urge you not to be guided by prestige thinking. If no results should be reached by the deadline you have set, do prolong the negotiating period for another few months, and reasonable people throughout the world will understand that you seek to get a result. There is no sense in upholding prestige while letting negotiations founder. Please consider that a pro- longation may also induce the other party to continue negotiating; and if it is made, it will be by far easier to explain to people who is responsible for a failure to reach a mutually satisfactory solution.

My particular concern is young people's relationship to democracy, because they are the main force in the peace movement. I am quite simply afraid that democracy may be headed for a crisis similar to the one I lived through in my youth, and that such a crisis might generate developments none of us would welcome. Democratic order is a delicate structure which cannot be maintained by rough interference from the state's law and order forces. What is at stake is the relationship of a major part of Europe's young generation to democracy, and I appeal to you, Mister President, to attribute just value to this stake. It will be of decisive and profound importance to the relations between our democracies, the European and the American one.

I belong to those who know what European democracy owes to American democracy. We are fully aware of the role played by the two big American parties. It is entirely up to the American people to choose their leaders, but the crucial point is solidarity between the democracies, which can only be strong, if democracy is deeply rooted in people's minds.

The awards program was first announced by the President's Science Adviser last January as a way to provide national recognition to outstanding teachers of science and mathematics in the country's secondary schools. The awards carry with them $5,000 grants to each of the teachers' schools for use in science or mathematics instructional programs.

Mugabe of the Republic of Zimbabwe. As the first Prime Minister of Africa's newest independent state, his wise leadership has been a crucial factor in healing the wounds of civil war and developing a new nation with new opportunities. Our discussions today have covered a wide range of topics, including our bilateral relationship and regional issues. We've spoken very frankly and in an atmosphere of mutual respect. We didn't always agree but have all gained much from hearing your views, Mr. Prime Minister.

I believe that our two countries will continue to cooperate on those areas where common concerns are shared and that we will come closer to an understanding on those issues where our views diverge. The United States and Zimbabwe have much in common. We both came to independence through a revolutionary process. We are both multiracial societies. And our constitutions offer protection to all our citizens, black and white, ensuring their political freedoms as well as their individual rights.

We look to Zimbabwe for leadership in southern Africa. Blessed with natural resources, a hard-working, multiracial population, and a spirit of national reconciliation, Zimbabwe can provide a firm foundation of economic viability and political stability and serve as an inspiration in its part of the world.

Mr. Prime Minister, our talks today have confirmed that we also share a desire for peace and stability in southern Africa, and I know that we both look forward to a time when all countries there can achieve a level of amity which will allow them to work toward economic, social, and political development, free from the threat of attack from whatever quarter.

The ultimate responsibility for resolution of their problems, however, rests with the states of the regions themselves. And here, Mr. Prime Minister, you've taken a leading and constructive role. I know that you'll be meeting with a number of leaders in all walks of American life during your stay here in Washington and elsewhere in our land. I'm sure they will benefit as I have from your thoughtful views on our bilateral relationship as well as on regional and global issues.

Government and people of Zimbabwe, express to you on this historic occasion of our visit -- the first such by the head of government of the Republic of Zimbabwe -- express to you our heartfelt thanks and appreciation for that support which the United States has given us all along the way.

We got pledges from your government, from your predecessors, that upon attainment of our independence the United States would not be found wanting in extending to Zimbabwe that amount of aid the United States was capable of extending to it to enable the young state to attend to those problems created by the war which the young country would feel necessary to attend to.

And so here we are, a young state that yesterday was only a toddler but today is able to do a little more than it was able to do yesterday. And this is because of the amount of assistance -- I think the United States contributes the largest amount towards our whole program of reconstruction and development. And that input into our own efforts has enabled us to create the necessary base for our socioeconomic transformation.

We have enjoyed excellent relations with your country. There has never been an occasion when we have had to complain to the United States on issues of bilateral relations falling in the political or diplomatic sphere. Yes, as you admit, there have been areas of difference. We are different on the modality of bringing about Namibia's independence, the linkage with the Cuban question. But, sir, generally we have looked at issues through the same glasses, one might say. And our posture regarding international situations of conflict has been identical. We all are opposed -- we both are opposed to interference in the domestic affairs of a country by another.

And I'm sure this identity of viewpoint makes for the greater friendship and solidarity that we find between our two countries and our two people. We have enjoyed every minute of our stay in your country. We continue our talks with leaders of your society. But I'm very happy that the discussions we've just had have dwelled on those issues which are of mutual interest to our two sides.

Zimbabwe, the question of our original relations, and the fact that South Africa continues to destabilize our region. We have discussed Namibia, we have discussed the apartheid system in South Africa, and there is a greater measure of agreement. There might be some difference here and there in respect of the method of bringing about change, positive change to the area.

President Bush, who visited us not long ago, for extending this invitation to me and enabling me therefore to come to this wonderful country with a wonderful people and a wonderful tradition and express to them the gratitude of the people of Zimbabwe.

We don't intend to vitiate at all those principles which underline the constitutional order that we have created. We are determined that a nonracial society shall exist in Zimbabwe and that racism, tribalism, regionalism, and whatever other ``isms'' -- these are things of the past. What we would uphold as fundamental is that principle which binds us together and makes us one regardless of our race, color, or creed.

And these are matters on which the United States has long made a decision, matters of principle which make for greater democracy and greater freedom in society. We are prepared that this shall also be our tradition.

The President. It's a pleasure to have you here today. I understand that you've been briefed on some domestic and foreign policy issues, and we're concerned that all Americans are fully aware of what we're doing and how it relates to them.

For those of you in the Hispanic press, I want you to know that my concern is not something new or some grand campaign strategy, as some have indicated. Since my days as Governor of California, I've been aware of the rich contributions that Americans of Hispanic descent have made and are making to our country. Within 24 hours of declaring my candidacy for President in 1979, I outlined a program that emphasized the importance of better relations among all of us in this hemisphere. I said then and have echoed since at Cancun, during my trip to Central and South America, and during many consultations with the Presidents of Mexico, that we in this hemisphere are all Americans. We worship the same God. We have enormous potential if we can build on the many things that bind us together here, from North to South Pole, in this hemisphere.

And those of you who are with us today from the religious press understand, perhaps better than most, how faith brings people together. Recently I visited Hispanic business leaders in meetings in Florida and California, and I was impressed by the enthusiasm and the optimism that I found.

Their spirit and energy were reminiscent of Americans of an earlier age when entrepreneurs turned an undeveloped wilderness into a dynamo of freedom and abundance. There's no better proof that the American dream is alive and well than what is happening in the Hispanic community in America today.

Many Americans of Hispanic descent are moving into positions of influence and authority, not because of some quota, but because they are top quality individuals. Earlier this week I appointed Katherine Ortega. She was the first woman to become a bank president in the State of California, and I appointed her to be Treasurer of the United States. She and the many others of Hispanic descent in this administration will continue to play an important role in building our economy.

There's one word of warning, however. We can't take economic expansion for granted. The growth of government with its taxing and spending gave us double-digit inflation, sky-high interest rates, business stagnation, and unprecedented pessimism -- and that was just 3 years ago.

We've got our country back on the road to noninflationary economic growth, but if we're lured back into the policies of tax and spend and inflate, policies that caused our problems in the first place, everyone will be worse off.

Strengthening America's economy hasn't been our only challenge. We've accelerated our efforts to rebuild our military strength, and this has permitted, or had been permitted to seriously erode during the last decade. Now, we've done this not because we enjoy spending money -- I don't want the Federal Government spending 1 cent more than is absolutely necessary -- but what we've done is for the preservation of our freedom and the maintenance of world peace. Wishful thinking is a threat to peace. There are members of the labor press, I know, here today, and I want you to know that I fully appreciate America's longstanding -- or labor's longstanding contribution to our country's security. I should. Maybe some of you aren't old enough to know that I was six times president of my own union, and I think I'm the only fellow that ever held this job as a lifetime member of a union.

That gruesome episode unmasked the Soviet regime for what it is -- a dictatorship with none of the respect for human values and individual rights that we in the Western democracies hold so dear. That brutal regime stamps out any dissent that might serve as a moderating influence.

Worshiping God is considered a social evil. Well, we can't permit such a regime to militarily dominate this planet. This incident should reaffirm our commitment and that of our allies to rebuild our defensive strength. We must and will continue to reach out for arms reduction agreements to reduce the nuclear and conventional arsenals that threaten humankind. But with a regime that callously shoots down passenger planes, demonstrating that their values are far different than our own, this is a great challenge, one that we must meet with faith, wisdom, unity, and courage.

We're encouraged that today the Western alliance is more unified than in many years. In this hemisphere we enjoy a healthy dialog with our neighbors, and a new level of respect has developed among us. In contrast, the Soviet Union is becoming increasingly isolated, as the free people of the world become more aware of the nature of the Soviet regime.

The President. I have been looking at that, and with all the things that are going on, we haven't been able to talk as much as we should about it. But I have to tell you that as far as I'm concerned, that agreement has been abrogated many times by the Soviet Union and Cuba in the bringing in of what can only be considered offensive weapons, not defensive, there. And we'll get around to that.

Q. Mr. President, in January of 1982, your Press Secretary said that you were shocked and dismayed when you learned that a Cuban stowaway had been deported back to the island. You were right; that Cuban is now back in jail. Since then about 50 Cubans have come over on small boats fleeing communism. They are at the Chrome Avenue Detention Camp in South Bay. Do you think that's fair?

The President. It is to this extent, that out of the Mariel boatlift we found that there had been deliberately planted among legitimate refugees a great number of Cuban criminals who were released from prisons, some from mental institutions, and they had been responsible for -- some of those that moved out into our society, before we were aware of this -- had been responsible for some very violent and very vicious crimes. And we're holding many more than what you just mentioned here. Those, I'm sure, are being held while we do a little checking on them.

They have refused. And we're still trying to deal with this problem and what we do with those who were infiltrated. We cannot deny that there is evidence, also, that in addition to this kind of individual, that they have used this refugee movement to, well, infiltrate subversives into our country. And so we're trying to do a little better job of checking.

Q. Mr. President -- [inaudible] -- there is concern among the agriculture community, because of the drought all over the Nation, that the disaster provision in the 1981 farm bill will not be enacted by the administration. There is also some concern and some requests that the PIK program be extended through 1983. Can you tell us what the status on both of those is?

The President. No, I can't, other than the fact that they're very much on the agenda for us. As a matter of fact, we had a Cabinet meeting yesterday just for a complete report on the economic problems brought about by the drought. But all of these things are, as I say, on the agenda, and I can't give you any answers right now.

Executive order to prohibit the use of missionaries for gathering of intelligence, or the use of an intelligence officer posing as a foreign missionary? We have 3,000 foreign missionaries in 100 countries.

I would not be aware and am not aware that anything of that kind has ever been done. I have the greatest respect for those people whose religious calling takes them out into the world, and I wish them well.

Q. Mr. President -- [inaudible] -- your appointments of Linda Chavez and Katherine Ortega have been hailed as appointments of both women and Hispanics, and yet there's still concern these aren't policymaking positions. Do you have any plans to appoint Hispanics or women to top-level policymaking positions soon?

The President. Yes. As a matter of fact, we have about 125 in the administration right now, and we are constantly, in our personnel section, on the search for more. We would have had a member of the Cabinet, except that at the last moment, probably faced with all the reporting and the revelations and the personal affairs and so forth that have to be made, like so many others, this individual turned away and said no, I don't want any part of it, and left us.

I don't mean to say that he did this because of any wrongdoing on his part. You'd be surprised, growing out of some of the past problems of Watergate and so forth, there have been a number of restrictions that have been placed on people who were willing to volunteer and serve for government, restrictions that have prevented many fine, capable people when they just take a look and they say no, that's humiliating, and I'm not going to do it, and they turn away from us.

I wish we could return to some sanity and recognize that people who are willing to give up their personal lives and careers for a period and come in and serve government aren't doing it for any personal gain. As a matter of fact, I don't know of anyone on our Cabinet today who did not make a tremendous sacrifice, personally and economically, to serve in government.

Salvador depends on the improvement of the economic condition of the people, why don't we hear more in America about what that government is doing, with our help, to improve the economic condition of the El Salvadoran people, instead of so much about the warfare that is going on?

The President. You are all members of a profession that could do a lot about that. Now there are some very well-kept secrets in Washington, not because we want them kept secrets but because they just don't seem to be of interest to the media.

Now, we have over and over again said that our help to El Salvador has been three dollars of economic and social help for every dollar of military help. And yet the bulk of the people, according to the polls in the country today, don't even know which side we're on in El Salvador -- whether we're on the government's side or the guerrillas' side. We have tried, yes.

The Government of El Salvador has a reversal, over centuries of another form of government there, have been trying to implement these social and economic reforms, the land reform program, but because of what the guerrillas are doing, many of those people who are now landowners through this government program are in refugee camps, driven off their land and unable to farm it, because it would mean death to go out in the fields. The guerrillas would see to it that it would mean death.

Tonight.'' And yet, more than 83 percent of the eligible voters in El Salvador made their way to the polls and voted. They are working at instituting democracy. They haven't made a hundred-percent cleanup of some of the past practices that have taken place, but they've made remarkable progress.

And yes, the people should know about that. We have seen plenty of shots about our military games that are going on in Honduras, the joint military exercises. But has anyone shown you some of the hospitals, you know, those balloon-type buildings that you inflate and blow up, that are there? One hospital alone -- 27 doctors and a full complement of nurses from our country, and not just for military purposes -- treating and taking care of the people who have not had proper medical care, the civilians in that area.

The President. I would have to tell you that I believe -- and this is not just our administration, but since 1948 when Israel became a nation -- the policy of the United States Government, under Democrat and Republican Presidents and legislatures, has been one of alliance with Israel and assurance of Israel's continuation as a state. And I don't think that any American administration would ever forsake Israel.

This is one of the reasons for our peace plan. When Sadat did what he did and brought peace between Egypt and Israel, the two that had been actually in combat with each other, it was my belief that what we should do is start working with the Arab nations to see if among them we could not first bring their recognition of the right of Israel to exist and then see if we could not create additional Egypts, nations that would enter into a peace treaty, because no nation can go on having to maintain the military stature that Israel does. When you stop to think that the 500 men that they lost in the fighting in Lebanon, if that was the United States, proportionately, that would have been more than 30,000 dead.

Economically, the strain on them is so great that the answer to their problem must be peace. And peace can only come when all of them recognize, all the other nations recognize the right of this nation to exist. This was one of the reasons why we would never negotiate with the PLO, because they openly said they denied the right of Israel to be a nation. Their dream was of driving them into the sea. And we said how could we talk to someone who believes that way?

Right now, we started with the idea that the Lebanese situation had to be cleared up and the foreign forces all get out of Lebanon before we proceed with these peace talks. I am still optimistic that we're going to be able to bring this about, and we'll continue to try.

More than 50 million American youth are included in the Nation's general population. These young citizens play major roles in our society as they mature into adulthood. They make important contributions to our country by pursuing their educations, working in the economy, upholding the law, and joining the military services.

Our young Americans have every reason to be proud of their contributions to the American way of life. They can look forward to doing more as they complete their educations and move into positions in science, space, education, medicine, business, labor, government, military service, and other fields. The future of America depends on the preparation and dedication of our younger citizens, because one day, it will be their responsibility to ensure the security of our Nation, both at home and abroad. They must be given every opportunity to achieve their goals as they pass through adolescence to full maturity.

Among the American youth population are many in special need. The Federal government works actively with State and local governments and the private sector in important programs responding to the needs of runaway and homeless youth, unemployed youth, and to those who experience physical, emotional, and social handicaps.

To assure our Nation's youth of our commitment to share our knowledge, experience, and wisdom, which will help nurture in them democratic principles, and the development of strong moral and spiritual values so vital to the survival and future betterment of America, the Congress of the United States, by Senate Joint Resolution 116, had designated the week of September 4 through September 10, 1983, as ``Youth of America Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

You know, some things in life, however, are exactly as they seem. I know that I can always count on the ideals and the convictions of the Republican National Hispanic Assembly. Each of you should be congratulated for what you've done. But accomplishments also require leadership. And tonight I'd like to take this opportunity to thank Tirso del Junco for the great job that he's doing here with the Republican National Hispanic Assembly.

I'm delighted that we could gather to share our hopes and dreams for America. I've always believed that this blessed land was set apart in a special way, that there was some divine plan that placed the two great continents here between the oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth who had a deep love for freedom and the courage to uproot themselves, leave home and friends, and come to a strange land.

Islands, or North or South or Central America, we came together, all, as Americans. That's the heritage of this Western Hemisphere. Now perhaps you are the first generation citizens of the United States of America, or the second, perhaps, or the third, or perhaps as far back as the United States herself goes. But there are no prouder, more patriotic Americans than are gathered here tonight in this room.

America remains mankind's best hope. The eyes of history are upon us, counting on us to protect the peace, promote a new prosperity, and provide for a better tomorrow. This evening I want to talk to you as Republicans and Hispanics, and as Americans foremost of all, about these very values that we cherish so deeply.

In recent years, America's values almost seemed in exile. Just consider where our nation was or where it stood just 3 years ago. Our leaders were struggling and shrugging their shoulders and saying that we were in some kind of a malaise and that our problems were unsolvable. Pessimism, totally inconsistent with our national character, had spread across this land, and our leaders had forgotten the strength and determination that runs deep in our people. They'd forgotten that values, not programs and policies, serve as society's compass. They seemingly had forgotten what a decent, moral nation we are. We need make no apologies to the world. After all, we do not occupy any countries. We don't build walls to keep our people in. And we don't coldbloodedly open fire on aircraft loaded with innocent passengers.

When we took office, this America was suffering from years of uncontrolled spending and taxation. Federal spending was growing at a rate that was steep enough to make a mountain goat dizzy. And the problem was that the Democrats genuinely believed -- and poor, misguided things, they still believe -- [laughter] -- that money can buy happiness. Well, Federal tax money can't buy happiness. It can't buy our citizens real jobs and real opportunity. Ask the Democrats what it takes to get people back to work, and they won't answer that we need responsible and constant economic policies. No, they'll answer that we need billions of dollars more in Federal job programs.

Well, Federal money doesn't buy happiness, except for the bureaucrats and the special interests that luxuriate in those programs. All it buys is a bigger debt. We haven't stopped the growth in Federal spending, but we've slowed it by almost 40 percent. And if the Congress acts responsibly -- and those who are present will -- we can bring it further under control. I only wish the majority of that illustrious body were as responsible as Manny Lujan.

Taxes were rising right along with spending, and paying for all those special interest programs doubled the Federal tax bite in just 5 years, between 1976 and 1981. You know, there's an old saying that in levying taxes, as in shearing sheep, it's best to stop when you get to the skin.

We've put into place a tax program that cut personal income tax rates across the board by 25 percent. Now that was a commitment we made to the working people of this country, and we have another protection waiting in the wings. Soon, beginning in 1985, America's taxes will be indexed, so that never again will government profit from inflation at the peoples' expense.

Reaganomics anymore. [Laughter] As they say down at Cape Canaveral, we have liftoff. Our economy is lifting off, and it's because of the policies that we've been passing over the past 2\1/2\ years. Consumer confidence and spending are up. Productivity is up. Industrial production, retail sales, auto sales, housing and construction are all up since the beginning of the year. And last quarter, the economy grew at an annual rate of 9.2 percent, a much bigger jump than anyone had predicted.

Although unemployment is still too high, it's coming down rapidly, and we'll continue to chip away and knock that statistic down to size. As a matter of fact, last month it was the biggest single-month drop in unemployment in 23 years. Now, we must help those who, through no fault of their own, are without jobs, but let's be clear: Our goal isn't welfare or handouts, it's jobs and opportunity. And if I didn't believe that, I think you, the people in this room, would tell me that's what we need and what you want.

Just as we've been building a stronger economy, we've been building a stronger defense. I know that you'll recall a few years ago our military personnel were putting their uniforms in mothballs, and we had a lot of ships and planes that belonged there -- in mothballs. And this situation endangered our national security and the peace.

As Commander in Chief, I can say to you America is more secure than she was 3 years ago. I've heard it from generals and I've heard it from privates, that once again it's an honor to be in our military. We have an abundance of applicants with more education than ever before. Morale, discipline, and unit cohesion have improved dramatically. Training and retention are up.

In 1980 the people also made it clear that they wanted a new direction in foreign affairs. Well, we began by letting the world know what we stood for once again. For too long, our nation had been mute to the injustice of totalitarianism. So, we began speaking out against chemical warfare inflicted on the people of Afghanistan and Southeast Asia, against broken treaties, and against the denial of human liberties. We began speaking out for freedom and democracy and the values that all of us share in our hearts.

And you know, it's amazing. In my meetings with foreign leaders and their ministers, they've told me how good it is to know what the United States stands for once again. Now, they may not always agree with us, but they respect us. There's a growing recognition abroad that America once again will stand up for her democratic ideals. Our country is the leader of the free world, and we morally cannot shirk that responsibility.

We are providing democratic leadership in Central America. A ruthless power has set its sights on our neighbors in Central America and the Caribbean. The security aspect of this threat must be addressed, so we're helping our friends to defend themselves, and we will continue to stand by them in their hour of need.

But let's get one thing straight, and I don't know how many times we must repeat this before it sinks into the skulls of some in this town -- that $3 out of every 4 that we send down there is in the form of humanitarian and economic aid. The people in Central America and the Caribbean are our neighbors. They need our help, and we will not abandon them to indifference.

We're also pursuing peace through arms control. In our search for peace, we have more major negotiations underway with the Soviets than any administration in history. We've undertaken the most sweeping proposals for arms reductions since nuclear weapons became a threat. And for the first time the Soviet Union is willing to talk about actual reductions rather than just ceilings, as in previous administrations. In strategic nuclear forces, in intermediate-range nuclear forces, and in conventional forces, we want to lessen the danger to ourselves and our children. We remain flexible in our bargaining. But as Commander in Chief, I have an obligation to protect this country, and I will not let political expedience influence those crucial negotiations. We will restore equality of strength with the Soviet Union either one way or the other, and the choice is theirs.

I believe that we share a sacred responsibility, all of us, to maintain the opportunity and freedom we've enjoyed and to pass it on to future generations. Americans of Hispanic descent understand completely the traditional values of work, of family, of freedom, and of God. That's why I'm so supportive of VIVA 84, your grassroots Hispanic voter education and registration drive, conceived by Dr. del Junco.

Well, America needs the values of our Hispanic citizens. We need those values to be expressed at the polls and through our political system. And I urge you, the members of the Republican National Hispanic Assembly, to run for public office, so that your values will carry even more influence. And nothing would please me more than to see the Republican National Hispanic Assembly become the voice of millions of Hispanics in our country.

As Republicans, we must work in unity toward 1984. We must pull together for the values we treasure. Hispanic Americans know the real meaning of this country. Those who fled oppression especially cherish America's freedom. Those who fled poverty especially cherish America's opportunity. And all of us deeply love this beautiful ideal that is America.

Every American has the right to dream great dreams. I want to keep the dreams of even the poorest, most powerless American great, because he and she are the hope and future and meaning of this nation. Tonight, my friends, I'm asking for your help, your commitment to preserving the American dream, and I have a hunch I know your answer already. Freedom -- siempre [always].

You know that this is Hispanic Heritage Week. Do you know that at the Pentagon, those great corridors over there are dedicated to various things that they want to keep before America and want to honor and remember, and one of those corridors is dedicated to those who have won that highest honor that our country can give, the Congressional Medal of Honor, and 37 of those who have won that honor since the Civil War are Hispanic Americans?

Friday -- I believe I have the day right -- Friday, the Pentagon is going to hold a ceremony there in honor of what Hispanic Americans have meant in arms and in preserving the peace in America by way of our military. And I have witnessed a little 12-minute film that was made, perhaps, in connection with that.

Now there's something in that film that I don't think you would know -- I didn't know it -- but it is something to be so proud of. In a little town in Illinois, there's a short street called Second Street in that town. There are 22 homes and families on that street, and those 22 families are all Hispanic Americans. And when war came, 85 sons of those 22 families went off to war for this country.

But it is a proud record that you have. And I'm sure that you know what the creed is and the slogan is of your sons, your brothers, or your fathers and husbands who have gone and who've served this country in time of war, and that is, ``The first in and the last out.'' God bless you all.

The resignation of Prime Minister Begin was formalized today. The President wishes Mr. Begin well and states that the Prime Minister has played a unique and central role in the history of his country. His dedication to peace and his efforts on behalf of the people of Israel are truly commendable. His statesmanship and leadership have been a source of inspiration. Prime Minister Begin has shown the courage and determination to make the kind of difficult decisions for peace, as demonstrated at Camp David, decisions which are so necessary to bring stability to this troubled region of the world.

Mrs. Eanes to the United States. Ever since President George Washington opened formal diplomatic relations between Portugal and the new American Republic, our history has been one of warm friendship. And, Mr. President, I know I speak for our people when I say a friendship as warm and true as ours is more valuable than the richest treasure. I've looked forward to this opportunity to get to know you personally and to discuss relations between our two countries, as well as international matters of mutual interest.

In the 9 years since the revolution of April 25th, 1974, Portugal has made great strides in building a vigorous democracy. Today, the fundamental institutions of a democratic country -- an open press, a free economy, and broadly based political parties -- are in place and flourishing. We in the United States recognize, Mr. President, that the establishment of democracy in your country met sharp challenges. Portugal's success in surmounting those challenges demonstrates the courage of your leaders and the love of your people for freedom.

You have stated that Portugal must have an open, clear democracy. And as President, you've labored tirelessly to give Portugal just that. Your efforts have earned you not only a place in your nation's history but a chapter in the noble story of freedom throughout the world.

In foreign relations, our two countries share a number of vital interests, and these will receive due attention during our discussions today. I might note in particular, Mr. President, that your nation's experience in Africa gives Portugal a unique and invaluable perspective on current events on that continent, especially in Angola and Mozambique. Both our nations are actively interested in southern Africa, and your country has always been generous in sharing with us insights drawn from your own wide experience. During your stay here, I would like to discuss southern Africa, and I want you to know that the United States not only values the counsel you've given to us on this matter in the past but intends to remain in close consultation with Portugal about it in the future.

We in the United States take pride in our military cooperation with your country. Currently our two governments are negotiating a new security cooperation agreement that will broaden and strengthen our collaboration on common defense objectives. The United States fully supports Portugal's efforts to enlarge its role in Western defense. We recognize that as those efforts proceed, Portugal will need to modernize its armed forces, and we're committed to helping you do so.

Portugal, particularly in recent years. That cooperation expresses the concern of the American people for the well-being of the Portuguese people and this country's unshakeable support for your country's economy and democracy.

Korean Air Lines massacre reminds us that although we in the West belong to a community of nations that strives to do good, others in the world do not shrink from doing evil. Let us in the Western alliance join together to retrieve meaning from those scores of innocent deaths, and let us rededicate ourselves to the defense of human freedom.

I am confident, Mr. President, that your visit to the United States will strengthen relations between our two countries and reaffirm our commitments to shared goals. I know that my countrymen are eager to give you a warm reception. Nearly half a million Portuguese have come to America as immigrants, and both they and their descendants have earned the gratitude of all Americans by contributing honorably and diligently to the building of our country.

President Eanes. Mr. President, I wish to thank you for the most generous welcome you have extended to us and for the words addressed to me as the representative of the Portuguese people who, as you know, is a loyal and firm ally of the United States of America. The ties uniting Portugal and the United States are indeed strong. The Portuguese maritime adventure, the Atlantic Ocean and the geopolitical concepts that it imposes, the sharing of the same democratic ideals, and the presence in the United States of a large and significant Portuguese community creates real affinities and require from our countries a mutually advantageous approach.

It is with great pleasure that I pay this official visit to your country, Mr. President, certain as I am that it affords an opportunity for an open and frank exchange of views on political and international developments and, in a very special way, on the most positive means of strengthening the relations between our two countries.

It will thus be possible to reaffirm our loyalty to mutual commitments and to reinforce our longstanding cohesion in the defense of our common interests. This is an objective that is imposed on us by the present and by the future, and it is an aim that it is all the more important to attain inasmuch as your actions, Mr. President, have proved, through your courage and your consistency in the defense of democratic principles, that the values of freedom have, in you, a committed defender.

Portugal is a small country with a long history and vast political experience. With its eight centuries of independence, Portugal has participated in the long and complex course leading to the Europe we know today. But with its active presence in various regions of the world that it discovered and helped to know and to develop, Portugal has gained practical political knowledge that contributes to our unique way of relating to and understanding other peoples. From our history, we draw the conviction that the assertion of freedom of expression and of pluralist democracy, as well as the permanent guarantee of human rights and firmness in the defense of the essential values of our society, cannot be called into question. For us, the search for negotiated solutions to all conflicts, respecting other positions and different cultural patterns, is also natural, provided that those solutions do not run counter to the autonomy and sovereignty of each people and are expressed in terms of a common concern for safeguarding the peace.

In these last few years, the Portuguese overthrew a dictatorship half a century old and managed to overcome new totalitarian attempts through the rigorous fulfillment of the rules of a pluralist democracy, at a time when some believed that such an objective was already impossible to achieve. The Portuguese showed that when democracy is given an opportunity, a serious, committed opportunity, the totalitarianisms that deny freedom are defeated by the only real and consistent way of ensuring victory -- the citizens free choice.

But the superiority of democracy must equally be evidenced in its capacity to guide society, adjusting social expectations to what it is really possible to organize. Societies, or some social groups, when faced with the impossibility of attaining material expectations that they consider legitimate or that have been promised to them, may question the validity of global models of political organization and then nourish radical tendencies.

Only a political power that is democratically legitimate, competent, and efficient and able to ensure the balance of interests, a negotiated consensus, and conscious participation will be able successfully to carry out the tasks of economic reorganization.

In this regard, the greatest concern for the present and the immediate future lies in the economic area, both in respect of Portugal and within the framework of the Atlantic alliance and of international relations in general. And further, it is in that context of global democratic concern that it is justified to expect the demonstration of the solidarity of the democratic countries and, first of all, of the United States. In this way, our security will be reinforced, guaranteeing the present and future substance of the Atlantic alliance and illustrating, in many other areas and in practical realities, that all truly democratic forces and programs may count on effective support.

I am certain, Mr. President, that our exchange of views on these and other subjects, while confirming our alliance, will justify a future of active and committed cooperation. I look forward to meeting with you, Mr. President, and discussing with you means for us to carry out this fruitful cooperation in the future between the United States and Portugal.

The provision of a home and a suitable living environment for every American family continues to be a national housing goal. Homeownership and decent housing instill pride in our citizens and contribute to the vitality of communities throughout America.

The resurgence of America's housing industry is both a contribution to and a result of our Nation's economic recovery. The substantial increase in housing starts in 1983, by restoring and creating thousands of jobs in housing and related industries, has been a major factor in the reduction of unemployment.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Chronic lung diseases constitute an important health problem in the United States. They afflict nearly 18 million Americans and cause nearly 70,000 deaths each year, many of which are the direct result of cigarette smoking. Thousands of other persons annually suffer some degree of permanent disability as a result of these disorders. The economic cost of these diseases has been estimated to exceed $16 billion annually.

For some of these diseases the cause is unknown, and for many there is no cure. The timely initiation of appropriate therapy, however, can usually slow their progress, relieve their symptoms, reduce the extent of permanent lung damage and respiratory disability, and avert or delay the onset of life-threatening complications. Although the lung damage already caused by these diseases cannot be undone, respiratory therapy may help preserve lung function that might otherwise be irretrievably lost and can also help the patient make the most effective use of that which remains.

Respiratory therapy may take many forms, including drugs to dilate open air passages or protect against respiratory infections; respiratory-assistance techniques to maintain adequate blood oxygen levels; and exercise programs to improve the efficiency of breathing and condition respiratory muscles to bear the increased burden imposed on them. Kicking the smoking habit is also important to all respiratory therapy.

Atlantic represent an enduring symbol of man's resourceful response to the challenge of exploration and discovery. Medieval sagas describe supplies of timber and wild grapes which he brought back to Greenland from North America. His exploits offer inspiration for our continuing efforts to conquer fear of the unknown and explore new worlds.

Erikson, who was charged by King Olaf I to spread religion among settlers in Greenland, also embodies the tradition of Nordic enrichment of the wider western world. That tradition has been memorably dramatized for Americans during the past year by the Scandinavia Today program across this country. This splendid program has given people in all parts of the United States an admiring new appreciation of the rich cultural and intellectual heritage brought to this country by Nordic immigrants and the vitality of contemporary life in the Nordic countries.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Since the Pilgrims observed the initial Thanksgiving holiday in 1621, this occasion has served as a singular expression of the transcending spiritual values that played an instrumental part in the founding of our country.

Lincoln formally proclaimed a national day of Thanksgiving to remind those ``insensible to the ever watchful providence of Almighty God'' of this Nation's bounty and greatness. Several days after the dedication of the Gettysburg battlefield, the United States celebrated its first national Thanksgiving. Every year since then, our Nation has faithfully continued this tradition. The time has come once again to proclaim a day of thanksgiving, an occasion for Americans to express gratitude to their God and their country.

In his remarks at Gettysburg, President Lincoln referred to ours as a Nation ``under God.'' We rejoice in the fact that, while we have maintained separate institutions of church and state over our 200 years of freedom, we have at the same time preserved reverence for spiritual beliefs.

Although we are a pluralistic society, the giving of thanks can be a true bond of unity among our people. We can unite in gratitude for our individual freedoms and individual faiths. We can be united in gratitude for our Nation's peace and prosperity when so many in this world have neither.

As was written in the first Thanksgiving Proclamation 120 years ago, ``No human counsel hath devised nor hath any mortal hand worked out these great things. They are the gracious gifts of the Most High God.'' God has blessed America and her people, and it is appropriate we recognize this bounty.

On behalf of all Americans, I salute the House and Senate for their overwhelming, bipartisan support of a resolution condemning the Soviet Union's murder of 269 innocent people aboard KAL 007. This wanton, barbaric act violated the most basic principle of international law and morality -- the sanctity of human life.

I urge the American people to stand by the families whose loved ones were taken from them. And let us appeal to the conscience of the civilized world: The passengers of KAL 007 must never be forgotten; nor must we rest until the world can prevent such a crime against humanity from ever happening again.

But, Mr. President, this morning we had a chance to explore issues that concern us both. Our discussion about relations between our two countries, our common support for the NATO alliance, and our close consultations on southern Africa demonstrate how much our nations share a firm commitment to freedom and peace.

Americans esteem those who rise from humble beginnings to positions of national service. You and Mrs. Eanes have probably seen the Lincoln Memorial, the monument to a President who began life in a simple log cabin. In many ways your own life parallels that of Lincoln, for you, too, began life in modest surroundings, then rose in the service of democracy to your nation's highest office.

And, Mr. President, we honor you for that achievement. You once stated your determination that the Portuguese people will have their democracy. Today, the Portuguese people do indeed have their democracy and Portugal, fully committed to political and economic freedom, has taken its rightful place among the democracies of the West. As a full and active participant in the NATO alliance, Portugal has proven its willingness to help defend the Western community of nations and the values for which that community stands.

Portugal has thus earned a reputation as a staunch and reliable ally. The security relationship between our two countries has for many years been one of full cooperation and complete mutual respect. Our negotiations for a formal renewal of the security relationship are going well, and I have every confidence that the new agreement will strengthen the security of the West and enhance Portugal's already vital role in the Atlantic alliance.

Gatherings like this among friends and allies always constitute pleasant social occasions to get to know and to understand each other better. They are also political occasions for affirming our common democratic commitment. And this is, in fact, the strongest reason for our easy and natural mutual understanding.

In the past, when Portugal lived under a dictatorial regime, it might have been considered an uncomfortable ally. Kept for decades apart from democratic life, the Portuguese are well aware of the difference that exists between imposed obligations and freely chosen positions.

Today, we can affirm our presence in the Atlantic alliance and assume within it all the necessary positions with the certainty that these positions are supported by the Portuguese people. For that reason, within the framework of the express will of the Portuguese people, we are a responsible ally of the United States with natural and justified expectations.

The deep historical bonds and existing common interests are now strengthened by the common identity of our pluralist democratic political systems. Peoples understand each other more easily and support each other with greater determination when their political institutions have similar modes of action and similar legitimacy.

In our opinion, the world of today clearly confirms that foreign policy involves societies as a whole. For this reason, the harmony of decisions and the continuity of political action have shown themselves to be of such importance in achieving truly consequential objectives in conditions of security, social support, and the furtherance of democracy.

It is only natural for a Portuguese to cite his recent experience of the establishment of a democratic regime in order to underline the importance of internal social conditions for the security and the permanence of external alliances. And it is for this reason that I should like to stress the concern with which I follow the evolution of economic indicators, which point to the need for a joint and determined effort to reorganize this vital sector of contemporary society.

And this is essential for all those who believe in the superiority of the democratic system. In our view, it is also a necessary condition in order to ensure the security not only of each of the democracies but also of the Atlantic alliance itself, and for achieving useful cooperation with various regions of the world.

As a result of the talks that we have been holding, Mr. President, I am further strengthened in my conviction that your statesmanship, sir, is an essential contribution to our mutual commitment to peace and to the strengthening of democratic societies, for these are the necessary conditions for the continuity of political action and for harmony in the decisionmaking process which will lead to a new era of progress and prosperity.

Mr. President, you have the courage to show firmness in the defense of democratic values and determination in guaranteeing their security, and these are qualities which deserve our sincere admiration.

In this context, it is right that our close friendship should be seen together with our position as a responsible ally which has definite expectations. I am sure that by truly expressing our respective interests, based on democratic legitimacy, we are certain to be able to find ways in which our means and our wills can complement each other in such a way that we will lead to mutual commitments and to joint action.

Ladies and gentlemen, may I invite you in this spirit of responsibility and friendship to join me in a toast to President and Mrs. Reagan, to whom I wish the greatest happiness and through whom I address to all Americans our best wishes for happiness and prosperity.

Those of you before me have achieved in life, not as a result -- we're going to have to do something about that\1\ (FOOTNOTE)  -- not as result of any special treatment or artificial quotas or political favoritism, but as talented individuals on your own. Your acts of personal sacrifice and valor, too numerous to relate, are part of the thrilling story of Hispanic heroes in defense of freedom, a story so powerful and moving that it sometimes defies belief.

Since the Civil War, Americans of Hispanic descent have been winning Medals of Honor. To this date, there have been 36 such winners, an incredible number, all out of proportion to the percentage of the Hispanic population in our country. The stories of these Americans, the stories of many of you here today who were wounded, decorated, and promoted in your country's service, account for some of the most astonishing acts of valor and personal sacrifice in the history of our nation's armed services.

You know, I must tell you I saw a wonderful film recently -- believe it or not, the story of a street, a street in an Hispanic neighborhood, what used to be called Second Street in Silvis, Illinois. At the end of it is a monument, the end of that street, to eight heroes from this street who gave their lives in the defense of America. In fact, from 22 families on this block, 84 men served in World War II, Korea, and Vietnam. In World War II and Korea, 57 came from that street. The two Sandoval families sent 13 -- 6 from one family, 7 from the other, and 3 of the Sandoval sons never came back. I think you will agree with one man in the film who says they so willingly defended America because it was for them, as for all of us, a place of opportunity. I think you will agree with his words when he said, ``I don't think there's any more to prove than has been proven on this street.'' And perhaps you will understand why the name on Second Street in Silvis, Illinois, was changed a few years back. The new name is Hero Street.

But Hero Street is only one Hispanic contribution to America's defense. Indeed, ``first in, last to leave'' seems to be the watchwords of Hispanic American heroism. One of the units to fight the first major battle of the Civil War was Hispanic, and one of the last units of the Confederacy to fight on after Lee's surrender was Hispanic. Hispanic members of the New Mexico National Guard were among the original cadre of Teddy Roosevelt's Rough Riders. Among your number have been the first American flier to be shot down over Vietnam; the first American to escape from captivity in Vietnam and make his way to freedom through Communist-infested territory; the last marine to leave Saigon, a young sergeant who had also fought in the early years of the Vietnam war; and, of course, the last American to have received the Medal of Honor for conspicuous gallantry. And it's with a special sense of gratitude that we remember the supreme sacrifice of Staff Sergeant Alexander Ortega and Corporal Pedro Valle, gallant marines who recently gave their lives in the service of peace in Beirut, Lebanon.

Hispanic Americans continue to excel in the Department of Defense mission, which is to preserve peace through strength. We have with us today bright and dedicated young men and women from our service academies, our enlisted ranks, and our officers corps. We also find more and more Hispanic general and flag officers, many of whom are here today, providing strong and sensitive leadership in promoting peace within this hemisphere and around the world. Our fine Hispanic women, military women, are equal partners with their male colleagues on the defense team.

Here I would like to pay special tribute to our military spouses and family members whose sacrifices on behalf of this great nation too frequently go unnoticed. America owes all of them and all of you who are here a special thank you.

This record of honor is one that Americans of Hispanic descent take great pride in, and it's part of the proud heritage they pass on to their children. And by the way, in case you haven't heard, at our request the United States Postal Service will be issuing a commemorative stamp in honor of this enormous and awe-inspiring record. And this is a replica of what that stamp will look like.

But let me assure you this record of valor, all Americans take pride in. And that is the real importance of this ceremony. We celebrate this day just as we've celebrated the events of Hispanic Heritage Week. We pay tribute to Americans of Hispanic descent, but especially to the culture and the values that bred in men and women like yourselves a respect for family, work, neighborhood, and religion, a belief in duty to God and country and fellow man. More than ever, today America needs these values, these ideals. More than ever, America needs your example.

We're just now emerging from a time when many people here in Washington thought the business of governing meant only assembling coalitions of special interests, groups that could vote or exert pressure to push government in a certain direction. Well, yes, government must recognize the legitimate rights and concerns of individual Americans and social, ethnic, or racial groups they belong to. But I've always believed that it is ideas, it is hope and idealism that count most with the American people.

South Pacific. ``He wouldn't sell his life to you, but he will give it to you for a piece of colored ribbon.'' He meant simply that shared values and the hope of freedom have always meant more to the American people, and especially to Americans of Hispanic descent, than private gain or personal interest.

As I said to the G.I. Forum a few weeks ago in Texas, Americans of Hispanic descent have always understood this better than most. You've known that the ideals, the faith, and the dreams of a people mean far more than a thousand promises of an easy life or a comfortable existence.

You've reminded us with the example of your lives that independence, honor, and devotion to country and family are more than just words. ``There are those I know,'' the poet Archibald MacLeish once said, ``who will reply that the liberation of humanity, the freedom of man and mind is nothing but a dream.'' They're right. It is. It is the American dream.

Well, it's your dream and our dream, one that you've given of your lives and talents to protect and preserve. And so today our purpose is simple. On behalf of the American people, I want simply to say something that should have been said a long time ago. I want to thank Americans of Hispanic descent. Thank you for accounting for so much of our economic and social progress as a nation, for enriching our national culture and heritage, but most of all, for upholding the values that account for America's greatness. That's what made us a beacon to the oppressed and the poor of the world. There's no better symbol of those values and that greatness than those of you here in uniform today. We honor you, we thank you. We want you to know that as you continue to serve your country, our thoughts and our grateful prayers are with you.

In their recent statements on the Korean Air Lines tragedy, senior Soviet officials have shocked the world by their assertion of the right to shoot down innocent civilian airliners which accidently intrude into Soviet airspace. Despite the murder of 269 innocent victims, the Soviet Union is not prepared to recognize its obligations under international law to refrain from the use of force against civilian airliners. World opinion is united in its determination that this awful tragedy must not be repeated. As a contribution to the achievement of this objective, the President has determined that the United States is prepared to make available to civilian aircraft the facilities of its Global Positioning System when it becomes operational in 1988. This system will provide civilian airliners three-dimensional positional information.

The United States delegation to the ICAO [International Civil Aviation Organization] Council meeting in Montreal, under the leadership of FAA Administrator J. Lynn Helms, is urgently examining all measures which the international community can adopt to enhance the security of international civil aviation. The United States is prepared to do all it can for this noble aim. We hope that the Soviet Union will at last recognize its responsibilities and join the rest of the world in this effort.

Five days after the Soviets shot down KAL 007, I went on nationwide television to urge that all of us in the civilized world make sure such an atrocity never happens again. And I pledged to you that night, we would cooperate with other countries to improve the safety of civil aviation, asking them to join us in not accepting the Soviet airline Aeroflot as a normal member of the international civil air community -- not, that is, until the Soviets satisfy the cries of humanity for justice.

Aviation Organization. This meeting was called at the request of the Republic of Korea, and 32 countries are attending. The group immediately went to work on a resolution to call for an international investigation, to deplore this atrocity, and to review procedures to prevent civilian aircraft from ever being attacked again. Yesterday, the resolution passed by an overwhelming majority.

Flight 007. They reserve for themselves the right to live by one set of rules, insisting everyone else live by another. They're supremely confident their crime and coverup will soon be forgotten, and we'll all be back to business as usual. Well, I believe they're badly mistaken. This case is far from closed. The Soviets aggression has provoked a fundamental and long overdue reappraisal in countries all over the globe. The Soviet Union stands virtually alone against the world.

Take the example of aviation. Canada suspended Aeroflot landing rights for 60 days and froze the signing of an agreement for Aeroflot refueling at Gander. The Canadian Air Traffic Controllers Association has withdrawn from a longstanding exchange agreement with its Soviet counterpart organization.

With the exception of France, Greece, and Turkey, all the NATO nations and Japan have temporarily suspended civil air traffic between their respective nations and the Soviet Union. Even neutral Switzerland and pilots in Finland have joined the general boycott. Australia and New Zealand are also taking strong measures in the area of civil aviation.

In the United Nations, the Security Council voted a resolution deploring the Soviet attack, forcing the Soviets to cast their veto to block its adoption. Here, too, we're seeing evidence that a fundamental reappraisal is in the works. Most countries rebuke the Kremlin. Only a few of Moscow's dependables stood up for its defense. Nonaligned nations are looking to the United States for leadership. I've instructed our Ambassador to the U.N., Jeane Kirkpatrick, to sit down with them to seek out new areas of cooperation.

In the Congress, both the House and the Senate mobilized overwhelming bipartisan support for a resolution of condemnation. Some would have us lash out in another way by canceling our grain shipments. But that would punish American farmers, not the Soviet aggressors. The most effective, lasting action against their violence and intimidation -- and it's the one action the Soviets would welcome least -- will be to go forward with America's program to remain strong.

I'm confident that if enough of you at the grassroots make your voices heard, we can and will do just that. We may not be able to change the Soviets ways, but we can change our attitude toward them. We can stop pretending they share the same dreams and aspirations we do. We can start preparing ourselves for what John F. Kennedy called a long twilight struggle. It won't be quick, it won't make headlines, and it sure won't be easy, but it's what we must do to keep America strong, keep her free, and yes, preserve the peace for our children and for our children's children.

This is the most enduring lesson of the Korean Air Lines massacre. If we grasp it, then history will say this tragedy was a major turning point, because this time the world did not go back to business as usual.

And under your first chairman, Air Force General Jeanne Holm, your organization set out to encourage talented women to enter government and to ensure that women had the opportunity to play significant roles once they got involved.

You started out with 38 members, and today you have 246. I know you're a wonderfully diverse group -- scientists, judges, lawyers, managers. You've been activists within the system, serving as a point of contact for professional women and a catalyst for change during four administrations.

Over the last few months much has been said about women in general and in our administration. I just wish that those who are doing all the talking would focus more on the many top-notch women in the administration instead of talking in generalities. I'm exceptionally proud of the women who are making great contributions to achieving our goals.

Women are in top policy and decisionmaking positions throughout the executive branch, yet they are by-and-large ignored by those who are claiming our record is not up to par. Well, we've appointed more women to significant positions than any other administration.

We appointed the first woman to the Supreme Court, and I can tell you that there have been a few decisions when I was mighty happy she was there. [Laughter] And for the first time in history, we've got three women of Cabinet rank -- Secretaries Dole and Heckler and Ambassador Kirkpatrick. I'd just like to add something important here. During this time of tension over the Soviet massacre of 269 airline passengers, Jeane Kirkpatrick has been a tower of strength and dignity, and she's doing a great service to her country.

But these female stars in our administration receive far less personal attention from the public than they deserve. And other women within the administration, individuals who are making decisions that are affecting the lives of tens of millions of people, are getting too little public recognition.

Being intimately involved in government, we know, but how many other citizens are aware, for example, of the tough job Mary Jarratt is doing as Assistant Secretary of Agriculture for Food and Consumer Services? She has responsibility for programs totaling $19 billion.

Dorcas Hardy, Assistant Secretary for Human Development Services at HHS. She's been instrumental in improving services to some of our nation's most vulnerable citizens. And then there is your own chairman, Nancy Harvey Steorts, who heads up the Consumer Product Safety Commission, which has the responsibility of ensuring the safety of some 15,000 generic consumer products.

All of these and so many others that I couldn't possibly take the time to name are in positions of authority not because of some artificial quota, but because they're capable, committed, and responsible individuals.

Let me just diverge a moment to make a short announcement on another subject, because it affects that goal I spoke about. Strengthening America begins with strengthening American families by providing new opportunity. We've been working hard to do this from the outset of this administration. Reducing tax rates, estate taxes, and the marriage penalty, increasing the child care credit, and bringing down inflation and interest rates are all important steps of progress. But there is another side, a darker side to family life in America. The problem of family violence, the terrible cost of this violence in emotional grief, shattered lives, and more crimes in the future must be squarely faced. This year the President's Task Force on Victims of Crime recommended, in particular, the creation of a task force to study the problem of violence in families. And today, we're announcing the creation of the Attorney General's Task Force on Family Violence. This task force will be asked to make specific recommendations, and it will be chaired by William Hart, the chief of police of Detroit, Michigan.

All of you have much of which to be proud. I'm tempted to go through a list of accomplishments, but it's sufficient to say that all Americans are better off because of what the women and the men of this administration have done, aided by capable and dedicated career staff, in these last 2\1/2\ years. I'm happy to have had this opportunity to thank you for the role that you're playing and to congratulate you on the occasion of your 10th anniversary.

The one hundred and three historically black colleges and universities in the United States have contributed substantially to the growth and enrichment of the Nation. These institutions have a rich heritage and tradition of providing the challenging higher education so essential to an individual's full participation in our complex technological society.

Historically black colleges and universities bestow forty percent of all degrees earned by black students. They have awarded degrees to eighty-five percent of the country's black lawyers and doctors and fifty percent of its black business executives. Throughout the years, these institutions have helped many underprivileged students to attain their full potential through higher education.

In recognition of the fact that the achievements and goals of these historically black colleges and universities deserve national attention, the Congress of the United States, by Senate Joint Resolution 85, has designated and requested the President to proclaim September 26, 1983, as National Historically Black Colleges Day.

Our Armed Forces veterans have earned a special day in which you and I may focus on their heroic accomplishments. For their unselfish devotion to duty, Congress established Veterans Day as a national expression of gratitude. On this historic occasion, our hearts and minds should be with our living veterans and their deceased comrades who have contributed so much to the defense of our country's ideals.

From Valley Forge when our Nation was in its infancy, to the Vietnam conflict where our men and women in uniform served and died for the human rights of others, through war and peace, these valiant citizens have answered the call to service with honor and dignity. They are indeed worthy of a formal tribute from a grateful Nation. Special consideration is due to those veterans who are sick and disabled. There is no better tangible expression of our affection than by remembering to visit them at home or in our hospitals.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

It is with special gratitude for your contributions to the conduct of foreign policy that I accept with regret your resignation as Ambassador to the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland, effective November 7, 1983.

The remarkable dedication and purpose with which you have carried out your demanding duties as Ambassador have added singular luster to your distinguished career. The alliance today between the United States and Great Britain is adamantine and for that you are in no small part responsible. I know that you leave diplomatic service with the true respect and admiration of your colleagues at Embassy London and in the Foreign Office. To that I may only add my warm personal thanks for a job well done.

James effective November 7, 1983. I shall be returning to the United States, and to the business affairs and civic, educational and charitable work which had been my life until you honored me with this appointment in 1981.

I leave with a great sense of accomplishment. Anglo-American relations are excellent. Britain's support for alliance policies, and the effectiveness of our consultations, have allowed the United States and the United Kingdom to work together with renewed strength and enthusiasm for creative diplomacy. There is a refreshing candor in both official and personal contacts with Mrs.

Thatcher's government. Our two countries have been effective partners in numerous initiatives all over the world, and our successes together have been important contributions to the search for peace and security. I am very proud of these achievements.

Mr. President, you have paid me the highest compliment, and the highest honor by appointing me as your personal representative at this post. My responsibilities here have been the most demanding, the most thrilling, and the most satisfying of my life; and I shall remain forever grateful to you for your trust.

An agreement has been reached among the bipartisan leadership of the Congress to introduce and seek to enact a resolution authorizing the continued presence and mission of the U.S. peacekeeping forces in Lebanon.

While I have substantial reservations about parts of this resolution -- reservations which I made clear to the leadership -- I am pleased that this agreement among the congressional leadership supporting our presence and policies in Lebanon has been reached, and I would be willing to sign the proposed resolution, while expressing my reservations, if it is passed in the form that has been presented to me this morning.

I'm especially pleased that this proposed resolution not only supports our policies in Lebanon but now enables us to advance United States peacekeeping interests on the solid bipartisan basis that has been the traditional hallmark of American foreign policy.

But it was a particular pleasure to have you present me. And by the way, as I looked at that summary of Judge Russell's career -- Assistant Secretary of State, president of this university, Governor of South Carolina, United States Senator, and now Judge in the Court of Appeals -- I couldn't help but thinking just what you might have done if you had put your mind to it.

Today, in this historic place, I believe I understand why. Here, on the grounds where you're sitting, during the War Between the States, soldiers from both sides drilled and trained -- soldiers who wanted nothing more than to go home to their families, their mothers and fathers, their wives, their children. Here, in these buildings flanking these grounds, war councils were held by officers who only months before had been running their businesses or working their farms in peace. And here, makeshift hospitals were erected for those wounded in battle. Many of the wounded left the hospitals permanently disabled; many never left them at all.

Perhaps more than any other State, South Carolina has suffered the ravages of war. And because the citizens of this State possess a keen sense of history, one of the marks of a truly civilized people, you and your Representatives in Washington have always urged our nation to avoid war by maintaining a sound defense.

And now, may I say a word to you students here today? As a new school year begins, many of you probably wonder what kind of world it is that you're preparing for. You wonder whether you'll find jobs in a nation created to offer expanding opportunity to all; whether you'll have the means to raise your own families as well or maybe better than your parents raised you; or whether you won't be able to afford your own homes or give your children the education they deserve.

And yes, you have a good reason to ask those questions. In recent years, so many claimed that we live in a world of limits where all nations, even those as bountiful as our own, must learn to live with less. Perhaps you remember a report published a few years back called ``The Limits to Growth.'' That title -- limits to growth -- said it all.

Well, my college days, if you can stretch your imaginations back that far, happened to fall during the Great Depression of the thirties. The overall unemployment rate was more than a fourth of the work force, almost double -- or more than double what it is today. The Federal Government broadcast radio messages in those days telling all of us not to leave home to look for jobs because there were none; just wait at home for the government to take care of you.

Well, I remember that all my way through high school and college I had a job as a lifeguard on the banks of a river in Illinois. The job didn't pay much, but it was something. And when I left that job at the end of the summer to start classes -- incidentally, I went to another job there on the campus. It was not one of the worst jobs I've ever had; I washed dishes in the girls' dormitory.

I would have to go right back to being a lifeguard, and that could only be for the summer. Well, I did go back for the summer following my graduation in order to get some money to go job hunting. If ever there was a time to talk about limits to growth, it was then.

But here we are half a century later, and the American people enjoy a standard of living unknown back in the thirties or even before the thirties, before there was a Depression. During the past 50 years, each decade, employment in our country has risen on an average of some 12 million people in each 10 years, and real income per person has increased on the average of nearly 30 percent.

And think of the things that we take for granted today that didn't even exist before -- television, computers, space flights. Two big thrills in my life were hearing Charles Lindbergh had landed safely in France, and then some five decades later, watching the space shuttle Columbia land safely in California. And it was impressed on me, the great technology, when I was told, as we sat on the platform looking toward the western sky for it to come into view, that it had started its approach over Honolulu.

Well, I know that hunger and sickness in many parts of the world haven't been wiped out. But thanks to breakthroughs in agriculture and medicine, today more people on this Earth eat better and live longer than ever before in history. I've already lived some two decades longer than my life expectancy when I was born. That's a source of annoyance to a number of people. [Laughter] But life on Earth is not worse; it is better than it was when I was your age. And life in the United States is better than ever.

Now, what about your generation? Well, we've only seen the beginning of what free and brave people can do. You've all heard, of course, and studied the Industrial Revolution. Well, today our nation is leading another revolution even more sweeping as it touches our lives. It's a revolution ranging from tiny microchips to voyages into the vast, dark reaches of space; from home computers that can put the great music and film and literature at a family's fingertips to new medical devices and methods of healing that could add years to your lives and even enable the halt to walk and the blind to see.

Your generation stands on the verge of greater advances than humankind has ever known. I remember my disbelief when I was told one day of a communications satellite that could deliver the entire Encyclopaedia Britannica in 3 seconds. But for you to take advantage of these staggering advances, and your children, too, we must forge an education system to meet the challenges of change. The Senator spoke eloquently of this.\1\ (FOOTNOTE)  The sad fact is that system doesn't exactly exist today. Of course, there are many fine schools -- this university a notable example -- and thousands of dedicated schoolteachers and administrators. But overall, lately, American schools have been failing to do the job they should.

Now, some insist there's only one answer: more money. But that's been tried. Total expenditures in our nation's public schools this year, according to the National Education Association, will total $116.9 billion. And that's up 7 percent from last year -- more than double the rate of inflation, and more than double what we spent just 10 years ago.

If money was the answer, the problem over the last 10 years would have been shrinking, not growing. Despite the loud chorus from big spenders, most Americans understand that to make our schools better we don't need money as much as we need leadership from principals and superintendents, dedication from well-trained teachers, homework, testing, efficient use of time, and good, old-fashioned discipline.

It is we, not the young people of today, that are responsible for this failure. Maybe we thought we were making things nicer or easier for them after our experiences with war and with depression and all. But we have failed them in not bringing them up to the fullest extent and to the limits of their ability.

To begin with, we have to realize that our young people don't all go to school in Washington, but in thousands of American cities and towns, parishes, and neighborhoods. And that means that we have to restore, as the Senator said, parents and local governments to their rightful place in the educational process.

And then, too, we need to make certain that excellence gets rewarded. Teachers should be paid and promoted on the basis of their competence and merit. Now this may require more money, but responsibility for that should rest with authorities close to the schools themselves, not the Federal Government. Hard-earned tax dollars should encourage the best. They have no business rewarding mediocrity and incompetence.

And one more idea which may be laughed and sneered at in some supposedly sophisticated circles, but I just have to believe that the loving God who has blessed this land and thus made us a good and caring people should never have been expelled from America's classrooms. It's time to welcome Him back, because whenever we've opened ourselves and trusted in Him, we've gained not only moral courage but intellectual strength.

I'm convinced that if we can send astronauts to the Moon, we can put these commonsense principles into practice. It'll take hard work, because many special interest groups will resist. But with your support and with help from dedicated public servants like Senator Thurmond and your Members of the House of Representatives, we can give your generation and those that follow the education you'll need for the future -- a future more dazzling than any America has ever before known.

If I could leave you with one last thought, it's this: There are no such things as limits to growth, because there are no limits on the human capacity for intelligence, imagination, and wonder. A century ago, oil was nothing more than so much dark, sticky, ill-smelling liquid. It was the invention of the internal combustion engine that turned oil into a resource, and today oil fuels the world's economy. Just 10 years ago, sand was nothing more than the stuff that deserts are made of. Today, we use sand to make the silicon chips that guide satellites through space. So, remember, in this vast and wonderful world that God has given us, it's not what's inside the Earth that counts, but what's inside your minds and hearts, because that's the stuff that dreams are made of, and America's future is in your dreams. Make them come true.

And before I sit down -- and I'm not just doing this to be polite -- all the time that I've been waiting and that I've been up here, I've been wondering whether I should or not, and I can't sit down without recognizing that magnificent choir. When they sang the National Anthem, they did more than just sing it with their voices. I thought it came from their hearts, and we, therefore, listened with our hearts. And you know, that National Anthem of ours. I don't know all the national anthems in the world, but I don't know of any that end with a question. Yes, the question was the one that Francis Scott Key asked -- did we see, could we see that banner through the smoke and the bomb burst when morning came? Well, today, we can ask the same question.

When he asked, was it floating o'er the land of the brave and the home of the free? We're asking the question now. We know it's still flying, but it's up to us to see that it continues to fly over a land that is free and brave.

Maybe you'll understand why I say Strom is my friend, and I like him by my side giving me counsel and advice. And I trust the good sense of his friends. I'm confident that come November 1984, you'll send him right back to Washington to keep on doing a great job as your Senator.

Washington, D.C., as a Fourth of July blizzard in Columbia, South Carolina. [Laughter] There's a great sympathy in Washington for practically any scheme to spend money. But for years, Strom has been one of those lonely voices telling the awful truth: that government can only spend what it borrows or taxes away from the people. And hard-working people in South Carolina need higher taxes like they need a plague of locusts. You don't need to be taxed more; government needs to spend less.

We didn't go to Washington to raise taxes. We went there with a radical idea: to put this economy and the destiny of this great nation back in the hands of you, the people. And that's exactly what I think we've begun to do. With your support and Strom's, we came to the rescue of a nation whose house was on fire. We put out the flames and, brick by brick, we're rebuilding a foundation of strength, safety, security, and prosperity for America, and that's not bad for a new beginning.

Now, it's true, some people don't seem to like anything we do. Our opponents resist our budget savings. They oppose our tax cuts. And they complain that all their special interests have been hurt. Well, pardon me, but let them resist and oppose and complain, because I intend to remind the people the big spenders who saddled America with double-digit inflation, record interest rates -- as Strom has told you -- huge tax increases, too much regulation, credit controls, farm embargoes, no growth, and phony excuses about malaise are the last people who should be giving sermonettes on fairness and compassion.

I'm a firm believer in the need for bipartisan cooperation, especially in foreign policy where politics should stop at the water's edge. And sometimes we succeed. But there just isn't much sympathy among some there in Washington for reducing the tax burden on hard-working American families. And if the liberals in the Congress had their way, the American people would never have received any tax cut -- no first year, no second year, or, as the girl in the TV ad says, ``no nothin'.'' If we had followed their blueprint for compassion, the average family of four would be paying, as Strom told you, nearly $700 in higher taxes this year. And isn't it strange that we never hear a fairness argument that is framed that way?

But never mind, because that average family won't be paying the higher taxes some of those complainers on the Hill tried to pass. Thanks to the help of Strom Thurmond, his Republican colleagues here with us tonight, and a lot of responsible Democrats, we passed the first decent tax cut for every working American since 1964.

Despite all the threats from the other side, we kept our promise to the people. And we still have one more promise that must and will be kept. Indexing, an historic reform, will begin in 1985 -- it's already been passed -- so that never again will government be able to profit from inflation at your expense.

America is getting well, and she's getting strong. We've got a recovery train going. And rather than whine and carp and complain, the misery merchants should get on board and help us keep America moving forward. And if they can't do that, then let them get out of the way.

Inflation has plummeted by four-fifths, 80 percent, as Strom told you. And it's been under 2\1/2\ percent during the past 12 months, and that's the lowest 12-month rate in more than 15 years. The prime rate is almost half what it was when we took office. Estate taxes on family farms and businesses are being cut sharply. Strom and I happen to believe widows and children shouldn't be forced to sell the family farm or the family business just to pay Uncle Sam, and now they won't have to.

Factory orders, industrial production, auto sales, and housing starts are up since the beginning of the year. Housing starts, we just learned yesterday afternoon, were up last month to the highest level since December of 1978. The stock market has come back to life and today hit a new record.

You know, you can recite all these facts and figures or you can use an easier way, a kind of a layman's way to tell our economic program is working: Our opponents don't call it Reaganomics anymore. [Laughter] You know, I never did call it that. I just called it America getting back on track.

Increasing housing starts, greater automobile production, rising personal income should be music to the ears of one crucial industry in South Carolina -- your textile industry. And no one in the United States Congress works harder for the textile industry than your Senator, Strom Thurmond.

Recognizing the importance of that industry to the national economy -- an employer of nearly 2 million people -- I told Strom our administration would seek to relate imports to growth in the domestic market. We believe progress is built with competition, keeping faith with the magic of the marketplace, but we also know there are times when exceptions must be made due to special circumstances in market conditions. And that's why we've continued to support the Multifiber Arrangement which gives us the ability to protect our domestic textile and apparel manufacturers within the international system.

Reflecting the concerns of Strom Thurmond, we've negotiated a series of bilateral agreements which are far tighter than any existing before we took office. Our new China agreement contains 33 categories of textiles and apparel, as opposed to eight in 1981. Where other threats to our import textile and apparel industry have appeared, we've tried to counter them. And as you know, we have much to do, and I pledge to you tonight, our administration will strive to work toward an ever closer relationship of textile imports and domestic market growth, consistent with our existing international obligations.

Senator Thurmond and I share a very profound belief: We must preserve the American system of family farming. Strom has fought to protect the tobacco price support program from those who don't understand it. You know, talking about our family farms and what they can do -- every person out there in farming in America, feeding not only himself and his family but feeding more than 50 other people in the world -- there's a story that's going the rounds in Russia.

Strom Thurmond has been on the frontlines in our struggle to strengthen our foreign policy. He said some nice things about me on this, but he stands up for a strong national defense to make America second to none.

The debate on defense is about protecting lives and preserving freedom, because they're the source of all our other blessings. We both believe it's immoral to ask the sons and daughters of America to protect this land with second-rate equipment and weapons that won't work.

The savage Soviet attack against the unarmed Korean airliner reminds us we live in a dangerous world with cruel people who reject our ideals, who don't even understand them, and who disregard individual rights and the value of human life. We can only keep our families safe and our country free and at peace when the enemies of democracy know America has the courage to stay strong. And Strom and I intend to make sure they do. His leadership will be important on key appropriations votes that are coming up on defense and the MX.

Well, just as we're turning the economy around, we're also strengthening the Armed Forces and bringing a new sense of purpose and direction to America's foreign policy. In the military, the number of combat-ready units has gone up by a third since 1980. The deployable battle force in the Navy has risen from about 480 ships when we took office to 510 today -- well on its way to our goal of 600. The percentage of new recruits with high school diplomas has risen throughout our Armed Forces. And since 1980 the reenlistment rate has gone up by more than a fourth. We're attracting better recruits. We're keeping them longer, because we're giving them better pay and better equipment and because we're giving them the respect and appreciation they've always deserved.

Defense Department auditors and inspectors -- who ordered the audits in the first place and who conducted the investigations that revealed those figures. Those are our figures. We're the ones who formed a special unit to prosecute Department of Defense fraud cases. And in just an 18-month period, the Department has obtained 650 convictions, and this doesn't count the number of settlements that have been made not going to court. So despite all the headlines, we are keeping that promise to weed out waste, fraud, and abuse.

And one other thing: Under our administration, this nation is through with hand-wringing and apologizing. We don't have to put up walls to keep our people in. We don't use an army of secret police to keep them quiet. We don't imprison political and religious dissidents in mental hospitals.

What we are doing is working tirelessly for a just peace in the Middle East, promoting human rights in southern Africa, giving firm support to the forces of democracy in Central America, and negotiating for balanced and verifiable arms reductions. In fact, in our search for peace we have more major arms control negotiations underway with the Soviets than any other administration in history. And this is the first time that the Soviets have agreed to go beyond nuclear arms ceilings to negotiate actual reductions in nuclear weapons.

They haven't done it as well as they should; we haven't got them to the point that we think they should be. But at least they're there talking. And I don't think they would be there talking if it wasn't for the buildup in the military strength of the United States, the sort of signal they've gotten.

We can hold our heads high. I believe with all my heart that the United States is safer, stronger, and more secure today -- both economically and militarily -- than before. And if enough of you would just make your voices heard, we can make two more powerful contributions to the cause of good: We can welcome God back into America's classrooms, and we can finally protect the life of the unborn child.

I believe one word sums up the difference between today and 1980: Hope. Hope is being reborn in America. A better future awaits us, and together, we can make America a nation of winners again. So let us have faith. Let us go forward, remaining true to our vision of progress -- the vision Strom Thurmond has worked so hard to achieve. It begins with your families, churches, schools, and neighborhoods. We don't ask the people to trust us; we say trust yourselves, trust your own values, and working together, we'll make America great again.

Too many of our opponents are only comfortable trusting government. Their solutions -- higher taxes and more spending -- could bring us back full circle to the source of our economic problems, with the Government deciding that it knows better than you what should be done with your earnings and how you should live your life. Their road is timid and appeals to fear and envy.

I want to thank all of you. I just have to say this afternoon I had a most thrilling afternoon out on the campus of South Carolina, at the University of South Carolina, and seeing thousands of those wonderful young people. And you looked out at them, and you know I did some of my life in public office back in the riotous days when if I went to a campus, I started a riot. And to see those thousands of young people out there was to see the future of America. To see these young people, also from that campus, and hear them up here tonight is to see the future of America. And I assure you, the future is very bright indeed.

States. In spite of its prevalence, however, the disease remains a mystery in many ways. Its underlying cause is elusive, as is a method for identifying carriers who have no symptoms. Even in victims of cystic fibrosis, the disease manifests itself in many different ways, often masquerading as other conditions, and thus confounds diagnosis.

Through the combined efforts of the Federal government's National Institutes of Health, private voluntary agencies, and researchers at medical centers and universities across the country, we are making inroads toward explaining the mysteries of cystic fibrosis. While the disease once was almost invariably fatal in infancy and early childhood, innovations in diagnosis and treatment over the past 20 years have virtually doubled the average age of survival of its victims. For example, half of the children born with cystic fibrosis can now expect to live to age 21.

But this good news brings with it new hurdles. While people with cystic fibrosis are embarking on careers and assuming societal responsibilities to a greater extent than ever before, they do so in the shadow of a disease that remains progressively debilitating.

Therefore, the challenge remains to identify the cause of this disease and ultimately, we hope, to prevent it. Scientists are uncovering in greater and greater detail the metabolic defects involved in cystic fibrosis. By focusing on the unique physiology of people with the disease, researchers are getting closer to being able to identify its cause. In this effort, public awareness of the hallmarks and treatment of cystic fibrosis and of the importance of continuing scientific research are critical.

States, by the United Nations Commission on International Trade Law (UNCITRAL) and received the unanimous approval of this worldwide body; the Convention was then adopted, without dissent, by the United Nations Conference of sixty-two States. This unanimity attests to the broadly perceived need for the Convention and the value of its provisions.

States ratify the Convention, subject to a declaration permitted under Article 95 as to the grounds for applicability. I concur fully in this recommendation for the reasons set forth in the enclosed report of the Department of State.

The report of the Department of State provides a summary of the Convention and describes its approach. Worthy of emphasis is the international deference that the Convention accords to the contract made by the parties to an international sale. The parties may agree that domestic law rather than the Convention will apply, and their contract may modify or supplant the Convention's rules. The uniform international rules play their significant role when, as often occurs, a problem arises that the parties did not anticipate and solve by contract.

International trade now is subject to serious legal uncertainties. Questions often arise as to whether our law or foreign law governs the transaction, and our traders and their counsel find it difficult to evaluate and answer claims based on one or another of the many unfamiliar foreign legal systems. The Convention's uniform rules offer effective answers to these problems.

Enhancing legal certainty for international sales contracts will serve the interests of all parties engaged in commerce by facilitating international trade. I recommend that the Senate of the United States promptly give its advice and consent to the ratification of this Convention.

Senate consideration of the Convention, which was transmitted for advice and consent to ratification by letter dated November 12, 1980, has been delayed pending the correction of certain technical problems in its text. The Protocol resolves these technical problems by clarifying the language of the Convention to assure that its original intent is fulfilled.

In addition, the Protocol makes a necessary change regarding pensions, annuities and alimony and amends the Convention to permit the United States to exercise its full taxing right, under the Foreign Investment in Real Property Act, section 897 of the Internal Revenue Code. The Protocol also includes a new rule which affects an athlete resident in one State who is a recipient of a bonus from an employer resident in another State. The new rule protects such a recipient by limiting the rate of tax in the State of the employer.

The Treaty would permit citizens of either nation who had been convicted in the courts of the other country to serve their sentences in their home country; in each case the consent of the offender as well as the approval of the authorities of the two Governments would be required.

This Treaty is significant because it represents an attempt to resolve a situation which has inflicted substantial hardships on a number of citizens of each country and has caused concern to both Governments. The Treaty is similar to those currently in force with Bolivia, Canada, Mexico, Panama, Peru and Turkey. I recommend that the Senate give favorable consideration to this Treaty at an early date.

He is currently serving as regional vice president for the United Student Aid Fund, Inc., and executive director of the Maine Educational Loan Marketing Corp., in Augusta, Maine. He is a former Maine State senator and served as assistant majority leader.

Since then, the United States has held extensive consultations with our NATO allies and Japan regarding the U.S. position in the talks. These consultations have included both direct correspondence between myself and allied leaders, meetings of the NATO Special Consultative Group, and bilateral consultations with the Japanese.

In those consultations, suggestions for U.S. initiatives to move the negotiations forward were offered. These suggestions were welcomed by allied leaders, who reaffirmed their strong support for the U.S. negotiating effort. Our NATO allies also reaffirmed their commitment to the NATO double-track decision.

Based on the results of these consultations, Ambassador Nitze has received new instructions to pursue these U.S. initiatives with the Soviet negotiators in Geneva. These initiatives represent significant further development of the U.S. proposal for an interim agreement which the U.S. put forward last March. They address a number of Soviet concerns.

The professional relationship between those of us in public office and members of the press is an important ingredient of American freedom. Senator Moynihan once pointed out that countries which have papers filled with good news usually have jails filled with good people. Earlier this year, I suggested that perhaps -- and it was a gentle suggestion -- that perhaps the press could focus a bit more on the many wonderful things that Americans are doing for each other, especially during National Volunteer Week. There were a few cries of outrage, but now that the dust has settled, I think there's been a movement in the last few months to show the uplifting side of American life as well as our flaws. Of course, the imperfections need to be brought out; otherwise, they might never be corrected.

One of our greatest national treasures is our right as Americans to criticize government without fear of reprisal. There's a story about a Soviet citizen who was telling an American traveler that people in Russia are free to speak just like they are in the United States. The difference is that in the United States, they're free after they speak.

Journalism is not an easy profession, especially when the events of the day are immersed in theories and schools of thought not familiar to an individual that's trying to meet a deadline. In the first 2 years of this administration, economic issues became the focus of news coverage as never before. We were making fundamental changes in the direction of this country, and it wasn't always easy to understand what was happening and why the changes were being made. Well, these changes take time before they can take hold. As you understand, the suggestion that economic freedom needs time to work isn't good copy after a few weeks, and it's a bit difficult to visualize for a news audience how bad things would be if certain changes hadn't taken place.

For example, thanks to our program against inflation, a middle-income family today has $600 more in purchasing power than in 1980. Now, I think that's an important story, yet it's a hard one to present visually on a newscast. Since the beginning of the year, the expansion of the economy has been robust. America is beginning to move again after years of isolation and -- or I should say inflation and stagnation. I think that was a Freudian slip when I said isolation there.

But yesterday, the stock market, as you know, hit a new alltime high. And I'm pleased to report that this morning we received more heartening news about the economy. The figures for second quarter economic growth in gross national product had been revised upward for the second time from 9.2 percent to 9.7 percent, and now it is estimated that economic activity in the third quarter is rising at an annual rate of 7 percent.

Some of the foreign policy challenges we face are just as vexing as those concerning our economy, and they're just as difficult for journalists to cover. When we got to Washington we were faced with an unrelenting buildup of armaments and military equipment in Central America.

Much of this material is provided by the Soviets and their Cuban and Libyan allies. The American people and even some journalists are confused about what's happening in Central America. Well, stated succinctly, we're trying, even amid the turmoil, to encourage democracy, to ensure economic development, and to engage in dialog and listen to every idea that might put an end to the bloodshed and bring peace. What we cannot do is permit Soviet-armed and Cuban-trained insurgents to shoot their way into power, simply because we're unwilling to provide those who believe in democratic government with the means to defend themselves.

The Middle East is another area where America's role as peacemaker will require courage and commitment. The agreement reached yesterday with leaders of both parties in the Congress is a welcome step forward in our pursuit of peace in Lebanon. If approved by both Houses, it'll send a signal to the world that America will continue to participate in the multinational force trying to help that nation back on its feet. We've informed the Congress that we have reservations about certain features of the resolution, and our agreement is subject to those reservations. But that should not obscure a fundamental point: This resolution, hammered out in long hours of discussion between the congressional and executive branches, represents a bipartisan commitment that America will continue to play a significant role in the search for peace in the Middle East.

Peace is our highest goal. We've been working tirelessly to achieve it through diplomacy, but our participation in the multinational force of U.S., French, Italian, and British troops is absolutely crucial if the fighting is to stop, the Soviet-sponsored aggression against Lebanon is to end, and the diplomats have a chance to succeed. I'm very pleased that many Members of the Congress on both sides of the aisle recognize this reality and are willing to work with us in this pursuit.

Three years ago, America was being counted out by friend and adversary alike. It was being said that our best days were behind us. Well, today we can be proud that where freedom is on the line the United States is living up to its responsibilities, and we must not permit domestic politics to get in the way of these responsibilities.

Soviet Union and the rest of the world. The massacre of 269 airline passengers has brought home to many just how difficult this will be. At an absolute minimum, the Soviets should give the world an apology, an admission of responsibility, pay reparations to the victims' families, and provide assurances that such a crime will never be repeated. For our part, we stand ready to work with the Soviet Government to see that this kind of tragedy never happens again and to deal on other vital issues such as arms reduction.

After consultation with our allies, I have sent Ambassador Paul Nitze, our INF negotiator, instructions to pursue new U.S. initiatives with the Soviet negotiators in Geneva. On these or any of the other areas of concern, the time has come for the Soviets to show the world that they're serious about peace and good will.

Pittsburgh. There are many people in the Pittsburgh area, sir, who believe that no matter what you have been able to do so far with the Commerce Department relative to steel imports and restricting imports that the final breakthrough will hinge on whether or not we are able to allow some revision or readjustment or relook at the antitrust laws that will allow some companies to use their best skills in combination with other companies and other expertise to, in effect, merge not the two giant corporations, perhaps, but certain portions of those corporations to take advantage of what they have -- [inaudible]. Do you agree with that, number one?

The President. Well, let me say this: In theory and in principle, yes, I do, because we ourselves have proposed a change in the antitrust laws with regard to a number of things such as research, things of that kind that industry in America, for its own progress and for our country's progress, should be allowed to do without being in violation of the antitrust laws.

The President. Well, we have to continue to try to bring that about. And while there's a great deal of attention spent on whether we're shooting back or not shooting back when our marines are in danger, we are in continuous diplomatic negotiations by way of our Ambassador there and by the two Ambassadors that we sent, Fairbanks and McFarlane. They're back and forth between Damascus and Beirut constantly to help bring this about.

The mission that the multinational force was created for has not changed. At the time the first request came in, you'll remember that the Israelis were in, the Syrians were in, the PLO was in, and the fighting was going on, and hundreds and hundreds of innocent people were being killed in the shelling and bombing that was taking place.

Lebanon in which each one had its own militia. And the request came, and the multinational force went in with the idea of helping provide stability as the foreign forces withdrew and left Lebanon, then, to establish its government and establish its supremacy or sovereignty over its own territory.

Everything was proceeding on schedule, our negotiations in which we helped Lebanon and Israel to come to an agreement. You will remember at the time Syria had promised that when everyone else got out, they, too, would get out. Then they changed their minds. Whatever reason, well, we can take our own guess at that. They've made it pretty apparent that they feel that they have a proprietorship over much of Lebanon. They -- and I think under the influence of the Soviet forces that are there in their own country -- are behind much of what is presently going on.

But the fact still remains, the multinational force is there to help in this achieving of stability and control by Lebanon, and I think the mission still goes on. But from the very first, I said we will never send our men any place where they will not be allowed to defend themselves if they come under attack, and that recently has happened, and they have been defending themselves.

But the efforts toward a cease-fire still go on. And the opposition to that is coming from Syrians and now from PLO who have reinfiltrated after they were once taken out of the country and have moved into the fighting. And if this fails, the peace plan for the whole Middle East that we had proposed and offered our help in bringing about, based on Camp David and the United Nations resolutions that they had passed, I think also goes. All of us must ask ourselves, if we're not aware, that the reason we were trying to promote a peace plan is that the Middle East is vital to the Western World, the United States, and to our allies.

The President. Well, we can't, obviously, can't guarantee victory. But such things as this recent shelling and the controversy about whether that was in defense of the marines was based on the commanders on the ground recognizing that if that particular vantage point in the hills was taken, it would make the position held by our marines untenable, because those who had been shooting at them will be looking right down their throats from those heights, very close.

And so we're convinced, and I hold, that this was part of them defending themselves. But we're continuing, as I say, with the negotiations. And I think there is -- well, we still have reason to believe that we can attain that cease-fire.

The President. Well, the idea was that the multinational force was there to try and preserve order while the army then proceeded to take over and take over from those militia factions in their own country. So I think that the mission that we're on is still operative.

The President. Well, the statement that I made was based -- that agreement is not, you know, in the form of some formal treaty or agreement. This was a series of letters exchanged between President Kennedy and the Castro regime.

We tried to establish communications with Mr. Castro quite some time ago when he had indicated that perhaps this should be done, and we got no place. And as far as we're concerned, we are going to continue there, and the Soviet efforts to establish another Cuba on our mainland in Central America, and we're going to do that as we have been doing it in Central America.

The President. Now, you've asked a question that I really shouldn't answer. I don't see the necessity for the United States going to war in any place where we are. But as I once said in a press conference here -- and some of the regular White House press corps tried to hang me out to dry on it -- there are some things about which a President should never say never, and I just think things of this kind.

But there is nothing in our plans that envisions a war for the United States. Our job is trying to prevent war wherever it may come in the world. And this is the reason for our military buildup, and it's the reason for our meeting in disarmament talks -- more than any other administration has ever had going at one time in our history.

So, I can just say that we're going to continue on this line, and that any time that Castro -- whose country is in dire straits, is an economic basket case -- any time that he wants to make the moves to return to the community of American nations here in the Western Hemisphere, we'd be happy to sit down with him and work that out. But it begins with him coming out from under the wing of the Soviet Union.

The President. So far, we see no indication of anything of the kind there. You can't rule anything out when you're dealing with some of the kind of people that we're having to deal with in that episode. But I would think that they would do thinking two or three times more before they would attempt anything of that kind.

The President. Well, I asked at my table here a while ago if anyone has ever heard a 16-inch gun go off. The New Jersey should be arriving very shortly. The same thing would apply to the fleet that applies to the marines: They will defend themselves if attacked.

The President. Well, we just thought that with all of the hotspots around the world and all, and the New Jersey is newly in service -- it's been down off the Central American coast, as you know, and we just thought that it ought to get a look at joining up with the Sixth Fleet for a while in the Mediterranean.

Q. Sir, could I just ask you one quick last one? [Inaudible] Concerning the length of the resolution, the congressional resolution, Senator Kennedy is calling that ``a blank check for far too long a period''. What do you think about the length of the resolution, and also that puts it past the election?

The President. I think that the agreement has worked out; both sides have some reservations. I'll be voicing mine, probably at the time of signing, if it passes. I think the Senator is absolutely wrong. And I think those people that have advocated such things as invoking the 60-day clause are very shortsighted, because if you did that, aren't you simply saying to the people who are causing the trouble now, step up the trouble for 60 days and your problems will be over, the multinational force will go home?

The President. Oh, I think he was thinking out also the same thing that I just mentioned -- that makes it a long enough time that that does not become a factor in the strategizing of the people who are causing the trouble.

Q. Can I just ask you one more question? Yesterday, the Philippine President, President Marcos, said that if you canceled your trip to the Philippines that would be a ``slap in the face'' to his country. And I was wondering if you made any decision yet as to whether you would be going or not and whether that might happen?

The President. Well, I can understand his saying that if we deliberately bypassed the Philippines at this point as part of the planned trip. There are no plans to change the trip as of now. The whole Southeast Asian trip is planned, and as far as we're concerned is going ahead on schedule.

The President. Well, I think that the gentleman who spoke for us the other day -- I'm three questions past that last question here. [Laughter] I think the gentleman who spoke the other day had the hearty approval of most people in America in his suggestion that we weren't asking anyone to leave, but if they chose to leave, goodby. Jeane Kirkpatrick has made an interesting suggestion, also, that should be thought about. But maybe all of those delegates should have 6 months in the United Nations meetings in Moscow and then 6 months in New York, and it would give them an opportunity to see two ways of life.

Prevention of waste and inefficiency in Federal programs is a top priority of this Administration at any time of year. It has a special priority now. The end of the fiscal year is approaching and the temptation is great to obligate funds simply so that they will not lapse and be unavailable for obligation after September 30.

In a memorandum dated June 21, 1983, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget provided guidance to you on ways to prevent wasteful year-end spending. I ask you now, in the remaining days of this fiscal year, to redouble your efforts to prevent this form of waste.

It is absolutely essential that we do everything in our power to restrain the growth of Federal spending. Avoiding wasteful year-end spending is an obvious way to help do that, one that the taxpayers have every right to expect of us.

Sickle-cell disease affects the health of some 50,000 to 60,000 Americans, most of whom are blacks. An additional two million blacks are carriers of the sickle-cell trait. Though the trait usually does not have clinical symptoms, it is very important in the genetic transmission of sickle-cell disease.

Diagnostic procedures have been greatly improved. Measures to ameliorate the excruciatingly painful sickle-cell crises have been introduced for those afflicted with the disease. Our ability to combat life-threatening complications also has improved. Although much has been accomplished through this comprehensive national effort, more remains to be done to conquer this serious health problem.

Permanent Council meeting yesterday. As the President has often said, there is far more that unites us in this hemisphere than could ever divide us, and the demonstration of this was never plainer than at yesterday's OAS Permanent Council meeting.

Representatives present at the meeting, reconfirms our belief that terror and indiscriminate use of force will not go unchallenged by the nations of the Western Hemisphere. This unanimous sign of compassion by the OAS members makes us confident that the world has learned a bitter lesson from this tragedy.

Well, good morning, and I'm delighted to welcome all of you, even though I'm a bit of a visitor here myself. Before I begin, let me thank Bill Simon and Bill Seidman [Chairman and vice chairman, respectively, of the White House Conference on Productivity] for their strong leadership in shepherding this idea forward. I know so many of you have given your time and talents during the preparations preceding this conference. We're impressed with the broad diversity of your group -- leaders from management, labor, academia, and government at all levels. Another important point that I think will help us down the road in body and spirit: Your group is bipartisan. We're pleased that the conference steering committee included both Senator Bill Roth and Congressman John LaFalce.

We come together today in shared appreciation of a basic truth: The challenge of greater productivity growth is of supreme importance to America's future. When we arrived in Washington almost 3 years ago, we faced a situation unprecedented in post-war history. From 1948 to 1968, productivity in the private economy had risen at an average rate of about 3 percent a year, providing the American people with one of the highest standards of living in the world.

We think of the American farmer who a century ago toiled all year to feed himself, his family, and a few others. Today a farmer feeds himself and 77 other people. Being the breadbasket for the world -- that's productivity. And we think of those first computers which could cost up to a million dollars and were so big they filled a room, a big room. Today a computer chip that performs the same functions can fit in the palm of your hand and costs under $10. That's productivity, too.

There's no denying that greater productivity growth is the cornerstone of price stability and sustained economic growth. It's vital to regaining our competitive position in world markets and creating job opportunities for an expanding American labor force.

If we can agree on what productivity is and why it's so important, we can also identify certain principles that are present in productive societies. For example, productive societies reward saving, investing, building, and creating, rather than consuming. Productive societies do not selfishly tax and spend the product of today's labor without a thought toward tomorrow's needs.

Samuel Gompers, founder of the American Federation of Labor, spoke often for a partnership between labor and management, viewing them as trustees for the preservation of the American free enterprise system.

From this, we should agree that there is no single, all-encompassing solution for increased productivity. I realize that among some a perception exists that we need only to work harder and the problem will disappear. And I don't deny there are some sluffers out there. You remember that comment that Pope John allegedly made when he was asked how many people work in the Vatican? And his answer was, ``About half.'' [Laughter] Well, there's nothing wrong with admonishing people to have a positive and dedicated attitude toward their jobs. But it's just as important to give them the tools, the training, and the proper economic environment to work better and more productively.

We need to move on many fronts. We must spur capital formation by encouraging savings, investment, and modernization. We must stimulate adequate research, development, and technological innovation by appropriate incentives. We must improve our work force by providing training for solid jobs and encouraging greater cooperation between labor and management. We must sharpen the skills of tomorrow's leaders by improving America's educational system. And, yes, we must prevent government from suffocating initiative, innovation, and risk-taking through overregulation.

In sum, we must free enterprise. And make no mistake, I believe we can. America is no second-best nation. Our people come from sturdy stock. Their energies have always carried them past their highest dreams. And that's why immediately upon arriving in Washington, we moved to unlock the power and drive of our people. We identified four areas where broad-based reforms were necessary.

Second, we passed sweeping incentives for individuals and businesses by cutting personal tax rates 25 percent across the board, by providing new incentives for IRA and Keogh plans, and by accelerating depreciation schedules for businesses, large and small.

Third, under the able leadership of Vice President Bush, we curbed the growth of Federal regulations and redtape. The number of proposed new regulations has been reduced by one-third in the past 2 years. By the end of 1983, the time our citizens spend filling out Federal forms and reports will have been cut by over 300 million man-hours annually.

How are we doing? Well, the one statistic that interests us most -- productivity -- is headed in the right direction again. Productivity has gone up the last four consecutive quarters. This week has been a messenger for very good economic news. The recovery is strong, broad-based, and maintaining its momentum without unleashing a deadly new wave of record inflation and interest rates. Housing starts in August were at their highest level since December of 1978. The demand for automobiles is outstripping supply. The stock market has set a new closing high.

I'll be the first to say we have a long way to go. We face unacceptably large deficits. But let's make one thing very plain: We didn't get those deficits because Americans are undertaxed; we got those deficits because government has overspent. Rather than moan and weep about my stubborn refusal to raise taxes, I urge all those of good will to work with me. Together, let us summon the courage to roll up our sleeves and do the right and proper thing for our country by getting control of Federal spending once and for all. This would free more resources for the private sector to invest in productive capital projects.

America is moving forward. And we're supplementing our general recovery program with legislation to meet the needs of a more productive society. America needs her best minds to create new miracles of high technology, miracles both for innovation and for modernization of the major areas of our economy -- in manufacturing, agriculture, and services.

We have enacted the first tax incentive program for research and development. We seek to improve the instruction of science and math in secondary schools. We want to encourage greater and more creative cooperation between university and industry scientists and engineers. And we're attempting to remove legal impediments that prevent inventors from reaping the rewards of their discoveries.

Partnership, training, incentives, responsibility -- these are the building blocks for a stronger economy, renewed world leadership, and a better life for all Americans. Two landmark programs will help lead us there.

Americans a year for productive, self-sustaining jobs in the private sector. Unlike the old CETA program which was run primarily by government officials and which often provided little training or trained people for a job that didn't exist, this program will be run primarily by business and labor people at the grassroots -- those who know best what training is needed for existing jobs.

Another positive program that we've introduced is the National Innovation and Productivity Act of 1983. This bill would encourage companies to work together on complex and expensive research and development, stimulating new technologies, new products, more exports, and higher employment. Current antitrust laws often discourage joint research and development efforts. Well, we can't afford to sleepwalk into the 21st century, permitting our competitors to seize the advantage and overtake us. I am confident the Congress will work with us to pass this legislation.

We've also proposed to consolidate all U.S. trade functions in one department so we can help them sell their products abroad. Large projected trade deficits underscore the importance of enhancing our producers' ability to compete. American business, labor, and farmers deserve the strongest possible Federal representation on trade.

I appointed the National Productivity Advisory Committee in 1981, assembling a cross section of distinguished American leaders. Of that committee's 46 recommendations, we have already adopted a significant number. This White House Conference on Productivity provides a window of opportunity to build on that first committee's work.

Many of you attended important preparatory conferences this summer, and we followed them with interest. You discussed how capital, human resources, government, and private sector initiatives all contribute to productivity. Well, we look to you now for new guidance.

I have every confidence that this great nation, built by pioneers with courage and vision to persevere in the face of great adversity, is ready to charge forward again. As one of your fellow citizens, Bill Mellberg, recently wrote, ``Opportunities do exist for those who dream, who believe, who work hard, and who willingly take risks. The Constitution does not guarantee success. It guarantees the opportunity to succeed. As Will Rogers put it, `America is a great country but you can't live in it for nothing.' Today's generation must remember that success demands commitment.

In recent decades more and more American women have entered the work force until today, more than half of all women over 16 work outside the home. Workmen work in all sectors of the economy, at all kinds of jobs. And I would like to have you listen, for example, to the names of just a few of the organizations that were invited to send representatives here today: the American Council of Railroad Women, the Association of Women in Architecture, the Association for Women Veterinarians, the Society of Women Engineers, the International Association of Women Police, the National Association of Women in Construction, and American Women in Radio and TV.

They own 22 percent of all sole proprietorships and take in gross receipts of over $40 billion a year. They own businesses from construction companies to clothing stores to coal mines. And today our nation honors you, American businesswomen, for your achievements in business, for your contributions to our nation's economic vitality, and for paving the way for future generations.

The economy was pretty sick when we came into office, and as the doctor on the case I'm pleased to report that the patient is not only out of bed but back on the job. [Laughter] And we couldn't do it just by saying take two aspirins and get a good night's sleep.

Inflation, which was running in double digits when George Bush and I were inaugurated, has dropped to 2.4 percent for the last 12 months, and that's the lowest annual 12-month rate in more than a decade and a half. And that translates into renewed consumer confidence and strong demand for your products and services. The prime interest rate is about half what it was.

Businesses have easier access to funds for new investments, leading economic indicators have been on the rise for the past 11 months, and our gross national product is growing faster than most economists expected -- by a whopping 9.7 percent last quarter and at an estimated 7-percent rate this quarter.

Well, these days people are having a lot less trouble with stocks that don't go up. Unemployment is still too high, but it's begun to drop and, as business continues to expand, it'll drop still further.

And many of those self-employed women have started small entrepreneurial businesses -- the kind that create the most new jobs. You know, if America already had the national industrial policy planned and supervised by the Federal Government, which some of our critics want, I have to wonder. Would the plan have allowed businesses owned by women to grow five times faster than businesses owned by men? It would probably have underestimated your potential. Women are doing far better in the marketplace than all the so-called experts could have predicted. I just have to believe that government intervention would never offer the same opportunity as economic freedom.

Now, many Americans still face discrimination, and I want you to know that our administration is committed to making sure that all Americans, women and men, have opportunities to live their lives as they want. We're determined to rid our country of unjust discriminatory laws and to guarantee vigorous enforcement of codes that are now on the books.

Some of the contributions that I'm proudest of in this administration have been aimed at removing barriers to economic freedom. We've increased, almost doubled, the maximum child care credit for working parents. We've authorized larger IRA contributions for working women, and we're working to remedy discrimination in pension programs. We've also virtually eliminated estate taxes levied on surviving spouses, a tax that because of the longer life expectancy of women used to strike widows especially hard.

Business Administration has created a national initiatives program to conduct conferences across the country to advise and encourage women in business. In addition, we recently announced the formation of the first-ever President's Advisory Committee on Women's Business Ownership and of the Interagency Committee on Women's Business Enterprise.

The Advisory Committee will be made up of 15 outstanding business leaders, chaired by the former Treasurer of the United States, Angela Buchanan. It'll advise me and the Small Business Administration on the needs of women entrepreneurs. The Interagency Committee, chaired by Becky Norton Dunlop, will spur and coordinate Federal efforts to assist women business owners.

Today our nation faces a great transition, a time when new technology is working a dazzling revolution, a time when we can strengthen our economy and set for the world an economy of what free people are -- or an example, I should say, of what free people can do. Yet we can only find the strength we need by drawing on the energies and talents of all our people -- young and old, women and men. And I'm proud that today our nation is honoring the role of American businesswomen, women like you who are working to make American dreams come true.

I think, now, that two of us in here are supposed to get ahead of all of you and get in the next room. And then we're going to have a chance to meet each one of you individually, and we'll have our pictures taken.

The activities of American businesswomen have experienced a dramatic transition and expansion in recent years. More and more women are participating in every aspect of business -- as owners, executives, professionals, support staff and production workers.

Women play an increasingly important role in the Nation's economy and in determining and implementing the direction of both the private and public sectors of our Nation. Women entrepreneurs currently are the fastest growing segment of the small business community, owning twenty-two percent of all sole proprietorships and realizing gross receipts of over $40 billion.

The United States supports ASEAN's [Association for Southeast Asian Nations] efforts to achieve a comprehensive political settlement of the problem in Kampuchea based on the complete withdrawal of Vietnamese forces and internationally supervised elections. These principles have been adopted by the great majority of the world's nations in the declaration of the U.N.-sponsored International Conference on Kampuchea (ICK) and successive resolutions of the U.N. General Assembly.

The Khmer resistance coalition is an important element of ASEAN's strategy. The U.S. was not directly involved in the coalition's formation, but we have welcomed it as a vehicle formed to achieve a political settlement in Kampuchea. We give moral, diplomatic, and political support to the coalition's non-Communist elements, led by Prince Sihanouk and former Prime Minister Son Sann. We provide no assistance to and have no contact with the Khmer Rouge.

The President will reaffirm our opposition to the Vietnamese occupation of Kampuchea and our support for ASEAN's efforts to achieve a settlement which will restore Kampuchea's independence. He will also seek their views on the present situation in Kampuchea and prospects for the current U.N. General Assembly. We have no plans to provide military assistance to the coalition or any of its members.

The President. Well, good morning, and my greetings to you all. I'm delighted to speak with you about our challenge for '84 and how I know we can and will work together for victory. I wish I could see your faces beyond this little red light, because maybe you've gotten the same feeling I have from around the country. I believe things are looking up for our economy, for our Grand Old Party, and for America.

Hope. Hope is being reborn in America. We've been through some mighty rough waters during these first 2\1/2\ years, no doubt about that. But confidence is making a comeback. America is getting stronger. We're on a new road, a far better road, and we're not going back to the mess from before. And let's make sure that people remember that.

You know, I asked two questions during the last campaign, and you'll probably be hearing them thrown back at you in the months ahead. Are you better off today than you were before? Do you feel America is more secure today than it was? Well, I welcome those questions, and I hope you do too, because as I said this week in South Carolina, I think it's now time we held our heads high and made our case to the people. Yes, we're better off than before and, yes, America is more secure today than in 1980.

We've got a recovery train going, and rather than whine and complain, our critics should get on board and help us keep America moving forward. Why are we better off? Because 2.6-percent inflation over the last 12 months is one heck of a lot better than the 12.4 percent that we inherited; because an 11-percent prime interest rate is a big improvement over a 21\1/2\-percent prime rate; and because permitting the middle-income family to keep $700 more of the money it earns is better than the big, built-in tax increases condoned by the last administration.

Do you remember what the experts warned? They warned that if our plan passed, double-digit inflation was here to stay for the rest of the decade. They told us interest rates were sure to rise to 25 or 30 percent, and they said by decontrolling oil we would send the price of gas at the pump soaring. Well, they were dead wrong. Just as they have been so often in the past.

Let's tell the truth about our critics. They sob enough about deficits to fill an ocean. But it's an ocean of crocodile tears. What they're after is a blank check for higher taxes, more spending, and greater control over the people's lives. They say they plan to talk about fairness. Well, fine, let them. Because those who gave America runaway spending, double-digit inflation, record interest rates, huge tax increases, too much regulation, credit controls, no growth, and excuses about malaise, are the last people who should be giving sermonettes about fairness and compassion.

Thanks to the progress of our economic recovery program, real wages for the American worker have increased for the first time in 3 years. But you know, there's an easier way you can tell our critics are wrong and that our plan is working: They don't call it Reaganomics anymore.

That brings me to another point. We're making America safer for your families by rebuilding a military force that will bring peace through strength. Here, too, we have something important to remind the people. Our military forces had been dangerously neglected before we came in. In 1980 we had planes that couldn't fly, ships that couldn't sail, and troops that couldn't wait to get into civilian clothes. Our major weapons programs were being eliminated or delayed, and America was falling behind. But in Washington, the leadership lectured us on our inordinate fear of communism. Well, the savage Soviet attack against the unarmed Korean airliner is a reminder. We live in a dangerous world with cruel people who reject our ideals and who disregard individual rights and the value of human life. It is my duty as President, and all of our duties as citizens, to keep this nation's defenses second to none so America can remain strong, free, and at peace.

We are also pursuing arms control, and for the first time in history the Soviets are negotiating reductions of nuclear weapons, not just limits on their growth. We've undertaken the most sweeping proposals for mutual and verifiable arms reductions since nuclear weapons became a threat. In our search for peace, we have more major negotiations underway with the Soviets than any administration in history. In strategic nuclear forces and in measures to build confidence and trust, in intermediate-range nuclear forces and in conventional forces, we want to lessen the danger to ourselves and our children. We remain flexible in our bargaining. But as Commander in Chief, I have an obligation to protect this country, and I will not let political expediency influence these crucial negotiations.

I'll be the first to acknowledge that we still have a long way to go. Unemployment is still much too high, but that, too, is headed in the right direction. Two million jobs have been created since last December, and all indications point to more strength developing in the job market. In the meantime, we're doing everything we can to stimulate jobs.

So, as I said, I think we can hold our heads high. You're the people who can spread that message, because no one has worked harder and given more from the heart for the cause that unites us than you. Our greatest challenges are to maintain control of the Senate and increase our numbers in the House. If we can do that, we can check the big spenders, keep America strong, and keep her moving forward on a road that's bold and filled with opportunity.

Let us remain united and true to the Republican vision of progress, a vision that begins with the people and their families, churches, synagogues, schools, and neighborhoods. We don't ask them to trust us. We say trust yourselves, trust the values that made us a good and loving people.

You are the key. So, I just want to thank you with all my heart for all your support. And I urge you as strongly as I can, keep doing what you do best so we can preserve freedom, prosperity, and hope in America.

Our role is what it was when we first sent them in as a part of the multinational force. As you recall, Lebanon, beginning back several years ago, had kind of come apart. The Syrians had moved in on one side. And then with the northern border of Israel violated by PLO attacks that were shelling and sending rockets across the border and killing innocent civilians, they had moved into Lebanon.

We, as you know, a year ago submitted a plan for peace in all of the Middle East and we set out with an effort to persuade the more moderate Arab States to recognize Israel's right to exist and then to come together and, in effect, create more Egypts, more nations that would sign peace treaties with Israel.

But first we had to restore the order in Lebanon or see it restored. You will recall that Israel, in its own defense, had moved all the way up to Beirut; the shelling was going on; Syrians were coming in from the other side; and there were several factions that over these several years in Lebanon had created militias, armies of their own, and were fighting each other. Well, the idea was that the multinational force would move in to be a stabilizing force as we persuaded the other nations to get out -- the PLO, the Syrians, the Israelis to get out of Lebanon. And then as a new government of Lebanon would attempt to regain control over its own borders and its own land, the multinational force would be there, as I say, as a kind of stabilizing force to help maintain order.

The PLO, as you know, was ushered out of Lebanon. Then the Syrians -- who had said that when everyone would withdraw, they'd be a part of it, they would withdraw -- they reneged. And the Syrians stayed in. And there's no question but that they're influenced by the Soviet Union, which has put people in there, and weapons systems, and is urging them to support, and they are supporting, some of those internal Lebanese factions.

But we're there with the idea of maintaining order while the Lebanese Army -- which we in this same interim period have helped train, and it is an excellent force -- tries to restore the order, the internal order. Now they've been reinfiltrated by PLO that have come back in. The Syrians, as I say, are encouraging these groups and even supporting them with supplies and, we believe, sometimes manpower.

The one thing that has changed is the violence has struck at all of the multinational force. There have been casualties among all the nations that are involved there, including four marines killed and a number wounded. And we've given orders, and our allies in that force have given orders to their people, to defend themselves. And so we've been doing that. Now, as to a time certain for getting out, I don't know that anyone knows that. But at the same time, we do have very heavy diplomatic efforts going forward, with our representatives there trying to bring about a cease-fire in the internal conflict and then turn our attention to the Syrians and the others getting out of Lebanon.

There is some reason -- we have seemed several times to be on the verge of a ceasefire which would be the beginning of success in those diplomatic efforts. And I believe it is essential for the entire Middle East situation that we continue there. We've asked the Congress, or negotiated with the Congress for, I think, we have a bipartisan agreement on a longer period of time that is guaranteed if needed that they will be there, but they will be taken out the first minute that there is no longer a need for them to be there.

Q. Good afternoon. How do you do, Mr. President? We want to know how you feel about the frustration or the lack of willingness on the part of some of the member nations of the Atlantic alliance to support strong sanctions against the Soviets as a result of the tragic downing of the Korean airliner and, further, if there is further action planned by our government?

The President. Well, Elsie, I have to answer the first part of that question with mixed emotions, because never have the bulk of our allies in NATO been more united than they are today. And they have been in full support. Some of the things that people have suggested we should be doing about the Soviet Union are already agreed upon and have been done long before this tragic shootdown of all those innocent people; that is, with regard to high technology, we obtained last July agreement with our allies that we are all united in not delivering any high technology to the Soviet Union.

Last spring, we reached agreement with them on ending any more favored treatment with regard to interest rates in their trade with the Western World. So those things that some people are talking about today have already been done.

We are going to watch for, and continue in every effort that we can think of that might be effective in bringing them to the realization that this must never happen again, and bringing them to the admission of the wrong they've done and that compensation should be provided for the families of those who were victims.

So, we are in a measured way looking for every opportunity to do things. The mixed emotions come about because a few of our allies did not go along with us on some of the things that we're doing, particularly right now with regard to cutting off air traffic to the Soviet Union.

I think that whole talk about fairness with regard to our administration was begun and founded in or based in political demagoguery. Certainly, there are no facts to substantiate it. What could be worse for the people of lower income, what could be worse, as I pointed out in my remarks, that, say, someone who had $5,000 fixed income in 1979, at the beginning of the year of '79, and by the end of the year 1980, in just 2 years, that was only worth $4,000 in purchasing power? That's a pretty big blow.

We have set out and, as I have pointed out in my remarks, been pretty successful in reducing that double-digit inflation and bringing it down to where it is. For the first time, people's real income is actually increasing. Now, this has to benefit the people at the lower income level more than anyone else, because they were the ones that were suffering the most from this continued depreciation of the dollars that they had. And we're going to continue with that kind of a recovery.

Our tax program, they've said, ``Oh, this benefited the rich.'' They can't substantiate that. It was across the board, the same percentage cut. Had it not been across the board and the same percentage cut, then that tax cut would have further increased the progressivity of the tax structure. My belief is that those on the other side of the aisle who want to increase progressivity of, say, the income tax, should have the courage to stand up and propose that. They shouldn't try to sneak it in by an unbalanced reduction. We wanted it to be fair, across the board.

But many other things have been done. I know that some of this is based on our budget cuts, and we've never gotten all that we asked in that regard, and we're still going to try for more. They're necessary if we are to reduce the deficits that are looming on the horizon. But what they fail to mention is that we are feeding more people who need help in nutrition than ever before in history.

What they are distorting is the fact that in all of these areas of help, we discovered that the way the programs were being administered, there were many people who were receiving help from their fellow citizens who didn't deserve it because their incomes were as high, and in some instances higher, than many of their fellow citizens who were supporting them through their tax dollars.

So, we redirected the effort toward the truly needy. This was even true in our education programs, in providing grants and loans for students to get college educations. We found there were people getting those loans who could well afford to send their sons and daughters to college and who were reinvesting that loan at a low interest rate in government paper paying a higher interest rate and making a profit on the whole deal.

We changed that. And as I say, we redirected all of this aid, including food stamps. We found more than 800,000 people getting food stamps who had no legitimate or moral reason to be getting them. But we have increased the total number of people that are getting food stamps and the total number of dollars that we're spending on those food stamps -- all redirected to people at the lower earning level.

So, they don't have a leg to stand on on any charge of fairness. What they should be defending is, how could they call it fair to have gone along with their deliberate, planned inflation and their deficit spending? You know, with their sobbing about the prospective deficits now, are we to forget how they used to tell us that the national debt didn't matter because we owed it to ourselves and that deficit spending was necessary to maintain prosperity? Well, by the time we got here there wasn't much prosperity. Now I campaigned in cities in this country where the unemployment rate then was 20 percent, and the present recession was just a worsening of the recession that was already underway. And that was hurting people unfairly.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

And the whole administration is touched. Tomorrow we'll have a Cabinet Secretary out riding in the rodeo. And when I called him to ask Mac Baldrige to be Secretary of Commerce, I got his wife instead. And she said he couldn't come to the phone; he was in a calf roping contest.

Well, I'd say welcome to the team, but as Dan has indicated, Barbara, you're already a member of the team. As Dan's executive assistant, as he told you, she's been immersed in the work of the Civil Aeronautics Board for over a year.

Barbara's appointment brings this CAB back to strength, but it also brings the Board back up to a three-member majority of women. Earlier this week I met with the Executive Women in Government and mentioned that the many talented women in this administration are not getting the public attention they deserve. Some women's groups simply ignore those individuals who are playing important roles throughout the administration. Barbara, as one would expect of an appointment at this level, brings to her job impressive expertise and credentials. And she reflects the large number of women in this administration who are in positions of responsibility because they're highly qualified individuals, not because of some quota system. Much of the negativity we face has less to do with the number of women appointees than it does with the fact that we have a different political philosophy than those who are doing the complaining.

Well, in addition to being professionally qualified, Barbara has been an active Republican for many years and amply reflects the ideals and philosophy of our team. I understand she's been working precincts since she could walk. The outcome of the 1980 election was determined by a basic agreement of the people with the goals that we expressed. And it's important that those filling executive level posts in the departments and agencies agree with why the people sent us here. I know I can count on Barbara to represent us well in the Civil Aeronautics Board and ensure the airline deregulation process is completed and the CAB sunsetted by at least January 1, 1985.

In 2 days I will be going to the United Nations General Assembly to speak for a cause that people everywhere carry close to their hearts -- the cause of peace. This subject is so important I wanted to share our message with a larger audience than I usually address each Saturday afternoon in the United States. So today I'm speaking directly to people everywhere, from Los Angeles to New Delhi, Cairo, Bangkok, and I'm attempting to speak directly to the people of the Soviet Union. I'd like to talk about ideas and feelings all of us share which I intend to communicate to the United Nations on Monday.

Let me begin by bringing you greetings from the American people and our heartfelt wishes for peace. In these times of stress, I believe that the people of the world must know and understand how each other feel, their fears as well as their dreams. We Americans are a peace-loving people.

We seek friendship not only with our traditional allies but with our adversaries, too. We've had serious differences with the Soviet Government, but we should remember that our sons and daughters have never fought each other in war and, if we Americans have our way, we never will.

People don't make wars; governments do. And too many Soviet and American citizens have already shed too much blood because of violence by governments. The American people want less confrontation and more communication and cooperation, more opportunity to correspond, to speak freely with all people over our respective radio and television programs and, most important, to visit each other in our homes so we could better understand your countries and you could know the truth about America.

The treasure we Americans cherish most is our freedom -- freedom to lead our lives the way we choose, freedon to worship God, to think for ourselves, and freedom to speak our minds even to the point of criticizing our own government. We do not believe in censorship. When another government criticizes us, we know about it. And if they ever say something good, you can bet we'll know that, too. The trouble is, we don't always have that same freedom to speak to others, especially those who live in the Soviet Union. And one-way communication prevents us from better understanding each other.

For example, the Soviet Government has taken extraordinary steps to justify its firing on a Korean civilian airliner, killing 269 helpless people from 14 countries. But I ask those who have been told the United States is responsible: If you're hearing the truth, why has the outcry been so intense from members of the United Nations, the International Civil Aviation Organization, and why are pilots all over the world boycotting flights to Moscow? We have no quarrel with you, the Soviet people. But please understand, the world believes no government has a right to shoot civilian airliners out of the sky. Your airline, Aeroflot, has violated sensitive U.S. airspace scores of times, yet we would never fire on your planes and risk killing one of your friends or your loved ones.

Now, I guess the picture painted of me by the officials in some countries is pretty grim. May I just say -- and I speak not only as the President of the United States but also as a husband, a father, a grandfather, and as a person who loves God and whose heart yearns deeply for a better future -- my dream is for our peoples to come together in a spirit of faith and friendship, to help build and leave behind a far safer world. But dreams for the future cannot be realized by words alone.

Words must be matched by deeds, by an honest, tireless effort to reduce the risks of war and the loss of life. In this era of nuclear weapons, no achievement could be more meaningful than a verifiable agreement that would dramatically reduce the level of nuclear armaments.

American negotiators in Geneva are offering fairminded, equitable proposals in the interests of both our countries. In the strategic arms reduction talks, we propose deep cuts in both the number of warheads carried by intercontinental ballistic missiles and in the number of missiles themselves.

Also, from the outset of the intermediate-range nuclear force talks 2 years ago, I made clear that the United States was ready to join with the Soviet Union in the total elimination of an entire class of intermediate-range, land-based nuclear missiles. That offer still stands. I regret that the Soviet Government continues to reject this proposal. What could possibly be better than to rid the world of an entire class of nuclear weapons?

But in the effort to move the negotiations forward, we proposed an interim solution -- some number on both sides below current levels. Again, the Soviet Government refused. I'm deeply aware of people's feelings and frustrations. I share them. And I intend to keep trying. On Monday, I will go to the United Nations to propose another package of steps designed to advance the negotiations. All we seek are agreements to reduce substantially the number and destructive power of nuclear forces.

Yes, we insist on balanced agreements that protect our security, that provide greater stability, and that are truly verifiable, but these requirements are the essence of fairness. They would provide greater security for all nations.

We, the American people, deeply yearn for peace. If our dreams and hopes are to mean anything, we must sit down together and in good faith let honest negotiations bring us a safer world. But I must speak plainly. Just as government censorship is a barrier to understanding, the inflexibility of the Soviet Government on arms control is holding back successful negotiations.

I have said to my own people, you have the right to expect a better world and to demand that your government work for it. This Monday I will have the honor to carry that message to the 38th General Session of the United Nations. It will be a commitment from the heart and one that I know all people share. For the sake of our children and our children's children, I pray that the Soviet Government will not censor my words, but will let their people listen to them and then negotiate with us in good faith.

The address was rebroadcast to Europe 1 hour later when VOA's English service to Europe began its regular broadcast cycle. VOA's 34 other language services broadcast the address as they began their programs throughout the remainder of the day.

I think I'd be speaking for all of you if I said a heartfelt thank you to all these people who have entertained us so royally here today. There aren't too many activities in this land of ours, with all the many things we do, that are as purely American as what we have seen here. We're very proud of all of you and grateful to you.

You know, a rodeo here on the east coast, I think, establishes the fact that rodeos are now a national sport, not just a kind of a Western pastime. Madison Avenue, the advertising business -- they found that out a long time ago. They found out Americans still love cowboys and cowgirls.

Don't let these few pieces of paper scare you. I once had a lesson in the importance of brevity in a speech. I had made a speech, and in the audience was the late Bill Alexander, a preacher from Oklahoma. And he took it upon himself to tell me the story of his first sermon. And I thought there was a connection.

When I was about the age of some of you, I joined the horse cavalry. In those days, they still had horses in the Army, and I've enjoyed them ever since. It was heartwarming today to see the children out there from the Therapeutic Riding Association. I think we can all be happy that the National Therapeutic Riding Center provides these very special kids this kind of experience. And I know the results have proven that something I learned back in the cavalry is true, and that is, that there's nothing so good for the inside of a person as the outside of a horse.

The American cowboy remains a figure that is dear to the hearts of American people. The men and women of the Old West may not have been as slick as they were sometimes portrayed by Hollywood, but there was a certain integrity of character that shines through as we look back at them from the vantage place of history.

Mrs. Reagan hosted a barbecue for members of the association. The association's rodeo was held earlier in the day at the Capital Centre in Landover, Md. At the barbecue, the President assisted in the presentation of awards to six rodeo winners, along with Ken Stemler, president of the association.

The President. Well, I was just waiting till everyone got in place to tell you that Secretary-General de Cuellar and myself, we have just called President Gemayel to congratulate him on what has taken place. It is a first step, and you see my fingers crossed. It is the beginning, of course. And the cease-fire will be announced, or has been announced, and now they can get down to the real business of settling the issues and, we hope, bringing about peace and the solution to the Lebanese problems.

We all are very happy for this first step that has come about, and I'm not going to make any projections or predictions. There is still a long road to go in settling many of the issues there. But as President Gemayel himself said, now with this first step they can have the beginning of that process.

The President. Well, we commended President Gemayel for what he has done, but also we have to say the Syrians are evidently cooperating in this, and the Saudi Arabians. We must recognize that Saudi Arabia had a very definite hand in bringing about this first step, this cease-fire.

Thank you for coming this evening. And on behalf of all my fellow citizens, let me welcome you to the United States as we gather for the 38th Session of the U.N. General Assembly. The United States is proud to be the home of this organization whose purpose is to bring peace to all the people of the planet, and your presence honors our nation.

I've come to speak before the General Assembly because, like so many others, I'm disturbed by the drift of world events in recent weeks. I still believe the United Nations is an effective forum for not only discussing our problems but doing something about them.

As much as the Korean airline tragedy has been on my mind over the past few weeks, tonight I want to say just a few words about another tragedy that has been troubling me greatly -- the one that is occurring in Lebanon, that beautiful, prosperous land which was once a model of coexistence among peoples and faiths. It has been shattered by violence for reasons which are especially complex.

Our goal, as well as the United Nations, is the territorial integrity, the sovereignty, and the political independence of Lebanon within its internationally recognized boundaries. It's long been clear that we can best fulfill this role by working to strengthen the legitimate Government of Lebanon, by negotiating the withdrawal of all external forces, and by promoting a cease-fire and national reconciliation among Lebanese communities.

At the request of the Lebanese Government, my nation, as you know, joined with France, Italy, and the United Kingdom in sending peacekeeping troops to give Lebanon a chance to pull itself together while our diplomats continue to search for internal agreement and an end to external intervention.

Well, just a short while ago, today, welcome news flashed across the Middle East that a cease-fire has officially been declared. Within a few hours, it is hoped that guns will finally be stilled. No one can underestimate the challenges that still lie ahead. Lebanon has been racked by so many conflicting forces for so long that the building of peace and national reconciliation will be very formidable tasks. But this is the critical first step. We hope it marks a new beginning in Lebanon, a period of calm when Lebanon can begin to reclaim its nationhood free of outside forces and the threat of new bloodshed.

The Secretary-General and I spoke with him by telephone earlier today to congratulate him on this cease-fire and to wish him well. The assistance of Saudi Arabia, the cooperation of Syria have also been indispensable during this process.

Finally, if I may, can I congratulate those who have served in the peacekeeping forces in Lebanon as well as two of our own United States diplomats, Robert McFarlane and Richard Fairbanks. All of them have played an enormously constructive role and they, too, must share in our happiness this evening.

We must all remember that what is at stake in Lebanon is a vital principle of international law and international morality, a principle at the heart of the U.N. Charter. A country's right to decide for itself how best to achieve its sovereign objectives, free of occupation, threat, and blackmail -- that is what the goal must be. The people of the United States have no driving desire to become involved in the internal affairs of other nations. Contrary to what some have alleged, we have no objectives of our own in Lebanon beyond peace for its people and freedom from external intervention. We would prefer that everyone just mind their own business and live their lives peacefully, but we recognize that as a major power we have major responsibilities. In good conscience, we can't turn our back on those responsibilities.

The problems of Lebanon, important in their own right, are at the same time a part of the greater question of peace for all of the Middle East. We remain committed to the principles I outlined on September 1st, 1982, which were based on U.N. Security Council Resolution 242, 338, and the Camp David accords. The United States will not let up in its efforts to promote a just and lasting, comprehensive negotiated peace so that the nations and peoples of the Middle East can live together in peace.

United States of America will continue to work constructively in the United Nations and in every other forum to help resolve conflicts, to support the forces of peace and international civility, and to promote economic cooperation and prosperity. We believe arms reductions are of particular importance. The commitment of the United States to the goals of the U.N. Charter is unwavering.

Grand Marshal Zagurek, honored guests, ladies and gentlemen, I'm most pleased to have this opportunity to be with you, even though it's only for a few moments because I've got to move on to my duties with the United Nations.

Polish Americans have always been head and shoulders above the crowd when it comes to love of country and responsible citizenship. And it's a great pleasure for me to recognize and show appreciation for the great contributions of Polish Americans to this nation. And we begin by what you're doing, honoring General Casimir Pulaski, one of our nation's first Polish American heroes.

He gave his life for our country in the Battle of Savannah, Georgia, on October 11, 1779. By making this supreme sacrifice, General Pulaski showed the deep love of freedom that burns in the hearts of those who have come to these shores to start a new life.

The example set by such great men has been continued over the centuries. Polish Americans have shed much blood in the defense of our nation, and you know what sacrifices are sometimes called for to defend that cherished freedom. I know that this same love of freedom is in the hearts of your friends and relatives in Poland today. Tonight, in your presence, I would like to reaffirm my commitment to a free and democratic Poland.

In doing so, I would also like to thank you for your strong support of our policies. To all of us here in America, whether our heritages be Polish or Lithuanian or Chinese or Irish, the struggle of the Polish workers serves as a constant reminder of the power of ideas and the human dignity which comes from the willingness to sacrifice oneself for the freedom of our fellow man. Today, we must face challenges to our freedom with the courage and dedication of men like Pulaski. We can face the future with confidence.

Americans know all about the brutal nature of the regime that has controlled the Soviet Union since 1917. You know that downing a passenger airliner is totally consistent with a government that murdered 15,000 Polish officers in the Katyn forest. We cannot let the world forget that crime, and we will not.

And today, the world is grateful that Poland has given us a man whose courage and faith inspires us all and gives us hope when it would be so easy to despair. I say to your in all sincerity, thank God for Pope John Paul and all that he is doing. And may we all pray that his life be protected.

We Americans of all backgrounds have a tremendous responsibility. If freedom is to survive, it will depend on us. I know that together, we will see to it that America remains a mighty force for good in the world.

In addition to athletics in school, and when I was in school I started my career as a radio sports announcer, and thought that my life was going to go on connected with sports. Now here I am, and maybe I'm going to get back to it.

There was a time -- and it wasn't long ago -- that people thought that a woman's place in sports was in the grandstand. Old thought patterns are hard to break, and I'd like to congratulate all of you in the Women's Sports Foundation for what you're doing to expand opportunities for participation for half of America's population. Your efforts to open up sporting events and change attitudes toward female sports participation, competition, and fitness is doing a great service.

You should be especially proud of your work to encourage women and girls to get involved in physical fitness programs. You're having a great influence, and it was a result in health and happiness for people who otherwise might have lived less healthy lives.

We can all be grateful for the private sector support that you've been getting from corporations like Kimberly-Clark, Avon, and Milky Way, and I have a feeling that there are more of those present and helping than I was given names for. So, to all of them, you're reaching women and girls that are all over the country with a call for involvement, fitness, and health. This type of support from respected corporations is just the type of initiative that we're encouraging, and I applaud those companies for their good citizenship.

I'm pleased to learn that the United States Olympic Committee and Women's Sports Foundation have teamed up to ensure that there is a bright future for women in sports and fitness. I wish you success for your national conference in November, which will address the ways in which we can improve the status of girls' and women's sports in America. Sports and fitness opportunities are for everyone. And through activities like this one today, you can assure that every individual has an opportunity to participate, to compete, and to reach his or her potential.

So, good luck to you again and congratulations to your award recipients and thanks for letting me play a part in this effort. And let me just say, I can understand your suggestions to me, but I also know, and I just want to say to you in my own behalf, that there has been some misperception about what my attitude might be. And I want you to know that what it really is is probably one of the best kept secrets in Washington, and I've been doing my best to get the truth out.

Well, thank you for letting me spend a few minutes here. I've got to go back to the affairs of state now. But this has been a pleasure, and I assure you, you won't have anything to worry about from me.

Q. Well, Mr. President, first of all our genuine appreciation for sparing us the time. We know your schedule is very busy, and we know that time is limited. So, we'd like to get down to business right away.

Lebanon cease-fire. However, all Mideast cease-fires seem to be fragile at best, and we're wondering what are the contingency plans if the cease-fire breaks down. Secretary Shultz has said there is no timetable to pull out the marines, says that goes for the Navy as well.

The President. Yes. I think right now this is a first step. We know that it's a tenuous one and that it's a very complex problem that has to be worked out. But it is right in line with the mission that took the whole multinational force there to be in a position to help preserve stability as a government of Lebanon reinstitutes its sovereignty over its own territory and the foreign forces get out.

Q. Mr. President, you said yesterday that the Saudis played an important part in the helping to bring the cease-fire about. Did they put pressure on Syria by threatening to withhold their bankrolling?

The President. I don't know of any pressure of that kind. But I do know that just as we had two ambassadors there who were back and forth working virtually around the clock, trying to bring the various parties together, they were most helpful in doing the same thing and, I think, have to be recognized for that. So, I wouldn't know what persuasion was used or anything else, but finally we have the cease-fire.

The President. Oh. Well, no, let me just say I don't think this is a time when I can make an answer of any kind to that question. First of all, I believe that campaigns are too long anyway. But I've said there is no way that I'm going to make or announce a decision until the last possible moment that it could be done, because either way it's going to make things difficult. If you're not a candidate, you're a lameduck, and if you are a candidate, suddenly everything you try to accomplish is viewed as part of the political campaign.

The President. Well, I haven't set any specific date, and so I won't hazard one. But, as I say, I know that such a day is coming, that there is -- reality alone says that a decision must be announced.

The President. Very brave. And it was just amazing. He expressed his interest in so much that's going on in the world and some of the things that we're trying to do. And it was a moving experience. But also we were so grateful for the opportunity to see him and have this meeting with him. They had arranged a little prayer service in his chapel, but not with him present. But we then went to his room, and he concluded the service before our visit with the final prayer.

Interior. I think we have to point out with all of this that it was an unfortunate remark. It certainly was a mistake, and he has admitted that -- both those points. He has apologized not only to me, but he's apologized to the people on the Commission for that. But I think in all fairness we have to recognize that, yes, it was a very improper thing to say, but it certainly was not said in the sense of any bitterness or bigotry or prejudice. If I thought he was bigoted or prejudiced, he wouldn't be a part of our administration. It was an attempt at lightness that, as we all have to admit, fell very flat. And it was unfortunate.

Q. If we could turn to your speech at the United Nations today, which is very calm and very measured. Had you, while you were preparing the speech, had any indication or signal of any sort that your proposals might be agreeable to the Soviets?

The President. Well, you can always hope. What I said today I've thought for some time the things that needed saying, both with regard to the United Nations and to their approach to these matters. I just feel very deeply that if -- and when I remarked about governments starting wars, that if the representatives of the Soviet Union and ourselves sat down at those tables, those negotiating tables, with the conviction in our minds that there must not be a war, then there won't be a war, and there could almost instantly be a reduction in those terrible and dangerous arms, those weapons. I'm certain that the Russian people don't want a war, and I know our people don't.

The President. No, because I don't think it's come from the kind of people that normally would give the signals. But it is an indication there of, certainly, recognition on the part of some, as you say, that this was as terrible a deed as we have said it was. And I just think the world is owed an apology plus a statement to the effect that they're going to join the rest of us in cooperating to see that such a thing can never happen again. And that could be aided and abetted also if they would recognize some responsibility in compensation for the families of the victims.

Q. Mr. President, do you think there may be some sort of a high-level political dispute going on in the Kremlin, that the statements by these lower level officials, which were just referred to, may represent and in fact there isn't unanimity in there on what happened?

The President. I wouldn't hazard a guess on that. But I do say that there is evidence that is a little different than what we usually expect, because usually the official reply comes out with unanimous support over there, and that's it, and that's the story everyone tells. So, this has been a little different, that there have been voices that have begun now. They weren't heard for quite a while.

In fact, there was such a difference in the stories that it just further added to the evidence of how deliberate and despicable this act was. Most people are tending to forget that their first statement was that they just didn't know anything about it. It just disappeared from their radar. And then when the evidence was presented that it had been shot down and that they were responsible for that, suddenly they come up with a new story about spy plane and so forth. No one's mentioned this yet, but isn't that a pretty hard -- the idea of error -- a pretty hard thing to believe, when that plane is one on a regular schedule, that at least every week is flying that same route and at the same time of day?

The President. Well, the trip is still planned. If there would be any reason to change it, it would be domestic, because there is a probability -- we had planned that trip with the idea that Congress would not be in session, that it would have gone home. And that is questionable now as to whether they're going to go home. And now it makes you wonder, how can you be in two places at once? But don't take that as an indication. So far the trip is still on.

The President. Well, let me just say -- and I sympathize with her very deeply, but since a previous experience that we had -- I shouldn't use the expression ``she's a little gun shy.'' [Laughter] No, but she does feel a legitimate concern and in many places where I have to appear.

The President. Maybe that was a restatement of something that was always in our mind. The original concept of what was going in NATO in INF was going to be a mix of Pershings and cruise missiles. And at one time, there was a Russian voice raised that, well, they might listen to cruise missiles but not Pershings at all. Well, this in a way today was a restatement that, no, there will still be a mix, but we are willing that if they agree to reductions, that means that our original figure must be reduced. That reduction will be in both Pershings and cruise missiles.

But as I said in the remarks, I'd like to see it on the zero-zero basis. We know that can't be. Well, now we want -- any reduction that can be achieved is going to be better than what threatens us now and threatens our allies in Europe. And so, that's what we're going to continue to strive for, is to the lowest possible point that they will come, and we will meet them on an equal and a verifiable basis.

Q. Mr. President, you've been at the U.N. -- [inaudible] -- and there have been reports out of your administration that you and some of your senior aides feel that there is a double standard operating -- [inaudible] -- for example, being quick to condemn Israel for its invasion of Lebanon but not condemning the Soviet downing of the airliner or the Libyan invasion of Chad. Do you feel after being here that there is a double standard?

The President. Well, no, I've noticed that many times they on many votes have been able to marshal a majority of votes their way and not on ours. What I was trying to point out was again the -- something happens to the whole concept of the U.N. if we find the U.N., like the world, beginning to divide up into blocs. The ideal was supposed to be that every nation would be there as an individual and seeking the same thing, the things that are called for in the charter of the U.N.

I'll tell you, may I say something else about that, too? It's time that all of us recognize that maybe we're not as civilized as we were when I was a young man growing up. By that I mean that it was taken for granted for years and years, the days prior to World War II, that all the rules of warfare were aimed at limiting warfare to warriors and providing protection and neutrality for civilians.

And without quite realizing it's happened, we're in a world today where not only are the civilians fair game, but the most potent weapons systems, the nuclear weapons, are definitely aimed at the destruction of civilians. And wouldn't it be nice if in a forum of this kind we could get back to being as civilized as we once were?

Q. Since we're in New York, could we ask you a question about the Jewish vote? In 1980 you scored a very high proportion of the Jewish vote for a Republican, but since then, it has been suggested that support has dwindled. Do you think it would be possible to recapture that element in your 1984 strategy?

The President. Well, I never conceded that we lost them. I think we have more to offer them than the other side does. And, no, I haven't felt that at all. I know that sometimes in all of this debate with regard to the peace plan and all, there were times when the Israelis and ourselves found ourselves differing on various points. But that never in any way -- and they knew this as well; the Israelis knew this -- that never slackened in any way or weakened the resolve of this country, which has existed since 1948, of a moral obligation to see that the State of Israel continues to exist as a nation.

Q. Could I ask one last question? Mr. President, I wonder if I could ask you as an astute political observer, not as a President, who you think amongst the Democratic candidates for President might be the toughest candidate?

I know we both had a full day, and I'm happy we were able to arrange this gathering where we could meet in a more relaxed atmosphere. As you perhaps are aware, we've just returned from New York, where I addressed the United Nations.

It's clear that our country faces serious challenges in the years ahead, but there are numerous reasons for optimism. If the United States is to remain the leader of the free world, if our freedom and our prosperity to be maintained, we must make certain that every American has the opportunity to live up to his or her potential. Historically black colleges and universities have played and are playing a vital role. And I'm proud that in the last 2 years we've stood shoulder to shoulder with you.

I'd like to take this opportunity to offer a special thanks to a man with us today who has done so much over the years and continues to be an inspiration to us all. This distinguished gentleman, a former president of Tuskegee Institute, founded the United Negro College Fund in 1944. His hard work and leadership have meant that hundreds of thousands of our citizens are living richer and more meaningful lives. He's a man of deep conviction, yet he knows the value of businesslike approaches to achieving goals. He recognized long ago the significance of a strong endowment system to the viability of black colleges and universities. And I am, of course, referring to Dr.

Well, since we last met a year ago, much has been accomplished. We set a goal of identifying and eliminating unfair barriers to your participation in federally sponsored programs. We set out to encourage the private sector to get more involved. Well, we also identified the 27 Federal agencies which provide nearly all of the Federal funding for higher education and made sure that they were aware of and shared our commitment to strengthening historically black colleges and universities. And I'm happy to say that preliminary figures suggest that those 27 agencies will be providing 11\1/2\ percent more funds to your universities and colleges in '83 than they did in '82.

These grants offer colleges and universities a chance to develop new educational capabilities while providing a needed service. There's no reason for them to be concentrated only in the larger institutions that have developed the skill of granstmanship into an art form. I'm especially pleased that many of the projects stimulated by our initiative involve science, mathematics, and engineering.

But Federal research grants and other government subsidies are not an end in themselves. We must continue to work toward the goal of self-sufficiency. In that regard, our administration has strongly supported legislation which passed the Senate last week and the House today. This legislation, which I will sign this afternoon, will amend title III of the Higher Education Act to authorize matching endowment grants to colleges and universities.

These grants will promote independence and self-sufficiency by aiding and encouraging the development of substantial endowment funds and by providing incentives to promote fundraising activities. This program will help guarantee the continued viability of black colleges and universities, fulfilling a longstanding dream of Dr. Patterson.

Attracting better private sector support has also been one of our goals this year. Much has been accomplished in this area as well. Our project -- or one project underway provides a computer network in electrical engineering, connecting a number of black colleges and universities, and will improve the training of 1,500 electrical engineering students at these schools. Over $389,000 of private sector contributions are involved in this.

Alliance of Business to link specific black colleges and universities with local businesses and corporations. It's been 2 years since the signing of Executive Order 12320, and I think we can all agree that progress has been made.

And I can't help but tell a little story I heard the other day about faith. A fellow fell off a cliff, and as he was falling grabbed a limb sticking out the side of the cliff and looked down 300 feet to the canyon floor below and then looked up and said, ``Lord, if there's anyone up there, give me faith.

Well, working together, we can have faith that we will succeed and that our country will be a decent place and a land of opportunity for all that we want it to be. So, I thank you all for being here. God bless you.

Note: The President spoke at 4:49 p.m. at the reception for representatives of historically black colleges and universities in the East Room at the White House. Among those attending the reception were Secretary of Education Terrel H. Bell and the Vice President and Mrs. Bush.

And I am honored to have this opportunity to speak again to your distinguished members. I say honored because I believe that your institutions, the World Bank and affiliates and the International Monetary Fund, serve noble purposes. There can be no higher mission than to improve the human condition and to offer opportunities for fulfillment in our individual lives and the life of our national and our world communities.

You are the leaders of the world community in bringing a better life to the diverse and often tragically poor people of our planet. You have worked tirelessly to preserve the framework for international economic cooperation and to generate confidence and competition in the world economy.

The unending quest for economic, social, and human improvement is the basic drive that inspires and unites all of us. In 1945, when your great institutions were established, the civilized world had been brought to its knees by a wave of totalitarian violence that inflicted suffering, sacrifice, and the suppression of human rights on millions of innocent people.

In this civilization we've labored so faithfully to resurrect, preserve, and enhance, let us be ever mindful: It is not just development and prosperity, but ultimately our peace and our freedom that are always at stake. Too often the demands of prosperity and security are viewed as competitors when, in fact, they're complementary, natural, and necessary allies. We cannot prosper unless we're secure, and we cannot be secure unless we're free.

The goals of the great international political and economic institutions -- the United Nations where I spoke yesterday, and the World Bank, its affiliates, and the IMF you represent here today -- were to be reached by trusting in a shared and enduring truth: The keys to personal fulfillment, national development, human progress, and world peace are freedom and responsibility for individuals and cooperation among nations. When I addressed the delegates of the United Nations yesterday, I reminded them: You have the right to dream great dreams, to seek a better world for your people. And all of us have the responsibility to work for that better world. As caring, peaceful peoples, think what a powerful force for good we could be.

When our nations trusted in these great principles in the postwar years, the civilized world enjoyed unparalleled economic development and improvement in the human condition. We witnessed a virtual explosion of world output and trade and the arrival of many free, self-determined, independent nation states as new members of the international system.

And, as I said when I last spoke to you, the societies that achieved the most spectacular, broad-based economic progress in the shortest period of time have not been the biggest in size nor the richest in resources and, certainly, not the most rigidly controlled. What has united them all was their belief in the magic of the marketplace. Millions of individuals making their own decisions in the marketplace will always allocate resources better than any centralized government planning process.

Trust the people -- this is the crucial lesson of history. Because only when the human spirit is allowed to worship, invent, create, and produce, only when individuals are given a personal stake in deciding their destiny and benefiting from their own risks, only then do societies become dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

In the turbulent decade of the 1970's, too many of us, the United States included, forgot the principles that produced the basis for our mutual economic progress. We permitted our governments to overspend, overtax, and overregulate us toward soaring inflation and record interest rates. Now we see more clearly again. We're working and cooperating to bring our individual economies and the world economy back to more solid foundations of low inflation, personal incentives for saving and investment, higher productivity, and greater opportunities for our people.

I believe the United States is making real progress. Since we took office, we've reduced the rate of growth in our Federal Government's spending by nearly 40 percent. We have cut inflation dramatically, from 12.4 percent to 2.6 percent for the last 12 months. The prime interest rate has been cut nearly in half, from 21\1/2\ percent to 11 percent. Figures released last week reveal our gross national product grew at an annual rate of almost 10 percent in the second quarter, and about 7 percent is estimated for the third.

In the United States we still face large projected deficits which concern us, because deficit Federal spending and borrowing drain capital that would otherwise be invested for stronger economic growth. But as Secretary Regan correctly pointed out in the Interim Committee, Sunday, the deficit is coming down as a result of economic growth. Revenues are higher than anticipated, and we expect continued improvement. We'll continue to work for greater restraint in Federal spending, but we will not risk sabotaging our economic expansion in a short-sighted attempt to reduce deficits by raising taxes. What tax increases would actually reduce is economic growth, by discouraging savings, investment, and consumption.

Our commitment to military security is matched by our resolve to negotiate a verifiable nuclear arms reduction treaty. Only then can we safely reduce military expenditures and their drain on our resources. As I mentioned at the outset, there can be no lasting prosperity without security and freedom.

Turning more directly to economic development, all signs point to a world economic recovery gaining momentum. As early as last February, the Conference Board predicted that economic growth rates in the United States and six major industrial countries spell economic recovery in any language. Since then, industrial production in the OECD [Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development] countries has been moving up. Your own IMF economists are predicting growth in the world economy of at least 3 percent next year. This is the brightest outlook in several years.

As the U.S. economy picks up steam, our imports rise with it. When you consider that half of all non-OPEC developing country manufactured goods exported to the industrialized countries come to the United States, it's clear what a strong stimulus our imports provide for economic expansion abroad. And as other economies prosper, our exports in turn increase. We all gain.

Many nations are moving steadily forward toward self-sustaining growth. And like us, they're doing it by relying again on the marketplace. This period of adjustment has not been easy for us; in fact, it's been very painful. But it is the one way that does work, and it's beginning to pay dividends.

Economic recovery is spreading its wings and taking flight. We all know those wings have not spread far enough and, I would add, recovery alone is not good enough. Our challenge is far greater: lasting, worldwide economic expansion. Together, we must make the 1980's an historic era of transition toward sustained, noninflationary world growth. I have every confidence that we can, and with our combined leadership and cooperation, we will.

The IMF is the linchpin of the international financial system. Among official institutions it serves as a counselor, coaxing the world economy toward renewed growth and stability. At various times in its history, the IMF has provided important temporary balance of payments assistance to its member nations, including my own. At times it must play the ``Dutch uncle,'' talking frankly, telling those of us in government things we need to hear but would rather not. We know how significant the IMF's role has been in assisting troubled debtor countries, many of which are making courageous strides to regain financial health. We warmly applaud the efforts of Mr. de Larosiere and his staff.

My administration is committed to do what is legitimately needed to help ensure that the IMF continues as the cornerstone of the international financial system. Let me make something very plain: I have an unbreakable commitment to increased funding for the IMF. But the U.S. Congress so far has failed to act to pass the enabling legislation. I urge the Congress to be mindful of its responsibility and to meet the pledge of our government.

The IMF quota legislation has been pending for several months, and I do not appreciate the partisan wrangling and political posturing that have been associated with this issue during recent weeks. I urge members of both political parties to lay aside their differences, to abandon harsh rhetoric and unreasonable demands, and to get on with the task in a spirit of true bipartisanship.

The stakes are great. This legislation is not only crucial to the recovery of America's trading partners abroad and to the stability of the entire international financial system, it is also necessary to a sustained recovery in the United States.

The sum we're requesting will not increase our budget deficit, and it will be returned with interest as loans are repaid to the IMF. What's more, it will keep the wheels of world commerce turning and create jobs. Exports account for one out of eight manufacturing jobs in our country, the United States. Forty percent of our agricultural products are exported. I'm afraid that even today, too few in the Congress realize the United States as interdependent with both the developed and the developing world.

Examine the record: The United States has been a dependable partner, reaching out to help developing countries who are laboring under excessive debt burdens. These major debtor countries have already undertaken difficult measures in a concerted effort to get their economic houses in order. Most of them are working closely with the IMF to overcome economic hardships. They continue to demonstrate a commendable willingness to make necessary adjustments. And that's why I can state that our participation in the IMF quota increase is not a government bailout of these debtor countries or of the banks which are sharing the burden. On the contrary, IMF plans to assist financially troubled countries call for the banks to put up more new money than the IMF itself.

This is by nature a cooperative enterprise. If the Congress does not approve our participation, the inevitable consequence would be a withdrawal by other industrialized countries from doing their share. At the end of this road could be a major disruption of the entire world trading and financial systems -- an economic nightmare that could plague generations to come. No one can afford to make light of the responsibility we all share.

We strongly support the World Bank; in fact, the United States remains its largest single contributor. We recognize its key role in stimulating world development and the vital assistance it provides to developing nations. Here again, I have proposed legislation to meet our commitment for funding the World Bank and especially the International Development Association. It is important that these funds be available to help the people in the poorest countries raise their standards of living. Tomorrow, Secretary Regan will be discussing both the Fund and the Bank in more detail. Because our investment in the World Bank's operations is so large, we feel a special responsibility to provide constructive suggestions to make it even more effective.

Let me simply underscore again a fundamental point, and I say this as a spokesman for a compassionate, caring people. The heart of America is good, and her heart is true. We've provided more concessional assistance to developing nations than any other country -- more than $130 billion in the last three decades. Whether the question at hand be Bank project financing or Fund balance of payments assistance, it must be considered a complement to, not a substitute for, sound policies at home. If policies are sound, financing can be beneficial. If policies are irresponsible, all the aid in the world will be no more than money down the drain.

Whether such words will prove to be empty promises or symbols of a powerful commitment depends on the real day-to-day actions which each of our governments take. Everyone is against protectionism in the abstract. That's easy. It is another matter to make the hard, courageous choices when it is your industry or your business that appears to be hurt by foreign competition. I know; we in the United States deal with the problem of protectionism every day of the year.

We are far from perfect, but the United States offers the most free and open economy in the world. We import far more goods than any nation on Earth. There is more foreign investment here than anywhere else. And access to our commercial and capital markets is relatively free.

Protectionism is not a problem solver; it is a problem creator. Protectionism invites retaliation. It means you will buy less from your trading partners, they will buy less from you, the world economic pie will shrink, and the danger of political turmoil will increase.

I firmly believe that we can and must go forward together, hand in hand, not looking for easy villains to explain our problems but resolved to pursue the proven path on which these institutions embarked almost four decades ago -- a path of economic progress and political independence for all countries and for all people.

In closing, let me share with you a very deep, personal belief I hold. We are all sovereign nations and therefore free to choose our own way as long as we do not transgress upon the sovereign rights of one another. But we cannot really be free as independent states unless we respect the freedom and independence of each of our own individual citizens. In improving their lot, which is the only reason you and I hold high offices in our lands, we cannot forget that how we help them progress economically must be consistent with this highest objective of all -- their personal dignity, their independence, and ultimately their freedom. That's what this job of ours is all about.

President Reagan. President Koivisto and I have just completed a cordial and fruitful discussion about relations between Finland and the United States and about the current international situation. And it's a pleasure to say that we did not discuss problems in the Finnish-American relationship, because there are no bilateral problems between Finland and the United States. Our relations are excellent and have been for a long time.

I welcome this chance to hear President Koivisto's views and expressed our own commitment to international cooperation and world peace. Americans have always had a warm place in their hearts for the Finnish people, and it's been a pleasure to welcome their President to our country today. Thank you, and thank you, sir, for being here.

States. Naturally, I have also expressed our own views and aspirations with regard to the international situation. Finland's foreign policy is based, in the first place, on good relations and confidence with regard to our neighboring countries. In accordance with our policy on neutrality, we want to have good relations with all nations of the world.

I know you were as gratified as I with Sunday's announcement of a cease fire in Lebanon. While there were many things that contributed to the cease fire, it is my belief that your agreement to advance the compromise resolution on war powers -- and the favorable action by the Foreign Affairs and Foreign Relations Committees -- were particularly important. At a crucial point, your agreement and the supporting committee actions expressed a commitment to bipartisanship in U.S. foreign policy. Please accept my thanks.

Let me also take this opportunity to clarify an issue with respect to the interpretation of the compromise resolution. The compromise resolution refers to the requirements of section 4(a) of the Lebanon Emergency Assistance Act; I gather that a question has arisen as to the Executive Branch's understanding and intention in this regard. My understanding and intent remain exactly as they were when I signed the Lebanon Emergency Assistance Act: It would be my intention to seek Congressional authorization -- as contemplated by the Act -- if circumstances require any substantial expansion in the number or role of U.S. armed forces in Lebanon.

In addition, regarding the Administration's intentions with respect to the 18-month time period, I can assure you that if our forces are needed in Lebanon beyond the 18-month period, it would be my intention to work together with the Congress with a view toward taking action on mutually acceptable terms.

The United Nations remains today -- 38 years after its creation -- an institution uniquely endowed to promote international political, economic, social, and technical cooperation. Conceived during a brutal war and nurtured in a troubled peace, the United Nations has seen many of its shining promises realized, but many others have been frustrated. More often than the world community can afford, rivalries and divisions among states prompt abuse or misuse of the powers and machinery of the United Nations. Despite these imperfections, the system and its machinery continue to offer opportunities for mediating differences which threaten to erupt in hostilities; for arranging and overseeing agreements to end tensions or conflicts; for promoting the technical and scientific cooperation essential to meet problems of growth and development; and for coping with international emergencies of all kinds.

The people and the Government of the United States of America take pride in the support -- moral, intellectual, political, and financial -- which we have rendered to the United Nations, and in the leadership which we have provided to help bring about its foremost achievements. We also take pride in the knowledge that the principles of the United Nations charter are the same ones which underlie our liberty, our progress, and our development as a democratic society.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Over fifty million Americans sew at home. Their efforts demonstrate the persistence, skill, and self-reliance which are so characteristic of this Nation. The home sewing industry generates over $3,500,000,000 annually for our economy and serves to introduce many younger Americans to activities which lead to careers in such fields as fashion, textile design, interior design and retail merchandising.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Adult day care centers provide supervised community settings in which partially disabled men and women of all ages can obtain care that may not be available in their own homes. These centers provide opportunities for adults who are socially isolated to find friends and learn skills. Day care centers enable individuals to obtain the care they need without being forced to live in institutions, and they offer needed respite to families whose infirmed relatives live with them.

In recognition that adult day care centers and their dedicated professional staffs serve many health maintenance functions, provide vital medical care, including medication monitoring, therapies, and health education, and provide invaluable opportunities for social interaction to disabled elderly Americans, the Congress of the United States, by House Joint Resolution 132, has designated the week beginning September 25, 1983, as ``National Adult Day Care Center Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

Our Nation's history is rooted in the struggle to attain independence: the right of free choice by free citizens in a society that honors the efforts of individuals. The movement of disabled people to full participation in our society, with all its benefits and responsibilities, is an ideal whose time has surely come.

All across this Nation, disabled people are striving to obtain more control over their lives through choices that minimize their reliance and dependence on others. They are taking charge of their own lives and becoming responsible for their own affairs. They are participating in the day-to-day life of the community and fulfilling the whole range of social roles possible in our society.

Since World War II, the United States has set aside one week each year to emphasize ways in which more people with disabilities can be assisted in their efforts to become independent through gainful employment. Despite past and present efforts of employers to hire people with disabilities, the unemployment level of disabled people continues to be unnecessarily high. To solve this problem, we must plan and develop strategies to demonstrate that disabled people are a valuable resource to our economy and our society.

Extracurricular activities in the high schools of this country provide our students with valuable opportunities to discover and develop talents in areas other than those covered within the classroom. Extracurricular activities also build school spirit and demonstrate the importance of promoting common goals.

Through such programs as student government, athletics, music, drama, debate, journalism, community service, and many others, students gain key insights into the roles which competition and cooperation play in our society. Moreover, these experiences help students to learn to set and achieve goals, to organize their time effectively, and to enhance the social skills that are needed to enjoy and succeed in life.

But we're here to recognize those Senators who stood with us for 3 years and who are now running for reelection. And we are here also to salute their leader and ours in the United States Senate, a man who means much to all of us, both professionally and personally.

Baker really is about photography. [Laughter] He's one of the few Members of Congress who would rather take your picture than twist your arm. [Laughter] Well, there's a story, and I understand it's true. It's about a newspaper photographer out in Los Angeles, kind of reminds me of Howard.

Well, since 1966, Howard has been making the picture as well as taking the picture. Howard, I'll say you'll be missed, but if you make yourself scarce, we're going to come looking for you, and you can count on that.

It is more than fitting that a dinner like this, which is beefing up the Republican Majority Fund, would salute Senator Baker. Under his leadership, the Republicans in the United States Senate served faithfully as the loyal opposition. And for the last 3 years and for the first time in half a century, Republicans have maintained a majority in the upper House for two consecutive sessions -- the first and only time in 50 years.

Seriously, though, with Howard's guidance, we've proven to the American people that there is a difference in the two political parties and that, if given the chance, we can make a sometimes frustrating democratic process work for the betterment of our people.

During the election of 1980, we Republicans stated our case and outlined our program, and we did not, as some now suggest, just run against my predecessor. The opposition, with few exceptions, had control of both Houses of the Congress almost continually for 50 years. In those 50 years, we have held both Houses of the Congress for 4 of the 50 and one House, the Senate, for these last almost 3 years. And for long stretches, our opponents held not only the Congress of the United States but the White House as well, and all the departments and agencies. And now as much as they would like to blame the near crisis we inherited on my immediate predecessor, we know that's not true. It was not one individual who caused all those enormous problems America faced in 1980. It was decades of their liberal policies, their policies with good intentions, but unworkable solutions.

And when I say ``we,'' I mean a Republican ``we''. To those who criticize, I say to them, let them clearly state the alternative. Then let them explain how this blueprint would differ from the many years when their party dominated the Federal Government and left us with near disaster.

What has been achieved in the last 3 years has been the result of a team effort. We can be particularly proud of the 1981 tax and spending cut packages, the most significant economic legislation in memory. Without Republican control of the Senate, and without the kind of leadership Howard has been providing, that recovery package would still be bottled up in committee.

It takes time for any program to take hold. The opposition was declaring that our program was a failure the morning after it passed, and did everything to pull the rug out from under our reforms before they had a chance to work. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we've weathered the storm. It is clear now even to our critics that after years of stagnation and inflation, our economy, thanks to the basic changes we've made, is beginning to move again. We're witnessing the first phase of lasting economic growth.

And the most important question we must ask in next year's election is: Do we continue the responsible policies that are giving our economy new vitality and giving our people hope, or do we go back to the failed ideas of tax, spend, and inflate that brought us stagnation and despair?

Each and every Senate race will be crucial. And the Republican Majority Fund we contribute to this evening will give us a fighting chance to protect the gains we've made. But the special interests, groups that profited from big government, from high taxes and high inflation, will be out in force. As for me, I'm confident. When we got here, inflation had been running at double digits for 2 years. The prime interest rate had soared to its highest level, 21\1/2\ percent, in more than a hundred years. Taxes had doubled in just the 5 years between 1976 and 1981, siphoning off resources needed for savings, job-creating business investment growth, and economic development.

Our system is based on faith in the people, and I have faith that they will not vote to return to the failed policies of the past. Our biggest job is to remind them what things were like, how we turned that desperate situation around, and just as important, the crucial difference between our efforts and vision for the future and theirs. We offer solid progress and real hope, not fear, envy, and failure. We will not be on the defensive as we move into the 1980 elections -- or '84 elections. On the contrary, Republicans will be on the offensive. We're the party that lowered tax rates, reduced inflation, and put the American economy back on the path to real growth.

Morale in our Armed Forces was at a low ebb, and the weapons and equipment they had to use were wearing out. We had planes that couldn't fly and ships that couldn't sail. Well, we've turned that situation around, too. We're ending the Vietnam syndrome that had broken the will of the American people. And today we've established ourselves as a reliable ally, and we're rebuilding our defensive capabilities.

The number of combat-ready units has gone up by a third since 1980, and that means they have improved their chances of never having to be in combat. Our Navy's fleets have risen from 480 ships to 510, that we have today, and it's on the way to 600. And military officers tell me that morale in our services has never been higher.

We strengthened America's capabilities, and we've strengthened America's resolve to meet our responsibilities in the world. The likelihood of peace is not enhanced by weakness or gestures of good will to tyrants. Peace and the preservation of our freedom is not more likely if we put our head in the sand and run away from our responsibilities. The peace of the world and the freedom of the United States instead depend on hard work, courage, and strength.

Howard has told us that one of the reasons he's taking a sabbatical from government is that he needs time to get reacquainted with the people of the United States. Well, I think he's going to find out they're the same people they always were, the kind of people who took a vast wilderness and turned it into this blessed land of liberty and abundance. They had courage, faith in God, and a willingness to roll up their sleeves and get on with the job at hand.

What we need to look forward to and dream on is after 50 years, with only a brief interlude, with us there, able to really make the policy that fits our Republican philosophy, what it can be and what can happen for the world and this nation if we can one day in the very near future have not just one House but have the Congress and the executive branch and the bureaus and agencies and departments carrying out the philosophy that you and I have believed in for so long.

The new formula shall be applicable to all annuity payments payable after October 1, 1982, including annuity payments to those individuals who had previously reached age 62 and whose annuities had already been recomputed.''.

Employees, as amended, shall be deemed to be amended by adding after the words ``allowed for military service'' the following: ``, less an amount determined by the Director to be appropriate to reflect the value of the deposits made to the credit of the Fund under section 252(e), and''.

Voluntary early retirements will be permitted only if a major reorganization, reduction in force, or transfer of function will result in a significant number of participants being separated or immediately reduced in pay. Participants retired under this subsection shall receive retirement benefits in accordance with the provisions of section 221.''.

I understand that there are some 150 principals with us here today. I'm delighted you're here, but I have to confess to some mixed emotions. I remember on a number of occasions when I was sent to see the principal, and now the principals are coming to see me. [Laughter] But I thank you, everyone, principals, superintendents, and school board presidents. Thanks for joining us on this day that has been set aside to honor outstanding American secondary schools.

Jefferson to humble, self-taught people like Abe Lincoln, Americans have put their faith in the profound power of education to enrich individual lives and to make our nation strong. But lately many of our schools haven't been doing their job. Yes, there are many fine schools, dedicated principals, teachers, present company included. But since 1963, we all know that scholastic aptitude tests have shown a virtually unbroken decline. As of the '82 - '83 school year, half of our States required only 1 year of math and 1 year of science for a student to graduate. And 14 States impose no requirements for graduation at all.

We've begun to realize that compared to students in other industrialized nations, many of ours perform badly. But let me make one thing clear: that is if we take the overall student body across the Nation, and on the average, we don't compare favorably. On the other hand, when you take our top students, then they compare very favorably with the top students, the best in those other countries.

California, the exchange students from all over the world used to come for a visit with me at the capital in Sacramento. And every year for 8 years I asked the same question. I would ask these young people from these foreign lands how it compared, our education to theirs; was it harder or more difficult. And there would be silence. And then there would begin to be some smiles, and then they would look at each other, and pretty soon they would break into laughter. And that happened every time. And then they would begin volunteering the difference in what was required of them and what we're requiring of our students.

First, all of your schools know the meaning of team effort. You have school boards that skillfully translate community educational goals into sound policy. Superintendents, principals, and teachers carry the policy to the students and armies of parents are supportive of your efforts. This summer I visited one of the schools that's represented here today, Pioneer High School from Whittier, California. I met students, faculty, and community representatives. I was impressed with the way they all were pulling together.

Second, all of your schools share a few basic ideas about what goes into a good education. All of you happen to believe in leadership, from superintendents and principals, dedication from teachers, homework, testing, using time efficiently, and firm discipline.

Third, you are resourceful. Whether it's buying new test tubes for the chemistry lab, finding transportation to send the band on tour, all of you've shown ingenuity and skill in meeting your schools' needs. And you not only marshal resources; you share them. Secretary Bell has told me that a number of you have built good will in your communities by giving the public a chance to use the high school swimming pool, gymnasiums, classrooms, after hours.

Fourth, you've placed a strong emphasis on good teaching. You all recognize that good teachers are the heart and soul of any good school. And you promote good teaching. To do that, you've taken measures to reward it. Secretary Bell and I believe that schools across the country should learn this lesson and adopt policies and salary structures to reward outstanding teachers.

And last, your schools have rejected contemporary academic standards in favor of your own much higher standards. You get more from your teachers and students because instead of accepting mediocrity, you demand excellence.

Two hundred years ago when the British Army surrendered at Yorktown, a song was played as the British troops marched out under a white flag, played by the British band because the colonials didn't have a band. The song they were playing was called ``The World Turned Upside Down.'' Today people must be questioning whether the term ``down under'' applies to Australia any more.

Australians are made. I know that your countrymen are proud of you. And I want you to take this message back: that Americans are proud, too; we're proud to have Australians as our very dear friends. We salute you in your hour of triumph.

To the crew of the Liberty I say, and I'm certain all Americans feel this way, ``Well done.'' I spoke with Dennis Conner shortly after the race. I'm sorry he couldn't be with us today. We should think of him not as the loser of this race, but as the man who successfully defended the cup in 1980 and a skipper who's had a brilliant yachting career.

A special word of congratulations to Alan Bond. Alan, you represent the kind of tenacity with which Americans and Australians can identify. For 13 years and four challenges and at heavy financial sacrifice, you've been trying to accomplish this feat. You just kept on coming. But don't relax now, because, Alan -- and that's the other message to our friends in Australia -- the Americans are coming back stronger than ever next time around.

Seriously, the competition that we celebrate today is a tribute to the spirit and peace-loving character of our two nations. During that race 132 years ago, when our yacht, the America, competed against a squadron of Britain's best, at one point, with the America 7\1/2\ miles in the lead, our vessel passed the Royal Yacht. The captain of the America and the crew doffed their caps and stood at attention as a salute to the Queen and to their competitors.

A British paper of the day noted ``a mark of respect to the Queen, not the less becoming because it was bestowed by Republicans.'' [Laughter] I understand that Commodore Stone and the members of the New York Yacht Club paid the same tribute to the crew of the Australia II at the end of this America's Cup. And I join them. I might add that when we won that cup back in 1851, there were numerous comments about the America's unique design. We had every innovation of the day -- except a winged keel, of course.

Foundation, I want to thank you very much for inviting us to be here today. Dennis Conner regretted that he couldn't be here, but he certainly appreciated your phone call at a moment when he felt rather depressed, and all of us did. But you gave us a very good feeling that evening.

We wanted to show you, however, that in spite of losing the longest winning streak in sports history, that we did put up a good race. We did bring you a little memento which will show you that indeed we were ahead of Australia at times. It's a picture of Liberty and Australia very close, I might add, which is the way it was the entire time. And also on behalf of our syndicate, this is the burgee that we flew all this summer. And we would like to add that to your collection.

All of our crew and their contingent, and those who could not be here today, have signed this for you. And I hope you will keep this as a memento not just to us winning the cup but to the great friendship that exists between our two nations. Liberty and its crew put up a great effort. And we were just the better yacht on the day, but take nothing from them.

Well, I'm very proud to have these mementos. I am very proud to have -- I'd call it a flag; you called it something else -- [laughter] -- and this picture. And again, I just want to say that I think the people of Australia and the people of the United States all can be very proud of this event, of all of you who made it what it was. And it's just kind of a shame for those of us who look on that we have to wait all these years now until it's done again.

I am grateful to the Congress for its swift response to my request that it pass a joint resolution condemning the Soviet crime of shooting down a Korean airliner with 269 innocent persons on board. The strength of the joint resolution and the unanimity with which it was adopted will make clear to the Soviet Union that the American people are united in their condemnation of this dreadful act and in their demand that the Soviet Union take full responsibility for its action and publicly agree to take necessary measures to ensure this tragedy is not repeated. In its passage of the defense authorization bill the same day as this joint resolution the Congress has backed up its expression of outrage with a firm statement of American resolve.

I want to thank the House of Representatives for its strong, bipartisan vote today supporting our policies in Lebanon and the continued presence of the U.S. peacekeeping force. This vote would not have been possible without the strong leadership of Speaker O'Neill, Majority Leader Wright, Minority Leader Michel, Chairman of the House Foreign Affairs Committee Zablocki, and Ranking Minority Member Broomfield.

A spirit of cooperation between members of the two parties, and between the executive and the legislative branches of our Government, has been the traditional hallmark of a successful foreign policy. Today, we continue the process of restoring that bipartisan spirit. Now we look to the Senate for a similar demonstration of responsible leadership.

On Monday, the President put forward a series of concrete proposals, and we shall continue to press for resolution of problems at the negotiating table. But we are still awaiting signs that the Soviet Union is prepared to negotiate differences on a realistic and equitable basis. Deeds, not words, are urgently required.

We do not hide our view of the nature of the Soviet system and of the dangers to the world of many Soviet policies and actions. For their part, the Soviet leaders have never been reticent in expressing their view of us. But while we disagree profoundly on the way human society should be organized to protect human rights, ensure justice, and achieve prosperity, we know that we must live on the same planet and that peace is imperative to mankind if it is to survive.

Thatcher on a wide range of mutual interests and concerns. Our conversations reflected the superb relations that exist between our two countries and our determination to broaden our cooperation and consultation.

We reaffirm today our resolve to maintain a strong Western defense to protect freedom and maintain peace. We'll carry out our commitments to the alliance, moving forward in the modernization of NATO's conventional and nuclear deterrent. At the same time, I have pledged America's best efforts to reach acceptable agreements on arms reduction with the Soviet Union.

The Prime Minister informed me of what her government is doing to prepare for the scheduled deployment of cruise missiles should we fail to reach an agreement with the Soviets. I expressed the thanks of the American people to the Prime Minister for Britain's strong and unequivocal support on this vital issue.

We also discussed developments in the Middle East, especially the situation in Lebanon, where both our countries are participating in a peacekeeping force. We agree that the solution to that tragic conflict can only come from the Lebanese themselves, free from all foreign interference. I've reviewed with the Prime Minister U.S. efforts to engage all Lebanese factions in a constructive dialog toward the goal of withdrawing all foreign forces from their country and reestablishing the rule of peace and law.

Prime Minister Thatcher and I also discussed developments in this hemisphere. I explained our energetic efforts to end the violence that plagues Central America and to promote democracy and economic development in that region.

In our discussion of economic matters, we reaffirmed the course set out at the Williamsburg summit as the best blueprint to sustain economic recovery and counter protectionism. We agreed on the need for continued close consultations as a means of resolving any differences between us in matters of trade and commerce.

Prime Minister Thatcher, we're grateful for your visit, your friendship, especially as this month marks the 200th anniversary of the signing of the Treaty of Paris which made us friends instead of countrymen. And when you finish speaking here, we can go over and look at that Treaty of Paris.

The Prime Minister. Thank you very much. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, today's visit has been a very important one. I've had just about 2 hours of talks with the President on the many things which he has indicated, all of them which are extremely vital for the future of our peoples in our several countries.

I've also seen, earlier this morning, Secretary Regan, when we discussed economic matters and, in particular, the problems of unitary taxation. I saw, too, Mr. Volcker, because naturally we are all concerned that the great international debt position should find a solution which enables trade to continue and those countries to come out of their grievous debt problems.

The President and I started first, as he has indicated, on East-West relations. I think I can put our position like this: We both believe in defending our way of life, and we must do that to keep that way of life secure. But our purpose in having military strength is entirely defensive -- to defend our way of life. We would like to be able to have that security at a lower cost in weaponry and in expenditure and in men. In order to achieve that lower cost, we have seriously and continuously to negotiate with the Soviet Union to try to get a balance in men, materials, weapons, and in nuclear strength. If we can achieve that, we can keep our security at a lower expenditure.

Soviet Union. Such is the anxiety of the West genuinely to negotiate disarmament reductions. He has put forward the latest proposals. Mr. Andropov has replied. I hope now that the proposals will be seriously discussed by the Soviet Union at the negotiating table. If they are not successful in reaching zero option, the cruise and Pershing missiles will be deployed by the end of this year.

I hope and it is my earnest belief that they should continue, so that although we were not able to negotiate zero option, we should be able to negotiate the deployment of a lesser number of weapons than the full total, provided, again, the Soviets will genuinely negotiate on balance.

We have also discussed, as the President indicated, the Middle East, and we're very conscious that although all eyes are focused on Lebanon, the fundamental problem of the Middle East -- a secure Israel and a legitimate deal for the Palestinian people -- has still to be resolved.

I have pointed out to the President we support his Central American policy and, particularly, the most excellent strategic view he gave of it during his very famous speech in April. And we are constantly pointing out that of the aid which the United States gives to Central America, 75 cents out of every dollar goes to civil aid, and that is a record to be proud of.

We've also had a word about Belize, and I, naturally, as you would understand, have made my views known about arms to Argentina. I discussed with Secretary Regan this morning and again at lunch the wider issues affecting the economy and the importance of trying to secure lower interest rates so that we can get a full recovery in the world which would be to the benefit of the United States, Europe, and also to the peoples of the underdeveloped countries.

If I may sum up, altogether this has been another chapter in the close discussion, consultation, and similar beliefs in shared ideals between the United States and Britain. Against that background, it's not surprising that we find common views and we pursue them with common purpose in the wider world.

Well, a welcome to all the players, the coaches, and the managers, and thank you all for coming. I understand we're going to have a little exhibition right here in the Rose Garden. Just don't let me be caught between the two teams. From the hot rivalry we hear you have going, you may just melt the ice at the Capital Centre Friday evening.

Athletic rivalry is the best spirit of competition, and you've put me in a predicament for Friday's game, because both teams here are in a sense hometown teams. The U.S. Olympic team is America's hometown team, and the Capitals are Washington's hometown team. So, I'm not going to pick a favorite. In politics, they call this fence-sitting. [Laughter] We do wish both teams the best of luck for a good game.

Before the big game with the Soviet team, the coach told the players, ``You were born for this moment. This is your moment.'' And I don't think we'll ever forget the picture of those young Americans, not favored to win by a long shot, but win they did.

In my State of the Union Address last January, I underscored my commitment to taking action to end inequities in the provision of pensions to women. This issue is a top priority of my Administration, and I believe passage of legislation is imperative to eliminate difficulties faced by women both in earning their own pensions and receiving retirement income as widows and divorcees.

Act,'' which has been introduced in the Senate by Senator Dole. Further, the Administration has testified before the Senate Finance Committee where we stated our strong endorsement of many of these proposals and urged their prompt consideration and enactment. We believe that these and the other amendments contained in our bill are long overdue and will significantly improve the ability of women to realize a fair and equitable retirement income. At my direction, we will continue to work closely with Senator Dole and other members of the Senate to enact pension equity legislation this year.

Representatives on many of the problems facing women in securing an adequate pension. We look forward to working with the appropriate Committees of the House to provide whatever assistance may be required to achieve enactment of these extremely important statutory provisions.

U.S. peacekeeping force in Lebanon, sends a strong signal to the world: America stands united, we speak with one voice, and we fulfill our responsibilities as a trustee of freedom, peace, and self-determination.

By working together to promote peace in Lebanon, to give Lebanon back to the Lebanese people, and to help them rebuild their democracy, we are strengthening the forces for peace throughout the Middle East. This is neither a Republican nor a Democratic goal. Peace in that troubled region is the cause that unites us all.

I vetoed an earlier bill on this subject, H.R. 3564, because it mandated early and rigid announcement dates. They would not have allowed the Secretary of Agriculture sufficient time to collect and evaluate critical information on the harvest of current crops, before committing to a specific program for the following year.

I am approving H.R. 3914 because I believe that it will meet the needs of farmers, while also allowing the Department of Agriculture to carry out its responsibilities to manage these programs in a timely and efficient manner.

Our nation is approaching the 200th anniversary of the Constitutional Convention's approval of the Constitution, which occurred on September 17, 1787. Our Constitution contains the principles that have formed the basis of our national strength, unity, and prosperity. This bicentennial offers an opportunity to rededicate ourselves to the principles embodied by the Constitution.

Speaker of the House of Representatives in the activities of the Commission. However, because of the constitutional impediments contained in the doctrine of the separation of powers, I understand that they will be able to participate only in ceremonial or advisory functions of the Commission, and not in matters involving the administration of the act. Also, in view of the incompatibility clause of the Constitution, any Member of Congress appointed by me pursuant to section 4(a)(1) of this act may serve only in a ceremonial or advisory capacity.

I also understand that this act does not purport to restrict my ultimate responsibility as President for the selection and appointment of members of the Commission, under article II, section 2, clause 2, of the Constitution.

The President today announced the third annual President's Volunteer Action Awards, a program designed to honor outstanding volunteers and volunteer groups and to focus public attention on the contributions of the Nation's 96 million volunteers.

The President will present the awards at a White House ceremony in early May. Awards are made in 10 categories: arts and humanities, education, the environment, health, human services, international volunteering, jobs, material resources, public safety, and the workplace.

The National Center for Citizen Involvement, a private, nonprofit volunteer support organization, and ACTION, the Federal agency for volunteering, are cosponsoring the program for the third year. Funding for the program is provided by corporate and foundation sponsors.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Susan Meredith Phillips to be Chairman of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission. She has been serving as a Commissioner on the Commission since 1981.

President Reagan. President Mubarak and I have concluded another of our regular consultations on regional and bilateral issues. Our discussions were warm and frank, as discussions between good and trusting friends should be. They strengthen our sense of common purpose in working for regional peace and security.

We discussed the urgent need to achieve a just and comprehensive peace for the Middle East which would permit the nations there, all the states in the region, to live in peace while safeguarding the legitimate rights of the Palestinian people. In that regard, I reiterated my commitment to the peace initiative that we announced a little more than a year ago and my desire to work closely with President Mubarak to bring the parties to negotiation. Our policy remains firmly based on U.N. Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338 and the Camp David accords.

Ambassador McFarlane's efforts to produce a settlement there, and assured him of my determination to support the territorial integrity, sovereignty, and independence of Lebanon. To that end, there must be an enduring cease-fire, political reconciliation, and the prompt withdrawal of all foreign forces.

On bilateral questions, I reiterated the information -- or the importance that I attach to our continued assistance to Egypt and to our strategic cooperation. I've assured the President that our assistance will be responsive to Egypt's needs. And I also reviewed steps that we've taken to increase the flexibility of our economic assistance so that it can support President Mubarak's efforts to reform the Egyptian economy. We agree that we should continue our dialog on economic issues.

President Mubarak's visit, the third since he was elected to office, highlights the special nature of our relationship with Egypt and the importance that I attach to his personal friendship and wise counsel. Our two countries share a common dedication to building a Middle East that is peaceful, prosperous, and secure from outside intervention. The Egyptian-American partnership has already produced significant results, and we'll continue to build on our record of accomplishment.

We both rejoiced in the cease-fire agreement recently reached in Lebanon. The cease-fire must continue so that efforts to bring about national reconciliation in Lebanon be given the chance to succeed, and succeed they must. Lebanon has seen much bloodshed and destruction, and it deserves a lasting peace and stability and the real opportunity to reconstruct the country. The key to our breakthrough is the complete withdrawal of Israeli and other foreign forces. The authority of the Lebanese leadership over the entire country must be consolidated. Short of this, the situation would remain tense and explosive.

September, 1982. The time has come to reactivate this initiative with a view to secure the participation of Jordan and the representatives of the Palestinian people in the negotiations. I am confident that through negotiations Palestinian legitimate rights will be fully recognized, and peace between Israel and all her Arab neighbors will emerge, assuring for each the right to live within secure and recognized borders and thus allowing the region to devote its energies to development and progress.

President Reagan and I have also agreed on the necessity to put an end to the war between Iran and Iraq immediately. The promulgation of the meaningless war is detrimental to the interests of all nations. We call upon Iran to respond positively to Iraq's offer of terminating the war and entering into a peace negotiation without preconditions.

We also discussed current African problems. We fully support the Government of Chad and uphold the presence of foreign occupation forces there. The territorial integrity of Chad must be preserved. We support the efforts of the Organization of African Unity in this regard.

Earlier, the two Presidents met in the Oval Office and then held an expanded meeting, together with their advisers, in the Cabinet Room. Following the meetings, the U.S. and Egyptian officials attended a luncheon in the State Dining Room.

Alzheimer's disease, a devastating disease that affects the cells of the brain, is now regarded as the major form of old age ``senility.'' While experts formerly believed that Alzheimer's occurred only in persons under 65, it now is recognized as the most common cause of severe intellectual impairment in older individuals. Presently, there is no established treatment that can cure, reverse or stop the progression of this disease, which is the cause of serious confusion and forgetfulness in about 1.5 - 2.5 million elderly persons in the United States.

Because there is an association of dementia with aging and because Americans are living longer, the numbers affected by this disease will continue to grow. As many as half of those in nursing homes suffer from this degenerative brain disease. Also, because of the decrease in life expectancy accompanying the illness, Alzheimer's is thought to be the fourth leading cause of death among adults of age 65 or more. Generally, from the time of onset, the disease reduces a person's remaining life expectancy by about one-half. It also deprives its victims of the opportunity to enjoy life and takes a serious toll on its victims' families and friends.

The emotional, financial and social consequences of Alzheimer's disease are so devastating that it deserves special attention. Science and clinical medicine are striving to improve our understanding of what causes Alzheimer's disease and how to treat it successfully. Right now, research is the only hope for victims and families.

To recognize that progress is being made against this disease and to show understanding and support for the individuals and the families and friends of those who are affected, the Congress of the United States, by Senate Joint Resolution 82, has authorized and requested the President to proclaim November 1983 as National Alzheimer's Disease Month.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

This weekend marks the 90th observance of Labor Day, a well-deserved tribute to the working men and women whose dreams and hard work helped build America into the greatest Nation in the world. We know that what is good for the American worker is good for America. And as we prepare for a new season of work, I believe there's good reason for giving a hopeful thumbs up.

The outlook on Labor Day weekend 1984 is for a continuation of strong, steady economic growth, more jobs, and low inflation. We still have great challenges to meet, which I'll speak about in a moment. But we should also recognize the progress we've made together. It's an important source of confidence and inspiration for our future.

In the last 19 months, the jobless rate has fallen farther and faster then any recovery in the last 30 years. We've seen the creation of 6\1/2\ million new jobs. The United States has created, on average, more jobs each month than all the Common Market countries combined in the last 10 years. The Europeans are calling our success the American miracle.

And we're determined to bring inflation further down, just as we're determined to simplify our tax system so we can bring your tax rates further down, not up, as my opponent would do, harming the growth and progress we've made.

With inflation and tax rates down, the American miracle can continue: interest rates can come down further; peoples' earnings can continue to buy more; investment and productivity can keep on growing; new businesses can develop new products and markets; more jobs can be created; and all Americans can share in a dynamic, exciting future.

Our future can be one of boundless opportunity if we challenge the limits of growth through reforms like tax simplification and fight inflation by passing two long-overdue reforms: the balanced budget spending limitation amendment and the line-item veto.

We must also meet the challenge of pushing back our newest frontiers of science, high technology, and space. It's been estimated that high technology industries create jobs eight times as fast as low technology industries. Just as important, the knowledge we gain from the technological revolution enables our older industries to modernize their plants and equipment, increase their ability to compete in the world, and maintain and expand their work force.

One sure way to spur jobs through new technology is by promoting more research. On Thursday morning I visited the employees of Goddard Space Flight Center and assured them our administration will continue its strong support for research and development, particularly in our universities. Between 1981 and '85, Federal investment in basic research will have increased by almost 30 percent in real terms. The importance of research work in universities reminds us that we must go forward with our agenda for excellence in education so today's students at the elementary and secondary school level can go on to college and acquire the knowledge to work in our rapidly changing world.

At the same time, we must stimulate economic development in inner city areas that have not benefited from technological innovation or the economic expansion. We've proposed enterprise zones, offering strong incentives for people to start up new businesses in up to 75 areas of high unemployment, and a youth employment opportunity wage to open up job opportunities and reduce the high levels of teenage unemployment, especially among black youth.

Both enterprise zones and the youth employment opportunity wage would reduce dependency -- providing new hope for millions -- and they're supported by a broad coalition of minorities. But both have been blocked by the Democratic House leadership, the very people who profess compassion. Americans aspiring to lift themselves up should never be held down by partisan politics. We will keep our economy strong, and we will not rest until it can bring a job to the home of every American.

Listen, I want you to know that the men and women in the Navy and at Hughes Aircraft were thrilled by your perfect deployment of SYNCOM. That communications satellite is going to help all of us in this country, and believe me, we're grateful for your great part in getting it up there and getting it launched. And now, as of this morning, just a little while ago, you're three for three with the launch of the AT&T communications satellite.

Listen, you know, I know the previous astronauts have now and then been able to pinpoint various things down here that they can see from the vantage point of space. And how do we look from up there? Have you seen anything unusual or things that you're going to be reporting on?

Listen, your work up there is helping to make it easier for the people of the Earth to communicate with each other, so on top of being spacemen and a spacewoman, you're doing some very good work for your fellow citizens of Earth. And we're very thankful, and we're also very proud.

Walker. Now I know the birthday isn't until Wednesday, but I have the feeling that you'll all be so busy, and he'll be busy, as you'll all be finding a parking place at Edwards, so I just thought I'd send the greetings now.

Listen, what you're doing is so exciting that -- you mentioned about myself being up there. As I say, I'll have to think about that for a while and then see whether I can appoint myself as passenger. But our thoughts and our prayers are with you, believe me, and I say that for myself and Nancy and, I know, for all America.

Astronaut. Thank you, Mr. President. As you're well aware, we're only part of a very large team that makes this happen, and we'd like to accept your kind words on behalf of everybody that helped get the Discovery airborne and helped us do this mission.

Director of the Office of Administration. He joined the White House staff in January 1981 and has responsibility for the administrative operations of the White House and the Executive Office of the President.

The President. Well, he'll have to speak for himself. What I was commenting on was the great movement that has been going on, more and more, to attack religion by some who pretend that they're acting within the Constitution -- those people who would deny such things as chaplains in the military, and ``In God We Trust'' on our coins, and so forth. That's what I was commenting about. I'm not seeking to install a state religion in any way.

Today, we pay tribute to America's working men and women, and I join with all Americans in celebrating the dignity and productivity of our working people. Labor Day brings a fitting opportunity to salute those who built our great nation and whose spirit, hard work and courage are now building a new era of lasting economic expansion filled with greater opportunities for all our people.

Too many of our fellow Americans are still out of work or down on their luck. We must not and will not rest until everyone who wants a job has found one, until all Americans can reach as high as their vision and talents take them. We must and we will make certain that the American dream remains a springtime of hope for all our people. Meaningful work, not welfare, is every American's hope, and we have a continuing responsibility to make those hopes a lasting reality.

Labor Day, 1984, also finds American workers facing many new and different challenges and opportunities. The nature of our labor is changing rapidly. Occupations unheard of just ten years ago are opening up opportunities. America's future growth and prosperity depend on how well we take advantage of these opportunities.

We must also compete effectively in foreign markets. Exports account for 25 percent of the total value of all goods produced in our country. Exports mean jobs for our people and growth for our economy. We're committed to keeping markets open to free trade, and to make them grow.

As America's workers enjoy this holiday, let us all be thankful for the prosperity we have achieved and let us work together to meet the challenges ahead and turn them into opportunities for all Americans.

All these people here on the dais who are helping so hard, and all of you, you'll forgive me a little home State pride, but I can't help but thank you for giving me an opportunity to get away from those puzzle palaces on the Potomac -- [laughter] -- to return home and kick off our campaign.

Ocean renews our strength and purpose as we start our march to victory this November. And let me add, when people need a little sunshine in their lives and a feel for the optimism that fills the soul of this beautiful country, then I can assure them they'll find it in Orange County.

We don't seek a victory for any partisan purpose. Today we set out to achieve a victory for the future over the past, for opportunity over retreat, for hope over despair, and to move up to all that is possible and not down to that which we fear.

Eleven days ago in Dallas, we said what is still true today. This election campaign is about the clear choices that will be before the American people. The choice goes to the very heart of our purpose. It's about the vision we see for America, the kind of world we'll leave for our children.

We said that we would welcome to our side Democrats who believed in our cause. And I'm very pleased to have learned since I've been here and to report that right here in Orange County five locally elected officials have changed parties. And this morning I met one of your supervisors who said that he did so as a result of our invitation in the acceptance speech there in Dallas.

Well, this year we present to the people of America a sparkling vision of tomorrow, a belief that greatness lies ahead, only waiting for us to reach out for it. We present to the people four great goals to build our tomorrow. We present a chance, this time a real chance, finally to maintain sustained economic growth without inflation. We offer a challenge to ensure that the United States of America remains today and forever prepared for peace. We put forward a philosophy that proudly proclaims the rich traditional values that fill our lives and have permitted our nation to endure. And we will continue to insist that there is no such thing as a life without uncharted frontiers, and that is our mission -- to seek them, not cringe from them.

Now, we've heard what others have offered to American people today, in this year. They have said that America is nothing if it isn't promises. Well, America isn't about promises; it never has been. America is about promise. It's about possibility. We grew and prospered. We protected our liberties and those of others. We built energetic cities and fed the world. And we did all these things not because of promises, but because we Americans decided that we must see things brightly through the expanding visions of opportunity and vision, and not darkly through the prism of the past.

For too many years, we lived with the idea that there had to be inflation, that we must be satisfied with higher taxes, that high interest rates just might be acceptable, and that government just had to keep growing.

Well, we challenged all those assumptions, because they were false. Together, we began the task of controlling the size and activities of the government by reducing the growth of its spending, while passing a tax program to provide incentives to increase productivity for both workers and industry.

The American people deserve all the credit for the way they pulled us from the depths of the economic mess that we were left with. And frankly, I think they have trouble understanding why some people persist in distorting the facts.

Just night before last, a high-ranking official of the AFL - CIO was interviewed on national television. It's hard for me to understand how someone in his position could be as unknowing as he seemed to be about the national employment situation. He charged that our tax policy was beneficial to the rich only, and yet, there had been, as he said, little of that money invested in production facilities to provide new jobs, so unemployment was getting worse.

Well, he might like to know that there are more people employed today in the United States than ever in our history. And as I just noted, more than 6 million new jobs have been created in less than 2 years. In the auto industry alone, there are nearly 150,000 more people employed than were working in 1980 in that industry. As for business and industrial development, I just pointed out, it's increased at the fastest rate in any recovery since World War II.

The President. I was six times president of my union, and I led it in the first strike that it ever called. Now, with distortions like these, our detractors would like you to think that we hadn't made any progress.

And now we can see a future where inflation doesn't consume us, where people can find new and challenging jobs, and where they can finally have some hope that this economy is back on track and America is on top.

Now, rebuilding the economy has also allowed us to restore our ability to keep the peace. The future of America relies completely on the state of our preparedness. We're not out for any territorial gain or to impose ourselves on anyone but, believe me, America must never again let its guard down.

Now, for the sake of our children, for the sake of our children and the safety of our Earth, we'll continue to invite all nations, including the Soviet Union, to join us in keeping the peace and in reducing and, yes, ridding the Earth of the awful threat of destructive nuclear weapons.

Building prosperity and maintaining our strength also permit us to keep our strong values -- faith, work, family, neighborhood, freedom, and peace. And those are not just words, they're expressions of what America means, definitions of what makes us a good and loving people.

We must do more than talk about these values; we must restore them and protect them against challenge. And we must use our resources in and out of government to allow our historic values to enrich the lives of all who follow us -- allowing our faith to be heard and to be felt, infusing our schools with the finest of quality, giving law enforcement all the tools they need to fight crime and drugs, and never limiting the opportunities for any American -- all those belong to the future that we will build. And we didn't come all this way as a nation without such values, and we can't step into tomorrow without the continued strength and moral stamina they give us.

Nothing in our future is more technically challenging than our exciting new frontiers. The space shuttle Discovery circles the Earth this very moment. It reminds us that America has always been greatest when it does not shrink from greatness. We must always follow our dreams to distant places and prepare to live in space for peaceful, economic, and scientific gain. That's why I directed NASA to develop a permanently manned space station, and to do it within a decade.

Expanding those frontiers of technology requires boldness of spirit and confidence about what lies ahead. It requires restoring a system of education that demands excellence, that rewards merit, and that can instill in our children the highest level of intellectual achievement. And believe me, on this day, in this year, you and I can say we're not afraid of tomorrow.

Well, as far as we're concerned, that's America's message to the world. We've got everything before us. We're going to build an economy that you can give to your children and say that it will ensure and fulfill the lives of our next generation. We're going to go to work to break the cycles of dependency on government so that free men and women have the surging spirit of boundless opportunity. We're going to build a peace that won't fail if we don't fail. And we're going to be unafraid of exploring all that's beyond this Earth. We're going to leave -- and proudly leave -- sturdy and indestructible values so that in the 21st century our shield will be their shield.

And on this day which celebrates the productive work of men and women everywhere, let us pledge again to revere the past and to learn from it. But let us be determined it is the future we will celebrate. That's our message this year. We'll carry it across America: You ain't seen nothin' yet.

You know, I've been traveling around the country quite a bit recently, and I've been noticing something -- and please correct me if I'm wrong -- but it does seem that Americans look happier than they looked 4 years ago when we were campaigning. You seem like people who even believe in your future again. As a matter of fact, you seem like you're better off than you were 4 years ago.

Now, I know that you don't want to hear about interest rates that reached their worst peak since the Civil War, back in 1980, and about double-digit inflation, or about huge, unfair tax increases on working families, growth that ground to a halt, or about the loss of freedom and steady decline of U.S. leadership abroad. So, I won't talk about those things. And believe me, our opponents don't want to talk about them either. But we want to talk about the present and the future, about what Americans are doing together, and what we must continue to do to make America great again and let the eagle soar.

What we've done for 21 straight months, and what we must continue to do, is create powerful economic growth while keeping the inflation monster locked in his cage. And that's how we've created what our European friends are calling the American miracle.

In those values lies the heart of a good and decent people and the golden hopes of a nation as generous and peaceful as the world has ever known. We're seeing a rebirth of these values, not to return to some mythical past, but to build on strengths for a creative future as we renew the quest for excellence at all levels of our society.

What we've done, what we must continue to do, is keep America prepared for peace with freedom and human dignity by being prepared to deter aggression, by bringing steadiness to American foreign policy, by being prepared to pursue all possible avenues for arms reductions, by ensuring that our economic strength leads the way to greater stability through growth and human progress, and by having the spiritual strength and self-confidence to reach out to our adversaries.

And what we've done and must continue to do is to help push back our newest frontiers in education, high technology, and space. America has always been greatest when she dared to be great. I'm convinced we will be leaders in developing these frontiers, because the American people would rather reach for the stars than reach for excuses why we shouldn't.

We can forget that pack of pessimists that are roaming our land. If we strengthen incentives, invest fully in new technologies, and strive for new breakthroughs in productivity, then we can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anytime, anywhere in the world. And as we use our knowledge to help older industries modernize and help develop new sunrise industries, we can create a bounty of new opportunities, jobs, and improvements in the quality of life surpassing anything that we've ever before dreamed or imagined.

My friends, this we can do if you'll give us your support. The truth is, we've already got a good start, so I hope I'll be forgiven for pointing out one difference between ourselves and our opponents. We believe in high tech, not high taxes. The Silicon Valley produces some of the most advanced technology in the world. I'm told that you actually have a computer that was able to add up all the promises that have been made by the other side. But when that computer tried to add up all the tax increases it would take to pay for them, it blew a fuse.

The President. Now, I knew that that wasn't what you thought your future should be. The future we're building is not one of special interest groups, one or another, but for all the people. And let me offer a little proof in the form of a question. Which major industrial nation today has the strongest economic growth, 7.6 percent for the last quarter?

The President. Thank you. The American people deserve all the credit for the way that you've pulled us from the depths of the economic mess that we were left with. I think the American people have trouble understanding why some people persist in distorting the facts.

Just night before last, a high-ranking official at the AFL - CIO was interviewed on national television. Now, it's hard for me to understand why someone in his position could be as unknowing as he seemed to be about the national employment situation. He charged that our tax program was beneficial to the rich only, and yet, even after they got all that money, there had been very little investment in production facilities to provide new jobs, so, he said, unemployment was getting worse.

Well, he might like to know that there are more people today than ever in our nation's history who are employed. And, as I just noted, more than 6 million new jobs have been created in less than 2 years. In the auto industry, there are nearly 150,000 more people employed than were working in that industry in 1980. As far as business and industrial investment, I just pointed out, it is at the fastest rate of any recovery since World War II.

Kennedy, the flow of earnings and power from the people to the Government is not increasing, it's going the other way -- flowing from the Government back to the people. And we intend to keep on going in this new direction for a brighter future.

We want to enact an historic reform of tax simplification that makes the system easier to understand, fair to all, and that can bring everyone's tax rates further down, not up. Might we consider taking our cue from our Olympic athletes? Rather than discourage risktaking and punish success, rather than raise taxes, let's go for growth, and let's go for the gold.

We want to handcuff the big spenders by enacting a line-item veto and a constitutional amendment mandating that government spend no more than government takes in. Now, you know there are some that say you can't do that. Well, right here in California we have both of those here in our constitution. I used that veto more than 900 times when I was Governor here, and our budget stayed balanced. And your Governor now stands ready and is armed with that, and that's why you have surpluses and balanced budgets.

The President. We're pushing for something called enterprise zones so people can get off unemployment and welfare and get the chance for decent jobs that they deserve. Our dream is to help every American climb as high as he or she can go. Now, isn't that more compassionate than keeping people down in dependency for the rest of their lives? That enterprise zones legislation is bottled up by the majority leadership in the House.

The President. We think that it's time for every American to have the protection, also, of our anticrime package; time for spouses working in the home to receive the same rights for IRA's as spouses working outside the home; and time for working families who pay to send their children to parochial and independent schools -- and pay their full share at the same time of taxes to support the public schools -- that they should receive the simple justice of tuition tax credits.

Now, the trouble is our opponents treat each new idea the old-fashioned way -- they spurn it, they turn it down. You know, I hate to say this, but the age factor may play a part in this election. No, not mine. It's their ideas are too old.

Now, the party whose nomination that I hold may be the minority party for now, but we have the majority of good and new ideas. We believe in opportunity and opportunity for all. GOP doesn't stand just for Grand Old Party, it also stands for great opportunity party. We believe that everyone deserves an even place at the starting line. And the more we encourage economic development, the more jobs that are created -- jobs for young people just getting out of school, jobs for people denied opportunity in the past -- the more all Americans can share in a dynamic, exciting future.

And let me make one thing plain today: We will not be satisfied until all Americans understand that they're welcome with us and belong with us. The Republican Party won't be complete again until more black Americans feel that it is their home again. The Republican Party won't be complete until Hispanic Americans and every individual in this country understands that we are the party of opportunity, the party of growth, the party of the future -- and that party is America's party.

To all those Democrats who were loyal to the party of F.D.R., Harry Truman, and J.F.K., but who see that its current leaders have changed it, that they no longer stand firmly for America's responsibilities in the world, that they no longer protect the working people of this country, we say to them: Our arms are open. Join us.

I believe in my heart that by changing our country these past 3\1/2\ years we're making it a better country -- a country of greater freedom, opportunity, confidence, and hope. And that's the America I'm working for this year. That's the America I intend to work for in the next 4 years.

The President. Well, my dream for America -- and I know it's one you share -- is to be the kind of success story that this valley has -- see that story multiply a million times. And with you by our side, we'll make history again, and our victory will be America's victory.

It's wonderful to be back with you today. All of you in the American Legion have served your country honorably in time of war, but you've also served her nobly in time of peace by making the American Legion one of the most important and effective civic organizations in our country's history. I salute you today, as do all Americans.

While you pay special attention to matters of military readiness and foreign policy, any issue of the American Legion magazine shows how well informed all of you try to be about a broad range of domestic issues. And it's on the broad range of issues that I want to talk with you today. So, for a few moments, let's talk about the unfinished business that awaits us as a nation and as a people.

I think we can all be proud of the economic progress America's made in the past few years. I won't bother to recite here all the statistics about how the inflation, interest rates, and unemployment have come down, or the many indicators that demonstrate America's current economic expansion, because the real question you and I must now ask ourselves is how can we solidify the gains we've made and ensure that the prosperity we're now enjoying will endure not just for the rest of this decade, but on into the next century.

To do this, we have to make sure the Federal Government never goes on a spending spree like the one it was on when we came into office. Just in case you've -- [applause] -- well, I was going to say just in case you've forgotten, but evidently you haven't forgotten -- [laughter] -- Federal spending nearly tripled in the decade of the seventies. Taxes doubled in the 5 years before we took office.

Now, no one feared government's tendency to spend and tax and become the oppressor of the people more than those who built this nation. They had lived with the anxiety of a collapsing currency and runaway inflation, and that's why the Founding Fathers gave us that remarkable Constitution that placed so many checks and balances on government. But they also wisely provided for an amendment process through which later generations could perfect the constitutional system. Well, the performance of government in the last few decades shows the Constitution needs a little perfecting, and the people need a lot more protection from the fiscal transgressions of government.

Federal spending, that it would force the Federal Government to do what so many States and municipalities and all average Americans are forced to do -- to live within its means and stop mortgaging our children's future. So, today I'm asking for your support and help. We need the balanced budget amendment. We need it for America's future. Is that contrary to the ideas of the Founding Fathers? No, it isn't. When the Constitution was adopted, Thomas Jefferson said there was an oversight -- it should have contained a clause forbidding the Government from borrowing.

Second, we need to give the office of the Presidency the powerful tool it needs to cut out the porkbarreling and special interest expenditures buried in those catch-all appropriation bills the liberals in the Congress are so fond of. Today I'm asking for your support and help. We need the line-item veto. We need it for America's future. Now, is that a wild experiment? [Applause] I asked, is that a wild experiment, as some have suggested? No. Forty-three Governors have that right. I had it when I was Governor, and it works.

So, let's end the trauma of April 15th. Let's stop the nightmare of tangled regulations and twisted requirements that every American faces at income tax time. Let's make it possible to bring everybody's tax rates further down, not up. And today I'm asking for your support and help. We need a simplified tax code. We need it for America's future.

Now, as we get America on the road again economically, we also need to return her to respect for the sound values and traditional beliefs that account for her greatness. And to accomplish this, we must rectify two of the greatest wrongs of the past few decades.

First, we must rid ourselves once and for all of the old liberal superstition that crime is somehow the fault of society and not the wrongdoer who preys on innocent people. Now, we've already appointed some very fair but tough-minded judges. And I just wish there was time to report to you in detail on the efforts of the tough new steps this administration has taken against drug trafficking and organized crime. What it all means is that we're putting more career criminals in prison than ever before. So, it should be no surprise that for the first time in many years, the crime statistics are coming down and staying down, and have been coming down for 2 years in succession.

Yet critical legislative initiatives against crime remain right where they've remained for the last 3 years -- dead in the water in the House of Representatives. Our Comprehensive Crime Control Act includes bills calling for bail reform; tougher sentencing; justice assistance to States and localities; improvement in the insanity defense; and major reforms affecting drug trafficking, prison crowding, and forfeiture. All of these reforms, and others we've forwarded, are badly needed and constitutionally sound. In fact, our initiatives -- the core crime bill -- passed the Senate by a vote of 91 to 1. But in the House of Representatives, the liberal leadership keeps them bottled up in committee.

Our forefathers were religious people, and they were also enlightened enough to realize the follies of religious intolerance. What they did, on one hand, was to erect a wall in the Constitution separating church and state and, on the other hand, they provided in the same document for the free exercise of religion. They knew that morality derives chiefly from religious faith and that no government -- or that government no more should handle religious expression than it should show preference for one religious group over another.

Now, I can't think of anyone who favors the Government establishing a religion in this country. I know I don't. But what some would do is to twist the concept of religion, freedom of religion, to mean freedom against religion. So, let me repeat what I've always believed: Religion is one of the traditional values which deserves to be preserved and strengthened. We are and must remain a pluralistic society. When we speak of church and religion, we speak of them with a small ``c'' and a small ``r,'' so as to include within the constitutional protection all churches and all religions. The unique thing about America is that every single American is free to choose and practice his or her own religion, or to choose no religion at all, and that right must not and shall not be questioned or violated by the state.

We must protect the rights of all our citizens to their beliefs, including the rights of those who choose no religion. That is why our administration opposes any required prayers in schools. At the same time, we call for the right of children once again to pray voluntarily in our public schools, and that stand is in the spirit of the Constitution as our Forefathers wrote it and as we have lived it for most of our history. Let us restore that balance.

But in addition to strengthening our economy and reasserting traditional American values, our agenda for the future must promote economic growth by extending new opportunities to all our citizens. Right now, this administration has before the Congress a series of measures that would give us a great start in this direction. But, once again, these are measures that have been held up by the liberal leadership in the Congress and, once again, we're going to need your help to get them moving: first, tuition tax credits for the parents of parochial or independent school children; second, the Federal enterprise zones bill that will provide jobs and opportunity for those in our inner cities; and third, a youth employment opportunity wage so that young people, especially minority youngsters, can get that first job they need to begin their climb up the economic ladder.

And finally, let me turn to a matter I know is of special interest to all of you -- America's national security, the safety of her people, the right to a future of peace and freedom. We've come a long way in the past few years in restoring our ``margin of safety.'' I mentioned at this convention in 1980 that we needed this. Today every major commander in the field agrees that America's military forces have better people, who are better armed, better equipped, better trained, with better support behind them.

Now, besides moving to restore the strategic balance, we've added tanks, fighting vehicles, combat aircraft, and we've also added some 70 ships to the U.S. Navy. We will have 600 ships 4 years from now if the Congress honors our budgetary requests. In the past 3 years, we have added to our sealift capability more than in all the years since World War II. And our 1983 - 85 budgets reflect a 100-percent increase in sustainability funding, which will significantly increase staying power for all our armed services.

Now, just take Europe alone. We can now deliver 25 percent more tonnage there in case of crisis, and we've improved our air sortie rate by 60 percent. And both on land and in the air, we have more accurate weapons, newer equipment than ever before. Now, these are the kind of things which will make sure we never have to cross the nuclear threshold.

Yes, our defenses are being restored. And so, too, are our alliances. We have completely reoriented American foreign policy, imbuing it with a new energy and moral purpose. And in the process, we have rallied our friends throughout the world. Even as we've successfully resisted Soviet expansionism, we've opened a wide series of diplomatic initiatives that will eventually bear fruit not just in arms control treaties, but in arms reduction treaties.

First, we must complete the task of military modernization and improved readiness. This is directly related to the prospect for arms reductions. In the past, we've succeeded best when we've bargained from strength. We have a moral obligation to pursue technological breakthroughs that could permit us to move away from exclusive reliance on the threat of retaliation and mutual nuclear terror. We must pursue vigorously research on defensive technologies that can permit us to intercept strategic ballistic missiles -- fired deliberately or accidentally -- before they reach our own soil or that of our allies. Now, some are calling this ``Star Wars.'' Well, I call it prudent policy and common sense.

Third, we must continue to work hard toward balanced and verifiable arms reduction treaties with the Soviets, treaties that will be made all the more feasible by maintaining our resolve to keep our defenses strong.

And fourth, we must continue our forward strategy for freedom and speak up for human dignity whenever it's threatened. I preach no manifest destiny, but I do say we Americans cannot turn our backs on what history has asked of us. Keeping alive the hope of human freedom is America's mission, and we cannot shrink from the task or falter in the call to duty. In the past 4 years, we've offered renewed hope to millions of people in developing lands, and we're beginning to see them turn away from the East and toward political and economic systems based on personal freedom.

So we must not be apologetic about our nation's commitment to freedom. We must present to the world an America that is not just militarily strong, but an America that is morally powerful -- an America that has a creed, a cause, a vision of a future time when all people of the world will have the right to self-government and personal freedom.

So, today, again, I ask your support and help. We need to continue to restore our strength, to pursue emerging technologies, to consolidate our alliances, to move forward energetically with strategic arms negotiations and, most of all, to continue proclaiming the American dream of human freedom to the entire world. We need these things, and we need them for the sake of America's future.

Another subject of great interest to Legionnaires is the POW - MIA issue, and your responsible support of our efforts and the National League of Families is greatly appreciated. We've made some recent progress with both Laos and Vietnam, and we'll continue our highest priority efforts until we achieve the fullest possible accounting of these brave men.

And, by the way, I want to add something that also needs to be said here. The men and women veterans who've proudly served their country in the military have earned more than simply the respect of their countrymen, they have earned the benefits to which they're entitled, including veterans preference in government employment. As long as I'm President, those will be the policies of the United States Government. And I want you to know that as long as I'm President, the door of the Oval Office is open to you, to your leaders, and to your concerns.

You know, I can't leave this discussion without thanking all of you in the American Legion for the enormous help that you've given us on the Central American issue. It's been a long struggle and, thanks to your efforts, we're finally making progress. But the struggle isn't over yet. There are still those in the Congress who want to hinder our attempts to help El Salvador, and there is also a move underway to desert the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. So, on this issue and many others, I hope you'll think about sending a reminder to the Capital this year. I hope you'll think about ending that stalemate in Washington by voting this year for responsible candidates at the congressional level, so that this administration can have a Congress it can work with and our agenda for the future can become reality.

I think you join me in my belief in this agenda for America's future. It's one that will create growth, opportunity, and progress at home and pursue peace and freedom abroad. From reducing the growth of government to supporting prayer in our classrooms, we aim to strengthen families, local communities, private institutions, and voluntary organizations. Our goal is to reaffirm traditional American values while we get government out of the way of our people and their boundless capacity for change, innovation, and progress. Our hope is to keep alive America as a beacon of hope, a shining city in a world grown weary of war and oppression.

You know, I wanted to speak to all of you today about the future, because I believe the things so many of you struggled for so valiantly have not just endured, they have grown and prospered and turned brighter with the years. What a change from only a few years ago when patriotism seemed so out of style! I'm not sure anyone really knows how the ``new patriotism'' came so quickly, or when and how it actually began.

Or how about those young men and women on our Olympic team this summer? Who's ever said more about this country than those young Americans? Can we forget those young American sprinters who swept the 200-meter race, and then, led by Carl Lewis, went around the track with a flag, embraced their families, and then knelt to pray?

And for me there was that visit to Normandy earlier this year, where I read the letter of a loving daughter who had promised her father, a Normandy veteran who had died of cancer 8 years earlier, that someday she would go back to Normandy for him. She would see the beaches and visit the monuments and plant the flowers at the graves of his fallen comrades. ``I'll never forget what you went through,'' she had told her father, ``and, Dad, I'll always be proud.'' Well, reading her letter was one of the hardest speeches that I ever gave. But I'm sure you, of all people, understand. For many of you, even though your days of military service are receding, there are still reminders like that, poignant and piercing.

It's always been so for old soldiers. There's a story told about General Grant during the final weeks of his life. He had begun his last journey by train to upstate New York, and the newspapers were already filled with headlines, ``Grant is dying.'' He was in a race against time, hoping to finish his memoirs and give his family back the financial security lost by those he had trusted too well.

The flagman waved his arm. There was no hand. ``General, I lost that with you in the Wilderness,'' the flagman said, ``and I'd give the other one to see you well.'' Well, as Grant's wife and the doctor wept, the old General's lips tightened and his hand went up quickly as he took his hat off in a final salute to an old comrade.

Nimitz and Halsey, MacArthur, Bradley, Patton, Ike -- they're all gone now. And boys who stormed the beaches for them at Normandy or Iwo are grandfathers now. Korea, too, fades into memory. And even Vietnam now belongs less to journalists or politicians than to scholars and historians.

Well, I know you join me in a prayer today that for America such days and places are gone forever; that as much as we honor those who died to make us free, we also fervently hope that such sacrifice will never again have to be asked for, and that the day is not far off when there will be no new battlefields to visit and no old soldiers stories to hear.

Some will say that such hope is in vain, that the weight of history or human experience is against us. Well, I don't believe it's too much to hope that the years ahead will bring peace and freedom not just for the people of this kindly, pleasant, greening land called America, but for all mankind.

The President. I think it's evident every place you go. Everyone is optimistic and everyone is gung-ho to go forward with the kind of expansion we're having. We've got 6 million new jobs in the country. We've got the fastest business expansion that we've had -- 600,000 new incorporations. Everybody's ready to go.

The President. Well, I was only talking about it because I was speaking at a prayer breakfast, and then what I said was greatly distorted. My concern was not with government invading religion, it's with all those people that are trying to make government turn around and interfere with people's right to practice religion.

The President. I'm honored to be here this morning with all of you very distinguished ladies and gentlemen. It was kind of good to fly in yesterday on Air Force One and see the city of the big shoulders again.

I have to tell you what that means to me personally. I was broadcasting the Cubs in 1935 when the only mathematical chance they had to win the pennant was to win the last 21 games of the season -- [laughter] -- and they did! [Laughter] And it still stands today as an unequaled record.

Permit me to commend AmeriTrust Corporation and its fine chairman, Jerry Jarrett, for your leadership in sponsoring ``Choosing a Future'' for mid-America. Your survey identifying the significant economic difficulties we know your region faces, as well as strategies for overcoming them, represents a far-reaching and impressive private sector economic development initiative.

When we talk about the great changes in America in recent years we often describe them in statistical ways, and I'll be guilty of that before I finish. But I think the most significant change, a good and hopeful one, has been the change in America's attitude -- our renewed confidence and the higher value that we place on the truly important things in our lives.

Ben Franklin once said that, ``When the well's dry, we know the worth of water.'' Well, 1980 marked such a moment for America. It was, in a sense, a great moment of truth; a time in our history when it seemed to many that America's well finally had run dry from a philosophy of bigger and bigger government. It was time to begin putting back what we had lost.

For half a century, we'd been giving government greater power over our lives. We did this with the best and most honorable of intentions. But by 1980 the full impact of distorting our economy, of draining spirit from the heart of our people, and of permitting our traditional values of faith, family, and work, neighborhood, and freedom to be undermined -- all of this had come home to roost.

The worst trauma was not the breakdown in our economy or the humiliating setbacks that we suffered abroad. Being sick was bad, but the worst thing was when they told us we couldn't get well; that the problems were just too big, and government wasn't to blame, we were to blame.

Well, Americans didn't give up hope; we just hadn't been allowed to hope. And that's why in 1981 we said let's renew our faith and hope. We have every right to dream heroic dreams. Let us make a new beginning with one revolutionary idea -- freedom.

From day one, the driving force behind everything we've done in economic policy from reducing the growth of Federal spending, which soared over 17 percent in 1980 alone, to lowering tax rates and providing new incentives for business investment, to cutting back the jungle of regulations, to supporting stable monetary policies has been to put our future back in the people's hands, so working Americans could make America great again.

America forward and to make sure that nobody gets left behind. One continuing challenge for the future must be to clear away the remaining roadblocks to economic growth without inflation, and do it for all Americans.

We do not believe, as some propose, that higher taxes on income, capital, and labor is the way to reduce budget deficits. That idea was bad policy before, and it's bad policy today. Entrepreneurs must not be discouraged; they must be encouraged.

Another reform could bring hope and opportunity to depressed neighborhoods in Chicago and pockets of despair throughout the Midwest. Imagine an abandoned ghetto with people working again in shops and firms and restaurants. Imagine their families living in more secure neighborhoods with less crime. Well, we can and will have this rebirth in America if the House of Representatives would just give us a vote on our enterprise zones proposal.

We understand, too, the challenges your agricultural and industrial regions face. We've tried to help you meet those challenges in a number of ways -- by ending a totally unfair, wrongheaded grain embargo; by restoring grain sales to the Soviet Union -- over 22 million metric tons since August of 1983; by reaching an agreement with Japan that will virtually double our beef exports over the next 4 years; by accepting an understanding with Japan permitting our auto industry to get back on its feet after the killer interest rates in 1980; by working aggressively for more open markets and by opposing protectionist legislation like ``domestic content,'' which would revive inflation, provoke retaliation, and destroy American jobs and farm exports.

May I suggest that the most productive food growers in the world -- the kind of leaders who once invented the assembly line, who manufacture our cars, and who have given us the hard-hat spirit and the expertise that made American business second to none -- can outproduce, outcompete, outsell anybody, anytime, anywhere in the world.

We can and we must go forward, all of us together, building an economy that spurs the initiative and ingenuity to create sunrise industries and make older ones more competitive. To do this, we must meet the challenge of developing our next frontiers in science, technology, space, and education.

Washington, an America unafraid, pushing back those frontiers with courage and leadership, becoming once again America unsurpassed. A new revolution is rising from the deepest yearnings of our nation's spirit to challenge the limits of knowledge and to put the power of discovery at the service of our most noble and generous impulses for decency, for progress and, yes, for peace.

I saw that in Decatur, Illinois -- men and women not only processing corn and soybeans to produce food products that feed a hungry world but putting into practice breakthroughs in the field of hydroponics and pioneering work in ethanol to increase demand for farm products, create new jobs, and give greater energy security to our country. America's heartland is on the cutting edge of progress.

I saw us meeting that challenge on the assembly lines in Kansas City and Detroit, where investments to modernize and the introduction of robotics are helping the American automobile industry come back stronger than ever, and where engineers are using lightweight, super strong, plastic-like materials to reduce the weight of modern cars, and consumers are getting the benefits from more miles to the gallon.

I saw us meeting that challenge when the people at Goddard Space Flight Center showed us how practical applications of space and aeronautical technology are transforming our lives -- from life-saving vests for firemen to sophisticated aerial scanning techniques to locate and identify everything from schools of fish to mineral deposits to agricultural resources.

I saw the vision of technology with a human face. Miraculous medical wonders like PIMS, the programmable implantable medication system, can administer medication automatically within the body. HTS, the human tissue simulator, can send electric impulses through wire leads to targeted nerve centers or areas of the brain, giving relief from pain.

Who could put a price tag on the value of these human benefits? Even more dazzling opportunities lie ahead, if only we have the faith and courage to keep pushing on. Each technological breakthrough enables us to work from a newer, higher plateau of knowledge, and each breakthrough opens the door to a new leap in productivity considered impossible only a few decades ago.

The great untold story of the technological revolution is the awesome potential for productivity power. If we meet the challenge of building a manned space station, for example, we can manufacture in 1 month's time life-saving medicines that would take 30 years to manufacture on Earth. We can manufacture crystals of exceptional purity that could enable us to produce larger, faster computers, the super computers, and achieve even greater productivity gains throughout our economy.

My friends, we can create a bounty of new opportunities, technologies, and improvements in the quality of life surpassing anything we've ever before dreamed or imagined. Our vision is not an impossible dream; it's a waking dream. If we cultivate the art of seeing things impossible, if we challenge the limits of growth, we'll have the strength and knowledge to make America a rocket of hope shooting to the stars.

I believe we will be the leaders in space because the American people would rather reach for the stars than reach for excuses why we shouldn't. And as our technology transforms the great, black night of space into a bright new world of opportunities, we can use that knowledge to create an American opportunity society here at home. We can ensure that every person has not only an equal chance, but a much greater chance to pursue the American dream.

I promise you we'll do our part. We'll support high tech, not high taxes. We'll constantly endeavor to strengthen the private economy, to support tax credits for incremental research and development, strive to lessen concerns that cooperative R&D ventures between companies may violate antitrust statutes, and continue our strong commitment to support basic research and development, particularly in universities, to train tomorrow's industrial scientists and academic scientists and engineers, and build our nation's intellectual capital.

You know, the more we look at our changing world, the more we see that the problems and challenges we face are interrelated. The American opportunity society will blossom from the progress of a growth economy. That progress will hinge on our ability to push back the frontiers of science, technology, and space. Meeting those challenges depends on education. And our success in education will depend on what kind of people we have in our schools, what values we absorb and bring forward into the future with us. The world of learning and the world of work must not only come into better harmony, they must strengthen and enrich each other.

So, our vision of education must be as forward-looking as our vision of the rest of American life: a school system that teaches our children how to enrich their lives using telecommunications as educational tools; that shows them how to educate themselves so they will be able to keep their skills current in an ever-changing job market; and that gives them an appreciation of the arts and humanities that give life meaning.

The sense of our boundless potential and the spirit of excellence are rising again in America. In every State in the Union in the past 3 years, there has been a resurgence of interest in our schools and a resurgence of commitment to excellence. SAT scores are turning up again, and the back-to-basics movement has proved itself not old-fashioned, but indispensable to progress.

In the past few decades, many of us turned away from the enduring values, from faith, the work ethic, and the central importance of the family. We had something of a hedonistic heyday. But it's passing. We've righted ourselves, and across the country there's a rebirth of the traditional values that guided our fathers and mothers and guided our nation. We affirm this trend, not to return to some mythical past, but to build on proven strengths for a creative future.

There's another challenge for us to think about. In the history of our nation we've had problems with ill-spirited divisiveness -- one race thinking it was better than another, one generation thinking it was superior to another. We've had religious divisions. We've had our share of bigotry.

We've had tensions between this class or this group and that. And one of the good changes of recent years is that we've outgrown a lot of that nonsense. But we must commit ourselves to doing better. We are and must remain a pluralistic society, but we're also one nation together.

No one group in this country is better than another. No one race or religion or sex or color is better than another. And no region is better or worse than another. It's time we erased the last vestiges of intolerance, bigotry, and unkindness from our hearts. Decency demands this and so does our history.

There's a final challenge. It may seem remote from issues of regional economic development, but it's a most fundamental challenge, for if we ever failed to meet it, the value of our economic progress and our spiritual progress, too, would be lost. It's the challenge to maintain peace in the world, peace with our neighbors and our allies and our adversaries. I think you well know my feelings on this; they've been shared by most American Presidents down through our history.

America has always been a peaceable country. We've never loved war. We're the least warlike powerful nation in the history of the world. We can be trusted with the military power that is our responsibility to hold. We maintain it only for the good, never for territorial gain or imperialist desires. We work for peace by staying strong, so that we may be a nation at peace with ourselves and at peace with the world.

If we keep these things in mind, if we retain our economic strength, help our children, strengthen the bonds that keep us together, and work for peace, then the well will not run dry again. We will have replenished it -- and more. We'll move forward. The future will be bright and shining; our nation will continue to be what it's always been -- a place of refuge for those who come from places that are not free and not fair, a place of great hope and endless possibilities.

Winston Churchill surveyed the Western World, and he said, ``We have not journeyed all this way across the centuries, across the oceans, across the mountains, across the prairies, because we're made of sugar candy.'' Well, like many of you, I share his spirit. We can do anything when we set our minds to it.

The dream of America is much more than who we are or what we do; the dream is what we will be. We must always be the New World, the world of discovery, the world that reveres the great truths of its past but that pushes on with unending faith toward the promise of the future. In my heart, I know we have that faith. The dream lives on. America will remain future's child, the golden hope of all mankind.

Mr. Thomas. As I indicated earlier, President Reagan has indicated that he'd be willing to take a few questions from our audience. We have collected your cards. Our committee has reviewed them and tried to distill the essence of them into a few succinct questions which I have. So, I'll ask the President to come back to the podium at this time, and I'll address those questions to him.

Mr. President, looking over the questions, this audience is very concerned about four things, I would say in this order -- the federal deficit, interest rates, our international competitive position, and the Chicago Cubs. Now, you've already dealt with the last one -- [laughter] -- so we'll get on with the others.

And the first one deals with our Midwest economy. We had an excellent panel discussion this morning, and I think we all would agree we have challenges and opportunities here. But one of our very significant problems in the Midwest is the very substantial net outflow of tax dollars to other, faster-growing regions of this country. Now, what might you suggest that we do to reverse this trend, if you have any thoughts on that particular subject?

The President. Well, we have been trying a thing that we call federalism, and we've run into some of the same kind of opposition we've written on some of the -- or we've run into on some of the other things we tried. One of the things that we would like to see more of is block grants, where that's all that we can resort to, instead of the Federal Government dictating and spending the money.

It's true that there are, oh, probably someplace between a dozen and 20 States that are considered to be the rich ones, and they must help support the others. What we would like to do, even rather than block grants, and what we have not done as much of as we would like, and that is to wherever possible turn back to the States and local communities tax sources that presently are held by the Federal Government, and turn back with them the responsibility for functions that properly should be administered at State and local level that the Federal Government is not as well equipped to perform as they are.

And I think in this way there would be some help with what you're saying. I know it has to seem unfair when you're in one of those States. Recently, some years ago, when New York was having its great problems with bankruptcy, I thought at the time that it was pretty ironic that New York was considered way up at the top of the list as one of the States that could afford to help out the other States.

The President. Well, I know that I'm accused of not being very specific on this. I think we've been more specific than almost any administration that I can remember, if you will look at the program that we started to implement when we first came here.

Now, what we're going to continue to do are two things in attacking the deficits. One of them is look at the deficit as being partly structural and partly the result of the economic slump. Now, as you bring back the economy and it expands, even at the lower tax rates that we put in as an incentive to help bring back the economy, your revenues grow. They don't shrink. So, we are reducing the deficit right now. The one for this year will probably be some 20-odd billion dollars less than we had estimated ourselves that it was going to be, simply because of the economic recovery. That is one thing.

The other thing is reducing government spending. I still think that a federal government has a higher overhead than is necessary. We haven't made all the gains that we wanted. As a matter of fact, had we gotten all that we asked for in our first submission of our program, the deficit would be between $40 billion and $50 billion less right now.

But we see the deficit as one in which, as the economy improves -- and that brings up revenues without increasing the actual rates on the individual -- and if, at the same time, we can continue -- we have 2,478 specific recommendations by the Grace commission, where they came in and looked at all of government and made recommendations, as businessmen and women, as to where government could be run more like a productive business -- we have a team looking at those. We have already implemented by administrative decree some 17 percent of those.

Now, as we bring government costs down, the share that government is taking from the private sector, and as the recovery brings income up, there must be a point out here at which those two will meet. Now, if they don't -- and this is what I mean by those today who are saying that the first resort is increased taxes. We say it is the last resort. If you come to a point where you've done all you can do with regard to economic recovery, and the revenues fall short of that line, and you've done all you can do to bring government down to be as efficient and economical as it should be and still perform the services that we can expect of government and those two are apart, then you have to look at your tax system to bridge that difference.

But today, to suggest a tax increase simply for the cure of the deficit -- we've had any number of tax increases over the last 50 years, and we have had regularly deficits every year for 50 years, every year since World War II. Well, we had them during the war, but that's the kind of deficit we could expect, and then you'd pay off in the years following the war. But in the 5 years before we came here to office, the taxes doubled in those 5 years and the deficits increased.

The deficit we have to face is an effect, not a cause. The cause is when government takes too big a percentage from the private sector, you're going to have economic troubles. Government is going to become a drag on the economy. And this is what we're trying to cure.

The President. Well, it isn't easy. We do know that sometimes -- and our law provides for this -- that sometimes there are emergency situations in which an industry has suffered unfairly, and temporarily you can give that industry some help to get it back on its feet.

Basically, however, I think we have to be opposed in principle to protectionism because it's a two-way street. Having looked for my first job in the depths of the Great Depression -- graduating in 1932 -- I, looking back, have some idea of what the Smoot-Hawley tariff bill did to the Depression worldwide. And I think that free trade is the best answer. But free trade must also be fair trade. And what you have recited there is that many times the protectionism can help heal a particular segment, but no one pays any attention to the disaster or the depression that is created over here in other areas.

And it is true that in some instances the competition is unfair, that things like steel had been sent into this country that are subsidized by a foreign government and are selling below their cost of production, which our people can't do. And there we have rules and have invoked them in these 3\1/2\ years at times to prevent that. And we'll continue to do that.

The President. See? Forty-three States. I had it as Governor of California, and I inherited a situation out there where, in spite of a constitutional provision that we could not have a deficit, I walked into office in the middle of the fiscal year and we already had a deficit.

The line-item veto -- I invoked it more than 900 times in those 8 years, and we didn't have an unbalanced budget very long. We solved that problem. It's absolutely necessary; it's the most vital tool.

Now, the Congress has the right to overcome that veto, to override it, if they feel strongly enough to do it. You know, in all of my more than 900 vetoes, the legislature that had passed the bills to begin with never once overrode one of those vetoes. They never once dared stand up and publicly vote for that single item that they had agreed to put into another bill.

Mr. Thomas. We have one last question. This is a little different thrust, but very important, nevertheless. Affirmative action and job training have been of great assistance to minorities. Since your administration has reduced the impact of these programs, what do you propose to do to replace them?

The President. What we are opposed to is not affirmative action so much as a quota system. And having grown up, as I did, in a time when there were prejudices of all kinds, you find that the quota can be used, actually, as an instrument of discrimination, not to cure it. We have in place today throughout the country a job training program that we believe encompasses the proper ideas, and that is that as a team between the Federal Government, local authorities, and local businesses to train people in those areas for the jobs that are available in those areas.

The Federal Government in the past, with many of its job training programs, they really were just make-work programs. They didn't train anyone, really, for a specific job, and there was no relationship between the area where the training was taking place and the residence of the people and whether there were jobs once they were trained, that there would be jobs in those areas. Now, this program of ours -- incidentally, the CETA program, only about 18 cents out of each dollar actually went into job training in that program. That's why we don't have it anymore. In this program, over 70 cents of every dollar is being spent on actual job training, and already we're seeing tens of thousands of people going through that program and almost immediately out into productive jobs.

Now, I know that there's been a lot of criticism that somehow I am opposed to civil rights. My mother and father would come back and jump on my back if I ever did. I was raised to believe that there's no sin greater than prejudice or bigotry. And I grew up that way. In fact, back in those days, broadcasting the Cubs and all, I was one of the handful of sports commentators throughout the country that was even then campaigning for an elimination of the rules that had kept minorities out of organized baseball, and, finally, there was triumph in that.

I was fighting for civil rights before they called it civil rights. And so any translation of this criticism of the management of some of the affirmative action programs in an attempt to make that look as if I'm not supportive of the elimination -- the goal in this country must be, and we haven't completely reached it yet, but it must be the day will come when whatever is done to someone, or for someone, is neither because of nor in spite of any difference in race or religion.

And I thank all of you. It's a deep honor for me to speak to you, the members of one of the oldest and largest Jewish organizations in America. For more than 140 years, B'nai B'rith has sponsored religious, cultural, and civic programs, conducted studies of vital issues, combated bigotry, and worked tirelessly to advance the cause of tolerance and humanity. And because of your efforts, today our country has a bigger heart, a deeper sense of the generosity of spirit that must always define America. And on behalf of all Americans, I thank you.

Well, today, as President, I come before you to report on the progress that we've made together during these past 4 years. Once again, I want to talk about American policy toward Israel -- today's new policy of deepened friendship and strengthened support. But first, permit me to share with you my view of how working together the American people have replaced our own nation's descent into impotence and despair with the rebirth of freedom, prosperity, and hope.

The prime interest rate was rising sharply, and in December 1980 it reached a point not seen since the Civil War. In just 4 years, taxes roughly doubled, and average monthly mortgage payments more than doubled, and the real after-tax income of the average American actually began to decline. It all added up to the worst economic crisis our country had faced since the Great Depression.

In foreign affairs we had lost the respect of friend and foe alike, and our willpower had grown weak and soft, undermining commitments to allies like Israel. Our leaders seemed to have lost faith in the American people and in America's future. They spoke of a national malaise. On television, we saw the Stars and Stripes being burned in foreign capitals. And from Afghanistan to Grenada, the Soviets were on the march. Seldom in all its proud history had the United States of America reached such a pathetic state of apparent impotence.

Well, today, just 4 years later, we're seeing not humiliation but well-justified pride -- pride in our country, our accomplishments, and ourselves. On the economic front, from New York Harbor to San Diego Bay, a vast and vigorous economic expansion is taking place. Inflation has plummeted to just 4 percent, and the prime interest rate has fallen by almost 9 points.

Productivity is up, consumer spending is up, housing starts are up, and take-home pay is up. Our tax rate reductions have restored incentives to the American people, and when tax indexing goes into effect this January, they'll get more help in the form of long overdue protection against the unfairness of bracket creep.

The best news of all: During the past 19 months, 6\1/2\ million men and women have found jobs that we've created -- on an average, each month, more jobs than all the Common Market countries combined created in the last 10 years. Europe is calling our success the American miracle.

Well, as we've worked to promote economic growth we've made certain that the safety net for the truly needy has remained in place. Indeed, after correcting for inflation, under our administration average food stamp payments, medicare payments, medicaid payments, have all risen. We can and are promoting economic vitality, while showing the disadvantaged genuine compassion.

On civil rights, we have enforced the law with new determination. The Justice Department, since we took office, has filed more criminal charges on civil rights violations, brought more violators to trial, and achieved more civil rights convictions than ever before. So, let no one doubt our commitment. As President, I will enforce civil rights to the fullest extent of the law.

I'm old enough to remember a time -- when America did have quotas, and they were used in an attempt to make discrimination legitimate and permanent, keeping Jews and other targets of bigotry out of colleges, medical schools, and jobs. And I can't state it too forcefully: This type of thing must never happen again.

To combat crime, our administration has increased the law enforcement budget by more than 20 percent, established 12 regional drug task forces around the country, and hired more than 1,900 new investigators and prosecutors. We've also reasserted some very basic values -- values that say there is such a thing as right and wrong, that the innocent victim is entitled to as much protection under the law as the accused, that individual actions do matter, and that, yes, for hardened criminals preying on our society, punishment must be certain and swift.

And now that we're getting back to these fundamentals of our Judeo-Christian tradition, the will of the people is at last being done. In 1982 reported crime dropped 3 percent -- the first decline since 1977. And last year reported crime dropped 7 percent, and this is the first time the serious crime index has ever shown a drop for the second year in a row, and the sharpest decline in crime statistics since 1960.

In the Armed Forces, our troops have newer and better equipment, and their morale has soared as we've begun to give them the pay, the training, and the respect they've always deserved. And in foreign affairs, our country is being respected again throughout the world as a leader for peace and freedom. We've strengthened our relations with Asian allies like Korea and Japan, deepened our friendship with China. In Europe, we and our NATO allies went through months of Soviet attempts to divide us and emerged more firmly united than ever. And in Central America, we're supporting the free nations of the region against the threat posed to them by the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua.

America or, through callous indifference, withdraw from that region altogether. These politicians would give free reign to Marxist-Leninists who would persecute Central American Catholics and Jews, leaving them defenseless against Sandinista intolerance.

American Jews is illustrated by a growing interest in Jewish history and the Hebrew language, and by the rise of -- and I hope I get this right -- Baal Teshuva movement -- a powerful movement of Jews, young and old, Orthodox, Conservative, and Reformed, returning to the ancient ways of the faith.

As Americans of different religions find new meaningfulness in their beliefs, we do so together, returning together to the bedrock values of family, hard work, and faith in the same loving and almighty God. And as we welcome this rebirth of faith, we must even more fervently attack ugly intolerance. We have no place for haters in America.

Well, let me speak plainly: The United States of America is and must remain a nation of openness to people of all beliefs. Our very unity has been strengthened by this pluralism. That's how we began; this is how we must always be. The ideals of our country leave no room whatsoever for intolerance, anti-Semitism, or bigotry of any kind -- none. The unique thing about America is a wall in our Constitution separating church and state. It guarantees there will never be a state religion in this land, but at the same time it makes sure that every single American is free to choose and practice his or her religious beliefs or to choose no religion at all. Their rights shall not be questioned or violated by the state.

During the dark days of World War II, legend has it, an event took place that I believe is a timeless symbol of regard for our fellow men that true tolerance and brotherhood demand. Soon after the Nazis invaded Denmark in 1940, they published an edict that all Jews identify themselves by wearing an armband showing the Star of David. Well, the next day the Christian King of Denmark appeared in public. He was wearing a Star of David. I was told on my one visit to Denmark there, that after he had done that every citizen of Denmark, from then on, appeared in the streets wearing the Star of David.

A renewal of faith and confidence, a resurgent economy, a rebirth of strength and purposefulness in our foreign relations -- yes, we Americans have made a new beginning, just as 4 years ago I said that we must. And this new beginning is good not only for us but for our allies. And now, it is to our relations with Israel that I would like to turn.

The first step in understanding American-Israeli relations is to recognize our common values, aspirations, and interests. This has fundamental consequences for our diplomacy in an environment of widespread hostility to Israel. Nowhere does this hostility appear more clearly than in that international institution that should be a citadel of good will, but that all too often becomes a platform for propaganda -- the United Nations. From the 1970's on, the United Nations has too often allowed itself to become a forum for the defamation of Israel.

Well, sadly, in the years thereafter the United States did not always give Israel such steadfast support. American policy toward Israel was often weak and muddled. It reached a low point on March 1, 1980. That day the American delegate to the United Nations actually voted in favor of a resolution that repeatedly condemned Israel. Some 48 hours later, President Carter disavowed the vote and announced to the press that it had all been a mistake -- a bad mistake. And it certainly had.

Well, since taking office our administration has used every effort to reaffirm before the world our unwavering support for the State of Israel. And in the United Nations, our stand has been made unmistakable by our Ambassador and your good friend, Jeane Kirkpatrick. Just 3 weeks ago at the United Nations Population Conference in Mexico City, we joined Israel in opposing and voting against a resolution that attacked the State of Israel. And let me make it plain to the friends and enemies of Israel alike that what Max Fisher just told you is absolutely true and still the policy of this Government, and that if ever expelled, yes, Max, and all of you, we walk out together with Israel.

In concrete terms, our administration has strengthened the American-Israeli alliance in three crucial ways. First, we have upgraded and formalized our strategic cooperation. For the first time in history, under our administration, the United States and Israel have agreed on a formal strategic relationship. The American-Israeli Joint Political-Military Group has already begun regular meetings. Together, we're developing plans for joint efforts to counter the Soviet threat to our mutual interests in the Middle East.

Recently, we renewed an American-Israeli memorandum of agreement that provides for cooperation in military research and development, procurement, and logistics. Under the terms of the agreement, the United States has already purchased Israeli-manufactured radios, remotely piloted vehicles, antitank weapons, and components for sophisticated aircraft. We, in turn, are making available the latest technology for the development of the Israeli-designed LAVI fighter aircraft and for a new class of missile attack boat, the SAAR 5.

And third, we have begun formal negotiations with Israel for a free trade area agreement. When signed and ratified, this agreement will allow the duty-free entry of Israeli products into the United States and will at the same time completely open the Israeli market to American goods.

These measures have made our relations with Israel closer and our friendship stronger than at any time in the history of our two nations. Indeed, Prime Minister Shamir recently described American-Israeli relations as having never been better. And that warm relationship is crucial as we strive together for peace in the Middle East. So, let me outline our work in this regard.

America's peace efforts still stand on the foundation of the Camp David accords. Those accords, which established peaceful relations between Israel and Egypt, led to the return of the Sinai to Egypt by Israel in April of 1982, and the United States was proud to play a central role in achieving this step of the Camp David process. Then on September 1st of 1982, I set forth a set of fair and balanced positions on the key issues -- issues which the negotiating parties must deal with to achieve a lasting peace. The positions I outlined included our firm opposition to the formation of any independent Palestinian state. Today those positions remain fully valid, and they represent the foundation of our continuing labors.

And let me assure you, we will never attempt to impose a solution on Israel, nor will we ever weaken in our opposition to terrorism by the PLO or by anybody else. As I said when I addressed you in 1980, terrorists are not guerillas or commandos or freedom fighters or anything else.

Today the United States is rebuilding its defenses, and that is restoring confidence in our leadership and making the parties more willing to take risks for peace. Today the United States has re-energized its vast and productive economy, and that will help to make Israel more prosperous. And today the United States has stopped wringing its hands apologetically and once again begun to play its rightful role in the world with faith, confidence, and courage. And that means Israel can depend on us.

We who are friends of Israel may differ over tactics, but our goal remains always unchanged -- permanent security for the people of that brave State. In this great enterprise, the United States and Israel stand forever united. And as we approach the Jewish holiday of Rosh Hashanah, let us pray that the new year will be a Shanah Tovah Umetukah -- a good and sweet year for both America and Israel.

For make no mistake: In a world where so many are hostile to freedom, where millions live in poverty and oppression, those few nations who share the light of liberty must stand together. If we do not, we take the awful chance that the darkness will overwhelm us one by one. But standing together, we can pierce the darkness and shed our light over all the Earth.

In view of all relevant aspects of this case, I have determined that granting import relief is not consistent with our national economic interest. The imposition of import restrictions -- either in the form of quotas, tariffs, or orderly marketing agreements -- would create a differential between U.S. and world copper prices. Consequently, it would seriously disadvantage the copper-fabricating industry in the United States, which employed an estimated 106,000 workers in 1983, vis-a-vis foreign competitors. Such a result would, over time, shrink domestic demand for copper and add to the serioius problems faced by U.S. copper producers.

Import relief would also adversely affect the export earnings of the foreign copper-producing countries, many of which are heavily indebted and highly dependent on copper exports. It would, therefore, complicate our efforts to maintain the stability of the international financial system and lessen the ability of foreign countries to import goods from the United States. Finally, there are encouraging signs that the economic recovery is beginning to have a favorable effect on world copper prices; stocks have fallen considerably this year and a significant price increase is expected in the near future. The denial of import relief on copper should act as a signal and as encouragement to our partners around the world to resist protectionist acts and, thus, will foster that recovery.

In order to help ease the difficult problems now faced by many workers in the U.S. copper industry, I have directed the Secretary of Labor to work with State and local officials to develop a plan of job retraining and relocation assistance for workers in affected industries. In addition, I have directed the Secretary of Commerce to actively monitor the domestic copper industry including inventories and the levels of copper imports.

In view of all relevent aspects of this case, I have determined that granting import relief is not consistent with our national economic interest. The imposition of import restrictions -- either in the form of quotas, tariffs, or orderly marketing agreements -- would create a differential between U.S. and world copper prices. Consequently, it would seriously disadvantage the copper-fabricating industry in the United States, which employed an estimated 106,000 workers in 1983, vis-a-vis foreign competitors. Such a result would, over time, shrink domestic demand for copper and add to the serious problems faced by U.S. copper producers.

The President. Well, I won't speak for another country, I'll speak for my own. I think there has been a growing awareness on the part of people in both parties here that the increase in government and in government intervention in what had traditionally been the private sector, and so forth, is finally catching up with us. The people have found that the cost of government has skyrocketed and that there are things that government cannot do as well as the private sector.

The President. On the international scene? Well, it has to be peace, and it has to be reduced arms, particularly in the strategic field. I have to believe that if we can persuade the Soviet Union to join in reducing those weapons, that perhaps we can all see the wisdom of not only reducing but eliminating. I don't think the world should have to live with this threat hanging over it.

And it really doesn't make any sense. Every weapon that's ever been introduced until this one has had defensive measures that followed. And you could look at war as winnable or losable in the normal sense. But we've come to a point now that a previous President of ours, Dwight Eisenhower, said might happen. We've come to a point where a war with the weapons now at hand -- there is no foreseeing a victory or defeat in the traditional terms. The weapons are capable of destroying mankind and civilization. When that time comes, as he himself said, then it's time for the nations to sit down and find another way of settling disputes.

Q. You have always argued that America must only negotiate with the Soviet Union from strength. The Reagan years have seen a rebuilding of America's military might, yet the Soviets stubbornly refuse to talk. What would a second Reagan administration do to bring Moscow to the negotiating table?

The President. We are determined to reduce arms and the danger of nuclear war by negotiating balanced, fair, and verifiable agreements. And it's important to remember that we are talking and negotiating with the Soviets -- at the CDE Conference in Stockholm and at the MBFR talks in Vienna. We are not just sitting back and waiting. In fact, at our suggestion, we successfully negotiated a new and better hotline agreement that further reduces the possibility of misunderstandings and accidents.

With regard to the START and INF talks, we cannot, of course, compel the Soviet Union to return to the negotiating table. But I think these negotiations will be resumed eventually, because they are as much in Soviet interests as in ours. And I would point out that the world community of nations wants the Soviet Union to resume negotiations. But the Soviet political structure has had three leaders in as many years, and this has undoubtedly complicated and slowed Soviet decisionmaking. An example of this was the Soviet refusal to meet with us in Vienna after we accepted their suggestion to initiate discussions on space weaponry. We were accommodating, but Moscow continually backtracked and invented excuses not to go. As Foreign Minister Howe so aptly phrased it, ``They wouldn't take `yes' for an answer.'' We, nonetheless, will continue to be patient and hold to a steady policy.

The President. Let me begin by saying that for us, the Atlantic alliance is an anchor, an enduring affirmation of the vitality of Western civilization and an unshakable commitment to the defense of democracy and individual liberty. The defense of Europe and America is indivisible. We are dedicated to peace. That means NATO must be strong enough to make certain that conflict does not begin.

But we cannot be content with the accomplishments of the past. We cannot rest easy with the knowledge that NATO has made possible the longest period of European peace and prosperity in modern history.

As we look to the future, there are compelling reasons to strengthen even further our unity and our capability to sustain the peace. That is why the United States has made major improvements in our defenses, both by modernization and by increasing the readiness and sustainability of those forces. And that is why our NATO allies should also improve their defenses. We understand the cost and sacrifices, but we are confident that all members of the alliance understand that our collective security will continue to be an indispensable bulwark against aggression and tyranny.

My administration opposes any move to reduce the U.S. commitment to Western Europe, and we will continue to do so. It is my intent to maintain the force in Europe necessary to sustain the peace and to perform their assigned mission in support of NATO's strategy. And as I have said repeatedly, we have absolutely no plans of any kind to reduce the number of U.S. troops assigned to Western Europe's defense.

The President. I hope there is a better understanding of what we and our allies are trying to do than your question suggests. Our basic belief is that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. In an effort to build an enduring peace and to reduce the level of arms, we have presented the most comprehensive set of arms control and weapons reduction proposals in history.

Union in a dialog as serious and constructive as Soviet leaders permit. We all recognize that there is no more important consideration than the development of a better working relationship with the Soviet Union -- one marked by greater cooperation and understanding and leading to stable, secure, and peaceful relations.

This has been and will continue to be a primary goal of my administration. We and the Soviets need to find ways to eliminate the threat and use of force in solving international disputes, to lower arms levels, and to establish a better working relationship with each other. We remain ready to negotiate fairly and flexibly and without preconditions. When the Soviet leadership decides to return to the START and INF negotiating table, we'll meet them halfway. And our allies fully share these aims and objectives, as the NATO declaration this past May pointed out. And at the London summit this past June, the industrialized nations agreed on a common approach that demonstrates the fundamental consensus that exists among our governments on our approach to relations with the U.S.S.R.

I hope more people will come to understand that I have no higher priority than strengthening peace. Our perseverance and patience will, in time, move us toward a safer and more peaceful world. And if the American people return me for a second term, I will continue to pursue these goals.

Q. Rightly or wrongly, many Europeans blame record U.S. deficits for stymying their economic recovery. You won in 1980 promising to balance the budget. Why should policies to cut the deficit in a second term be believed?

The President. We are determined to reduce the deficit, and I firmly believe it can and will be done. We need to attack the fundamental problem, which is excessive Federal spending. We are trying to deal with the deficit problem not by taxing America into a recession, as some would do, but by making government live within its means and building an economy that generates jobs and tax revenue. Our economic recovery has already brought down the deficit from the dire predictions of 2 years ago.

I might also point out that the economic recovery in America is helping to stimulate growth in the economies of the West European countries. Indeed, we have witnessed a revival in world trade with a marked rise in exports from Europe to the U.S., which has helped to spread the benefits of our recovery.

I have been trying to get a balanced budget amendment to our Constitution. I am also working to get the line-item veto adopted, by which a President can veto individual items in an appropriations bill without vetoing the entire bill. Forty-three State Governors have that tool. I had it in California, and it works.

We won't even consider raising taxes until after we have cut Federal spending to that minimum level which is necessary to finance truly necessary activities. The best way to bring down the deficit is through prudent government spending levels and strong economic growth and expansion. That's our program in a nutshell, and it will benefit Europe as well as America.

Q.  What will a reelected Ronald Reagan do to disprove the common criticism that he has been content to see spending cuts fall disproportionately on the weakest members of society and that he cares only for the ``achievers'' in America?

Our reforms are reducing fraud, waste, and abuse and targeting welfare programs to better serve the truly needy, rather than those who ought to work and be self-supporting. The money saved by these reforms has already helped make it possible for three-fourths of the States to raise either their payment standards or payment levels under a program that aids truly needy families.

I understand how politically rewarding it is for critics to pretend we've been unfair, but the facts just don't bear them out. And remember, those critics are the same people whose ruinous inflation fell so heavily on the poor, especially in 1979 and 1980. This government is spending more money on social programs than ever in U.S. history, but at last somebody's trying to make those programs work better.

Republican Party is still a minority party, and that means we're still outnumbered nationwide in terms of party registration. But I think you have to look beyond that to see the real strength and vitality of the Republican Party.

There was a time when the opposite party was able to portray Republicans as rather stodgy types, resistant to progress. But in recent years that's changed dramatically. Today it's the Republican Party that has new, forward-looking ideas, that stands for a revitalized economy and jobs. It's the leaders of the Democratic Party who are tied to the failed policies of the past.

You can see this in the fact that one of the Republican Party's great strengths in 1984 is its appeal to the youngest generation of voters. What I'm saying is that the new vibrancy and confidence of the Republican Party goes far beyond the political fortunes of any one candidate, including myself.

The President. Well, I can understand the crowded agenda that they have with regard to the election and the necessity to adjourn for campaigning and so forth. So, no, I don't think there's anything unusual about that at all.

The President. The correct words to use is there is a wall of separation. And some anti-religionists are trying to break down that wall. And what I was saying was in the context of, yes, definitely, there is a connection between morality and politics, and should be, and too many neglect it.

Young people across the country returned to school this week. The approach of autumn marks the end of the year, but somehow it always seems to be a time of new beginnings in the home and the workplace and in the classroom.

We've seen a great resurgence of interest in how our public schools run the past few years. We've seen a new seriousness about the importance of education in our lives. You may remember when a commission we appointed almost 3 years ago to study the state of our schools concluded that if another country had done to our schools what we ourselves did to them, we would be justified in calling it an act of war.

But already things are beginning to turn around. It's been one of those great American stories, a little like how neighbors used to band together to raise a house out of the wilderness. Teachers and school principals and school boards have joined with parents and local community leaders to turn things around. Scholastic aptitude test scores are turning up. Academic performance is up, and more parents are showing confidence in the schools.

School up at Sherman Station, Maine, was named by the Department of Education as an exemplary school. At Katahdin, they encourage students and teachers to work together and understand each other's problems. They have firm disciplinary rules. Teachers feel they have a say in how the school is run. They can get the supplies they need. And they're looking to the future.

Then there's Jefferson High School in Los Angeles, a big city school with 2,000 students, most of them Hispanic or black. Principal Francis Nakano came to Jefferson 2 years ago and found walls full of graffiti and halls full of unruly youngsters. But Nakano turned it around. He started with discipline -- fast, firm, and fair. He overhauled the buildings to create a climate for learning. He encouraged learning, recognizing and giving honors to the school's best scholars and helping slow learners with a special program that has them sign a personal contract accepting responsibility for their own progress in return for special, individual instruction.

These are just two schools that are a part of our national renewal in education. But what we're doing isn't enough; we've got to do better. I propose that this week the young people starting school and their parents and future employers accept some challenges, and they'll be tough challenges, the type you have to meet by yourself.

First challenge: Before this decade is out, we should regain at least half of what we lost in the sixties and seventies on scholastic aptitude test scores. As I said before, those scores are inching their way up, but not fast enough. Now, if you think that ``I can't do anything to help,'' you're wrong. If you're a student who will take the scholastic aptitude test this year, study hard and do your very best. You can help lift our national average.

Second, violence and disorder have no place in our schools. Parents worry about it, and so do many children. Before this decade is out, we should reduce crime in the schools so much that it becomes a mere anecdote in studies about our schools.

Third, there's the problem of dropouts. Our high school dropout rate is now 27\1/2\ percent. I propose that before this decade is out the public schools of this country reduce the dropout rate to 10 percent or less. You know, when a girl or boy drops out of school, we tend to think the child failed the system. But I wonder sometimes if it isn't also true that the system failed the child.

There's one other great challenge I want to speak to you about: watching too much TV. Now, I don't want to sound like a scolding parent, but time given to a television show that ought to be given to a school book is time badly used. TV is entertaining and sometimes educational. It's part of the fabric of our lives. But watching TV is passive, it's not living life.

Life involves effort and growth. You won't grow by watching a situation comedy, though you can grow by reading a book. I hope we aren't becoming a nation of watchers, because what made us great is that we've always been a nation of doers.

Americans are showing a renewed attention today to the importance of strong families for raising the next generation of Americans. Families are the chief repository of our nation's values but, more than that, they are centers of love and affection, where each individual is accepted as a unique person, created in the image of God.

They provide their grandchildren with a living sense of continuity with our past and so with the confidence to face an uncertain future. Grandparents provide love, instruction and adult authority to their grandchildren just as they once provided them to their own children. Sometimes grandparents live in the same home as their grandchildren and sometimes they live many miles away, but in either case they can and often do play a very important role in their grandchildren's development.

Some grandparents are retired and have the time and energy to devote themselves to the many volunteer efforts which distinguish our nation and contribute so greatly to the general welfare. In this way, they share their experience in life not only with their own families, but with many others as well. Those grandparents deserve a special word of thanks from all of us.

Well, since my childhood I was always told about the luck of the Irish. And after the Illinois lottery, that phrase is bound to be changed a bit -- [laughter] -- the luck of the Polish. Now, that has a nice ring to it, doesn't it?

I think we're all winners because we have the great good fortune to be living in the United States of America. And I think we're all winners because we have the great fortune to be living in the United States of America. And I have the delight of being back in the great State of Pennsylvania.

I realize that I repeated myself when I said something there, but if I had to say something twice, I don't know of anything more important to say than about the pleasure of living in the United States of America.

This has been a most inspiring day. This shrine with its magnificent stained glass stands out not only as a monument to the heart and soul of Polish America but as a tribute to the cause of human freedom itself. And those who chose the location for this shrine did their job well.

Not far from here, our Declaration of Independence was penned and our liberty proclaimed. Not far from here, General George Washington and his ragtag army, many of the soldiers without shoes, endured a winter of despair. And it was in that time of darkness for America when giants in the cause of human liberty stepped forward and helped turn the tide.

Kosciuszko. These heroes from faraway Poland helped spark a flame of liberty that still burns white hot in the soul of all who cherish freedom. And from what I'm seeing today, that is especially true of the Americans of Polish descent.

Well, I was honored to welcome such people to lunch at the White House just a few weeks ago, the veterans of the Polish Home Army. Their valor in the struggle against Nazi oppression has never been surpassed in the annals of human conflict. I was more than a little in awe of them. And I'm proud that after 40 years, the proper tribute has finally been paid to the commanders of the Polish Home Army.

It wasn't that long ago when a new force for freedom emerged in Poland, the Solidarity union movement. And 4 years ago, when I kicked off my campaign, I was joined on the platform in the shadow of the Statue of Liberty by the stepfather of Lech Walesa, a working man with strong arms who emigrated to this country and could speak to us only through an interpreter. He's passed away, I'm sad to say, since that day. But his son lives on, and no matter how they try to suppress it, so does the spirit of Solidarity.

We see in the Polish people a mirror image of our own commitment to the simple virtues of honesty and hard work. The millions of Polish immigrants who came to America -- many were your own fathers and mothers -- these brave and sturdy people helped shape the American character. Their energy, sweat, and muscle built our factories; their moral strength is part of our national backbone.

We Americans who are not related to Poland by blood are related to her by spirit. Just as Polish immigrants decades ago bolstered America's resolve to live up to its ideals, so, too, a brave son of Poland now inspires all of mankind. The world is truly blessed that in this time of peril and confusion a spiritual leader of great historical significance is with us. We've sought his advice and guidance on numerous occasions, and I can only say, thank God for Pope John Paul II.

You know, when I was in the chapel earlier I could sense the love and pride that went into the re-creation of the Black Madonna. And I'm told that as a symbol of the brave Polish peoples' religious faith and freedom, Our Lady has been a special inspiration to the Holy Father.

I have to interject something here. I have seen held up several times back there a banner with regard to Yalta. There is one thing about that that I have to say. Let us not be tempted into giving Yalta as coverage to those who have violated that agreement; that the agreement never gave them the power to dominate the countries of Eastern Europe and Poland as they have.

I've known four wars -- four wars -- in my lifetime, and not one of them came about because we were too strong. Weakness is the greatest enemy of peace. We're trying to build a future for our children that is free, prosperous, and secure -- a future of boundless hope and opportunity. And we're not doing this by wishful thinking in foreign affairs or by going back to economic policies that failed.

Our new beginning is a far cry from the defeatism, decline, and despair of only 4 years ago. We were then on the edge of an economic disaster. Today we're in one of the most powerful economic expansions in 40 years. More than 6 million people have found work in the last 20 months. Our European allies are calling this the American miracle. Small business incorporations are at a record high. Productivity is robust again, with research and development paving the way for an even brighter tomorrow. And, my friends, I said this the other day, and it's worth keeping on saying: You ain't seen nothin' yet.

While all this is happening, inflation has been knocked down from 12.4 to 4.1 percent. And, you know, when I hear some people talking about fairness, I'm reminded of the misery index they devised by adding the inflation and unemployment rates. But when they were in charge, the misery index was over 20. Today it's 11.6, and we'll bring it down more if they'll just stand aside and get out of the way.

Now, I know that some would never give us any credit and, frankly, the credit doesn't belong to us. It belongs to you, the people. Our victory against inflation, the wonderful resurgence of growth -- these are your victories; they're America's victories. If I could just offer a little friendly advice for our critics: next time, rather than say things that seem to run down America, how about giving the American people a pat on the back?

You in the Keystone State certainly deserve a pat on the back. You're aiming high, striving to make Pennsylvania's economy strong and competitive for the future. And I happen to believe you're blessed with one of the best Governors in our nation today -- Dick Thornburgh. Dick has a great gift of being able to pull together the many strengths and resources of your people.

Your Governor's Ben Franklin Partnership Program is a model for America. You can be proud that your State government, the business community, and many of your fine universities -- like the University City Science Center, Pennsylvania, Penn State, Lehigh, Bucknell, Lafayette, Carnegie Mellon, University of Pittsburgh, and others -- are working in harmony to spark technological growth and create secure jobs for the future. You can be proud that Pennsylvania is leading the way and showing it can be done.

Now, we've got challenges to overcome, but we won't overcome our problems by going back to the days when the Federal Government was taking more and more, knocking the economy right off its feet in the process. Raising taxes is an old answer. Some say it's the only answer. I say it's the wrong answer.

We're breaking new ground. And we must have the courage to keep moving forward with an historic simplification of the tax system. We intend to make the tax system more fair, easier to understand, so we can bring yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up.

Now, a certain candidate for national office said the other day that the biggest difference between us is our policies toward people of average means. And he's right. With our tax program, a family of average means today is paying $900 a year less in income taxes than if that candidate's last tax program were still in place.

And what about the future? Just to pay for the spending promises he made will require a tax increase of almost $2,000 for every household. Now, somehow I think that working families will see more fairness in our plan -- lower tax rates for all -- so that we can have more jobs, more growth, and more opportunity for all the people of Pennsylvania.

We want to build a fire of hope that links all America together, because with all of us going forward together we can build an American opportunity society that gives every person an equal chance and a much greater chance to pursue the American dream.

Now, I know this is not an exclusively partisan event, but after nearly 30 years of control, isn't it time for some fresh leadership in the House of Representatives? [Applause] And we can start by electing Dave Christian to the Congress.

A spirit of renewal and hope is alive again, and it will not be deterred by appeals to envy that would turn us against ourselves and take us back to the days of defeat and self-doubt. I do not believe in an America divided by envy, each of us challenging the other's success. I believe in an America inspired by opportunity, each of us challenging the best in ourselves.

The new patriotism is a positive force that unites us and draws us together -- all of us -- from every race, religion, and ethnic background. It gives us confidence because it's based on enduring values which we hold so dear -- the dignity of work, respect for family, faith in a loving God, a belief in peace through strength, and a commitment to protect the freedom which is our legacy as Americans.

Truman, and J.F.K., but who believe that its current leaders have changed it -- that they no longer stand firmly for America's responsibilities in the world; that they no longer protect the working people of this country -- we say to them, ``You are not abandoned, our arms are open, join us.

Just over 300 years ago, William Penn and a hearty band of settlers came here to establish a land of tolerance and liberty, a place where everyone, no matter what faith, could come to pray, to work, to achieve, and to build a great country. And we still believe in those things.

And she sent this as a gift to the people of the United States. And I can think of no more fitting place for it to reside than in this shrine, which is such an important symbol of the ties between our countries, and I am proud to present it to you at this time.

White House. You know, it's always a pleasure for me to greet people here. We should all be proud that this is one of the few executive residences in the world that's open to the people. So, when I say to you, ``Mi casa es su casa,'' it's literally true.

Our country often has been described as a nation of immigrants. Well, there is much truth in that description. And yet, today we recognize that the forebears of many Americans of Hispanic descent -- well, it was the United States that came to them, not the other way around.

That's true in Puerto Rico, throughout the Southwest. We Californians fully appreciate the highly developed Hispanic culture that existed in our State prior to its becoming part of the United States. As in the other States of the Southwest, there were thriving Hispanic cities, governments, ranches, and businesses. There was also a mission system built by a remarkable Franciscan priest named Father Junipero Serra, who's now under consideration for sainthood. I might add that all Californians are very proud of these missions.

Today, with this proclamation, we're reminding our fellow citizens that our Hispanic heritage is something of which all Americans can be proud. We're also celebrating the contemporary contributions of Americans of Hispanic descent. Having been in the profession I was in for most of my adult life, I knew many Americans of Hispanic descent in the performing arts. Anthony Quinn is showing off some of that talent right now at the Kennedy Center here in Washington.

In other professions, the list is equally impressive, from ophthalmologist Dr. Castro Viejo to fashion designer Oscar de la Renta. And today we honor them, but more importantly, we honor all those many millions of our citizens who so exemplify the values of family, work, and respect for God and love of country.

And when it comes to these basic building blocks of character, no group of citizens should be prouder than Americans of Hispanic descent. Over the years the contributions made by these people just by being good Americans have had an enormous impact on our way of life. With hard work they've built large corporations and accomplished great things. And when we look for exemplary individuals who have overcome great odds and endured much personal hardship, we know we'll find many in the Hispanic community. We only need to look there to see living proof that the American dream is alive and well. Whether their roots are from Cuba, Puerto Rico, Central America, or Mexico, they're here building a better America.

And yet success is not only measured in commercial and business accomplishment. Let us acknowledge the millions of heroic parents throughout the Hispanic community who, even though struggling to make ends meet, manage to raise their children with dignity and pride, see that they receive a good education, and teach them the values that are so important to Hispanic Americans -- the same values that help bind this nation together.

This is the character of the people which we applaud with Hispanic Heritage Week. We also recognize a love of country underlined throughout our history by so many acts of courage and valor. Within the Hispanic community are a host of heroes to whom this country owes a debt we can never repay.

I think of one, Allen Clark, whose mother is Hispanic. He lost both legs while serving his country in Vietnam. when he came home, his body was broken, but his spirit never faltered. He went back to school. He earned his master's degree in business administration. He served his State in a high government post and is now a successful businessman. He's an inspiration to all who know him.

And what gave him the confidence to overcome such a life-shattering experience? Well, he credits those values to his mother -- the values that his mother taught him early in life -- as the source of his strength.

One of the greatest strengths of our Nation is the rich mixture of people from various cultural backgrounds, and few groups have contributed more to our Nation than Americans of Hispanic heritage. In many communities across the land, Hispanics are a vital element in fostering America's achievements in the arts and industry, in agriculture and education, in religion and business, in science and politics, and in every other aspect of American life.

In our international relations, Hispanic Americans also contribute to our Nation's identity -- our own perception of who we are and our role in the world, as well as others' perception of us. The strong family and cultural ties which bind Hispanics in the United States with our nearest neighbors are an important element of the strength of the Western Hemisphere. The freedom of our neighbors is our freedom. Their security is our security. We Americans seek economic progress and justice for mutual benefit throughout the hemisphere, and we look to Americans of Hispanic heritage for leadership as we work together toward these goals.

Senator for 23 years. He was majority whip for his party in the Senate. He was Vice President of the United States. He ran for President three times and won the nomination of his party in 1968, when he came within a few hundred thousand votes of the Presidency.

There was in Hubert Humphrey a great joy of life and a truly buoyant civility. He was robust and energetic. He loved the battle. He was warm and affectionate. He was hearty and spirited. And he was nothing if not effusive. When he spoke, the words poured out of him. Some said he was deeply, endlessly articulate, and then there were others that said he was downright garrulous.

He was a masterful politician. Issues were everything to him, mere strategy a bore. He was no bully; his art was persuasion. He asked that he be remembered as ``an effective man of government,'' and he was certainly that. He lived in clamorous times, but he was ever optimistic.

He was a liberal who was an internationalist, a liberal who understood that America was great and has serious responsibilities in the world, a liberal who was strongly anti-Communist. He loved justice. He believed our Constitution is a living document that is reborn every day. He was a passionate democrat -- small ``d'' and big ``D'' -- who tried to make the world better according to his lights. And no one was better than he at infusing his followers with a fighting spirit.

Minneapolis, Hubert Humphrey was told that he was dying. He fought his sickness with the same spirit with which he'd lived his life. A week after his last operation, Humphrey showed up at an AFL - CIO convention to give a long-promised speech. He was thin and wan and his hair had gone white. He began his speech, ``I may start out a little wobbly, but I'm going to end up damn strong.'' He spoke for almost an hour, and he pounded the lectern so hard it jumped.

It was as if all of them were trying to reconnect with a part of an unchanging political past, trying to touch for the last time a special spirit and a special style that would go with Hubert Humphrey's passing. It's said that a lot of love passed along the lines those last few days. There was a lot of forgiving and a lot of encouraging and a lot of sharing of wisdom.

His passing left Washington a lesser place. He left a big silence behind him. He was a fine man, a patriot. And he understood that though good men and women can disagree on this issue or that, we must always stay bound by a common love of country.

Hubert Humphrey was a robust and active player in the dramas of our time for more than 30 years. He was a vivid presence on the scene. And looking back over his career, it's fair to say that his greatest contribution to his country was his life, a life that affirmed the vitality of democracy, affirmed the fact that the democratic process is alive and full of movement and action and great plans and decent dreams.

When we -- children and wife and friends -- planned Hubert's funeral, it was not a funeral ceremony that we planned. It was a celebration of his life. And I find that today, with this great tribute, this is a continuation of that celebration of that man's life. He was one man who made a great change in the life of our country. Thank you again, so very much.

Mr. Humphrey. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, honored guests: On behalf of my mother, my sister, and my brothers, and all of the members of our family, we gratefully accept the medal honoring Hubert Humphrey.

One of my highest priorities is finding ways to reduce the level of arms and to improve our working relationship with the Soviet Union. I hope that my meeting with him will contribute to this goal, as our administration continues to work for a safer world.

The President. Well, I would answer that the facts would belie any such supposition. The fact is we have proposed meetings with the Soviet Union on a number of occasions and for a number of reasons. We have not retreated from any meetings with them. And this is the time of the opening of the U.N. General Assembly, and he has announced his intention to come here. And so, I extended an invitation that while he's here, to come down to Washington.

The President. I don't know. The meeting will be confidential, but we're here. And as I say, I think that maybe with all the specifics that are before us in the various treaty negotiations -- some of which are continuing, but some of which they have walked away from -- I think maybe the time has come that anything that can perhaps get a better understanding between our two governments maybe should precede any resumption of dealings on specifics, if there can be an easing of any suspicion or hostility.

Q. Mr. President, there are reports that you're about to release a study showing Soviet violations of past arms control treaties. Are you going to release it, and are you afraid that might sour the atmosphere for this meeting with Mr. Gromyko?

Q. Mr. President, do you have any sense -- you and your advisers -- as to who is really in charge in the Kremlin and whether Mr. Gromyko is now sharing a much larger role of that collective leadership and what the health situation is with Mr. Chernenko?

The President. Andrea [Andrea Mitchell, NBC News], I'm not going to comment on what my opinion might be there. We know that the Government of the Soviet Union has traditionally been a kind of a collective government by the Politburo, and some leaders have over the years shown themselves as more dominant than others in that kind of collective. But I'm not going to hazard any guesses here because I've been facing a problem that no other President has faced, and that is the great turnover that in 3 years of my term in office we've had three leaders there. And I'm just not going to hazard a guess. I'm going to deal with the Government as it's presented to me.

Q. Is it your sense that with that kind of collective leadership that you might still be able to get a resumption of arms talks? And what is your relative priority between the strategic negotiations resuming and initiating talks on space weapons? Which would be the most critical as far as you're concerned?

You can't talk about militarization of outer space without recognizing that all the strategic ballistic missiles come by way of outer space. So, I think the most important thing to begin with is to see if we cannot lessen this threat hanging over the world -- and for which the Soviet Union and the United States are mainly responsible -- of these powerful weapons that could affect nations, all nations, whether they were involved in a controversy or not. That would have an effect on all of civilization, and I just want to see if we can't do something that will rid the world of this threat.

The President. Well, I don't think he's really submitted a budget -- or a deficit reduction plan. I think he's submitted a tax plan, a tax increase plan. In fact, the only real specifics -- three specifics there -- have to do with taxes.

As for any specifics on our part, they're voluminous, and they go back to 1981. I submitted four budgets and will be submitting a fifth before this term is out. And in all of those, they have thousands of words of substantiation, and had we been granted what I had asked in those budgets the deficit today would be $40 to $50 billion less.

So, we believe that the deficit will be reduced by continued growth of the economy and by getting control of spending to where it does not increase faster than the increase in revenues from the growth in economy.

Now, to keep the spending increase down we have already reduced the rate of increase in spending by almost two-thirds. So, we're going to continue along that line. We have 2,478 specific recommendations for improving the management of government for further economies that have been submitted by the Grace commission, which I asked to serve and to come in with recommendations for us. And we've got other facts that go along with this, specifics before the Congress: the enterprise zones, which are tied into increasing the economy, the enterprise zones legislation. We have the balanced budget amendment, the line-item veto. I think that I've put more specifics on the table in this term than probably any administration I know.

Q. But, sir, if I may, growth alone won't do it, because you yourself have said previously that spending cuts are the way you want to achieve your goal. Isn't it fair to spell out to the American people precisely what cuts you have in mind?

Now, what specifically has he proposed, other than some additional spending and his tax cuts and whacking away at the defense budget? But, as I say, the specifics are there and attested to by thousands of words of documentation.

It's as simple as this: If that rate of increase in spending can be brought down, as we've brought it down already, if at the same time, through economic growth, the rate of revenues begins to climb at a steeper rate, those two lines have to meet, and where they meet is a balanced budget. And this is what our plan is. [Laughter] If I had a blackboard -- but I would have looked like a teacher.

The U.S. and other Western Nations have proposed at the Stockholm conference a series of concrete measures for information, observation, and verification, designed to reduce the possibility of war by miscalculation or surprise attack. These measures would apply to the whole of Europe from the Atlantic Ocean to the Ural Mountains.

The Soviet Union, on the other hand, has taken a more rhetorical approach to the Conference, seeking the adoption of declarations which are embodied in other international agreements. In an effort to bridge this difference in our approaches, I made it clear in my address to the Irish Parliament in June that the U.S. will consider the Soviet proposal for a declaration on the nonuse of force as long as the Soviet Union will discuss the concrete measures needed to put that principle into action.

To prepare for the third round, Ambassador Goodby has consulted closely with our allies and conducted useful talks here in Washington with the head of the Soviet delegation to the Conference. The Ambassador and his delegation continue to enjoy my strong support in their efforts to achieve concrete results at Stockholm.

Our work in the Stockholm Conference complements our many other efforts to reach agreement on confidence-building measures. We and our allies have put forward similar proposals in the Vienna talks on East-West conventional force reductions (MBFR). Further, the United States has advanced confidence-building measures bilaterally with the Soviet Union in our successful effort to upgrade the ``hotline'' communications link and in our proposals for additional direct communications ties between our two countries. We have also made such proposals in the negotiations on strategic arms (START) and on intermediate nuclear forces (INF).

Unfortunately, the Soviet Union still has not returned to the START and INF talks since walking out of these two vital negotiations late last year and also has been unwilling or unable to follow through on its own proposal for talks on space arms control issues. I am convinced that the U.S. and the Soviet Union share a deep obligation to all humanity to get on with the urgent business of reducing nuclear arms. The United States is ready to do its part. I sincerely hope that the Soviet leadership will soon find its way to return to these negotiating tables.

Well, listen, I'm very happy to welcome all of you back, and I'm looking forward to discussing some important farm issues with you. But first, let me share some news with you for America's farm community.

Agriculture is notifying the Soviet Union -- that the Soviets can increase by 10 million metric tons their purchase of wheat and or corn for shipment during the second year of the agreement. And the ceiling for the second year of agreement is being raised to 22 million metric tons. And I've said many times, our philosophy is against the unfair and the wrong-headed policies of grain embargoes, and we're going to continue to do everything we can to strengthen markets for America's farmers. They're the most productive people, I think, on the face of the Earth.

The President has announced his intention to appoint Theresa Ann Elmore as Special Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs. Ms. Elmore is currently the Director of White House Administration and the White House liaison for the arts and humanities.

George Bush for President campaign, also served as adviser and finance director to several U.S. senatorial campaigns, and was on the Ford finance committee as well as inaugural and campaign staff of President Nixon.

These views and recommendations take into consideration the findings in Secretary Weinberger's report on ``Improving NATO's Conventional Capabilities.'' I have reviewed that report and endorse its recommendations. It is the product of thorough research and contains a candid assessment of NATO's achievements to date and additional needs for the future.

Few disagree with the pressing need to improve NATO's conventional forces in order to enhance deterrence and defense. The quality of NATO's equipment and the readiness and skill of the forces manning that equipment have improved significantly over the last several years. The absolute defense capabilities of NATO forces are substantially greater today than three or four years ago.

However, the measure of adequacy in deterrence and defense is not any static or absolute ability, but a dynamic relationship to the threat opposing that defense. The Warsaw Pact threat has increased by an even greater qualitative and quantitative increment, creating the necessity that NATO be ever more efficient and effective.

NATO's principal objective is not to fight and win a war, but to ensure that a war in Europe does not occur. Further improvements in conventional capability would augment a vital element of overall deterrence and lessen pressure for early escalation to nuclear confrontation. At the same time, as the DoD report concludes, conventional forces cannot totally supplant the nuclear dimension of deterrence. NATO must also continue to maintain a credible nuclear deterrent, as outlined in Secretary Weinberger's report on NATO's Nuclear Posture.

NATO's strategy must be based on the geographic and political realities of NATO, and the fact that NATO, as a defensive alliance, concedes the initiative at the outset of conflict. In this context, flexible response and forward defense provide the only viable deterrent and defense strategy for the Alliance. NATO's task is to do a better job of providing the forces and the doctrine to support the strategy.

The United States can be proud of our leadership by example over the last several years. We must continue to pursue those programs we have already begun, while seeking even more effective ways to enhance conventional defense. The support of Congress, in providing the funding for operations and maintenance costs, readiness, sustainment improvements, new equipment, force structure, research and development, and other defense programs, is essential to our efforts.

However, the United States cannot fill the gap alone. Every member of the Alliance must participate in improving conventional forces. The Allies recognize the need, and now must make the additional sacrifices needed to improve further NATO's military capabilities. The recent debate in the U.S. Senate will provide reinforcement to those Allies trying to assume their proportional burden. We will continue to prod all Allies to make better contributions to NATO defense.

Secretary Weinberger's report and the Supreme Allied Commander-Europe's (SACEUR's) independent assessment spell out the most important areas that need improvement. I agree with their recommendations. We must carefully balance our efforts, both by program area (such as readiness) and by task (such as defense against a first echelon). We must ensure that defense efforts and resources provide the most effective product for defense. We must critique the application of resources until we are satisfied that they are producing the optimum defense capability possible. No one can afford wastefully duplicative development programs, nor pursue programs that have only a limited military need. In sum, we must have a military strategy and an investment strategy. And these strategies should encompass our own programs and those of Allies -- in closer integration and cooperation than ever before.

The plans and programs in the current United States defense budget and five-year defense plan support these objectives. While we will continue to review plans and modify requests to fit new opportunities and requirements, enduring Congressional willingness to support required defense programs is essential if we are to improve NATO's conventional defense. No plan, no matter how well conceived, can succeed if the resources to achieve it are insufficient or inconsistent. We and our Allies have recognized NATO's conventional defense problems, and have taken the first steps toward recovery. Now, we must accelerate our efforts.

Making the changes necessary to supplement existing plans or to replace those which become obsolete requires bold thinking and leadership. We will continue to consult closely and frequently with our NATO Allies and with the U.S. Congress on new and better ways to use defense resources. There is no ``instant'' solution to any of the existing problems. Solutions will be achieved only by a long-term commitment. Nonetheless, we must start down the right paths, which are presented in Secretary Weinberger's report.

United States programs emphasize the need to provide the strategic lift to rapidly supplement in-place forces and to augment the thin strategic reserves available to SACEUR. We are working with Allies to ensure that Europe is prepared to receive these reinforcements and get them to where they can be most effective. We have stressed the need to increase the funding levels in the unglamorous but tremendously cost-effective Infrastructure Program. For example, by providing shelters and other supporting capabilities for aircraft, we can substantially improve the survivability and hence the capabilities of our Air Force.

Improving NATO's deterrent and defense posture will also require the Alliance to move in entirely new directions and to modify existing projects. ``Exploitation of Emerging Technologies'' is a fine example of new directions. This initiative, proposed by the United States in mid-1982, has already stimulated identification of projects for accelerated development. Although it will still be several years before this initiative contributes directly to NATO's defense capabilities, this effort marks an important first step in using the West's major advantage: its technological base.

In the short term, we must improve the deterrent capability of the conventional leg of NATO's deterrent Triad by increasing readiness and sustainability. Over the longer term, we must devote the necessary resources to provide all of the elements of an effective defense. This will require a clear understanding by the publics in all NATO countries of the nature and magnitude of the threat we all face.

The military threat to the Alliance has not lessened since the last report in 1975. There have been significant improvements by both the U.S. and the Europeans in conventional and nonstrategic nuclear forces over the last several years. Nonetheless, the quantitative military balance has, in fact, worsened. Our goal remains not to match the Warsaw Pact system-for-system or warhead-for-warhead, but to maintain forces adequate for credible deterrence and defense. NATO can accomplish this objective by continuing force improvement, including both nuclear and conventional modernizations, and by developing more effective use of our defense resources.

I am fully aware of the views in the Congress that we should do more to improve our conventional forces. I intend to take a balanced approach to improving our capabilities in both areas. You have received a report from DoD which looks at conventional plans and requirements in detail. I shall be providing my views on how to pursue some of those recommendations soon. It is true that we need to continue to improve our conventional forces. However, it is essential that, in the process of examining conventional problems, we not lose sight of the very essential, significant contributions that credible, survivable, and stable NATO nuclear forces make to enhancing conventional defense or of the fact that such nuclear forces are presently our most credible deterrent to chemical attack.

I especially endorse those recommendations that improve the survivability of NATO's nuclear forces. Closely associated security improvements will also do much to improve the safety of our weapons in peacetime. I have placed significant emphasis on carrying out such improvements. I intend to encourage our Allies to take an equally serious view of the problem. We are working through several NATO organizations to obtain Allied assistance in and agreement to making needed improvements.

At Montebello, Defense Ministers agreed to make further stockpile reductions which leave the stockpile at its lowest level in the last twenty years. At the same time, the Allies agreed that NATO must pursue appropriate modernization programs so that this reduced stockpile will continue to constitute an adequate and credible deterrent. I will support both the stockpile level decision and the modernization programs which will ensure a credible deterrent. Present U.S. defense programs and budgets provide the means to implement these decisions. I ask for your support to ensure that they can be carried out in an orderly and timely fashion. The DoD report accurately documents the need, and outlines the remedial measures which we will be pursuing.

As I mentioned earlier, NATO's nuclear posture correctly constitutes NATO's most effective deterrent against Soviet use of chemical weapons. We must do better than that, which is why the U.S. should develop a limited but modern chemical capability to serve as a direct deterrent against Soviet chemical use. U.S. defense budgets and programs include the necessary steps to sustain this deterrent.

NATO Allies are aware of the requirements for nuclear modernization and improvements in survivability and security. The U.S. will continue to provide the leadership and encouragement to stimulate the Allies to participate in their portions of future programs. As a result of the 1979 dual-track decision on LRINF, NATO is proceeding with deployments in the absence of a satisfactory negotiated arms reduction agreement which would make such deployments unnecessary. I stand fully committed to seek an equitable and verifiable arms reduction solution, and, as I have said many times, the U.S. is ready to recommend negotiations without preconditions at any time. Until such a negotiated solution is reached, however, the U.S. must provide the means to ensure that the nuclear posture of NATO does not deteriorate to such a degree that deterrence is threatened.

Alliance's objective of deterrence and defense. If we are to maintain deterrence and live in peace and freedom, we must continue to improve each capability. Secretary Weinberger's report on NATO's nuclear posture has outlined the current situation and a practical way to proceed towards an enduring nuclear posture in NATO. I fully endorse his recommendations.

Unemployment Insurance benefit payments continued to greatly exceed tax revenues in FY83 thereby requiring additional loans from the Railroad Retirement Account. The Railroad Sickness and Unemployment Insurance debt to the Railroad Retirement Account more than doubled in FY83 to a total debt of $575 million by the end of the year. Legislation will be needed before September 1985 -- when borrowing authority expires -- to ensure the restoration of the Railroad Sickness and Unemployment Insurance Account to financial balance and ensure the repayment of its debt to the rail pension fund. I urge the Congress to enact promptly my legislative proposal which would restore the solvency of the RSUI fund without imposing an undue burden on any party involved -- the general taxpayer, rail management, rail labor or the rail pension fund.

It's a wonderful tonic to be in Buffalo and to be with so many of America's finest. I know that I'm looking today at citizens who don't consider themselves Democrats or Republicans, so much as deeply patriotic Americans who are concerned about your country and determined to do all you can to make tomorrow better.

From our first day in office this has been our objective, as you've been told, was to reduce the growth of spending, to lower tax rates, provide incentives for investment, rebuild our defenses, and fight crime, so we can get our economy moving again, build a stronger America, and make your future more secure.

Well, America is moving forward again, but we won't be satisfied until the economic expansion reaches into every community of our nation. The America we're fighting for is one in which no one gets left behind, from Buffalo to the Bronx, from the Great Lakes to the Great Salt Lake.

I want to talk about our challenge, but let me just say how honored I am to help you celebrate the dedication of the Santa Maria Towers. It's people like you, and inspiring projects like this, who show us that the heart of America is good, the spirit of America is strong, and the future of America is great.

No single sector of our nation -- government, business, labor, or nonprofit organization -- can solve our problems alone. But by working together, pooling our resources, and building on our strengths, we can accomplish great things. And the Santa Maria Towers, this wonderful project for senior citizens and the handicapped, is truly a great thing.

Department of Housing and Urban Development, will be doing its part. I'm also encouraged by the efforts of the Saint Stanislaus Community Organization to establish the Monsignor Adamski Village just a short distance from here. Buffalo is telling America that your neighborhoods and communities are caring for your senior citizens and handicapped.

The handicapped may face limitations, but they have no limitations on their courage to do what others say cannot be done. Our disabled citizens want what all of us want -- the opportunity to contribute to our communities, to use our creativity, and to go as far as our God-given talents will take us. They deserve no less, and I believe that we can make their dream come true.

We've seen remarkable achievements in medicine and technology, education and rehabilitation, in equal access and greater economic independence. Voluntary efforts by the private sector and the many worthwhile Federal programs help in a thousand ways, but we've only made a beginning.

We live in a time of great challenges. Well, do you know something? Americans are very good at meeting challenges. Ask the senior citizens in Santa Maria Towers. They kept the world going during the tough years of the thirties and the Great Depression, through the forties and the war and beyond.

But our senior citizens also know that when you lose faith in the people, you can go wrong in a hurry. I think they remember what it was like only 4 years ago having to live on a fixed income with back-to-back years of cruel, double-digit inflation. In fact, all of us remember what it was like to have a broken economy, with the highest prime interest rates since the Civil War, taxes roughly doubling in 4 short years, and real after-tax income of the average family actually declining.

Well, that's behind us now. And it's behind us because there's no limit to what proud and free people can do if they're given a chance. The people of Buffalo understand that. Americans everywhere have always understood that. It was you that told us it was time to put earnings back into the hands of the people, time to put government back into the hands of the people, and time to put America back into the hands of the people.

And that's exactly what we've been trying to do with the strongest economic expansion in 40 years and inflation all the way down from 12.4 percent to 4.1 percent. But we must remove the remaining roadblocks to growth and jobs, without inflation, so a city like Buffalo will finally enjoy all the warmth from the sunlight of prosperity. And with your support, and with strong leaders like Jack Kemp back in Washington and Jill Emery of New York's 34th District, who we need in Washington, that's exactly what we're going to do.

Now, together we'll move forward into a brighter future with an historic simplification of the tax system. We must make that system more fair and easier to understand so we can bring everybody's income tax rates further down, not up.

Now, I don't believe, as my opponent most assuredly does, that government's greatest challenge is to convince us higher taxes will be good for America. I believe that F.D.R., Franklin Delano Roosevelt's words remain true today: ``The only way to keep the Government out of the red is to keep the people out of the red.'' And that means more jobs through opportunity and economic growth, not fewer jobs through unfair tax increases that destroy growth.

That's a fairy tale. [Laughter] His plan would hurt working Americans by raising their taxes and by stifling economic growth. With your support, we'll make sure that no one puts that ball and chain around America's neck.

We will move forward into a brighter future by insisting that government spend no more than government takes in. And we could make that happen if the Congress would give us a balanced budget constitutional amendment and a line-item veto, giving a President power to veto specific spending requests without vetoing an entire bill. I'm so homesick for that. [Laughter] As a Governor I had that right, and in 8 years I vetoed line-item things more than 900 times without ever having a veto overturned by the Legislature.

We can move forward into a brighter future by strengthening incentives to create sunrise industries and make our older firms more competitive. If we enhance our leadership in the marketplace of tomorrow -- high technology, science, education, and space -- we'll create more opportunities, more jobs for all our people.

We'll move forward into a brighter future by making it possible for you to walk your neighborhood streets without being afraid. For too many years, crime has sapped the strength and vitality of our people. Well, common sense is finally beginning to pay off. In 1982 reported crime dropped 3 percent. Last year there was a 7-percent drop, the sharpest decline since 1960. Right here in Buffalo, reported crime last year dropped a remarkable 9 percent.

Finally, the future of America relies completely on our ability to keep the peace and protect our freedom. We're not out for any territorial gain or to impose ourselves on anyone. Ours is the most peaceful, least warlike nation in modern history. But believe me, America must never again let its guard down. The reason we have a military is symbolized by a sign over the entrance to the Fairchild Air Force Base in Washington State. That sign says, ``Peace is our profession.'' Well, as far as we're concerned, that's America's message to the world.

We're going to go to work to break the cycles of dependency on government so that free men and women have the surging spirit of boundless opportunity. We're going to build a peace that won't fail if we don't fail. And we're going to be unafraid of exploring all that's beyond this Earth. We're going to leave -- and proudly leave -- sturdy and indestructible values so that in the 21st century, our shield will be their shield.

States -- and I do see a lot of them lately -- and ask where they should go to see America, I always say, well, don't go to the obvious places, the biggest cities or the resorts that are well known and such. Go to a small town in South Carolina, or spend some time in a suburb outside Phoenix, or go to upstate New York and head west and spend awhile in a town like Buffalo.

I was just over at Santa -- I'd been saying Santa -- the Santa Maria Towers, and that place is a splendid example of what individual people and groups can do to better their society. I would also like to applaud your efforts to establish the Monsignor Adamski Village. Together, the Saint Stanislaus Community Organization, the Diocese of Buffalo, Catholic Charities, and your Italian-American associations have a lot to be proud of.

Washington that the people of America are a great and vigorous people who are awfully good at ordering their own lives and running their own towns and cities, well, there were a few snickers here and there. But I think all of you prove that in America, where there is private need there is private response. And the response of the citizens of this country is worth a million times what government intrusion is worth.

Now, this is a political year, which I have a feeling you've noticed. [Laughter] And I speak here today as President, of course, but also as a candidate for reelection. And I don't want to stand at the stump and tell you all the reasons our administration deserves a second term. I'd just like to talk to you a bit about how we see the world and what we've done in Washington and all that we mean to do to make this a freer country.

We want to take a free country and make it freer. Part of human freedom is economic freedom, and our policies respect that. We believe that when you tax something you put a kind of artificial limit on its production. When you put heavy income taxes on a working man or woman, you make it less worth their while to work hard and get ahead. But let them keep more of the fruits of their labor, and you encourage greater work and greater productivity. You encourage investment, and the economy grows. Jobs are created and more people work and pay their modest taxes, and the healthy spiral continues.

And we tried to achieve prosperity while lowering inflation, because inflation is a terrible thief and another discourager from saving your money and investing in the future. After 3\1/2\ years of our stewardship, I don't think it unfair to report that what we've created so far is the first real cycle of peace and prosperity without inflation since the 1960's.

We've got the economy growing again, and it's created 6 million jobs in the past 20 months in this country. Last year 600,000 new businesses were incorporated, and that was a record. The prime interest rate, which 4 years ago had reached the highest point since the Civil War, has fallen.

Retail sales are up. Consumer confidence is up. So much is up that I almost hate to give you the downer: Inflation is down to just about 4 percent. [Laughter] And I don't need to remind you that 4 years ago, it was up more than three times that high.

There's still a lot that remains to be done; our work isn't finished. But the point I'm making is that for the first time in years our economy is on the right track again; not only on the right track, but chugging along like a big, powerful locomotive. And I don't think we want to go back. And I just want to highlight here that some of our opponents would go back. They've already told us that as soon as they're in, they'll start raising your taxes. And they'll do it again and again and again.

Opportunity creates growth, and together they give everybody a better chance to take part in the good life that America promises. And one way to help the economy keep growing and keep expanding is through some prudent and helpful legislative initiatives.

We think it's time for America to move into the future with an historic simplification of the tax system -- a tax system more fair, easier to understand, so we can bring everybody's income tax rates further down, not up. And with regard to making it simpler, you know, one of our truly great mathematicians, worldwide, actually had to confess he had trouble with his 1040.

You know, you have a great Congressman here, Jack Kemp. Jack is one of that great breed of creative new Republicans bursting with new ideas. And I think that all of us converge around one principal idea -- opportunity. We don't believe in an America divided by envy, each of us challenging the other's success. We believe in an America inspired by opportunity, each of us challenging the best in ourselves.

The enterprise zones bill would declare the older, distressed parts of a city to be special zones where special economic opportunity is encouraged. Businesses that go into those zones would be taxed at a much lower rate than if they were up on Main Street. Imagine adding to enterprise zones a bill that offers, during the summer months, a youth employment opportunity wage for teenagers, so that shopkeepers and others would be encouraged to hire those who are often disadvantaged and members of minority groups. It would be another -- but lower -- minimum wage for young people who are trying out for that first, or that summer, or that part-time job.

Now, you take these ideas, and you apply them to the distressed parts of Buffalo. Imagine those parts of your city blooming again, with kids coming home from school and having jobs to go to, with parents having a reason to care about the neighborhood, and with new local businesses adding to your tax base.

The liberal leadership in the House of Representatives, people who speak on and on about their compassion for the needy, have not only failed to pass enterprise zones, they've refused to even allow the Members of the Congress to vote on it. That's why we need new leadership in the House. We need people who recognize when opportunity knocks; we don't need people who knock opportunity.

Now, people, of course, don't live by economic matters alone. What's in their soul is more important than what's in their bank account. And that's why I'm so heartened and moved by the return to values that we've witnessed in the past few years. Young people love their country again and are trying to make it a better, kinder place. And once again, the family is being recognized as the center of society.

I think our government should help make it easier for those who believe in traditional values. And that's why I've supported, and will continue to support, tuition tax credits for those who pay into the tax system to support public schools, but who also take their savings to send their children to a parochial or independent school. And I support, and will continue to support, the right of voluntary prayer in the schools. And I don't mind telling you that we need the help of people like Al D'Amato and Jack Kemp and Jill Emery in the Congress if we're to prevail.

I'm running for reelection because I believe in the future, and I want to help make it a better and freer place for our children and our children's children. Together, we can build an American opportunity society that will give every person an equal chance and a much greater chance to pursue the American dream. Our work has just begun, and I'd feel like a quitter if I just packed up and went back to the ranch and forgot about the great challenges of our time.

This is an important election. It offers people of this nation the clearest, sharpest choice in half a century. And that's just fine, because the issues are really so big. Your vote is important; your decision is critical.

Well, I guess an awful lot of the kids today are the grandsons of those best kids in the world. And believe me, they're carrying on the tradition, those young men and women in uniform. When you see them now and then on the street, maybe smile and tell them you're proud of them. I know I am.

And of course, as I said already, a special greeting to the majority leader and president pro tem of the New York State Senate, Warren Anderson. Andy, for more than three decades you've served in the New York State Senate with skill and devotion. You've dedicated yourself to justice, liberty, and economic growth. And because of your efforts, people in this valley and throughout New York State lead fuller, freer lives. On behalf of all Americans, I thank you.

Traveling today, we've flown over a good part of the Empire State. New York is lovely this time of year. And I thought, looking down from that altitude, that I detected just a touch of color beginning to appear in the trees. And there were great rivers like the Susquehanna threading their way across the land. And I couldn't help thinking of those majestic towers of Manhattan, the hard-working, patriotic neighborhoods of the boroughs, and the thriving cities and towns that dot your upstate -- places like Rochester, Buffalo, Syracuse and, yes, Binghamton, Vestal, Johnson City, and Endicott.

They came here with few possessions, many with nothing but the clothes on their backs. And they asked only the chance to work, and work they did -- long, hard hours tanning hides, cutting leather, stitching together the finished shoes. And as family helped family and neighbor helped neighbor, schools were built, houses were constructed, churches and synagogues were established. And this valley became home to some of the proudest communities in our nation, towns that had seen firsthand all that free men and women can accomplish.

In time, however, the shoe business changed. The factories in town began to offer fewer jobs, and some feared that prosperity would leave this good valley forever. Yet one group of men and women had a great vision, a vision to bring this valley prosperity it had never before dreamed possible, a vision to launch a revolution that would change the world.

Their leader was Thomas Watson, Sr. He had grown up in a small town called Painted Post, down the road from here, where he learned how to stick with a job until it's finished. Watson started with a company whose mainstays were punchcard machines and time clocks. And in 1953 -- a long time ago for some of you, but just the other day for some of us -- [laughter] -- the company that Watson had renamed IBM began making the first mass-produced commercial computer in history -- the 650 -- less than a half a mile from this spot.

Scores of the IBM workers were sons and daughters of immigrants who had worked in the shoe factories. When they began, the best market researcher predicted that fewer than 1,000 computers would be sold in the entire 20th century. Well, IBM's first model sold almost twice that number in just 5 years, and now there are IBM plants in Endicott and around the world. And the computer revolution that so many of you helped to start promises to change life on Earth more profoundly than the Industrial Revolution of a century ago.

Already, computers have made possible dazzling medical breakthroughs that will enable us all to live longer, healthier, and fuller lives. Computers are helping to make our basic industries, like steel and autos, more efficient and better able to compete in the world market. And computers manufactured at IBM Owego -- where some of you work -- guide our space shuttles on their historic missions. You are the people who are making America a rocket of hope, shooting to the stars.

Today, firms in this valley make not only computers but flight simulators, aircraft parts, and a host of other sophisticated products. The shoe business has adjusted to the economic conditions and is working again. Your schools are better than ever. Your neighborhoods are strong. You still have a vigorous sense of ethnic pride. You can't talk to Mayor Corino for long without feeling how proud she is to be an Italian American. And here, you carry a sense of civic loyalty that shows up in organizations like the Tri-Cities Opera and the Roberson Center. I know how proud you all must be to live here. You've shown me that. And I just have to believe that the lesson of this valley is a lesson for our entire nation: With opportunity, there's no limit to what Americans can achieve.

You know, in 5 years, taxes doubled, average monthly mortgage payments more than doubled, and the real after-tax income of the average American actually began to decline. Our opponents preach a great deal about fairness. Well, it's true, their policies were fair in one respect: They didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable.

Now, we could go on, but we don't want to talk about their failures, do we? I can assure you, they don't. Well, then, let's talk about how, by working together, we're achieving great successes today, and we'll go on to build an even greater nation tomorrow.

The President. [Laughing] I'd like to ask you some questions about a certain country. Now, I don't want to give away the answer by naming the country. I'll give you just a little hint. It has three initials, and it's first two are U.S.

With your support, during the next 4 years, we'll keep going forward. We'll start by keeping government under control, by enacting a line-item veto and a constitutional amendment mandating that government stop spending more than it takes in. We'll fight for enterprise zones to help Americans in disadvantaged areas get off unemployment and welfare and start climbing the economic ladder.

Others would raise your taxes and the taxes of working families all across America. Well, we're not going to let them enact their tax plan, not on your life. Our pledge is for tax simplification, to make the system more fair and easier to understand, so we can bring yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up.

In the past 4 years, we've helped lead a grassroots revolution to recommit our schools to an agenda for excellence that will reach every child in this land. Teachers, school principals, and school boards are joining with parents to bring back discipline and higher standards. And what do you know? After 20 years of decline, achievement, by all the records, is up.

And today, schools like Union-Endicott have begun using computers to give our sons and daughters better education and to prepare them for an exciting world where the great challenges will lie not just here at home, but in the limitless frontiers of science, technology, and space.

We're cracking down on crime. We say with no hesitation, yes, there are such things as right and wrong and, yes, for hardened criminals preying on our society, punishment must be sure and swift. Last year reported crime dropped 7 percent, the steepest decline since 1960.

We're rebuilding America's defenses, and our nation is at peace. In New York's beautiful north country, 165 miles due north, lies the Army's Fort Drum, one of the finest all-weather land training installations anywhere in the United States. As the Secretary of the Army announced yesterday, we have chosen Fort Drum to be the home base for one of the Army's new light infantry divisions. Troops stationed at Fort Drum will be able to reach quickly any of the world's potential troublespots. And they'll have the benefit of some of the finest year-round training available.

And let me make one thing plain: We're not out for any territorial gain or to impose ourselves on anyone. But believe me, America must never again let its guard down. And since 1980, not a single nation has fallen to Communist aggression. And the people of one nation, Grenada, have been set free.

Grenada at the request of six Caribbean democracies and received from the Grenadian people themselves an emotional demonstration of gratitude. And today, less than a year after that mission, when the job was done, every American combat soldier has come home -- every one.

My dream for America, and I know it's one you share, is to see the kind of success stories in this valley multiply a million times over. And with you by our side, I just know we're going to make history again. Our victory will be a victory for America's future and the land that President Lincoln called, ``the last, best hope of Earth.'' And that nation will rise to meet her greatest days.

Earlier, the President went to the IBM Systems Technology Division facility, where he toured the plant and was briefed on computer production and the final product assembly. He then went to Union-Endicott High School, where he met with Tri-Cities Republican leaders.

But then I must add, and this time in real seriousness, Howard Baker has been a true friend. He's been a lion in support of the cause which unites us. And you will be missed more than you know, and I'm not going to let myself think about it, because it hurts too much. But thank you, Howard.

Our Administration is committed to improving the lives of all people. We can be proud of our record of encouraging a broad spectrum of private sector initiatives. We know that it takes a great effort by individuals, groups, voluntary organizations, and corporations to accomplish this most important mission. We are key members of the team, and must do our part through our leadership of the Combined Federal Campaign in our respective agencies and our direct personal involvement. It takes a team effort to get the job done right.

Chairman of the fall 1984 Combined Federal Campaign for the National Capital Area. I ask that you personally serve as Chairman of the campaign in your organization and appoint a top official as your Vice-Chairman. Please advise Secretary Block of the person you designate.

I urge you to take a personal interest in this year's campaign by working with your employees to achieve new levels of support for the programs of the Combined Federal Campaign. The private voluntary agencies and our neighbors in need are depending on us. Together, let's make this the best campaign ever.

In each of the past 23 years, Federal employees and members of the Armed Forces have had the opportunity to show their concern for those in need through participation in the Combined Federal Campaign. I ask each of you now to continue that tradition of voluntary sharing.

Through the Combined Federal Campaign, we can help relieve pain and health problems now and support research to help eliminate them in the future. We can help our neighbors without making them dependent on government. We can assist the less fortunate in other countries, extending a nurturing hand to friends around the world.

Americans have a record of generosity and concern for others unmatched by any other country in the world. I am confident that our proud record will continue in the fall 1984 Combined Federal Campaign. While the decision to give is personal and voluntary, I encourage each of you to join me in wholeheartedly supporting this year's CFC.

The President. Well, again, as I say, my specifics have been there for almost 4 years. We have submitted four budgets -- three -- and one to go. And they contain all the things that we're trying to do to reduce government spending and to increase the growth of the economy, which will increase revenue. They're all there for anyone to see, including some legislation still before the Congress that Tip O'Neill has refused to allow the Congress to vote on.

The President. That song they sing -- he was a part of the bipartisan commission that came forth with the plan to put Social Security on a sound fiscal basis. It's been adopted. Social Security is secure as far as we can see into the next century, and we're not going to touch the benefits of the people on social security.

The President. We're looking at thousands of suggestions, most of which have to do with improving management. I still insist that government overhead for providing benefits is still much too high. You can make further budget cuts without affecting how much actually goes to help the needy.

The President. Some of you might not like it if I answered that question specifically. But I've noticed that there's never a ``good news'' economic story on the evening news that was not accompanied by, or buried by, finding some individuals who have not yet benefited by the economic recovery.

The President. It isn't criticism at all. It's ignoring the fact that -- we know there are still individuals who have not been helped. The whole aim of the program is finally to get to everyone, but we also know that there are millions of people that have gone back to work, the economy is booming -- all of the figures that I've been giving in speeches. So, it would be fair to present this in a balanced way.

The President. As I say, our whole economic program is aimed at this, and it's there and has been there in every budget. The deficit today would be $50 billion less if the Congress, the House of Representatives, had agreed to the cuts we asked for, beginning in 1981.

The President. Well, since they have been approving deficit spending for -- with just a few exceptions -- virtually throughout 50 years, in 42 of which they have dominated the Congress, I would have to say that they can't remove themselves from the blame. Our deficit this year is over $20 billion less than we ourselves projected that it would at the beginning of the year. And this has been brought about by the gains in the economy. And that is still the best way of approaching added revenues for government, is through improving the economic base.

Whenever I visit your Volunteer State, I get a real tug knowing that I'm standing on this hallowed ground of heroes. The spirit of Tennessee was Davy Crockett daring to push back frontiers and open up the West -- they were a different kind of frontier then -- Andrew Jackson, knowing one man with courage makes a majority, blazing a revolution that put power back in the hands of the people. And today that spirit is alive in an economic expansion that's creating hope and bringing Tennessee's unemployment down. So, I salute you and I salute your fine Governor.

For people seeking the newest frontiers, my advice is come to the Oak Ridge-Knoxville high-tech corridor, and you'll see America at its best. Believe me, when it comes to encouraging growth, expanding opportunities, and charting a course for excellence in education, Lamar Alexander and the people of Tennessee are giving a lesson in leadership to all America. You are creating the greatest wealth we could wish for -- wealth of knowledge. It fuels a mighty tide of progress and carries hope for an optimistic future to people here and everywhere.

Ours has never been a revolution poisoned by hatred and the will to conquer, but one rising from the deepest yearnings of the human spirit to challenge the limits of knowledge and to use the power of discovery for our most noble and generous impulses for decency, progress and, yes, for peace.

You know, I can't help but wonder if a lot of the problems that are plaguing this nation wouldn't disappear if we could just borrow the people and companies in this corridor and put them inside the beltway in Washington, DC. There's nothing the United States of America can't do, if those Doubting Thomases would just stand out of the way and get out of our way.

Together, your small and large businesses throughout Tennessee are taking us another step into the future -- new markets, new jobs, and valuable knowledge to help us compete for leadership in the world area of technological development.

Sons and daughters of Tennessee can meet this challenge. Together, we can blaze this trail and win this battle. And if we're to honor the tradition of Crockett and Jackson, America must win it, and I believe we will win it.

Look how far we've already come. In a single generation, we have freed ourselves from the bonds of Earth. We've set our footprints on the surface of the Moon, used our instruments to explore space, the Sun, and our sister planets.

Satellites enable us to communicate with each other at a moment's notice virtually anywhere on the globe. We can anticipate tomorrow's weather and prepare for it. And thousands of practical applications of space and aeronautical technology are touching our lives, from lifesaving vests for firemen to aerial scanning techniques to locate and identify everything from schools of fish to mineral deposits to healthy timberland.

New materials from natural resources like carbon and silicon are replacing expensive manufactured products. And engineers are using them to reduce the weight of modern cars, with consumers getting the benefits of more miles per gallon.

Computers using microchips are redefining our world as they become common in the workplace, community, also, and in the classroom. Many children have access to more computer power than most professional scientists and engineers had in their laboratories at the beginning of the space age.

In medicine, we're seeing the vision of technology with a human face. The pioneer field of computer-controlled walking has given hope to thousands of paralyzed Americans that someday they may walk again.

Doctors can now use sound waves to monitor babies inside the womb, ensuring safer pregnancy and delivery for the mother and better health for the newborn. We've learned how to send electrical impulses to targeted nerve centers or particular areas of the brain to provide relief from pain. And we've developed a system that can administer medication automatically within the body.

Who can even imagine the wonders that lie ahead if we just have the faith and the courage to push on. While I was growing up, the Model A was just replacing the Model T. And now, a child may grow up to see space travel become commonplace.

Each breakthrough in knowledge lifts us to a new, higher plateau, paving the way for great gains in productivity. Agricultural economies barely advance; industrial economies move forward in inches and feet; and an advanced technological economy can leap forward.

Working in the zero-gravity of space, we can manufacture in 1 month's time lifesaving medicines that it would take 30 years to manufacture on Earth. And we can manufacture crystals of exceptional purity that may enable us to produce super computers and make even greater breakthroughs in productivity.

But some economists and politicians are afraid of growth, afraid it will reignite inflation. Well, I'm afraid they may suffer from time warp. They seem to be stuck in one period, while all of us are entering another. They seem to see our economy only as an old and quivering thing in the industrial age, rather than a strapping young adolescent beginning to flex its muscles in the technological age.

We don't need economic doctors telling us we must ration our strength. We need economic doctors who will help America build her strength. And we don't need more politicians insisting we have deficits because you're not taxed enough. Those deficits ballooned from an economy that didn't grow enough and from 50 years of a government that's been spending too much.

Some people have labored so long at making government bigger, they've developed a knee-jerk addiction to tax increases. And every time their knee jerks, we get kicked -- [laughter] -- and that's when growth suffers most.

We came to Washington determined to spark new growth in the economy and slow the growth of government. Well, with your support and Senator Baker's, we've had 21 straight months of economic growth. That is the best expansion since World War II. Government spending growth has been cut by more than half; inflation at 4.1 percent is down by two-thirds; interest rates are down; the deficit is coming down and, yes, continued growth will keep it coming down. So, pardon me, but somebody back there must be doing something right.

But these aren't my victories, they're your victories, America's victories. And that's why I want to offer a little friendly advice to our critics: Rather than saying things that always seem to run America down, how about giving the American people a pat on the back?

Government must encourage technological growth by supporting research and development, particularly in our universities, to train tomorrow's leaders. Between 1981 and 1985, Federal investment in basic research will have increased almost 30 percent in real terms. We'll carry forward that strong commitment, continue to support tax credits for industrial research and development expenses, and strive to lessen concerns that cooperative research and development between companies may violate antitrust statutes.

Let's remember that technology is born from capital, and capital requires incentives for risk-taking and investment. We've seen dramatic proof of this relationship. The 1978 capital gains reduction, followed by our 25-percent reduction in tax rates and the shortening of depreciation schedules for business investment, have given an enormous shot in the arm to risk-taking and entrepreneurship in America.

If the Democratic candidate had had his way, the top rate on capital gains would not have been cut from 49 to 20 percent, it would have been spiked up to 70 percent. His adminstration fought the historic reduction in capital gains and demanded the higher rate, which they said would bring in more revenue. Well, we're getting more revenue today at the new lower rate than we were getting before. And that's the secret of good tax policy.

You know, Roy Acuff composed a song called ``We Live in Two Different Worlds.'' And the choice in 1984 is between two very different worlds. They see America wringing her hands; we see America raising her hands. They see America divided by envy, each of us challenging our neighbors' success; we see an America inspired by opportunity, each of us challenging the best in ourselves. We believe in knowing when opportunity knocks; they seem determined to knock opportunity.

Well, I believe the American people are saying, ``Don't hold us back. Give us a chance and watch what we do.'' America has always been greatest when we dared to be great. And you can feel a new spirit in this land to excel again. The new patriotism is a mighty force for good, drawing us together -- all of us, from every race, religion, and ethnic background -- giving us courage and confidence to surge toward great new challenges in the future.

I believe America can and will meet our number one challenge in space: to develop a permanently manned space station and to do it within a decade. We can conduct new research, explore distant planets, unlock the vast potential for commercial ventures, and do it all for the sake of a more peaceful, prosperous world.

As American technology transforms the great black night of space into a bright new world of opportunities, we can use our knowledge to create a new American opportunity society here at home. We can ensure that every person has not only an equal chance but a much greater chance to pursue the American dream.

If we strengthen incentives, invest fully in the new technologies, and reach for great breakthroughs in productivity then, yes, we can and will outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anywhere in the world. We can ensure adequate supplies of affordable energy, because America must never again be held hostage by a foreign cartel. We can apply new agricultural technologies to preserve our soil and environment, and dramatically enhance crop yields for the benefit of millions who look to us for help and hope.

Our nation is more than 200 years old, but somehow America has never been younger, never been more filled with hope. Everything is before us. And if we keep America free, everything will be possible. The land that President Lincoln called ``the last, best hope of man on Earth,'' will rise to meet her greatest days, and the eagle will soar.

Thank you, Roy. And thank you all, ladies and gentlemen. Thank all of you up here on the stage, the great artists of the first of all American art forms, country music. I guess now that I've appeared at the Opry, I've really arrived.

I'm going to interject something here, just a little note that was not part of my prepared remarks, except I might also say, Roy, that the whole thing of being here a couple of days early, no problem at all for me.  [Mr. Acuff had earlier referred to the fact that his birthday was September 15.]  But if the 13th had fallen on tomorrow, I'd have really had problems then. [Laughter] Friday the 13th.

Tennessee. This is one of those special States. It's more than just a place; it's a state of mind. The secret of Tennessee, the way I see it, is its people and the music they make. And, you know, the man who founded the Opry explained a little about both when he said, ``The Grand Ole Opry is as simple as sunshine. It has a universal appeal because it's built upon good will, it expresses the heartbeat of a large percentage of Americans who labor for a living.'' Well, I agree.

In the 1930's he joined a traveling medicine show, and he put together a group, and soon he had his own radio shows over in Knoxville. Roy started making records, and that was in the 1930's when labor practices were not what they could have been. In one session, it was so hot in the studio that the band recorded in their underwear. [Laughter] You may have heard of a few of the songs that they were working on. One was the ``The Great Speckled Bird,'' and the other was ``Wabash Cannonball.'' In an earlier appearance of mine -- not here -- Roy and his band played that, as he said, for about 45 minutes from -- [laughter] -- my entrance and greeting of a lot of people.

A few years later a Governor of Tennessee was invited to appear at the Opry, and he turned it down with the statement that he thought country music was ``disgracing the State.'' Roy Acuff didn't like that a lot. [Laughter] So, he ran for Governor in the next primary. [Laughter] He didn't win, but he made his point. I don't think a lot of politicians criticize country music anymore.

Music Hall of Fame. A few years after that he was in a bad car accident, but within months he was up and out of his sick bed to entertain the troops in Vietnam. And he was there to sing at the White House when the POWs returned in 1974.

Now, there are a lot of reasons, I guess, why this good spirit has returned to our land. But it got a lot of encouragement from Nashville. It's the people of this city who never forgot to love their country, who never thought patriotism was out of style. And I know you were just expressing how you felt; you didn't know that you were doing your country a great service by keeping affection for it alive in your songs. But you were doing it a service, and I don't know if anyone has ever thanked you. But if not, thank you. People like you make me proud to be an American.

Now, the other side keeps saying the answer to all this success is to start another old round of tax and tax and spend and spend. I think we all better remember that the other side's promises are a little like Minnie Pearl's hat -- they both have big price tags hanging from them. [Laughter] But the price tag on those promises comes to over $1,800 for every American household.

The truth is there are things to be happy about and proud of in this country these days. The misery index is just about half what it was, and the forces of international communism have not, in these past few years, been gaining ground. And here at home the decent, homely virtues, the wholesome habits, are in style again.

There's so much before us, so much of the future to be seized and shaped by us. We can simplify the tax system so that people aren't sick with worry and confusion every April 15th. And if we do, we can continue to lower tax rates, which will further encourage the working men and women of this country and further encourage economic expansion.

And we can continue together to encourage respect for traditional values. We're greatly blessed in this country. We've been allowed to stand for something. So much of our greatness is behind us, but so much of our greatness is still before us.

There are big challenges ahead and big dreams. And no matter what your party, I hope you can join with us this year and walk with us toward a better future. You're wanted and welcome. And no one should feel left out. Our party is open to you and waiting for you.

This is National Hispanic Heritage Week, and I know you've been told already, and I can think of no better way of topping off the week's activities than with a ceremony that highlights the invaluable role of education.

It's encouraging to observe, in recent years, the marked improvement in the level of schooling of young Hispanics. Since 1970 the percentage of college graduates has doubled, and the number of Hispanics finishing high school has increased dramatically. What we see is a picture of a group of our citizens on the move.

Americans of Hispanic descent are moving into the business and professional community as never before. They -- and that includes some of you with us today -- are playing a major role throughout this administration. This generation of young Americans of Hispanic descent, due to an expanding economy and increasing opportunity, will have it within its grasp to achieve more and advance further than any generation of Hispanics at any time, in any country of the world.

And this is especially true for the young people who are here today. I know you've been selected because you've demonstrated superior academic skills, outstanding leadership, or exemplary service to your community.

I want to congratulate all of you for your personal standards and for what you've already accomplished. I know your families are proud of you, and so am I. We want you to soar like eagles in the coming years as you finish your education. We want you to shine in whatever endeavor you choose when you get out of school.

We also hope you'll help others along -- others who may be having a difficult time. The dropout rate among Hispanic students is still far from acceptable. I'm asking Secretary Bell to look into this, but let's not kid ourselves: There are no easy answers. We need your support in letting your peers, other young Hispanics, know just how vital it is to stay in school and get an education.

Perhaps some of you in the not too distant future may be teachers yourselves. And I can think of no other profession which offers as much of a chance to help others in such a meaningful way, doing things that will change people's lives.

And today, thanks to the efforts of responsible people all over the United States, there is a new commitment to excellence in education. In the past 4 years, more than half of our country's 16,000 school districts have increased the number of credits required in subjects fundamental to a good education. And by 1985 almost 40 percent more will have raised their standards.

Forty-two States have begun initiatives to improve teacher preparation or certification, and 20 have enacted or endorsed master teacher, career ladder, or merit pay programs to attract top students -- perhaps like some of you here -- attract them into the teaching profession and to reward our best teachers.

And as for money, the overall resources committed to education in this country in the last 4 years have increased by 32.4 percent. And that's not money being taxed away by the Federal Government and sent back to local areas with Federal guidelines and bureaucratic mandates and a kind of a Federal carrying charge. This increase represents a local investment by concerned citizens and parents. It represents more local authority, more community control, and more responsibility in the hands of those directly involved.

Perhaps one of the most heartening trends has been the emergence of a new spirit and direct support of education by the business community, professional associations, and fraternal associations. Today we're especially proud of the part the U.S. Hispanic Chamber of Commerce is taking in helping Hispanic students. This event today wouldn't have been possible without them.

Hector, and men and women like him, struggled long and hard, overcame great obstacles to get where they are. Today he's a successful businessman; yet he started out picking potatoes. He's someone young Hispanics can look up to.

Today we honor some giants in the field of education -- individuals to whom all Americans owe a debt of gratitude. And it's my pleasure to present to them these outstanding leadership awards of the Department of Education. Their contributions are improving the well-being of their fellow Americans of Hispanic descent and of the country as a whole.

And I'm especially happy that we're able to honor the late Dr. Rivera. I had the pleasure of meeting him at a private session here at the White House last year. I found him to be a thoughtful man, and he will be missed.

Secretary Bell. Mr. President, our first awardee -- and I think it's appropriate that we start with him -- is the famous Jaime Escalante. The Los Angeles teacher received nationwide publicity for his outstanding work in teaching mathematics, bringing students clear up through calculus. It's attracted so much attention, he's been written up in national magazines. So, it's a pleasure to present him to you as the first award receiver.

Rivera died almost a year ago. And as the chancellor of the University of California at Riverside and as professor of Spanish literature, he attained many distinctions in the field of education. And it's a real pleasure to present to you his widow, Concepcion, who will accept the award on his behalf.

Next, Mr. President, Dr. Pilar Barbosa de Rosario -- began teaching while still a teenager, a very outstanding author, a very distinguished professor and highly respected educator, accomplished wonders in Puerto Rico, and is dean of the Puerto Rican historians and an educator that we've been too long in honoring. And I'm pleased to present Dr. de Rosario to you now.

Next, Mr. President, is the president of one of our outstanding universities that's serving Hispanic youth. Dr. Miguel Nevarez -- president of Pan American University, a long-time educator, even an activist for attaining more education for Hispanics, a very distinguished executive. It was my privilege to give the commencement address at his campus last year. And he's highly regarded in the Rio Grande Valley as an outstanding educator, and I'm proud to present him to you.

And, now, Mr. President, another distinguished university president, Dr. Lauro Cavazos, president of Texas Tech University and Texas Tech University of Health Sciences Center. He presides as president over two institutions. He's also an author, an instructor in medical sciences, a very distinguished academic leader in higher education, and I'm honored to present him to you, Mr. President.

And then, Mr. President, Olympia Rosado -- a teacher, a very outstanding author, and today, a newspaper columnist, Mr. President, widely acclaimed for her professional and personal accomplishments. She's a great champion for education for youth. And we couldn't make these awards without including Olympia in this group, and it's a pleasure to present her to you.

Then lastly, Mr. President, Esther Buckley, who is a member of the U.S. Civil Rights Commission and a math and science teacher of great distinction from Laredo, Texas. And Esther wasn't able to be here because there's a Commission meeting today. And so we will present her award to you, but I wanted to mention her as also an award recipient.

When we remember Cardinal Slipyj's 18 years in Soviet prison camps, when we reflect that he was condemned to the gulag because he refused to betray his church, we see the power and strength of the human spirit brought clearly into focus.

Even after release from that long imprisonment, Cardinal Slipyj's spirit and energy were not lessened. Between his release in 1963 and his death at the age of 92, he traveled the world to visit Ukrainian Catholics and visited President Ford here in the White House. He established a Ukrainian Catholic seminary, built the impressive St. Sophia Ukrainian Catholic Church and the Ukrainian Catholic University. Recently, he was deeply involved in the planning of a worldwide celebration for the millenium of Christianity in Ukraine to take place in 1988.

Cardinal Slipyj's commitment to God and the freedom of men was unshakable, despite punishment and exile for his beliefs. Because of his inspired life, he has long been a symbol of the strength of God and human spirit. He will remain such, cherished not only by Ukrainians, but by men and women of good will in all nations.

When I set out on this campaign, I said this election would offer one of the clearest choices in 50 years. One major element in that choice is simply this: whether America will continue to champion the great, driving idea for your future -- economic growth through individual opportunity -- or whether our nation will return to the past and stifle that growth.

We're determined to keep the mighty engine of this nation revved up to build a future of lasting economic growth without inflation that reaches every American from the Bronx to Birmingham to San Francisco Bay. All that we've done and all that we mean to do is to make our free country freer still, to bring to each of you greater opportunities to build that stronger future.

We believe opportunity is the true engine of progress, the captain of great endeavors. And that's why we asked you in 1981 to give America a new beginning -- why we fought for and won a 25-percent tax rate reduction for everyone; tax indexing to keep inflation from pushing you into higher tax brackets; estate tax reductions for family farms and small businesses; a reduction in the marriage penalty tax; an increase in the child care tax credit; deregulation of banking, allowing a higher rate of return for small savers and new incentives for IRA's and Keogh contributions.

These incentives are sweeping fresh winds of progress across America. Along with restraints on government spending and regulating, they're bringing America the strongest surge of economic growth, jobs, business investment, and spendable income since the 1950's.

We're seeing proof that rewarding people who work and invest and save to get ahead is creating stronger growth and, in turn, helping still more people to find jobs and build a better life. So, we want to take this idea of incentives a big step further. We want to enact an historic simplification of our tax system, make the system more fair, easier to understand, so we can bring everybody's income tax rates further down, not up.

Next, we want to put the power of incentives to work in distressed areas of our cities and countryside. We want to establish enterprise zones where taxes and regulations would be cut for anyone starting up or expanding a business. Imagine ghettos across America with people off welfare working to support their families. Imagine their families living in more secure neighborhoods with less crime, feeling hopeful again about their future. Enterprise zones can do this for America.

To make a free country freer still, we want to ensure that those who produce our food and fiber have markets for their products. We've made a good start. Already, we've ended the last administration's disastrous grain embargo, restored grain sales to the Soviets with over 23 million metric tons sold in the last year, given them the go-ahead this week to buy up to 10 million tons more, and reached an agreement with Japan to virtually double our beef exports over the next 4 years.

So, you have a clear choice in 1984. To every American we offer new opportunity, lower tax rates, more jobs, rising take-home pay, and a brighter future for everyone. My opponent offers the biggest single tax increase in our history, $85 billion per year, he says, but really much more if his promises are fully funded. All told, his tax increase could amount to an additional tax of $1,800 per household, a giant stop sign that would bring America's economic growth and your opportunities for the future screeching to a halt. His plan would take us back to the worst misery index of the past. Ours would enable all of us to go forward together and build new opportunity for the future.

America raising her hands. They see America divided by envy, each of us challenging our neighbor's success; we see America inspired by opportunity, each of us challenging the best in ourselves. We believe in knowing when opportunity knocks; they seem determined only to knock opportunity.

As I look out at all of you here this evening, I can't help but think that you're a living affirmation of the sometimes desperate dreams of those world changers who came here and invented America. I say desperate dreams because those who traveled here, by wind-driven ship or by steamer, wouldn't have been making that terrible journey unless they were in search of something that had eluded them at home -- economic opportunity, or personal freedom, or a chance to make one's mark.

The Italian-American experience was never an easy one, but it was one of great triumph. Italians, of course, made their mark on this country early on. An Italian found it, it was named for an Italian, and it was explored by Italians. But after that came the immigrants, and it wasn't easy for them. The Jews of the roiling ghettos, the Irish living 10 to a room in Boston, and the Italians looking for work in Philadephia -- all shared some rough beginnings. But what distinguished these groups of immigrants is that they yielded more than their share of genius. In fact, you might say that Ellis Island was one big incubator for American greatness. All of the immigrants, and certainly the Italians, changed our country by adding to the sum total of what we are. They did not take from, they added to.

The Italians did it by hard work. They went to New Orleans and became longshoremen and fishermen. In Washington and Oregon and in my home State of California, they started out as hired hands and eventually built up their own farms. In Pennsylvania, they took the heavy lifting jobs, the manual labor. In New York, Chicago, and Boston, they opened barber shops, fruit stands, restaurants and eventually, small banks.

These immigrants were guided by habits, principles, and traditions that they took from the old country and transplanted here. They believed in the central importance of the family, the dignity of hard work, and faith in a just God who would reward effort and encourage virtue. They stayed in America and worked hard, and little by little, secured the things that eluded them. They became the backbone of the American middle class.

Monsignor Geno Baroni used to say, ``There are only two lasting things we can leave our children. One is roots, the other is wings.'' And what can we do these days to make sure that our children are given both? And what can we do to ensure that all of the immigrant sons and daughters of our country have the same chance to prosper as the sons and daughters of Italy have?

My views on these things, I think, are well known. We believe that the Italian traditions of faith and family, the dignity of work, and the importance of effort should be encouraged. And that's why we tried to gear so many of our efforts toward the family, the prime generator of life and human virtues. We believe that protecting economic freedom means fighting inflation with unrelenting determination, for inflation is the deadliest tax of all.

Because we believe in justice, we've tried to make society a safer place. We believe that families have the right to take a walk together in a park, in the dark, in the city, without having to fear for their lives. They pay taxes for that right, but violent crime has deprived them of it. We're tough on crime, and we think we must be. Defendants have their rights and always will and always must.

Department. The Italian Government's cooperation on this matter has been complete, and I believe the working group is another reflection of the excellent relations that exist between our two countries.

Italy, by the way, deserves a lot of credit and the thanks of the world for its heroic efforts to fight crime and domestic political terrorism. All of us remember that day in 1982 when Italy liberated General James Dozier from the hands of the Red Brigades. The courage of the Italian forces took our breath away. And I had the pleasure in Rome of meeting the young men that finally broke through that last door in the face of the enemy guns and effected the rescue. And I want to tell you, I'd feel you could send them to do some very tough jobs without arms. They were the most capable young men I've seen in a long time. Italy's been very effective in this fight, and they're setting an example for the world.

We believe in the neighborhood. We believe that the closer political power is to the people it affects, the better it will be wielded. We believe that human experience has taught us that local control is an integral part of political freedom. And we believe, finally, that the first and last key to making sure America will always be a haven for the immigrants who've enriched it is to ensure the peace.

American Presidents have understood this. Our friends know well something that we know and something that our adversaries know: America can be trusted with military might. We don't like war; we never have. We're not an expansionist country or an imperialist country. We seek only to protect, never to act as the aggressor.

And it must always be a place of limitless opportunity for the children and grandchildren of the dreamers who journeyed here. If we keep these things in mind, then, truly, the children of the future will have both roots and wings, and the dream will endure.

Before I leave you tonight, I want to add just one more thing. Decades and decades back, there was an Italian immigrant who came to America. And he started a family and worked hard and raised his children as best he could. One of his sons became a milkman. He, too, worked hard and married and had a family. And then the mailman -- or the milkman, I should say, raised his children as he had been raised. They were taught to respect honesty, decency, and hard work.

They struggled to make ends meet. All of the money went to the education of their children. They put one son through college, and when he said he wanted to be a doctor, they put him through medical school. Because of their diligence, the son became a prominent surgeon in a great hospital. And one day that surgeon, that son of a milkman, saved the life of a President of the United States who'd been shot. I know this story, because I was the patient.

I have thanked the Giordanos, but I've not had a chance to personally thank a group like this for all that you've done to keep the tradition alive. And so, grazie. Thank you all very much. God bless you.

The President. Well, I'm going to turn the meeting over to you, except to say that I'm delighted here and to have the report that I know you are going to present. I think we're all agreed on the improvement that has been made and the things that really remain to be done in our relationship with Japan. I think that's one of the most important partnerships we have. So, David.

Now, I would like to quickly point out that this is a joint effort. The Japanese and Americans continue to work very closely together, and the report is really an agreement between both members. As you can expect, there might have been some things that would have been said if we'd had complete freedom to say them, but I was very encouraged by the fact that the Japanese have been very forthcoming and very much interested.

I think we all came out of this study with the conclusion that this is an extremely important relationship not only in the short term but in the long term. In addition to the work that we did in discussing these issues among the Commission members, we had a number of studies done on various aspects of this relationship -- a very good study on agricultural policy, a good study on industrial policy. And we also had a study made to try and get some idea about what the options would be in the long term -- what would happen if we continued a close partnership with the Japanese over the next 10 or 15 [years] or even into the next century, and if we didn't.

And I think the conclusion we've come to is that this relationship is so important that we have no option but for both of our countries to work very hard to maintain this close cooperation. And I think that out of that, and really in part out of some of the things that you and your associates have done here, our recommendation is that this relationship will benefit from better management.

Prime Minister this last fall, the fact that Secretary Regan followed up on that, and George Bush went over -- it was an example, I think, of the way some of these issues can be managed in a more effective way than simply the reactive process that has come about.

U.S. -- Japan relationship and the fact that the two leaders should pay priority attention to this relationship. We will obviously stress the growing importance and opportunities for cooperation of our two nations in global affairs, and we'll certainly point out some of the problems, particularly in the management of the relationship. But we will discuss them in the context of a need for greater bilateral cooperation.

Mr. Packard. So, we hope that this will provide some guidance to move ahead with what you've already started here, and we think you've made very good progress so far. But we also think there's a lot of opportunity to continue the work that's being done. And it's been a great pleasure for us to participate in this program.

In his meeting today with the Committee, President Reagan will point to the growing importance of the Pacific to the United States and reiterate his personal commitment to strengthening and expanding America's cooperative ties with nations of that region. The President will make his remarks during a reception given for a group of prominent Americans active in U.S. relations with the nations of the Pacific Basin.

National Committee for Pacific Economic Cooperation. The bipartisan committee includes approximately 50 leaders from the country's business, government, and academic communities, and is an outgrowth of regional economic discussions held over the past 4 years. Its formation is an important step in the continuing progress toward improved communications and cooperation among the countries of the Pacific.

The Committee, a private nonprofit body, corresponds to similar bodies being formed elsewhere in the Pacific region. Among its roles will be coordination of the United States contribution to the region-wide economic dialog carried out under the auspices of the Pacific Economic Cooperation Conference. It is also expected to serve as a focal point of U.S. economic policy and strategy toward the Pacific. Serving on the Committee are Members of Congress, leading corporate executives involved in Asia-Pacific trade, representatives from several executive branch departments and agencies, numerous Asia-Pacific scholars, and representatives of such organizations as the Asia Foundation and the Asia Society.

As a Californian, I've long recognized the importance of the Pacific region. And I am pleased that during this administration we've been able to expand and deepen our ties with the countries of the Pacific Basin. And I look forward to hearing your views on the issues that we face.

We look forward to working with them to develop policies which will sustain the impressive record of economic growth for the benefit of our citizens, of our Pacific partners, and our global, free-market system.

Pacific to our nation's future and acting upon it. Your advice and counsel will be important to our continued effort. Your group includes four Senators, four Members of the House, seven members of the executive, in their unofficial capacity, and I think this demonstrates a bipartisan commitment of both branches. And all of us are in your debt for what you're doing and wish you well. Thank you very much.

Mrs. Rodden served 4 years as the State historic preservation officer for Nevada. She was a member of the docent council for the Nevada State Museum and was responsible for the first Western States Conference of Museums and the Arts.

Our approach to the farm economy and the problem of farm credit is based on the belief that the future will be better than the past, and that the right program is a transitional program that helps farmers get from the high inflation, high interest, and economic disasters of the previous administration to the stable growth, low inflation, and lower interest rates that all of us are bringing about.

And I'm pleased to announce today a four-part program that will permit many troubled farmers to put together financial plans that will give them more secure hope for the future. Secretary Block will provide a more detailed discussion, but let me give you the highlights.

First, I've directed the Farmers Home Administration to agree to defer for 5 years up to 25 percent of the principal and interest payments owed by farmers who need breathing room to return to a sound financial footing. And these deferrals will be made available on a case-by-case basis as part of comprehensive transition plans to get farmers back on their feet.

Second, in order to assist those who do not participate in the FmHA programs, we'll be making available $630 million in loan guarantees that will be used to facilitate additional lending by private banks as part of financial recovery plans.

And fourth, Farmers Home will expand its ability to serve the public by contracting with local banks and other financial institutions to handle routine paperwork processing in areas that have experienced delays and backlogs.

This, we believe, is a balanced approach that treats farmers as individuals and that recognizes our basic objective must be to help people through temporary difficulties, not create a massive new Federal program that will destroy the private credit system that serves the majority of farmers' needs.

Secretary Block. Once again, if I might add one point, I think it's important that we all appreciate that this package is a debt-restructuring, debt-management package, which is really what farmers need today. I think more than they need large sums of new money, they need to have a package to help restructure the existing debt.

The President. Now, I know that none of you standing over there on that side of the table are going to believe this: It wasn't done with that mind. It was done because there are people out there that need help.

Note: The President spoke at 1:23 p.m. in the Cabinet Room at the White House at the conclusion of a meeting with Senators from key farming States, members of the executive committee of the American Farm Bureau Federation, and representatives of agricultural organizations, including groups involved in farm production, banking, and trade interests.

However, I have decided to establish a government policy for the steel industry. I believe that this new policy is the best way to respond to the legitimate concerns of the domestic industry while maintaining access to our market for those who trade fairly.

Further, the Department of Commerce and the United States Trade Representative will self-initiate unfair trade cases including antidumping, countervailing duty and Section 301 actions when appropriate.

The Administration's hope is that this combination of actions, taken without protectionist intention or effect would enable one of the United States' most basic and vital industries to return to a level playing field, one in which steel is traded on the basis of market forces, not government intervention, and one in which the market would seek a return to a more normal level of steel imports, or approximately 18.5 percent, excluding semi-finished steel.

Mr. Schultz is a trustee of the University of Chicago, chairman of the visiting committee to the division of the humanities of the University of Chicago, and vice chairman of the Chicago Council on Foreign Relations.

I know that your door has always been open to all those Americans who came here as Italians, and the Irish, the French, the Poles, the Hispanics, the blacks. They made this a place where hard work is the rule, not the exception; a place where bedrock values took root -- faith in a loving God, belief in family, and love of a country that gave them, and you, opportunity, peace, and freedom.

Across the country, take-home pay is up, and families have more to spend. And retail sales are up, and industrial production is up. So much is up that I hate to give you the downers: The tax rates are down; inflation is down; so is the prime interest rate, which by 1980 had reached the highest level since the Civil War. I guess that's what the other side means when they say there's a down side to the Reagan recovery. [Laughter] But let me correct something that has been misnamed, misnamed the Reagan recovery. It's the American recovery, because you did it. All we did was get government out of your way, and now it's the American expansion.

But I don't think the American recovery is confined to economic matters. There's a new mood in the country these days. Uncle Sam is seeming mighty jaunty. Our brilliant and optimistic young students and scholars and workers are all the leaders in this, and our young people, particularly.

But our work isn't done; there's so much ahead of us. The future is out there. It's waiting to be seized and shaped; great frontiers in science, technology, and space waiting to be discovered and pushed back. And we can do it. We can do it because we saw with our Olympic athletes that when our people pull out all the steps -- the stops, I should say -- to meet a challenge, nothing can hold America back.

And I think that one challenge we're ready to meet as a nation, because it's so crucial to our future, is to make America's educational system a great center of leadership for excellence. And we've already begun. This morning we received word that the average scholastic aptitude test score, the thing we call the SAT's, has gone up a full 4 points. Now, 4 points doesn't sound like very much. It is just, however, the biggest increase in those scores in the last 21 years, and it's the second increase in 3 years. But it's not enough; we've got to do better.

So, I propose a challenge to all of us: It's time for America to lift her sights, time for us to resolve that before this decade is out we'll raise scholastic aptitude test scores nationwide. We'll make up half of all the ground that was lost over the last 20 years, which was more than 100 points. We must also reduce the dropout rate in our schools from 27 percent to 10 percent or less. And this will require a great national commitment by students, teachers, administrators and, most certainly, by American parents.

We can simplify our tax system. We can make it more fair, easier to understand, so everyone in the country won't be sick with worry and confusion every April 15th when you face that complicated tax form. You know, it's good to remember that Albert Einstein said, he didn't understand it. [Laughter] But if we do that, if we simplify the taxes, we'll be able to push yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up. And with that money they're saving, Americans could spend and save and invest, and that would further boost the economy, and more jobs would be created.

We can pass an enterprise zones bill that would declare the older, distressed parts of cities to be special zones where business life would be encouraged through tax incentives to start up, train, and hire workers. The House Democratic leadership has bottled up that bill in committee. For 2 years, they've refused to allow the Congress to vote on it.

And we could add to enterprise zones a youth employment opportunity wage for teenagers, so that employers would be encouraged to hire those who are disadvantaged and, particularly, members of minority groups.

As Secretary Baldrige told you, we've created 6 million jobs in the last 20 months. It's a good record, better, in fact, than any other nation, but still not good enough. And I pledge to you that I won't rest until every American who wants a job can find a job.

So, I propose that we lift our sights toward a second challenge for America: By this time next year we must have passed enterprise zones, passed the youth opportunity wage, found ways to simplify the tax system, and all of us must go forward to make this expansion so strong that millions of jobs will be created in distressed areas where our fellow citizens need help the most.

But do you know what the other side would do? The other side has put up a giant stop sign to stop the economy dead in its tracks. They've come up with an idea so old, so tired, that it could very well be called a cliche. Their wonderful idea is -- can you bear the suspense? Their wonderful idea is to raise your taxes again and again and again.

The President. Well, I want to tell you something I've been thinking of since this morning. Over there on the balcony of the Elton one night in 1960, just as the mayor told you, young John Kennedy stood there in the darkness. It was almost 3 o'clock in the morning. His campaign was near ending, and he was exhausted. But the night was bright with lights, and they lit the faces of the tens of thousands of people below who had showed up to cheer John Kennedy on.

And he stood down -- looked down at them. He smiled in the glow, and even though it was the fall, it seemed like springtime, those days. I see our country today, and I think it is springtime for America once again -- so many new beginnings. And I think John Kennedy would be proud of you and the things you believe in, proud of the stoutness of your hearts and the vision in your soul.

I hope there are some members of his party here today. I don't believe it would be possible to have this big a crowd in Waterbury without having a lot of Democrats here. Well, I was a Democrat once, for a large portion of my life. And it's a funny thing about party affiliation.

Whether you inherited it for generations back in your family, maybe you embraced it on your own when you were young, but it can be a very wrenching thing, I found, to change parties. You feel as if you're abandoning your past. But I tell you truly, the only abandoning I see is that the Democratic leadership has abandoned the good and decent Democrats of the J.F.K., F.D.R., and Harry Truman tradition -- people who believe in the interests of working people, who are not ashamed or afraid of America standing up for freedom in the world.

Don't think, any of you, that you don't have a political home. You will listen to the arguments and issues in this campaign, and I think by the end you may decide your home is with us. And I hope you do. And believe me, you will be welcomed. I hope you'll walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity.

And now I'm supposed to end my speech, but I don't want to go. Can I stay just long enough to add one more thing? [Applause] It's something I've been thinking about a great deal lately. I have to tell you that nothing, and I mean nothing, has made me prouder the past, almost-4 years than the young people who are serving our country in uniform. By any measure, they're just the best.

The President. Thank you very much. I do have to go, but it's wonderful to be here. I'd love to see you all again. Waterbury's made a real difference in my campaign, just as it did in John Kennedy's, and I will always remember.

You know, today my treat is seeing for the first time the Blueberry Capital of the world. It's the home of the fighting Blue Devils and the St. Joe Wildcats and your fighting State Senator, Bill Gormley; a town whose schools offer 4 years of three different foreign languages -- your town, Hammonton, New Jersey.

Americans like you -- and your mothers and fathers and their parents -- here in Hammonton I know that means many proud Italians and hard-working farmers who want to keep those farms in your family. All of you have given the ideas, the muscle, the moral courage and, yes, the spiritual strength that built the greatest, freest nation the world has ever known.

You didn't come here seeking streets paved with gold. You didn't come asking for welfare or special treatment. You came for freedom and opportunity. And we see that spirit in the faces of Hammonton: two people who recently you honored on their 50th wedding anniversary, Mr. and Mrs. Frank Mazza, and a woman who's still a picture of youthful vitality named Mrs. Mamie De Marco, who recently celebrated her 89th birthday.

And we see that spirit, also, when tragedies bring forth the nobility and kindness of our people, pulling us together, giving us strength to go on, to keep living for tomorrow. These moments show us that America's great because -- as a French philosopher said many years ago -- America is good.

I think there's a new feeling of patriotism in our land, a recognition that by any standard America is a decent and generous place, a force for good in the world. And I don't know about you, but I'm a little tired of hearing people run her down.

We've come through some tough times, but we've come through them together -- all of us, from every race, every religion, and ethnic background. And we're going forward with values that have never failed us when we lived up to them -- dignity of work, love for family and neighborhood, faith in God, belief in peace through strength, and a commitment to protect the freedom which is our legacy as Americans.

All that we've done and all that we mean to do is to make this country freer still. America's future rests in a thousand dreams inside your hearts. It rests in the message of hope in songs of a man so many young Americans admire -- New Jersey's own, Bruce Springsteen. And helping you make those dreams come true is what this job of mine is all about.

We hear shrill words from some who were in charge 4 years ago. But may I suggest that those who gave us double-digit inflation, record interest rates, tax increases, credit controls, farm embargoes, long lines at the gas stations, no growth at home, weakness abroad, and told us that it was our fault, that we suffered from a malaise -- they're not exactly experts on the future of growth and fairness in America.

I will say, however, their policies were fair. They didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable. But I didn't come to dwell on their failures, I came to talk about how together we're going to make this great nation even greater.

Jersey shore to San Francisco Bay, economic expansion is carrying America forward. I'd like to ask you some questions, if I could -- I know there are some young people present -- some questions about a certain country. Now, I won't give away the answer by naming the country, but I will give you a little hint. It has three initials, and its first two are U.S.

State, where they belong. And we have the rare opportunity to give our children the gift of peace and prosperity without inflation. America has worked too hard for this progress to let anybody destroy it with a massive tax and spending scheme. That would be the equivalent of about $1,800 more in taxes per household, and it would ruin the growth and your opportunities for the future.

For them to introduce that blueprint for bondage in Philadelphia, the very birthplace of our liberty, was a betrayal of the American people. Now, they could have introduced their tax increase in Atlantic City, but then that would have been unfair. The people who go to Atlantic City gamble with their own money, not yours.

Well, we won't let them put that ball and chain around America's neck. I don't think that you in south Jersey believe your families were put on this Earth just to help them make government bigger. They want to enact a massive tax increase to put in their new so-called trust fund. Well, we don't want their new government trust fund; we want a government that trusts you.

We're talking about two different worlds. They see America wringing her hands; we see America raising her hands. They see America divided by envy, each of us challenging our neighbor's success; we see America inspired by opportunity, all of us challenging the best in ourselves. We believe in knowing when opportunity knocks; they go out of their way to knock opportunity.

Aren't you saying we want to think big and aim high? And aren't you saying don't hold us back, give us a chance and see how high we fly? Well, that's what we want to help you do. So, I have some bad news for our opponents: Our economy will still be healthy come the November election.

Our work isn't done. The future is waiting to be seized; great frontiers in science, in technology, in space -- waiting to be discovered and pushed back. And we can do it. We can do it because, as we saw with our great Olympic athletes, when America goes for the gold, nothing is going to hold her back.

And I think one challenge we're ready to meet as a nation, because it's so crucial to our future, is to make America's educational system a great center of leadership for excellence. And we've begun already. This morning we received word that the average scholastic aptitude test score, that thing we call SAT, the college entrance exams, has gone up a full four points. And that's after nearly 20 years of steady decline of more than a hundred points. And this is the second increase in 3 years, and it's the biggest increase -- it doesn't sound like much, four points -- but it's the biggest increase in 21 years. But it's not enough; we've got to do better.

It's time for America to lift her sights, time for us to resolve that before this decade is out we'll raise scholastic aptitude test scores nationwide. We'll make up half of all the ground that was lost over the last 20 years, and reduce the dropout rate from 27 percent to 10 percent or less. And this will require a great national commitment by students, teachers, administrators, and most certainly, by America's parents.

We can pass an enterprise zones bill that would encourage people, through lower tax rates, to start up businesses and to train and hire workers in distressed areas. The House Democratic leadership has bottled up that bill for 2 years in committee.

And we could add to enterprise zones a youth unemployment [employment]\1\ (FOOTNOTE) opportunity wage for teenagers, so that employers would be encouraged to hire those who are disadvantaged and members of minority groups and young people who are just starting out with no job experience, to get their first job.

We have, as I said, created 6 million jobs in the last 20 months. That's a good record, better than any other nation, but it's not good enough. I pledge to you, I won't rest until every American who wants a job can find a job.

Now, I propose also that we lift our sights toward a second challenge: By this time next year we must have found ways to simplify that tax system, passed the enterprise zones, passed a youth opportunity wage, and all of us must make this expansion so strong that millions of jobs will be created in distressed areas where our fellow citizens need help the most. This America can and must do.

Our goal is an American opportunity society giving everyone not only an equal chance but a greater chance to pursue that American dream. And we can build that future together if you elect people to the Congress who will not vote for tax increases but vote for growth and economic progress. I'm talking about electing Mary Mochary -- wife, mother, and attorney -- to the United States Senate. Stand up there. There.

I was a Democrat most of my adult life. I didn't leave my party, and we're not suggesting you leave yours. I am telling you that what I felt was that the leadership of the Democratic Party had left me and millions of patriotic Democrats in this country who believed in freedom.

It did not enter the compound, but exploded in the street in front of it, with damage to the building. There are a number that are wounded. We have word that a few are critically wounded among the employees. We're still trying to get full information on all of that.

I'd like to express my sympathy to those who have suffered wounds, to the families of those who might be killed. And the State Department will be keeping you informed as we get additional information.

The President. Yes, we have, directly from him. He has been in contact with us. And he claims that he has some cuts, but he is not seriously wounded at all and, as I say, he walked on his own to the treatment center.

The President. Yes, as I say, they have barriers -- similar to what we have here for a vehicle that has to get through -- at the ends of the street. It negotiated these, was under fire, and exploded in the street. It did not penetrate the barriers leading into the Embassy building. And the force of the explosion was such that it, of course, damaged the building and wounded and killed some people.

The President. No. We're aware that this threatens our people wherever they are in the world, because these terrorist groups in many instances -- or most instances are opposed to everything that we stand for.

Before I begin the remarks today, let me say a few words about the cowardly act of terrorism that we learned of early this morning. The suicide attack against our Embassy annex in East Beirut has saddened us all, of course. It's another painful reminder of the persistent threat of terrorism in the world. I have talked with our Ambassador, Reg Bartholomew, on the way out here, who, although injured himself, expressed pride on behalf of the dedicated Americans who are serving with him.

In this moment of anger and sorrow, our prayers are with those who are bereaved, while our commitment to the cause of peace remains firm. I'm proud, as all Americans should be proud, of the brave Americans who are serving our nation throughout the world in the cause of peace for people everywhere, and even more proud after talking to our Ambassador there, who emphasized that we must continue, we can't just withdraw in the face of this kind of terrorism.

But now, it's good to be back in Iowa, in the very heart of our nation. And it's good to be in the proud and thriving town of Cedar Rapids. And I was most pleased to be accompanied on the way out here with the fine Members of the Congress from your State, Tom Tauke and Cooper Evans and Jim Leach and, too, our superb Senators, Chuck Grassley and Roger Jepsen. Believe me, we couldn't have accomplished what we have without our majority in the Senate, and Chuck and Roger are in the front rank of that Senate majority.

And I had another greeting that really touched my heart here today, and that was a special greeting from 6-year-old Katie Beckett. Three years ago, Katie was trapped in a hospital. Her doctors agreed that Katie, who had trouble breathing, could safely go home but it seemed there were regulations that forced her to stay, even though home care for Katie would have cost only a fifth of the cost of her hospital bills.

Germans, Swedes, Norwegians, and immigrants from many other nations -- men and women as hardy as the land. They plowed the sod, they planted crops, they dotted the land with farmhouses and built lovely towns like Cedar Rapids. And soon, Iowa contained some of the richest farmland in history, feeding tens of millions in America and around the world.

Cedar Rapids itself became a dynamic city, making breakthroughs in agricultural marketing and management, and helping develop the radio and electronics industries, and establishing fine high schools like Washington, Jefferson, and Kennedy, and Prairie, and great colleges like Coe, Mount Mercy, Kirkwood Community College. And you've shown the world that with opportunity there's no limit to what Americans can accomplish.

After years of drift and decline, this great nation is moving forward again. And during the past 4 years, we've knocked inflation down from 12.4 to 4.1 percent. And since then, in the most recent months -- that's for the whole previous years -- it's down as low, on a monthly basis, now, as 2.9 percent. During the past 20 months, we've created 6 million jobs and brought unemployment down at the fastest rate in the last 30 years. Our progress won't be complete until every State and every American can feel all the warm sunshine of America's economic expansion.

There's one way that we could bring this economic expansion to a halt, a sudden halt. And, yes, our opponents have found that one way -- raise taxes. Now, I know it's hard to believe, but after decades of a rising tax burden they've actually proposed a massive, new tax increase. That's to pay for the promises they've made in this campaign. All told, their tax increase would be the equivalent of more than $1,800 increased tax per household. Their tax increase is a giant stop sign that would bring our entire economy and your opportunities for the future screeching to a halt.

American athletes go for the gold. Well, making our economy bear the burden of their tax hike would be like having a coach tell an Olympic swimmer to do the laps carrying an anvil or a runner to sprint with a ball and chain. Come November, the American people are going to get to vote on our coaches. And come November, the American people are going to tell Coach Tax Hike to go find another team someplace else.

Our pledge is for tax simplification, to make the system more fair and easier to understand, so that we can bring yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up. Tax simplification can provide powerful new incentives for economic growth. We'll fight for enterprise zones to help Americans in disadvantaged areas get off unemployment and welfare and start climbing the economic ladder. And if we can keep government under control, we can do it by enacting a line-item veto and a constitutional amendment mandating that the Government stop spending more than the Government takes in.

Before this decade is out we must raise scholastic aptitude tests -- but I'm getting ahead of myself here in shuffling my notes. What I intend to say before I get to aptitude tests is, to those that I have termed -- or probably are still Democrats, as I once was for most of my life, come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity that we have. As our economy grows, we'll need to go forward with the bedrock values that sustained the first Iowa settlers and that nourish us today. And they're the simple values of faith, family, neighborhood, and good, hard work. And we're already making a good start.

In the past 4 years we've helped lead a grassroots revolution to recommit our schools to an agenda for excellence that will reach every land -- or schoolchild in this land. And yesterday, we learned that the average scholastic aptitude test scores have gone up a full four points. That doesn't sound like very much, but that's after a nearly 20-year decline that's totaled around 100 points or more. It is the second increase in 3 years, and it's the biggest increase in 21 years.

But I believe we can do better. So, I'm asking you to help America lift her sights. Before this decade is out, we must raise the scholastic aptitude test scores nationwide, make up half of all the ground that was lost over the last 20 years, and reduce the dropout rate from almost 28 percent to 10 percent or less.

We must continue cracking down on crime. We say with no hesitation, yes, there are such things as right and wrong. And yes, for hardened criminals preying on our society, punishment must be swift and sure. In 1980 the crime rate was rising. Last year reported crime dropped 7 percent.

That's the steepest decline since 1960. And I'm pleased to learn that Iowans have made a particular effort to seize the initiative in combating crime. You've established a crime prevention Citizen's Watch program in every one of your counties. That's an accomplishment that few States can match.

May I just interject something on that subject here? There've been two tragedies in Iowa that have saddened us all. In 1982, young Johnny Gosch disappeared while delivering newspapers on his morning route in Des Moines. Then, just 6 weeks ago, another newspaper boy, Eugene Martin, also disappeared.

Register. We've pledged our full support in the search for these two boys. And this past June, we established the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children in Washington to help locate missing children across America. So far, the Center has received thousands of telephone calls and helped hundreds of parents. Nancy and I join all of you, I'm sure, in praying for the safe return of Johnny and Eugene. And I pledge to you that none of us will rest until the streets in Iowa and throughout this nation are once again safe, particularly for our children.

Now, let me just conclude by saying that we're rebuilding America's defenses, our nation is stronger, America is at peace. And since 1980, not a single nation has fallen to Communist aggression. And the people of one nation, Grenada, have been set free. As I will tell Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko when I meet with him in a few days, we seek no territorial expansion and are making no effort to impose our will on anyone. But we will never again allow the United States of America to let down its guard.

And throughout Cedar Rapids and throughout Iowa, there are young couples today saving to buy homes of their own, mothers and fathers who want to give their children a better education, men and women with dreams of making the good earth of Iowa still more fruitful, the good town of Cedar Rapids still healthier and more prosperous, and America herself stronger and better still.

Q. Mr. President, Walter Mondale and Geraldine Ferraro have criticized you for your failed policy in Lebanon and the deaths of marines there. Do you think today's attack in Beirut will reopen that criticism of your policies there?

The President. No. I don't see how anyone in this country -- we have a program in which, in cooperation with our allies, we're trying our best to find an answer to the international terrorist problem. And as I say, we're -- all of us -- targets of that, probably because of what we believe and what our principles are, and they disagree with them.

The President. As swiftly as you can. Speaking of hostages, that's a different subject. Actually, the only defense you have against terrorist activities is if you can infiltrate and intercept and know in advance where they're going to strike.

Before I begin the remarks that I intended to make today, I'd like to repeat something that I said at the airport when I came in -- that's a few words about the cowardly act of terrorism that we learned of early this morning.

The suicide attack against our Embassy annex in East Beirut has saddened us all, of course, and it's another painful reminder of the persistent threat of terrorism in the world. I've talked with our Ambassador, Reg Bartholomew. He was in the hospital, and I was in the plane on the way here when we talked. He's injured, himself, but he said it was not serious and, actually, he walked out of the Embassy after the explosion and walked to the hospital on his own. He's quite a guy. And he expressed pride on behalf of all the people that are serving there with him.

But in this moment of anger and sorrow, our prayers are with those who are bereaved, while our commitment to the cause of peace remains firm. And I'm proud, as all Americans should be proud, I think, of the brave Americans who are serving us in the Foreign Service all over the world in the cause of peace for people everywhere.

But now, I want to thank the Brockschink family for being so kind to invite us here today in the midst of this busy time for all of you. I have a few things I'd like to say, and then I'd be very pleased to take your questions for a period of time.

First, with the hard work and great courage of our people, the farmers' number one market is coming back. America in September of 1984 is moving forward with an economic expansion that's given birth to 6 million jobs -- new jobs -- and new hope. We're a stronger nation today than we were 4 years ago.

In January 1981, we were left the legacy of record inflation, record interest rates, the highest peacetime tax burden in history, and a farm embargo that had inflicted terrible damage not just on short-term sales, but on our long-term reliability and credibility as a supplier. Well, all the initiatives that we've taken since our first days in office -- and that we'll continue to pursue -- have been aimed at getting to the root of your problems to help family farmers and ranchers turn things around for good.

How have we tried to help the family farmers who, day-in, day-out, probably face greater difficulties than any other group in our country? Well, by bringing down inflation, which had destroyed the profitability of farming in 1980. We went from one of the largest 2-year increases ever in prices that farmers paid in '79 and '80 to the smallest 2-year rise in 15 years in 1982 and '83. And the most recent inflation rate has been at 2.9 percent. If we had to go back and take the whole year getting to that point, why, it's down around 4.0 percent.

But we won a long-overdue change in our tax laws that will protect thousands of widows and children from losing what generations of love and toil have created. The estate tax exemption will increase to $600,000 by 1987 and, of even greater help, there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse.

We're aggressively moving to open up other markets that had been restricted. We reached agreement with Japan to double its purchase of Amercian beef exports over the next 4 years. And I think we have a friend there in the Prime Minister, Nakasone. He's got his political problems with his legislature, as I do with mine, but -- [laughter] -- he really is working in tandem with us.

The effects of the grain embargo, combined with the bumper crops in '81 and '82, left us with huge carryover supplies. So, when action was stymied in Congress, we moved to develop the PIK program. And farmers set aside nearly 80 million acres and got paid in kind with reserve stocks.

And we're trying to help tens of thousands of farm borrowers hold onto their farms and stay in farming. The Agriculture Department is lending money to 270,000 beginning farmers and farm borrowers who can't get credit elsewhere. And in the last 3 years, the USDA Farmers Home Administration has doubled its regular operating loans for farmers.

And this week, we announced another major initiative to assist farmers trying to cope with debt burdens. The Farmers Home Administration will permit a deferral for 5 years of up to 25 percent of the principal and interest payments owed by farmers who need breathing room to return to a sound financial footing. And the deferrals will be made available on a case-by-case basis.

And we want to assist those who do not participate in the FmHA programs, so Farmers Home will make available $630 million in guarantees of loans by private banks as part of rescheduling plans for troubled farmers.

And it puzzles me how some could already forget that only 4 years ago, they left the farmer stuck in the swamp. And I'm troubled that those who gave us the grain embargo, and the nightmare of double-digit inflation, and 21-percent interest rates don't seem to have learned their lesson.

They're proposing what would amount to a new one-two punch against American farmers -- a massive protectionist program that would provoke foreign retaliation, particularly against our farm exports, and a massive tax increase that would hit nearly a million people who earn income from farming. And if all of their promises are fully funded, it would be the equivalent of more than $1,800 in taxes per household.

Now, those are not my idea of friendship for farmers or fairness for farmers or a better future for farmers. They would reap a harvest of hardship and take us back to the past, to what has already failed. We firmly believe that the initiatives we're taking with you will make you stronger for the future.

Q. Mr. President, I have a two-part question. Mr. Grimes, an economist from Missouri, has figures that say U.S. pork producers' market is being depressed by $6 per market animal. Canada's Federal and Provincial assistance program seems to be giving Canadian pork producers an unfair advantage over U.S. pork producers. A number of U.S. Congressmen have signed a letter encouraging you to call an agriculture and forestry trade summit with Canada following the current elections. Mr. President, what is the progress of these talks.

The second part of the question, if I may go on, Mr. President: The current Economic Report of the President reports, ``the growth in world cereals imports in the last decade has been fueled mainly by growth in per capita income, with growth in population being a significant but less important factor.'' Is the President's office being used in any way to urge other countries to increase their per capita income?

The President. Yes. We have a Secretary of Agriculture who's a world traveler by now. And we have made substantial gains with some of our trading partners in this field. And right now, he has been meeting with the Trade Minister of Canada on this very subject of the import of Canadian hogs. And we believe in free trade, but we believe it's got to be fair trade. And I don't know what progress they're making or how much progress.

And I asked him -- I told him of our problems with them and our trade questions and asked if I could have a meeting with him and we could work to resolve the differences. He agreed to a meeting, and we will be setting one up and moving on that subject as fast as we can. So, we're right on top of it.

The President. All right. And as to the answer to the other problem, as I say, we have been working on that. In fact, we recently -- several months ago, if I remember correctly, was the timing of it -- we did a certain thing with regard to some shipments of grain products to Egypt, which sort of was like hitting a mule with a club to get his attention. And it was to get the attention of our trading partners in the European Community. And I think we did get their attention on that. So, we're making progress there, too.

The President. Strongly opposed. [Applause] Yes, wait, if I could just say this one thing about protectionism. In so many areas, so many times, we're able to prove that protectionism for one particular segment that might be construed as saving jobs in that one -- you can turn and prove that it'll lose three or four times as many jobs in other areas of our economy. And it's just a two-way street, and we're not going to go down that street.

The President. Yes, we believe in that. As I say, we've got to play on a level field. We can't keep on playing this game where we're downhill and trying to go uphill to score, and they're up there rolling down. And I think we have made progress, and we're going to continue. In fact, at the summit meeting in London, that was the gist of my messages to our trading partners over there in that meeting. And I met with a great deal of agreement with them on the fact that we've got to oppose protectionism.

Now, all of us recognize you can come to some situation where there is some particular segment or something that has been unfairly hurt, or that simply needs some breathing room to get back on its feet, and you can temporarily give them a hand. But you must be very careful that that, also, does not penalize others in our economy. But believe me, we're dedicated to free but fair trade.

Q. We have to have some concern, that the very large national deficit that is causing our high interest rates that we currently have. What can you, what can Congress, and what can we do to bring the national debt into line, so that we may all make a comfortable living?

The President. Let me just say with regard to the whole subject of the deficit: Actually, the only connection that anyone could make with our deficit and high interest rates would be if there was such a demand for lending capital that the Government shut out the private sector. That hasn't been true. Because of our tax cut across the board, because of the tax depreciation things that we put in for industry, and so forth, they have been investing at a faster rate -- business and industry in America -- than has been true for years and years, and without shutting off the supply.

For one reason -- because there's been a pretty healthy rate of savings by individual Americans, now, since the tax cut. The deficit is a result, not a cause. And the deficit is the result of the Government spending too great a share of the private sector's money. And what we've got to get is government down. Because what difference would it make in the deficit if you taxed and eliminated the deficit, simply by increasing the taxes, and the Government is still taking that same amount of money out of the private sector?

The problem with our economy is that reducing of the gross national product by government. So we do have plans, in spite of what you may have heard from some other sectors here. And we are specific. We think we've been very specific. Our economic program that we advocated in 1981, and are still going forward with, calls for sizable reductions. We never got all we wanted.

If we had gotten what we asked for from the Congress, the deficit would be $50 billion less than it is right now. But the two things that we have to do -- we've cut the rate of increase in government spending more than in half, bringing that line down. Now, as we do things, such as the tax cut -- and they may point to that and say, ``Well, that's what did away with government's revenues and increased the deficit.'' No, it increased the growth in the economy and brought about the recovery to the point that the revenue line is now coming up more steeply, not because your taxes have been raised, but because as a result of the incentive from that tax program, there is recovery.

And so, what we're working toward, continuing to try and get -- we've got 2,478 specific recommendations for better management of government that was brought to us by the Grace commission. Now, this was a private sector group -- leaders from all over the country -- that, under Peter Grace, at my request, formed themselves into a group to go and take a look at all of government and find out where it was doing things that business gave up doing a long time ago and to modernize and so forth. And we have a team studying those recommendations. Now, we don't know how many of those we'll find practical to -- and some will take legislation. We've already implemented 17 percent of them that we could do administratively to further decrease government costs.

But when we can get those two lines -- the increase in government spending and the increase in revenues by way of the recovery -- to come to a point together, we've eliminated the deficit. And we, in addition to that, have what we call the downpayment, where we got a compromise thing of some tax reforms, plus some further savings that we got bipartisan agreement on, to put into effect, that will further do it.

And we do have the deficits now in a declining line. This year's deficit at $174 billion is $21 billion less than we ourselves projected that it would be this year. And that's a mistake we like to make.

And the President can only take one more question. Remember, the President has asked for a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced budget. And that'll get us this. And your President asked for it. The Senate Republicans and the Senate have supported it. But Tip O'Neill and the Democrats in the House have blocked it.

Q. Mr. President, it's rather evident that much of the future welfare of our industry depends on exports. And many of the developing countries have been former recipients of our Food for Peace Program. And I was wondering -- and they have become viable trading partners with us now -- is there anything being done under Public Law 480 that can be done?

The President. I think so. And with regard to exports, that is also a priority of ours. And that's why he's a traveling salesman and has been going around the world so much on this, to develop and encourage more exports, because we know that -- good Lord, you have progressed. They talk about high-tech revolutions, the American farmer is high tech himself. You can not only feed all of America, you can feed an awful lot of a hungry world. And we're going to do everything we can to see that those markets are open to you.

And before I begin the remarks I'd intended to make today -- I know that some of you were at the airport and won't mind having to hear it again -- I feel that I should say a few words about the cowardly terrorist act that occurred this morning early in Beirut. The suicide attack against our Embassy annex in East Beirut, I think has saddened all Americans, of course. And it's another painful reminder of the persistent threat of terrorism in the world.

So, I know in this moment of anger and sorrow, our prayers are with those who are bereaved, and our commitment to peace remains firm. And I'm proud that our Americans in the Foreign Service, who are serving all over the world, are of the caliber and the quality that they are.

Now, I know this morning at the airport I mentioned some schools, and it had nothing to do with some of the charges that have been made against me, it was just an oversight that I didn't, in naming some of the fine schools there, name the two parochial schools of La Salle and Regis, I believe. Do I have it right? Well, all right. I apologize for the oversight. And I know also that I'm only a few miles away from someplace and just want you to know that I know that, in addition to all the great agricultural products and everything of Iowa, this button says, to those of you who are too far away, that I'm a Number 1 Bodicar fan. I guess I don't have to tell any of you who that is -- [laughter] -- and what it is.

Now, I've been following how things are going here and what your triumphs and travails have been. And I want you to know that I'll always agree with the journalist, Harrison Salisbury, who said: ``Iowa, the land and the people -- I would match it against the world!'' And I stand with another writer who said, ``There are few more beautiful sights in America than Iowa's farmlands in early autumn . . . .'' The most pertinent thing that I've read about Iowa is a report from a journalist who said just a few years ago: ``Iowa is graced by absolutely marvelous people . . .

Nationally, I think it's fair to report that the country's economy is recovering and economic expansion has begun. The fight against inflation continues, and now inflation is less than one-third of what it was in 1980. And if it continues at the rate of just the last couple of months or so -- it's under 3 percent. Interest rates have gone down, though not enough, by any means. And the employment picture is very good. We've created 6 million new jobs in this country in the past 20 months; 600,000 businesses were incorporated last year, and that's a record in our entire history.

And none of this happened overnight, and none of it happened by accident. Our economic success is a direct outgrowth of the practical application of a practical philosophy: We believe that the way out of the economic morass of the 1970's was to let all the American people keep more of their hard-earned money, instead of sending an ever-larger amount to support Federal spending programs that were out of control.

We cut tax rates for individuals, and we cut taxes for business. And what we said would happen happened: The economy recovered and then expanded. Now, all of this is good news, but it's not enough -- not by a long shot. We've got to do better.

Here in Iowa, farmers are still feeling the effects of years and years of bad government policy and neglect. When the Federal Government wanted to make a foreign relations point, when they wanted to make a point with the Soviet Union, they cut off the grain sales and left you holding the bag. When interest rates hit the highest point since the Civil War, they made it impossible for you to operate. When inflation gouged you, they didn't hear your cries. And on top of all that, as if that weren't enough, estate taxes on your farms were so high that you couldn't even keep the family farm in the family anymore.

Well, I know about your problems. And as I see it, there is no America without the American farm. You not only feed the country, you feed the world. We owe you a lot, and you're the last people in this country who deserve to be taken for granted or taken for a ride.

So, first, we ended the grain embargo. You know, as we do, that if we refuse to sell the Soviets grain they simply go to other suppliers, and that's what they did. And the only ones who suffered from that kind of lightswitch diplomacy were America's farmers. So, we ended the embargo and negotiated a new and expanded grain agreement with the Soviets. Since last October, they have bought 23 million metric tons of grain. And as you may know, I approved raising the ceiling so they can buy an additional 10 million metric tons in the next year.

I know that operating loans are a point or two higher, and that's still too high, but it's an improvement. As for estate taxes, we fought hard and finally succeeded, thanks to the help of your Republican Congressmen in the House and your two Senators. Now the estate tax exemption is to increase to $600,000 by 1987, and we've seen to it that there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse.

So, once again, families have a chance to keep the family farm. And I want to add here that I see this estate tax business as crucial to the interests of the farm belt. All of those taxes taking a farm right from under a family -- when I think about it, it's like a scene from the ``Grapes of Wrath,'' with the fellow in the bulldozer being the tax man knocking down the farm that a family had lived on for generations. Well, we've tried to stop that bulldozer dead in its tracks and keep the farm intact.

We've been working for some time on the problem of farm debts and land values. So many farmers have been struggling with debt burdens. In the last 3 years, the Farmers Home Administration has doubled its regular operating loans for farmers. And to provide further assistance, Farmers Home will now permit a deferral of up to 25 percent, for up to 5 years, of the principal and interest payments owed by farmers who need breathing room to return to a sound financial footing. And this will be done on a case-by-case basis. And for those who do not participate in the FmHA programs, Farmers Home will make available up to $630 million in guarantees of loans by private banks as part of rescheduling plans for troubled farmers.

So, we've introduced some soil conservation initiatives that will help ensure that our breadbasket will feed the world not only today, but tomorrow. And we've targeted a larger portion of our Federal funds to States such as Iowa, where the soil erosion is a major concern.

America's farmers, and not the least because the very qualities it takes to work and run a farm are the very qualities it takes for a citizenry to run the country. I'm talking about the decent and enduring values of hard work and thrift and planning for the future and investing in the future.

You know, it can be said that investing in the future is the most faithful act a man or woman can make. And when you invest your hard work and your money and your effort and your time, you show an extraordinary faith in our system, our culture, and our country. This is the faith of the heartland, and it's what our future is built on.

And after he spoke, there was a moment that was described as a ``hushed unison,'' as the vast crowd began the final hymn of the day, whose opening lines were ``Oh beautiful for spacious skies, for amber waves of grain.'' And a person who was there said at that moment ``the visit achieved a union of spirit . . . beyond sentimentality.'' It was a special moment, but such moments aren't uncommon in America. Despite our differences, we are -- all of us -- in America, in 1984, part of a great hushed unison, a great unspoken unity. And, as I travel the country in my quest for reelection, I think: May it ever flow unbroken.

Well, I thank you so much for your very wonderful hospitality and for the warmth and kindness that comes so naturally to Iowans. And I want you to know that I enjoyed both the beef and the pork for lunch. [Laughter] No argument about that.

It's always gratifying when the honor of a just man is vindicated, and that's exactly what has happened with the report of the Independent Counsel on Ed Meese. It's a particularly happy moment for me because I've known and worked with Ed Meese for many years, and I know how much he's given of himself in service to his country and community. He is one of the most decent and honorable men I've ever known, so I'm not surprised by the outcome, but congratulate him in any case on his vindication.

Thank you all very much. And before I begin the remarks I'd intended to make today, let me, if I can, just say a few words about the cowardly act of terrorism that we learned of early this morning. The suicide attack against our Embassy annex in East Beirut has saddened us all, of course. It's another painful reminder of the persistent threat of terrorism in the world.

I talked with our Ambassador, Reg Bartholomew, who, although injured himself, expressed pride on behalf of the dedicated Americans that were serving with him. I called him on the flight out here. He was in the hospital there. But he's quite a guy, as are a lot of those Foreign Service people of ours. He had walked out of that explosion to the hospital under his own power. And he was telling that all he had were some cuts and things, and he says, ``I'm going to get out of here tomorrow.'' And he will.

But in this moment of anger and sorrow, I think our prayers are with those, the bereaved who have lost someone there, and our commitment to the cause of peace remains firm. And, of course, we have sympathy for those who are injured. I'm proud, as all Americans should be proud, of the brave Americans that are serving, as I said, throughout the world in that service.

But I now come to this part of the day, and I have enjoyed this visit so much. Actually, it's been a bit nostalgic for me. Back in an earlier life, part of my job at that time was visiting manufacturing plants in connection with the TV show that I was doing and speaking to employees under very similar circumstances to these. I don't want to give away my age -- [laughter] -- but I can tell you that the plants I was visiting then looked like log cabins compared to what I've seen here today.

Now, I look at you, and I know I'm looking at America's future, and it looks great. If our country is to remain prosperous, the standard of living of our people is to be maintained. If America is to remain a leader in world affairs, we must have policies that encourage this kind of investment in the future. We aren't going to have it if politicians tax away our take-home pay, tax away the resources needed for investment, and tax the vitality out of our economy.

I know you folks here in Michigan have had your fill of politicians insisting that what you need is another tax increase. We need to focus our efforts on economic growth and expanding opportunities for people. We've already tried the old ideas that rely on bigger government and more taxes as a solution to our problems. The old solutions more than doubled our taxes just between 1976 and 1981. They gave us murderous double-digit inflation, sky-high interest rates, unemployment, economic stagnation, and national insecurity.

Now, there are those who would divide us, appealing to envy and promising something for nothing. Well, I think the American people are too decent and too smart to be taken in by such divisiveness. What we want to do is work and build and produce for growth and expansion, so that all of us and our families will be better off.

And I have to say something to you in just the short time that I've been here also. Family, yes, it's the center of our whole system and our whole civilization and policy in this country. But within this plant, in just this last short time, I've seen a larger family relationship that bodes well for increased productivity in our country, and it's the relationship that you all have.

Three and a half years ago we started America on a totally new course, a new beginning. We cut the tax rates by 25 percent across the board. We cut the growth in Federal spending in half and trimmed away needless and counterproductive regulations. It took time to reverse trends that had been building for the few years previous to that, but we've proven the gloom and doomers are wrong.

We're in the midst of the most vibrant and vital economic expansion in 40 years. Six million new jobs have been created. The pessimists said it couldn't be done. But we stayed the course, and now our country is reaping the rewards of high growth and low inflation. We know here in Michigan progress is far from complete, but that only makes us more determined than ever not to rest until every single person who wants to work can find work.

And I don't think we need to waste any more time listening to those who keep telling us what we can't do. Leave them be to harp on about no growth and limits and lowering our expectations. We say America should shoot for the stars, strive for the best and, like our Olympic athletes, go for it.

I can think of no finer example than your facility, which we're dedicating here today, and you men and women who are earning a living here by manufacturing high-quality products of which you can be proud.

This plant also represents a new level of cooperation and good will, as I said, between management and labor. And I've been told that most all of you -- management and labor -- were part of the planning process, helping to rearrange the workplace in a way to maximize efficiency, laying out the space to facilitate the work flow and improve production quality.

I understand that many of you who work in production were sent to customers, getting some direct feedback on your work. You -- all of you -- are doing a fantastic job. I think the last thing you need here is bureaucrats or Federal officials coming here to tell you how to run your business.

Today, thanks to a gutsy investment and a commitment to succeed on the part of all concerned, you're putting out products that are competitive with any in the world. Now, this is part of America's new confidence, part of the new patriotism. And I think the world is about to learn that once we Americans put our mind to it and are provided the proper tools and equipment, we can outproduce, outsell, and outcompete anybody in the world.

Success creates success. Momentum creates momentum. What you're producing, for example, will help make other companies more efficient. By doing your job professionally and the very best you can, benefits can accrue all the way through the system and eventually be enjoyed in one way or another by everyone. And that's what made ours the great country that it is.

I think it's also impressive that while working hard, you've taken the time and effort to get involved in community service. I know you were part of a fundraising effort, a charity golf classic, that raised $90,000 to buy equipment for the training of paramedics. I'm told that with the equipment you helped provide, the lives of many people in your local area will be saved. And that's quite a gift.

Greg Meyer, who comes from this area, won the Boston Marathon last year. Well, all of us are in the race for the long haul. We're part of the same team, the American team, and we ain't coming in second. We're going to keep working together, building and producing to keep this country number one and the best country on the face of this planet. And thank you for doing more than your part. It'll be my honor to help you dedicate this facility to the American spirit, which is what you're all about.

And let me just extend a word of personal gratitude also, that my talking about the few years before we came here, I wasn't in any way talking about the days when a gentleman on this platform was the President of the United States. It was going uphill then. It started to go downhill, and we've just tried to put it back on that uphill course.

The President. Thank you all very much. And before I begin the remarks that I intend to make today, let me say a few words, if I could, about the cowardly act of terrorism that we learned of early this morning. The suicide attack against our Embassy annex in East Beirut has saddened all of us, of course. It's another painful reminder of the persistent threat of terrorism in the world.

I've talked with our Ambassador, Reg Bartholomew, who, although injured himself, expressed pride on behalf of the dedicated Americans who were serving with him. In this moment of anger and sorrow, our prayers are with those who are bereaved, while our commitment to the cause of peace remains firm. And I'm proud, as all Americans should be proud, of the brave Americans serving our nation throughout the world in the cause of peace for people everywhere.

But now, we've just been visiting with your good friends in Iowa. And now, what a wonderful way to cap our day to be back with you in the Wolverine State. I can't imagine a better place to begin our Michigan campaign than right here in your all-American city -- the center of the 5th District, the home of our 38th President of the United States. And you don't have to be in Grand Rapids long to understand how this town gave us someone as good -- no, forgive me -- as great as Jerry Ford.

Westinghouse plant and seen an unbeatable combination for our future -- men and women from labor and management joining together to pool their resources, and not only saving their company but developing advanced technologies to make it stronger, bigger, and better than ever before.

Now, some people seem to spend their time traveling back and forth across America wringing their hands in despair. Well, thank heavens for people like you -- you, who rolled up your sleeves, went to work, and together have created almost 13,000 jobs for the Grand Rapids area in the last 3 years.

This is the brand of leadership that Jerry Ford gave America. He helped heal the Nation's spirit, he brought back our economy, he began rebuilding our defenses. And when Jerry Ford left, America was better off than before.

I have to tell you a little personal thing here about Jerry Ford and myself. I can begin it by saying we go back 50 years, except that we didn't know it 50 years ago. It was just that we happened then -- without realizing or knowing each other -- we happended to share an experience. Jerry Ford was down on the floor of the Michigan Stadium, in the center of the line down there, playing for Michigan against the University of Iowa. And I was up in the press box broadcasting that game on radio.

Four years ago, we had to cope with, as Jerry told you, the double-digit inflation nightmare and the interest rates of 21 percent and the highest peacetime tax burden in our history, zero growth, rising crime rate, scholastic aptitude test scores that had been falling for two decades, a foreign policy as feeble as it was fearful, and to top it off, the people in Washington whose only answer was, ``All of you suffer from a malaise.'' Well, the American people didn't suffer from any malaise; they suffered from leaders who denied them opportunity, and opportunity is what we're putting back in the hands of you, the people.

You know, with this being football season and Michigan being a powerhouse football State, maybe you've noticed in our Nation's Capital the same thing I have: When all the last team ever did was punt, isn't it great to see America scoring touchdowns again?

Our economy is not falling apart. Our defenses are not being neglected. America's being looked up to again as a leader for peace and freedom. And not 1 square inch of additional territory has fallen to Communist aggressors since 1981.

Now, Jerry Ford told you about inflation and what it's down to. We won't be satisfied until inflation is 0.0. And while here in Michigan things are looking up after a long period of hard times, we cannot and we will not be satisfied until every person in your State who wants a job can find a job.

Congress. Now, I'm talking about a constitutional amendment mandating that government stop spending more than government takes in and a line-item veto, giving the President power to veto individual items in appropriation bills to get rid of some of the useless extravagance.

The President. I know -- [laughter] -- you've had a taxpayer's revolt here in Michigan. But considering the magnitude of what's at stake today, would you agree that nothing could be quite so revolting as what they do to you and to all the taxpayers of America?

Well, I've been traveling our nation, and I've heard what our people feel. And believe me, there's no doubt about where they stand on this question. Come November 6th, America will rise up and answer my opponent's issue number one -- his tax increase -- with an emphatic, unequivocal no.

The President.  --  -- each day, our people do what they've always done best, and that is create not only prosperity but also the very ability of the United States to perfect and enjoy a wider array of freedoms than any other nation in history. That's America. People paying a fairer share, but always keeping a fair share. And that's where we and the other side part company. Their first loyalty is to government; our first loyalty is to the people -- all the people.

The tax increases they propose are recovery killers; they're destined to crush the initiative and spirit of the people, designed to destroy jobs and economic growth, and, yes, make no mistake, destined to make the deficit much higher, not lower.

To all those Democrats who've been loyal to the party of F.D.R. and Harry Truman and J.F.K. -- and I hope there are many present; I was one for most of my adult life -- people who believe in protecting the interests of the working people and who are not ashamed or afraid of Americans standing for freedom in the world, for those Democrats who are here, I say, ``Join us.'' And by ``us,'' I also mean Guy Vander Jagt and Hal Sawyer and Mark Siljander and your fine Senatorial candidates, your candidate Jack Lousma, your other candidates for the Congress -- Paul Henry and Jackie MacGregor for the House of Representatives. Come and walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity, and together we can lift America up to meet our greatest days.

No army is as powerful as an idea whose time has come. In 1980, millions of Americans from all walks of life came together for the common cause of freedom. We united under a new banner for opportunity, for growth, and progress. We fought to make a new beginning. We struggled to rescue our nation. And all during those momentous days, our ranks have continued to swell.

Today the power of that idea has become a mighty tide for progress. And with Democrats and independents joining us in larger and larger numbers, the power of that idea can become a tidal wave for progress. Those politicians who remain stuck in the past -- well, they cannot and will not hold us back. It's time for them to stand aside and get out of our way.

When I spoke of these candidates and these incumbent Congressmen here and how we need them, the last time that a Republican administration had a Congress of its own persuasion to help it to do the things it had told the people it wanted to do was in the first 2 years of the Eisenhower administration. And since then, until 1980 -- or till 1981, they have controlled both Houses of the Congress. And now, since '81, we at last have controlled one, the Senate. And we couldn't have accomplished what we have without that one. But, oh, how far we can march if we have both Houses of the Congress subscribing to our philosophy of more freedom and opportunity for the people.

So, I thank all of you. Jerry Ford, I thank you. I thank all these wonderful candidates here. And I thank all of you wonderful people for this grand Michigan welcome. Believe me, I go back to Washington from here very much inspired. Thank you.

The quest for knowledge about and beyond the earth, as well as profitable use of that knowledge, advanced in 1983. In the 25th anniversary year of the formal founding of the Nation's space program, four operational flights of the Space Shuttle expanded service to the government for civil use and for national security. They also served the private sector for commercial advantage and for university research. The first Shuttle flight of the reusable laboratory Spacelab was, in addition, a triumph of international cooperation. Built by the European Space Agency and flown by NASA, Spacelab carried both U.S. and European scientific experiments and crew; the largest crew yet launched into space included among its six members the first European to orbit in a U.S. spacecraft. On an earlier mission, the first American woman astronaut in space helped launch two satellites from the Shuttle.

Twenty-seven satellites launched during 1983, five of them from the Shuttle, went to work in communications, navigation, weather forecasting, and space science. One of these made numerous discoveries about the universe as it surveyed the entire sky.

Ambassador Glitman and I discussed the current status of the negotiations and the prospects for progress when the talks resume at the end of this month. We reviewed recent efforts by the U.S. and our NATO allies to give renewed momentum to the negotiations and to produce an equitable and verifiable agreement. Specifically, on April 19, 1984, the West put forward a major new initiative which addresses in a flexible manner the basic issues which stand in the way of an MBFR agreement. These issues include the ``data problem'' -- i.e., the dispute over the size of Warsaw Pact forces in Central Europe -- and the question of verification.

The Eastern response to this latest Western initiative to move toward an effective agreement has been disappointing. The Soviet Union and its allies have refused to engage in a detailed discussion of the proposal. If our proposal is examined on its merits, substantial progress could be achieved in these negotiations. Now that the Eastern negotiators have had several weeks during the summer recess to address the Western proposal in their capitals, we hope they will return to Vienna with a constructive response.

Ambassador Glitman and his Western colleagues have my full support in their efforts to move these negotiations forward. We in the West will do our part to achieve concrete results, and I have urged Ambassador Glitman to take every opportunity to probe for possible areas of movement.

Our efforts in MBFR are part of our broader commitment to achieving progress in arms reduction and other security negotiations. About 2 weeks ago, the Stockholm Conference on Disarmament in Europe resumed its efforts to negotiate confidence-building measures designed to reduce the risk of surprise attack. The United States and other NATO participants have put forward major, concrete proposals in Stockholm that would significantly enhance security in Europe. Similarly, in the 40-nation Committee on Disarmament in Geneva, the United States has put forward a proposal for a complete, verifiable ban on chemical weapons.

In the Geneva negotiations on both strategic and intermediate-range nuclear forces, the START and INF talks, the United States has put forward major proposals that would radically reduce or -- in the case of INF -- totally eliminate an entire class of nuclear missiles in U.S. and Soviet arsenals. Unfortunately, the Soviet Union walked out of these talks late last year and still has not agreed to return.

In June the United States agreed without preconditions to the Soviet offer to hold talks on space arms control issues. However, the Soviet Union has thus far been unwilling to follow up their own proposal by beginning such negotiations.

It is my firm belief that the U.S. and the Soviet Union share a special responsibility to take the lead in bringing about real reductions in the levels of forces. We will continue to keep this issue at the top of our agenda in discussions with the Soviet Union.

Americans. Approximately fifty million Americans sew at home, and nearly forty million sew at least part of their wardrobe. Their initiative, creativity and self-reliance are characteristic of the people of our Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

More than fifty million young Americans contribute to the vitality of our Nation. In their values, aspirations and accomplishments we see reflected not only a rich heritage but a vision of America in the future. It will be a society generous in spirit, strong in character and sincere in purpose -- one in which freedom and opportunity give rise to responsibility and excellence.

Just as young Americans can be proud of their contribution to our Nation, they also share a vital part of the life of the smaller community of the family. In this first school where the values of self-reliance, compassion and initiative are taught, the younger members make special contributions to foster the unique identity and sharing of each family. And they prepare for the time when they too will pass on to a new generation the values of our heritage.

For those young Americans in special need we continue to offer support in a variety of activities within the public and private sectors. These support programs are an investment in our national future, and many of the best of them rely not on large sums of money but on the unpaid service of volunteers who contribute their time and experience to the task of forming the next generation.

To assure the Nation's youth of our commitment to share our knowledge, experience and wisdom as they mature towards a full appreciation of democratic principles, the Congress of the United States, by Senate Joint Resolution 597, has designated the week of September 2 through September 8, 1984, as ``Youth of America Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

The care and education of children has always been society's most important task, since a nation's children are its future. The love and instruction young people receive during their formative years help to set their characters for the rest of their lives and so determine the kind of society we all live in.

Patterns of child care are changing rapidly as a majority of women spend part or all of their adult lives as members of the labor force. Yet the need of young people for love and guidance remains as important as ever, and we all have a responsibility to make sure that they continue to receive it.

The Federal government has been actively involved in working with State and local governments, voluntary and nonprofit agencies, and businesses to encourage the creation of appropriate programs for school-age children. The White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives has launched a series of forums for chief executive officers of major corporations to promote increased private sector involvement in child care. The Department of Health and Human Services is also sponsoring a number of initiatives to help American families meet their child care needs.

These projects are increasing knowledge through research, demonstrating new program models, making valuable information available to parents and providers, and helping to develop local child care systems.

But today, as in the past, the most important environment forming the characters of our young people is the family. Families face new challenges, but the American family has proved to be a most resilient institution. It remains the primary vehicle by which parents seek to develop their children into healthy and confident adults. The task before us is to strengthen the family and help it when necessary so that it will continue to perform its unique civilizing function.

Others had preceded him; some indeed may have visited the Western Hemisphere. Yet his discovery of the New World stands as a unique and momentous achievement. His voyages ushered in a new phase in history and enriched mankind with new opportunities. They revolutionized the way man thought of himself and his world. This New World that Columbus revealed to Europe soon came to symbolize hope, freedom, and opportunity for all. A stream of settlers arrived to build a new society out of their dreams of liberty, justice, and economic opportunity.

The willingness to strike out in new directions and to take risks is still at work. This spirit has enriched our lives and expanded our horizons. Thus, it is appropriate that we, both as Americans and as Columbus' spiritual heirs, should take inspiration from his blend of daring, skill, enterprise, and imagination.

All Americans share in admiring Columbus' achievement. But those of Italian descent can take particular pride in honoring this bold son of Genoa who set forth in the service of Spain in search of the unknown. A host of other Italians have followed Columbus to this land, lending their talents and helping to create an unparalleled society of freedom and opportunity. This day is one of justifiable pride for Italy and Italians everywhere, and it symbolizes the respect we Americans have for our rich inheritance from the Old World.

In the year 1000, Leif Erikson, charged by King Olav to convert the Nordic settlers in Greenland, set sail to the west. A terrible storm forced his vessel off course, and he came upon lands of which there was no previous knowledge. He found ``fields of self-sown wheat'' and a country rich with grapes and timber. His early explorations are a tribute to the indomitable and inquisitive spirit so characteristic of the Nordic peoples.

Leif Erikson could not have known at the time of his voyage how intermingled the fate and fortune of the Nordic peoples and the new land would become. During the nineteenth century and early part of the twentieth, millions of Erikson's descendants would join the great current of European migration to the United States. Brave pioneers from Norway, Sweden, Denmark, Finland and Iceland helped push the American frontier to the west, building communities and farms and enriching American life and culture. Others worked long and hard contributing to the great industries of the Northeast. Their accomplishments constitute a proud monument to the Nordic-American heritage and to the development of our country. Democratic ideals, an abiding faith in the value of ingenuity and hard work, and a deep belief in the sanctity of the individual are among the many values and principles we share. Because of the exstensive commerce and exchange of ideas and people between the United States and the Nordic region, we have enjoyed friendship, understanding, and appreciation for each other.

We're here to thank the -- to mark the progress, I should say, of the fight against drug abuse and to commit ourselves to an even greater national effort in the months ahead. Within the last several years, I think America has come to its senses about drug abuse. We raised a battle flag and declared war on one of the gravest problems that I think is facing our nation. Action replaced debate. We knew the fight wouldn't be easy, but we also knew we couldn't afford to lose. We're fighting for the health of our children and the future of America.

Well, we've made a lot of progress during these past 3 years. Permissive attitudes are giving way to a new sense of responsibility. Hopelessness and helplessness are being replaced with optimism and a willingness to join together in the fight. Concerned parents are banding together, and hundreds of community and business organizations have joined the ranks. Education programs are erasing 20 years of wrong-headed attitudes about drug use. And we're taking aim where it counts the most: teaching the drug users and potential drug users to say no to drugs.

At the Federal level, we've taken strong measures to crack down on big-money drug traffickers and to catch drug smugglers in the act. Yet we all know that we have a long way to go. About one-fourth of our nation's young people continue to abuse drugs or alcohol, and too many children are still getting into drugs every day. And thousands of teenagers are killed every year in auto accidents due to drunk and drugged driving.

As you know, Nancy has traveled across America visiting schools and treatment facilities, seeking every opportunity to promote an antidrug, proachievement generation. In her travels, she's come home to me with stories of heartbreak that she's seen, and broken dreams and families and lost lives. But she's convinced, and she's convinced me, that all of us -- if we work together, become more involved, more knowledgeable, and step up the fight -- can save a generation and help preserve its promise and hope.

And doing just that is the heart of our 1984 national strategy for prevention of drug abuse and drug trafficking. The 1984 strategy will be released next week during National Drug Abuse, Education, and Prevention Week. But let me tell you that we'll be striving to reinforce the program that is now in place. We're on the right track, we don't need to change direction, but we do need to step up the pace.

The Federal Government will redouble its efforts to stop drug trafficking, punishing drug traffickers, and increase international cooperation to control narcotics. But ultimately, victory can only come from the dedication and commitment of private industry, public organizations, local government, and citizen volunteers. We need to get more people involved, particularly in prevention programs. And we'll be calling on the American people to help us.

To win this fight, we're going to need the kind of help that those of you here have given to your communities and to all of us. And I know that for each of you here today there are thousands of other caring Americans who are also giving of themselves. None of you ever expected any reward for what you did. That's the way it's always been in America. But believe me, I'm delighted that we have the opportunity to recognize you today.

As chairman of the Texans' War on Drug committees, Mr. Ross Perot is helping to make Texas one of the worst places in the world for drug users, pushers, dealers, and traffickers. And his committee is now a model for many other States.

Mrs. Marsha Menatt Schuchard and Mrs. Loretta ``Sis'' Wenger have contributed unsparingly of their time, energy, and talents to make lasting contributions to the National Drug Abuse Prevention Program. Mrs. Schuchard was the inspiration behind an acclaimed TV documentary and is the author of two important books on the dangers of marijuana. Mrs. Wenger's drug abuse education program is reaching communities all across America. The unselfish efforts of these two ladies are changing attitudes and saving lives.

Keebler Company, represented by Thomas Garvin, have worked together to produce and distribute 3 million drug awareness comic books. And the popularity of their comic book characters is helping to educate our young people about the dangers of drugs and the reasons for them to say no.

McNeil Pharmaceutical, represented by Jack O'Brien, is the driving force behind a drug abuse education program that establishes our nation's pharmacists as a local source of credible information and technical assistance on drug use and abuse. And today their program, Pharmacists Against Drug Abuse, is in 85 percent of our nation's retail pharmacies.

Each of you is demonstrating the unique American spirit of voluntarism. In your own way, you're helping resolve the drug abuse problem in a more effective manner than we could ever do with large Federal programs. We're grateful for the people you've helped and the people whose lives that you've touched and whose burdens you've lifted because you cared enough to extend a helping hand and a warm heart.

With all due respect for Attorney General Smith and the Justice Department and all the others in our drug abuse program here in the attempt to intercept and keep drugs from crossing our borders and coming into the country, I think we all know that the real victory will only come not when we keep on trying -- just trying to take the drug away from the customer -- when we take the customers away from the drugs. And that's when we'll win this fight.

Now, before anyone leaves the room, there's one more piece of business. As part of our drug awareness campaign and our national strategy, I will now sign a proclamation designating the week of September 23d through the 29th as National Drug Abuse Education and Prevention Week. And I want to thank Senator Chiles, who sponsored the proclamation in the Senate, and Congressman Bennett, who sponsored it in the House. And would they please come up here and join us?

During the past two decades, the use of illegal drugs in the United States spread at an unprecedented rate and reached into every segment of our society. The youth-oriented drug culture was foreign to most of our adult population. We lacked accurate information about the hazards of some of the most widely used drugs, and our efforts to combat the lies, misconceptions, and moral confusion surrounding drug abuse lacked credibility. There was a feeling of inevitability regarding widespread drug use and uncertainty over what was the right thing to do.

The early 1980s have brought a dramatic change. People no longer believe that drug abuse is inevitable. There is growing recognition that by working together to eliminate the abuse of drugs, we can make a real difference in the lives of our children and a better future for America.

One of the most effective weapons we have against drug abuse is our ability to communicate the truth about drugs to the user and the potential user. Research and the personal experience of families across the Nation are expanding our knowledge of drug abuse and how to stop it. This new knowledge is being used by parents, community volunteers, local officials, teachers, health care professionals, and young people themselves. These are the individuals who are closest to current potential drug users, and they can have the greatest influence in preventing the abuse of drugs.

Across America, all levels of government, businesses, educational institutions, civic groups, and individual citizens are organizing activities which will help persons of all ages to say ``no'' to drug abuse. These Americans are committed to raising the awareness of the dangers of drug abuse and creating a positive environment in which drug abuse is unacceptable behavior.

When we took office in 1981, our goal was to help all of you build a new era of lasting economic growth without inflation. And we're getting closer. For the first time since the 1960's, America is enjoying strength in economic growth, business investment, productivity, and the creation of new jobs -- 6 million in the last 20 months -- while at the same time, we're keeping inflation down.

Two sectors in which millions seek their livelihood, steel and agriculture, have not shared fully in the recovery. This week we took additional action to help people in both steel and agriculture help themselves, so they can work their way out of difficulty and become full partners in our economic expansion, helping all of us build a stronger future.

The steel companies and their workers have been trying hard to save their industry by cutting costs and modernizing their aging plants and equipment. And we've been trying to help. Our tax reduction, passed in 1981, encourages just such business investments to modernize smokestack America.

In some cases, new technology has simply reduced the need for steel products. But the industry has also been hurt by foreign subsidies and an overproduction of steel worldwide, with foreign imports biting into the U.S. steel industry's share of our domestic market, making the United States a kind of steel dump for the rest of the world.

Well, that simply isn't acceptable, so we've designed a comprehensive plan to cover the entire steel industry and enable us to take swift, effective action to keep the U.S. from being foreign countries' dumping ground.

Taken together, these actions can be expected to bring down the percentage of steel imports from its current 26 percent to about 18\1/2\ percent, excluding semifinished products. And they'll enable our steel producers to continue their modernization and compete on a level playing field again.

One thing I'm not doing, for it would damage our economy more than it would help, is imposing import quotas. That kind of protectionism is my opponent's policy and, just like his tax increase, it's the wrong policy. The lessons of history are clear. The costs of protectionism for one group would automatically be passed on to another. Inflation would be reignited, jobs would be destroyed, not saved, and foreign countries would retaliate against our exporters, like our farmers. And America doesn't need that kind of help.

I'm confident our plan will help steel producers rebuild and become stronger, more competitive, and profitable again. And that's how we're trying to help our farmers, as well. We've ended the last administration's grain embargo, restored grain sales to the Soviet Union, and we've been able to bring down interest rates and sharply reduce inflation.

Unfortunately, our success against inflation, while helpful to farmers in most respects, has caused them some special problems. Many farmers took out loans in the late 1970's when inflation was soaring, and they assumed the value of the land they were pledging as collateral would keep rising with inflation. Well, now that inflation has plunged, those loans have become very difficult for some of those farmers to carry, so in the last 3 years the Farmers Home Administration has more than doubled its regular operating loans for farmers.

This week we announced another major initiative to assist farmers trying to cope with debt burdens. Farmers Home will permit a deferral for 5 years of up to 25 percent of principal and interest payments owed by farmers who need breathing room. The deferrals will be made on a case-by-case basis. For those not participating in FmHA, we're making available $630 million in guarantees of loans by private banks as part of rescheduling plans for troubled farmers.

Through Strength Week will support a commonsense, reasonable approach to security, peace, and deterring war. Rallies in all 50 States on September 29th, organized by a bipartisan coalition of Americans, will be held under the auspices of the Coalition of Peace Through Strength and the American Security Council. These citizens will be expressing support for a strategy of peace based on a strong defense.

If history teaches us anything, it is that a strong defense is the prerequisite to a lasting peace, the only credible deterrent against aggression. And a strong defense will enable us to reach sound arms control agreements. Arms control, negotiated from strength, can significantly reduce the levels of weapons threatening mankind and enhance confidence between potential adversaries.

We Americans maintain our military strength with the fervent hope that it will never be used, and with the conviction that this is, indeed, the best way to preserve the peace. We maintain our defensive strength in concert with our allies and friends, whose freedom and independence is vital to our own security. Our national strength, of course, is not based only on the force of arms. The ideals of human liberty are themselves powerful weapons in the world competition between democracy and totalitarianism. Thus, it is fitting that Americans from all walks of life and many citizens of our fellow democracies are working to strengthen democratic institutions throughout the world. It is becoming clearer every day, especially to emerging countries in the Third World, that democracy is not only the best path to freedom but, also, the most effective way of achieving economic progress. Democracy is the way to a more peaceful world. The ultimate goal of Peace Through Strength Week is a world where the people of each nation are free to determine their own destiny and where no state threatens its neighbors.

Much has been achieved in these last 39 years. Working together, through this institution, the governments of the world have made great efforts toward peace and improving the well-being of their peoples. But we also remain mindful of the failures we've witnessed of the world community to live up to the commitments in the charter. Some of the trends have been particularly discouraging in recent years.

The basic principles of the U.N., nonetheless, remain as worthy and as vital now as they were 39 years ago. Working together, the family of nations can, and must, improve its efforts to combat international lawlessness and to promote freedom, humane values, and social and economic progress.

For our part, we in the United States still hold firm to the belief that within the structure of this institution we can improve the chances for peace on this planet. And whether we succeed in doing so is not dependent on luck or on any inevitable pattern of history. We have it within our power to make history; let's not be afraid to do so.

In this era of electronic communications and high-tech wizardry, time and distance can no longer impede constructive dialog. Only people can do that. So, let us on the eve of a new U.N. General Assembly pledge again to one another, in the names of our peoples and for the good of all humankind, that we will continue to seek the kind of open and frank discussion which will help us to create a safer world.

This does not minimize the serious challenges and tangible differences that exist within our world body politic. Those differences are real and will require hard work and a large dose of good will to overcome. Yet there is reason for optimism. My country will not shirk the hard work or ration its good will in our effort to deal with differences peacefully. And we call upon other nations to make the same commitment.

For example, the United States wants nothing less than a realistic, constructive, long-term relationship with the Soviet Union, a relationship which would permit each of us to reduce, not increase, the number of our weapons, especially those nuclear weapons which threaten all humanity.

Jackson was President. Jackson said, ``Peace and friendly intercourse with all nations are as much the desire of our government as they are the interest of the people.'' In a time of nuclear bombs and overwhelmingly expensive weapons, President Jackson's words ring even more true today.

The United States, as I will detail in my remarks tomorrow, is moving with renewed confidence and vigor in the arena of international affairs. We endeavor to further the prospects for peace, prosperity, and democracy -- goals reflecting the desire and interest of our people.

I'll be stressing our commitment to these goals throughout this week, starting already in meetings with heads of state and government today, and in my speaking tomorrow to the General Assembly, and on Tuesday to the World Bank and International Monetary Fund, and with a number of other world leaders back in Washington.

This intense diplomatic activity complements your own diplomatic efforts. The United States will continue, through our much admired Ambassador, Jeane Kirkpatrick, and others, to be firm in advancing our interest and forceful in the advocacy of our democratic way of life. We will at the same time remain fair in approaching the interests of others. We expect nothing less of you. You should expect nothing less of us.

One of the advantages of having the United Nations in our country is an advantage for us in that it gives you a chance to better understand the American people. And when you return to your countries, I hope you'll convey to them our best wishes. I wish you all success in your upcoming session, appreciate, again, your joining us here tonight, and just thank you, and God bless you all.

Note: The President spoke at 7:09 p.m. at the Waldorf Astoria Hotel. The reception was hosted by the United States for heads of state, foreign ministers, and heads of delegations to the United Nations session. Following the reception, the President returned to his suite at the hotel.

Members of the Congress who are here and distinguished guests and ladies and gentlemen, welcome to the Rose Garden. I know we've all had a busy day, but I'm happy we were able to arrange this ceremony.

I don't know whether you're aware or not, but I just returned from New York -- literally minutes ago -- where I addressed the United Nations on what the United States has been attempting to do -- [applause] -- well, thank you very much -- what I was trying to do to help move the world closer to an era of lasting peace and freedom and human dignity. I'm certain you share my hope that the initiatives that were presented to the General Assembly will lead to a new beginning in the search for a safe and a proud future.

Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 1984. And before I say anything else, I want to thank Senator Orrin Hatch, who sponsored this important legislation in the Senate, and Congressman Henry Waxman, who was the chief sponsor in the House. The legislation will speed up the process of Federal approval of inexpensive generic versions of many brand name drugs, make the generic versions more widely available to consumers, and grant pharmaceutical firms added incentives to develop new drugs.

Everyone wins, particularly our elderly Americans. Senior citizens require more medication than any other segment of our society. I speak with some authority on that. [Laughter] They use about 25 percent -- we use about 25 percent of all the drugs sold. [Laughter] With this bill, elderly Americans will have access to safe and effective drugs at the lowest possible cost. Fact is, it's estimated that consumers will save more than a billion dollars over the next 10 years.

The bill will promote medical breakthroughs and drug innovation by granting drug companies up to 5 more years of patent protection for new drugs. And this extension will help compensate for the years of patent life lost due to the time-consuming, but essential, testing required by the Food and Drug Administration.

So, when you add it all up, this bill will provide regulatory relief, increased competition, economy in government, and best of all, the American people will save money, and yet receive the best medicine that pharmaceutical science can provide.

As educators, you know that education has always played a crucial role in the life of our nation, teaching the sons and daughters of parents from around the world a common language, English, and a common way of life, democracy. Our schools have uplifted our children, filled their hearts with hope, and given them the skills they need to make their way in the world with pride and self-reliance.

Like all our colleges and universities, your schools have performed these tasks. But your schools are special. For throughout our history, they did their work against a unique background of hardship and oppression. Just decades ago, almost 1 American in 10 lived a life that was separate and unequal because of the color of the skin. In parts of the country, black Americans were excluded from public life and from many of the professions, forced to eat in separate restaurants, to sleep in separate hotels, even to drink at separate fountains. And throughout those hard years, millions of black Americans saw education as a shining hope for advancement.

Institute -- and one above all, Chappie James. And even though I was only a horse cavalryman, I can't tell you how proud I am that I'm now an honorary member of the Tuskegee Flyers. I'm not going to volunteer for a journey into space -- [laughter] -- but they were brave young men. And I remember how impressed I was by their esteem for Tuskegee and their love of learning. It was your colleges and universities -- Tuskegee, Howard, Fisk, so many others -- that turned their bright dream of education into a blazing reality.

Government to increase its support of your schools. Indeed, in fiscal year '82, your schools received grants and other forms of assistance totaling some $564 million. And in fiscal year 1983, we increased the level to 606 million. In fact, even more significant, the order also called on the Federal Government to encourage the private sector to provide your schools with still more support.

And a year after we announced that Executive order, we issued a new Presidential directive that gave our commitment new strength and clarity. And this directive contained four important points. First, it told the Federal departments and agencies to look for ways to use Federal program funds to improve the administrative infrastructure of historically black colleges and universities.

We're working hard to create enterprise zones to help disadvantaged Americans, especially those in our inner cities, to get off welfare and onto the economic ladder. We're supporting a youth opportunity wage to help teenagers find jobs. And across the board, we're striving to create vigorous, long-term economic growth.

Today many of your schools still have a long and difficult road ahead. But since we've begun to give you more support, success stories have been rolling in. When Meharry Medical College was threatened with its very survival, together we were able to give it a new life.

Meharry so that 200 additional teaching beds would become available. Today, Meharry, a school that over the last century has trained 40 percent of all black physicians, is going on with its important work.

Initiatives and the Department of Education, selected a group of outstanding Americans to serve on that advisory board. I'm pleased to say that the members of the advisory board just met next door, and they're with us here now. And today, Fisk still has its work cut out for it, but it's back on its feet, and it's growing stronger.

Historically black colleges have enriched our nation in the past, and I just have to believe that your future will be even brighter. As we sign this proclamation designating the week beginning September 23d, 1984, as Historically Black Colleges Week, let us honor the brave men and women who dedicated themselves to the education of black Americans in decades gone by. But let's also look to the years ahead to the vital role that these colleges will play in training young Americans for full lives in traditional fields and in the new and limitless frontiers of science, technology, and space. So much of America's future lies in the dreams of your students. And together, we can all help make them come true.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

I'm honored once again to address the leaders of your institutions. Your quest to improve the condition of humankind, to offer opportunities for fulfillment in our individual lives and the life of our national and world communities places you in a position of responsibility and leadership second to none. You are true missionaries for a more prosperous world and a more peaceful world.

And we who are public servants in this international economic community know well the daily problems and pitfalls that obstruct our path to progress. Sometimes the immensity of these challenges and the attention they receive seem all but overwhelming to us.

But in these moments, let us remember and draw strength from the most powerful, enduring truth in human history: Free men and women are not destined to be powerless victims of some capricious historical tide; free men and women are themselves the driving force of history. And our future is never trapped in the hands of fate; our future will depend on our own freedom, courage, vision, and faith.

When I first spoke to you 3 years ago, I asked that we examine the terrible shocks inflicted upon the world economy during the 1970's; that all of us face up to the origins of those problems, and also recognize our ability to withstand and surmount them.

For our part, we said one conclusion seemed both undeniable and universally true. The societies whose economies had fared best during these tumultuous times were not the most tightly controlled, not necessarily the biggest in size, nor even the wealthiest in natural resources. What united the leaders for growth was a willingness to trust the people -- to believe in rewarding hard work and legitimate risk.

So, the United States made a new beginning -- one based on our conviction that we could only meet the challenge of contributing to world economic growth and of assuring that all countries, especially the poorest, participate fully in that growth by renouncing past policies of government regimentation and overspending and by taking decisive action to get our domestic house in order and restore incentives to liberate the genius and spirit of our free people.

And while we would not impose our ideas, our policies, on anyone, we felt obliged to point out that no nation can have prosperity and successful development without economic freedom. Nor can it preserve personal and political freedoms without economic freedom. Only when the human spirit can dream, create, and build; only when individuals are given a personal stake in deciding economic policies and benefiting from their own success -- only then do societies become dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

We invited all of you to join us and walk with us on this new path of hope and opportunity, and some of you have. We knew this endeavor would be neither short nor easy. We knew that it would require great effort and patience. But we were confident that once our people saw it through, the rewards would be far greater than anticipated.

I believe that confidence has been justified. As I said yesterday to the United Nations, we can speak again, and we should, of a future that is bright and hopeful -- a future of prosperity that I believe is far nearer than most of us would ever dare to hope. By working together we can make it happen.

Our own economy is dramatically changed from only 3 years ago. Rewarding hard work and risk-taking has given birth to an American renaissance. Born in the safe harbor of freedom, economic growth gathered force and rolled out in a rising tide that has reached distant shores.

We are heartened that the strength of the U.S. economy is helping lead the world from recession toward a new period of lasting economic expansion, with lower rates of inflation in many countries. And we're convinced we can continue to offer this leadership in the future.

Permit me to elaborate. The United States has enjoyed 21 straight months of economic growth -- the strongest growth since 1950. We've witnessed the creation of 6 million jobs and seen our expansion sustained by exceptionally low inflation. Consumer prices are rising by only around 4 percent now, compared with more than 12 percent in 1980.

And let me emphasize that we're determined to make another change from past policies. We intend to bring inflation down even more, and we're determined to keep it down by continuing to restrain the growth of our government spending. We have already cut the rate of that spending by more than half. And we're pushing hard for an amendment to our Constitution, placing mandatory limits on government's power to spend.

Fueling economic growth has been the record increase in venture capital and business investment, both results of new incentives in our tax structure. And innovation holds out the promise for continued strength in productivity growth and new breakthroughs in advanced technology.

We believe we have taken only the first small steps into the newest frontier, the technological revolution. By reaching for great gains in productivity, we can create a bounty of new jobs, technologies -- in the quality of life surpassing anything that we have ever before dreamed or imagined. I tell you today from my heart: We in America want to share our knowledge and the blessings of progress with you and your citizens, because together, and only together, can we build a better world, a far better world.

So, just as we must do more to restrain public spending, we believe more can and must be done to increase personal incentives. We will not be satisfied until America challenges the limits of growth. We want to enact an historic simplification of our tax system that will enable us to significantly increase incentives by bringing personal income tax rates further down, not up.

We have noted the increased recognition that's given to the central role of incentives in promoting economic growth. The Wall Street Journal recently cited surveys that were published by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development as indicating that governments can best spark economic growth by spending less and cutting tax rates, not by planning an elaborate industrial policy. This is our strategy for growth, and it will allow us to keep America's deficit on its current downward path.

And as we continue moving forward, we're heartened to see that recovery abroad is gaining momentum. Growth of well over 3 percent is being projected for other industrial countries in 1984 and '85. And we're seeing a rise in developing country growth rates, led by those aggressively pursing outward-looking and market-oriented policies.

Expansion here in the world's largest single market has meant increased trading opportunities for other nations. Total U.S. imports rose 32 percent in the first half of this year. And for the full year, our imports are expected to exceed 1983 imports by over 25 percent. U.S. imports from the non-oil developing countries rose about 14 percent in 1983, and they're up by nearly 30 percent for the first half of 1984.

We sometimes hear complaints about U.S. interest rates, particularly by debtor nations, which are legitimately concerned about the additional debt-service costs that they must bear. But not enough mention is made of trade and the far greater benefits developing countries receive from renewed economic growth and open-market policies of the United States.

So, we can be pleased at the improving outlook for the world's economy. But we can't be complacent. At the Williamsburg and London Economic Summits, my colleagues and I agreed that if we are to make the strength of the international economy stronger still, the sound domestic policies underlying current progress must be preserved.

The more difficult path is to resist the temptation of politically expedient solutions or the pressure of powerful interest groups, and to instead make the hard choices necessary to advance the long-term good of all the people. But we must persevere.

Once the corner has been turned, once economic growth and financial health are built on a foundation of granite rather than playing cards, we will have opened the door of a new future of opportunity for our children and our children's children. For their sake as well as ours, we must not only go forward with domestic policies that encourage growth; we must staunchly resist policies that destroy it.

Let me underscore the special importance which the United States attaches to resisting protectionist pressures. All of us know how crucial world trade is to the health of our economies and how fiercely competitive trade is nowadays. Few of our industries are unaffected by the pressure on foreign goods and services, whether competing for sales at home or abroad. Our common challenge is to pursue policies permitting freer and fairer trade.

Now, I know there's been concern, especially among debtor countries, that pressures for trade protectionism in the United States could lead us to run up the flag, erecting new import barriers, and harming prospects for their export growth. Well, we believe our record should put those doubts to rest.

Requests for protection on tuna, stainless steel flatware, shoes, and copper have all been turned down. And only last week, I reaffirmed the U.S. commitment to an open world trading system by rejecting protectionist quota and tariff relief for the steel industry. I've decided instead to take vigorous action against unfair trade practices in steel that will prove to be in the best long-term interest of consuming and supplying nations alike.

But we're not just fighting protectionism; we want to go forward toward more open markets at the London summit. Well, we want to go forward -- I should have put a period in there -- because at the London summit, we pressed for new efforts to liberalize and expand international trade.

For the millions around the globe who look to us for help and hope, I urge all of you today: Join us. Support with us a new, expanded round of trade liberalization, and together, we can strengthen the global trading system and assure its benefits spread to people everywhere.

These nations in partnership with the IMF are charting a course of renewed prosperity and stability which can serve as a guidepost for others to follow. The international financial system is the ultimate beneficiary of these individual country success stories and is stronger today than when we met here last year.

Providing an environment to foster lasting, noninflationary growth requires financing from both internal and external sources. It has become clear that a variety of capital inflows in the developing countries will be necessary. Countries will have to rely less on external debt and more on direct private investment -- both foreign and domestic.

Policies that attract foreign investors are identical with those policies that encourage domestic savings and investments and contribute to the efficient use of scarce capital resources: positive real interest rates, a realistic exchange rate, free convertibility of currency, and a respect for property rights -- in short, an economic environment that allows investors to earn a fair deal and a fair, real after-tax rate of return.

Committee to accept the United States proposal announced by Secretary Regan to sponsor an enhanced dialog on ways that the industrialized countries can better pursue our common goal of achieving sustained, noninflationary economic growth throughout the world. Your institutions represent the best means of cooperatively addressing the obstacles to realizing that goal.

As we go forward, we will support our two great institutions, the IMF and World Bank, which have been the cornerstones of the international economic and monetary systems since World War II. The United States remains honored to be one of the ``founding fathers'' of both organizations.

Besides their enormous contributions to individual freedom, prosperity, and initiative, these multilateral organizations are effectively handling even greater responsibilities as the technological revolution ushers in an increasing velocity of human transactions and greater global economic interdependence.

Last year the World Bank committed over $15 billion to supplement the efforts of developing member countries to strengthen their economies. In addition to its proven expertise as an investment project lender, we value highly the Bank's ability to provide helpful policy guidance and technical assistance and to act as a catalyst in encouraging private enterprise and investment capital.

The IMF has always had a central role in assisting members facing serious balance-of-payments problems, and it has assumed leadership in helping debtor countries design economic adjustments which seek to restore economic and financial balance and creditworthiness. For our part, considerable effort went into negotiating and obtaining the necessary legislative concurrence for United States participation in the quota increase which provided resources for the Fund to deal with this difficult problem.

We don't want a world in which some nations go forward while others are left behind. We want a world in which all go forward together. And we can go forward together if our countries give up spending what need not be spent and leave more in the hands of all the people who work and earn. Let them plant the seeds of wealth, and we'll see the smallest dreams awaken and grow into golden dreams for all mankind.

Permit me to take a brief moment to speak about a subject of special interest and concern to our government -- the particularly severe economic problems besetting sub-Saharan Africa. The Bank issued the third in a series of excellent reports on this subject, and we look forward to working with the Bank, the Fund, other donors, and African countries in developing a joint response.

Africa. And this initiative closely parallels the recommendations of the World Bank concentrating on flexible donor response to African economic policy reform initiatives. Our plans call for a U.S. contribution of $500 million over 5 years. And this would be in addition to ongoing U.S. economic assistance programs which are expected to run roughly at the billion-dollar level in the coming year, a 30-percent increase over such assistance levels a few years ago.

I look out at all of you this morning, people from so many different cultures and countries, speaking so many different languages, and I think, of course, how our nations spring from separate pasts, how many of us live at opposite ends of the Earth. But all of us, I'm convinced, have been brought together in this place by aspirations that bind us like friends and family. I'm talking about our determination to help people build a better life, to climb from the shadows of want into the sunlight of prosperity. That's what this job of ours is all about.

We're a little like climbers who begin their ascent from opposite ends of the mountain. The harder we try, the higher we climb, and the closer we come together -- until that moment we reach the peak and we are as one.

What I'm describing actually did happen in real life. One American and two Japanese groups began climbing Mount Everest -- the Japanese from the side of Nepal and the Americans from the side of Tibet. The conditions were so difficult and dangerous that before it ended, two climbers tragically lost their lives. But before that tragedy, these brave climbers all met and shook hands just under the summit. And then they climbed to the top together for their magnificent moment of triumph.

Distinguished colleagues and good friends, we are not asked to face the kind of perils those climbers did. Yet we do share the risks affecting the future economic well-being of our nations and of the world. But if those mountaineers could join hands at the top of the world, imagine how high our people can climb if all of us work together as powerful partners for the cause of good.

The year 5745 of the Jewish calendar is about to be ushered in with the soul-stirring blast of the shofar. And while the ram's horn is traditionally meant to summon Jews to prayer and reflection, its message echoes beyond the walls of Jewish places of worship and affects others as well.

Nancy and I hear its call and are reminded by it that so much in our American heritage is drawn from the religious values enunciated during the Jewish High Holy Days. The liturgy of Rosh Hashanah and Yom Kippur emphasizes both the moral obligations men have to their Maker and the ethical responsibilities we owe to our fellows. Fundamentally, America stands for the same principles. Indeed, these values have been derived in large part from the Jewish tradition which is thereby inextricably linked to our American spiritual heritage.

The ties between the Jewish and American traditions run deep and are related in no small way to the special relationship that exists between the United States and Israel -- a relationship based on the common spiritual and ethical values encompassed in the shofar's call to prayer.

The President. As part of Prime Minister Mulroney's visit to the United States, it's most appropriate to recognize our close and continuing cooperation in the pursuit of the many peaceful opportunities of space. Canada was our first international satellite partner during the early days of the space program, and that partnership has grown stronger ever since.

Most recently, we watched Canada's contribution to the space shuttle perform with perfection -- the remote manipulator system, better known as the Canadarm. It's been used on almost every space shuttle mission. And this past April, the Canadarm retrieved the crippled solar max satellite and then placed it safely back into orbit after repairing it on board.

Garneau. Early next month, Marc will be aboard space shuttle mission 41 - G and will conduct about 10 experiments in space science and technology and life science. These important experiments will help build a better tomorrow in space and right here on Earth.

Marc is joined by two other members of next month's shuttle -- Bob Crippen, the mission commander, and Kathy Sullivan. And Bob commanded the mission when the Canadarm was first used to deploy a satellite and was also aboard when solar max was retrieved and repaired. And Kathy will take the first spacewalk by an American woman, and I know how she's looking forward to that opportunity.

The President. The space shuttle has opened a new era to pursue the many scientific, educational, industrial, and commercial opportunities of space, and I'm proud that Canada is an important part of this adventure. And as we work to meet the next challenge, the development of a permanently manned space station, we want Canada and all of our friends to join us.

Our future can be shaped by our dreams and visions. And working together on the space shuttle and our space station we can push back the frontiers of space and open the doors to discovery, opportunity, and progress.

Well, Mr. President, in a recent election campaign, my party and I campaigned on a program, in part, of refurbishing the relationship -- historic relationship -- of trust and friendship between the United States of America and Canada. And this implies no subservience. It invites merely a degree of maturity and understanding that our trade and our technological advances hinge upon an excellent relationship which my government and I will always work towards improving.

And I think, Mr. President, the indication of that in the past is the joint efforts that we have made in space in the peaceful pursuit of mutual objectives in that area, as we will continue to work in the peaceful pursuit of a durable peace for all mankind. And this, I think, symbolizes what two sovereign countries can do together.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, just before you leave, although we're in a period of some austerity in Canada, we would like to make a presentation to you symbolizing Canada's contribution to our joint effort.

I congratulated Prime Minister Mulroney on winning a decisive and historical electoral mandate from the people of Canada. As the other North American Irishman, I also wished him well in his new responsibilities.

The Prime Minister and I exchanged views on a broad range of global issues, reviewed our common search to advance our agenda for peace, particularly the search for real and equitable reductions in the levels of nuclear arms. I told him that in our efforts to build a lasting structure of peace and security, we shall continue to value the experience, the counsel, and the participation of our Canadian allies.

A healthy North American economic relationship is essential to the prosperity of our two countries. We discussed some potential ways of increasing trade and investment between us. The Prime Minister impressed upon me the importance his government attaches to environmental concerns, and we intend to pursue these issues together.

United States, and I told the Prime Minister that I look forward to continuing the fruitful dialog that we had today. In addition, I've asked Secretary Shultz to continue the series of very productive regular meetings that he has had with his Canadian counterparts.

Even the closest of partners and allies may not always see things in exactly the same way. But we agree to keep each other's interests in mind, to keep one another informed, and to hear one another out on the issues which may arise between us. We, too, intend to give our neighbor the benefit of the doubt.

Mr. President, an hour ago you and I had the great pleasure of meeting Canadian and American astronauts soon to be launched into space. No endeavor better underscores our friendship or so dramatically indicates the potential for cooperation by our two countries in the service of mankind than the peaceful use of space. Such an effort, it seems to me, demonstrates to us all the tremendous potential for improved cooperation in joint development of our two countries.

Yesterday in the United Nations, you reached out to the Soviet Union with a message of peace, and you invited the leaders of the world to join in what we can accomplish together. We commend you, Mr. President, for this appeal and for your leadership in this vital area.

The principal task, Mr. President, of our new government is economic renewal -- to expand trade, to attract new investment, and to seek new markets. By establishing a climate for vigorous economic growth, we wish to create the new jobs that our people need and, we believe, deserve.

Our talks today have focused on strengthening and, indeed, intensifying consultation between the executive arm of our two governments and also between the Congress and the Parliament of Canada. We want more coherence in the management of our relationship and more action in regard to our shared priorities.

And, so, Mr. President, we must deepen our understanding of what we share together and of the distinctive interests we have in international affairs. And I thank you, Mr. President, for your generous hospitality and for a most satisfying exchange of views.

I have seen four wars in my lifetime. I've lost friends in those wars and the sons of friends. I've gone to school with the children of men who are still over there under those white crosses. We can't hear the words of Pope Paul VI without saying a heartfelt amen.

When a NATO ally is having problems, we discuss it with them. We try to help them or make some compromise, if that's what's called for. When our Caribbean neighbors tell us that peace is threatened in that peaceful part of the world, we have helped by rooting out the warmakers, as we did in Grenada. And we try to be what Franklin Roosevelt declared us to be -- a good neighbor.

And this has had a stabilizing effect on the world. Peace will not move forward unless effort is extended and ideas are put forth. And, so, we've made proposals for peace and put them on the table for all the world to see.

At the Conference on Disarmament in Stockholm -- a series of proposals to help reduce the possibility of world conflict. Also, in arms reduction talks in Geneva, we proposed deep cuts in both U.S. and Soviet intercontinental nuclear forces and intermediate-range missiles. And during those START and INF talks -- you know that START means the strategic nuclear missiles and the INF means the intermediate-range missiles that the Soviets have targeted on the countries of Europe -- we proposed seven different initiatives, trying to meet their queries and their protests on some of the issues. None of them were offered on a take-it-or-leave-it basis. We were flexible.

We're prepared to negotiate on nuclear arms reductions tomorrow if the Soviets so choose. I have had the privilege of appearing before the parliaments, the diets, the congresses of a number of countries in Europe and in Asia. And in every instance, I told them at one point or other in my address, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.

Now, we're ready to discuss a whole range of issues of concern to both sides, such as the relationship between offensive and defensive forces and space arms control. We've made new economic agreements with the Soviets. We've improved the communications instruments that link our Capital and theirs. In the meantime, we must consider what will make our defense, our ability to deter aggression, more stable and effective.

We work hard with our friends and allies to see that they feel safe and secure. And we work with scientists on the possibility of a nonnuclear defense system to see if it isn't possible to create a system that will neutralize the nuclear threat rather than rely on the threat of nuclear retaliation as our main option. And we continue to reach out to those with whom we have not been friends before.

Logic and experience might suggest that China would not be our friend, but China is. And our mutual friendship may be the most significant global achievement in the last decade. It shows our willingness to improve relations with countries that are ideologically very different from our own.

And the impact of this friendship has a rippling effect. Here at Bowling Green, you have an exchange program with Fudan University in Shanghai, China. Well, I met the Fudan students a few months ago in Shanghai. And they desire peace every bit as much as we do. I did a question-and-answer session with them. You'd be surprised how much they wanted to know about you.

The world is a dangerous place. We try to be a good neighbor, but we must be strong enough and confident enough to be patient when provoked. But we must be equally clear that past a certain point, our adversaries push us at their peril. Uncle Sam is a friendly old man, but he has a spine of steel.

To give peace a chance to grow and settle in, we must remain strong. Our military strength is one part an illustration of our resolve and one part a means of deterring aggression. There is great talk these past few years of the lessons of this war or that and what we should have learned here or there. Well, we should remember the central lesson of World War II. Our allies tried very hard for peace, to the point of outright appeasement. If only they'd shown Germany early on that they would pay any price and bear any burden to ensure the survival of their liberties, then Britain might not have known the blitz and Dresden might not have known the flames.

Well, we live in the age of nuclear arms, and the question of what to do about nuclear weapons is deeply frustrating for Americans. We're a nation of problem-solvers. And here we are faced with a problem that, so far, has resisted our best efforts.

Some propose unilateral disarmament: We disarm in the hope the other side will follow. Well, there are great saints and great sinners among us. Historically, unilateral disarmament has never worked; it has only encouraged aggressors.

It's frustrating, but here is the truth of the nuclear age: There are no cheap solutions, no easy answers. The only path to progress on this is the open door, the honest proposal, and such a path takes patience. But patience isn't inappropriate. Each day the world turns completely. Each day the world is reborn. Possibilities that yesterday didn't exist emerge and startle us.

Student Moderator. [Inaudible] -- earlier this morning, we randomly selected 14 students to participate in the question-and-answer session. And we simply passed out 3-by-5 cards and then drew 14 names. So, the first question will come from this side.

The President. No, I don't believe that. We have never had any thought in mind of armed aggression in there or of moving troops. As a matter of fact, with the memories of days gone by and gunboat diplomacy, our friends and neighbors in Latin America would be the first to say no to that. And they have -- all of them -- said to us, ``We need your help; that is, in training and in supplies and so forth, but not your manpower. We'll provide that.'' And I have the greatest faith.

The revolutionary forces, the Sandinistas, were only a part of the revolution that overthrew the dictator, Somoza. All who wanted democracy joined together. And then the Sandinistas did what Castro did when he took Cuba. They, once they were in, they got rid of the other elements of the revolution. They exiled them, they jailed them. Many of them are now what we call the contras.

States that they wanted democracy, human rights, the right to vote, the right to join unions, freedom of the press, and so forth. But once in, they took over, and they have a totalitarian form of government. And they are also aiding the people who are trying to overthrow the democratic Government of El Salvador. And we have been trying to be helpful, but it is not at the risk of our intervening there with military force.

The President. It is my hope that while we have met a number of times -- I mean, our people -- and have been in contact and all, that maybe we can open up a dialog about the suspicions that exist in both our countries: they charging that we intend war against them, we feel -- and I think with better reason -- that they really do have aggressive intent against us; but maybe a chance to open up a discussion and clear the air somewhat of those suspicions and then decide that here we are, the two superpowers in the world, the only two powers that can really bring about peace, or that if we don't, can bring about world destruction. And it's time for us to sit down together and recognize our joint responsibility.

Bowling Green State University and giving me this chance to present my question to you. I'd like to know if you think that you're going to have to beef up security in the Embassies around the world because of what happened in Lebanon?

The President. Yes, we're going to have to do everything we can to beef up security, and yet, let me call to your attention what the real choice comes down to. Is there any security that can make you 100-percent safe against a suicide who is intent on bringing in that destruction at the cost of his own life, as they have done in these bomb-type explosions? Remember, an Embassy is not a bunker. You can't build a fortress and hunker down. You are there to do business with the people of that country.

This last tragedy occurred at an Embassy building that is on a residential street. Now, we have put blocks up at the corners of that particular block there to try and slow down and check on vehicles coming through. But we can't close off the street. It isn't our country and there are, as I say, people living there.

The real protection, and where we're feeling the effects today of the near destruction of our intelligence capability in recent years -- before we came here, the effort that somehow to say, well, spying is somehow dishonest and let's get rid of our intelligence agents, and we did that to a large extent. Your biggest protection is to -- and we're trying to -- rebuild our intelligence to where you'll find out and know in advance what the target might be and be prepared for it.

But again, I have to say this for our Foreign Service personnel: they know their mission, they know they have to be there. Such courage. They're not in uniform, they're not fighting people, but their courage -- because the other alternative would be to simply close down our Embassies worldwide and come back here to fortress America and have no representation there. And that, we cannot do. That would give the terrorists a victory that we're not going to give them, and I don't think anyone should.

The President. Yes, with regard to the people. Unfortunately, the two societies are so different that the people of the Soviet Union only hear what their leaders want them to hear. We try, with Voice of America and a few things, and know that we have some listeners in those countries, although they have to probably go to the basement and pull all the blinds before they can listen to our radio. [Laughter] But the people of Russia, above all, want peace.

One of the things we would like would be to have more of an exchange of people so that, person to person, Ivan could meet Sam and Bill and Johnny over here, and vice versa. And we could learn more about each other as people.

We've had opposition to that in the Congress. My own degree was in economics, so I can speak harshly about economists -- [laughter] -- and their predictions that have been wrong. But back around the turn of the century, it was a classical economic belief that when we had business cycles and had what they called hard times in those days -- no one had thought of the word recession or depression -- the classic economists at that time said that it usually followed when the Government went beyond a certain level in the amount of money it took out of the private sector.

Well, I believe that our problem today -- the problem -- we talk about the problem of the deficit, but the deficit is a result, not a cause. It is the result of the Government taking too much money from the private sector.

The philosophy of our program is a reduction in the cost of government. So far we have cut the increase in cost in government in half or more and, at the same time that through continued economic recovery -- with a tax policy that offers stimulant to people, incentive to people to go out and produce, to business also -- that then the growth in the economy will increase the revenues the Government gets without increasing the rate of tax on the individuals. And thus we will have continued growth, because we will bring government back down to size.

The President. Well, first of all, to believe in yourselves and believe in -- well, you expressed your belief in the answer I just gave to that other question -- but to recognize that system -- the Founding Fathers were a unique group that came together in one period of history -- and this system was built on the belief, for the first time in the history of mankind, that government derived its power from the people.

There are other constitutions that say a lot of the same things ours do, make the same promises ours do, except the difference is so great it's almost unobserved. Those other constitutions say we, the government, grant you these rights. Ours says we, the people, grant government the following rights.

Remember that over this last half century where we've gotten in the habit of turning more and more to government for help, every time you get help from government you must give up a certain element of freedom. Now, sometimes it's worth it. We give up the right to drive 90 miles down a crowded street -- 90-miles-an-hour -- because we wanted safety for ourselves and others.

But always weigh government's offer, and remember that the system was built to be run on the level of government closest to the people: the local community for so much of what controls our lives, then the counties and the States, and finally, only those things should be done by the Federal Government that are the Federal Government's proper province. And when it does things it shouldn't do, it can't do any of them as well as the private sector can do them.

The President. We have been trying for a long time -- and that was even part of our marines being there in the first place, part of the multinational force. Lebanon, as we know, for a number of years, more than a decade, has been torn in revolution. And it has factions in which the leaders have their own militias, their own military throughout the country. But then we've had the invasion by other countries. The Israelis felt justified in going in when they did because the Palestinian refugees were using their position in Lebanon to launch terrorist attacks across the Israeli border.

I proposed a plan in September of '82 that, basically, to get down to -- if we can mediate and help bring about the kind of peace between Israel and the Arab States that was brought between Israel and Egypt, one of those states -- in other words, have more Egypts -- then we can bring peace to the Middle East. And that is the underlying problem, the reluctance of the Arab States to recognize the right of Israel to even exist as a nation. And this we're going to continue to try to do.

We brought our marines out after the terrorist attacks actually because they had only been sent in, the multinational force, as a peacekeeping force while we helped Lebanon restore its government, which was non-existent -- and they have a government now -- help train their military. And we had the hope that then they could begin to take over those parts of the country now held by these militias that I spoke of, and the multinational force would be there behind the lines to maintain order.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Lori Smith, and I'm a senior. And I'm honored to be speaking to you right now. My question is: What was the basis for your recent decision not to impose barriers to foreign steel, and what do you feel will be the effect on the U.S. steel industry?

Everyone seems to want to be in that business. And a number of the countries have made us a dumping ground for steel. And they do this by subsidizing the cost, so that it can be sold at a competitive price here, against our own producers.

Now, those who advocated protectionism, quotas, shutting down, high tariffs, and so forth, that's a two-way street. And it is counterproductive. If we had established this on steel, then those other countries would have retaliated by, for example, shutting down on our agricultural products.

We were able to find out that we would destroy more jobs in America than we would protect by the protectionist thing. But we haven't just said we're not going to do anything. We are now embarked on a program of dealing with our industrial partners and others in the world that are sending steel here, to make sure that it cannot be subsidized, it cannot be dumped on our market.

And we're going to try to work out -- we want free trade, but we want fair trade -- so we have a program that is at work right now, and the steel industry is satisfied with it. They believe that this is giving them the breathing space they need to continue their modernization.

Marshall plan to help countries restore their industrial capacity, why, they built on the basis of the latest technology in the field. Well, we still had old-fashioned mills, and so forth, that had not come up and modernized, and then under the competition, they couldn't earn enough money to modernize. So, sometimes our opponents have our technology, modern means of production, and we haven't caught up.

I'm going to be visiting, at Canton, the Timken plant that is -- [applause]. They have invested what amounts to a full third of their total capital capacity in this new plant and this new technology and, believe me, it won't have to worry about competition from anyone. It can hold its own.

So, this was the reason. Every time we've tried protectionism, it's a two-way street, and it ends up with us hurting ourselves and, in fact, hurting the whole world economy recovery. So, that isn't the answer.

I'm a veteran. I was looking for my first job back in the Great Depression, in 1932. And that worldwide depression really was prolonged and brought on by a thing called the Smoot-Hawley tariff, which thought that through a kind of general protectionism we could help ourselves, and we didn't. The only thing that finally ended the Great Depression was World War II, and I don't think that's a very good way of ending recessions or depressions.

Congressman Regula, State Representative Dave Johnson, who's here, and all of you ladies and gentlemen: Tim Timken, it's plain to see that you're following in the proud tradition of one of America's great men of commerce and industry, your great-grandfather, Henry Timken.

You know, being here in this particular place -- and it's true -- from some football I played myself, and then I became a sports announcer longer ago than I'm going to admit to -- all the way over here, I found myself telling Jim Thorpe stories, and so forth, with regard to that Football Hall of Fame. But it is a thrill for me to see what's happening here. I can now say with confidence, I've seen the future, and the future looks very good, indeed.

I'd just like to congratulate Tom Faught and his crew from the Dravo Corporation, the subcontractors on this project; all of the skilled craftsmen. From what I see, you're doing a quality job of which you can all be rightfully proud. With your energy and enthusiasm, with your dedication to efficiency and excellence, America is not just going to meet the competition; we're going to beat the competition.

Timken's courageous $500 million investment, representing about two-thirds of the total value of the company, is in the finest tradition of America's entrepreneurial spirit. The cooperation between everyone concerned -- management, labor, Federal, State, and local government -- is part of a new spirit that is emerging throughout this country. We're leaving the pessimists and the doom and gloomers behind.

But the American people, anymore, don't buy something-for-nothing schemes. We know that raising taxes, no matter what the big spenders say or try to make us believe, will mean a heavier burden for the working people of this country.

And let me ask what you think would be better for the future of America. Is it better to let them tax away your earnings because they'll know how to spend your pay better than you do? Or isn't it better for you to have more take-home pay and decide for yourself how that money will be spent?

Well, I think it's better, too. And I think it's better, too, to have Timken and other companies like yours channeling their resources into job-creating investment rather than letting politicians tax it away. America doesn't need higher taxes and a heavier tax burden. America needs more high tech to modernize heavy industry. We need more take-home pay, more investment, more innovation, and more jobs.

My opponent made raising taxes his number one issue and the option that he would use first in solving our country's problems. My first option is expanding economic growth and increasing opportunity. I say, let's not focus on dividing the pie and everybody continually getting a smaller and smaller piece. Let's pull together and make a bigger pie so that everybody can have a bigger piece.

And I was very pleased to get it, and very pleased to have him remember, too, about that telegram. I've often wondered what kind of telegram I might have received had our policy been to increase taxes instead of reducing them.

But Timken has always been a vibrant and innovative company, never afraid of new challenges, never afraid to take advantage of new opportunities, and never afraid to compete. If America is to progress as a country, this is the kind of spirit our policies must promote.

There are those who call for protectionism and quotas which are shortsighted and temporary at best and which will make all of us a lot worse off in the long run. Certainly, we must ensure that other countries, our competitors, do not use unfair trade practices. I reaffirmed our determination to prevent this and charted a clear course of action to that effect last week. But a blunderbuss approach of quotas and trade barriers, encouraging stagnation by stifling competition, is not the way to a better future. It's a giant step back into the misery of a failed past.

America's heavy industries, like steel, will be just as much a part of our country's future as they are a part of our country's past. We're going to ensure this by hitting directly any country that attempts to dump its industrial products using unfair and illegal subsidies. But aggressive enforcement is only part of the answer. The kind of innovation that we underline here today at Timken is the most important part of the solution.

This mill is designed to produce the highest quality alloy steel at the lowest cost. While your workers in this mill will be paid comparable wages to any in the industry, their productivity will be substantially higher. It'll be energy efficient, using 22 percent less electricity, 27 percent less natural gas per ton of steel melted. It was designed to meet, and in many cases exceed, all of the EPA's clean air standards. It innovatively ties, as Tim Timken rightly points out, high tech and heavy industry.

And this type of commitment, commitment on the part of all of us, is the path to progress and an improved standard of living. I firmly believe that, if given the tools and the equipment we need, American workers can outproduce, outsell, and outcompete the pants off anyone in the world.

What you accomplish here will reap rewards throughout the system. Producing a higher quality product at a lower cost will help the auto and other heavy industries meet their competition, benefit your other customers. And eventually, in one way or another, everyone in this country will benefit. And that's what made America the great country it is, and that's what's going to make America even greater still.

There's been a lot said recently, with the lead story in a major magazine recently, about the new spirit spreading across America, something I've been calling the new patriotism. I couldn't help thinking about it when I was driving over here and we went past that Football Hall of Fame.

World War II, Timken quickly adjusted its production line from steel tubes to gun barrels. By the end of the war, you did what the enemies of freedom thought was impossible, producing over a hundred thousand gun barrels used for antiaircraft guns, tanks, and the nose guns on the B - 25 bomber.

Six thousand Timken employees marched off to fight for their country during that conflict. One of them was John Paul Moriarty. He was blinded when he was shot down over enemy territory in 1944. He suffered blindness and imprisonment, and when he finally got home, the city of Canton gave him a hero's welcome. His friends and neighbors pooled their money and provided this local boy -- who gave his sight so they could remain free -- enough money to build a home for his family.

And then, in March of 1946, John Paul Moriarty returned to the Timken Company. He was given a job operating special electronic gauges that had been specifically developed to enable the blind to inspect Timken bearings. John Paul Moriarty retired last year after 47 years of service to Timken, most of it as a blind employee.

Rockne film on television -- [laughter] -- when the Gipper scores that touchdown, if you'll look at the fellow in the dark sweater standing right over beside me before I start for that touchdown run, that was Jim Thorpe. He was playing an assistant coach in the picture. And it was a great thrill for me to get to meet the immortal Jim Thorpe. I just had to throw that in. I told you I was full of Jim Thorpe stories.

But warm greetings to your outstanding Senator Bob Kasten. Believe me, we couldn't have accomplished all that we have without a Republican majority in the Senate, and Bob Kasten is in the front rank of that majority.

Whenever I come to this beautiful State, your rolling hills and gentle valleys and lush pastures -- and I have been here quite a bit, because for a large part of my life, I was a neighbor of yours just to the south in Illinois -- I know I'm almost -- well, I'm also going to see, in addition to all that beauty, some of the hardest working people in our country. And I know I'm looking at many of them right now.

Now, many went into the countryside and began to produce the best cheese and butter and milk in the world. And many stayed right here in Milwaukee. And together, they built a town of muscle, beauty, and pride. They manufactured machinery, produced metal products of all kinds, opened breweries, and made Milwaukee one of America's biggest ports. They gave this city a distinctive flavor, adapting the customs of the old country and the old world to the new. And as they stamped their character on Milwaukee, they enriched the cultural life of all Americans.

On the economic front, yes, we've been through some tough times. But Americans came through them together. We knew we had to work hard to correct the damage decades of government overspending and overtaxing had caused. And what do you know. The American people went to work, and we are getting the job done. Americans are working again, and America is working again.

Today inflation, as you were told, is down from more than 12 percent to an annual rate of about 4 percent. Interest rates, although still not as low as we want, are down substantially. Last year alone, America saw some 600,000 new business incorporations, and that is an all-time high in the history of our country. And during the past 20 months, America has created 6 million new jobs, by far the best performance of any country in the world.

And right here in Milwaukee, the economic expansion is beginning to take hold. In the last year, the unemployment rate in the Milwaukee area has fallen more than 3 percentage points. And in that same year, nearly 19,000 Americans have found work here in Milwaukee.

Now, we've been working to help Wisconsin farmers make the transition from the high inflation, high interest rates, and economic disasters of the past to stable growth, low inflation, and lower interest rates that all of us are bringing about.

We've eliminated the unfair, wrong-headed grain embargo. We've negotiated new agreements for grain with the Soviet Union. And last week, to help ease debt burdens, we announced that the Farmers Home Administration will defer for 5 years up to 25 percent of the principal and interest payments that farmers owe. And to help those who do not participate in the Farmers Home Administration programs, we will be making available $630 million in loan guarantees.

My friends, our great nation has turned the corner. The shadows are behind us. Bright sunshine of hope and opportunity lies ahead. But I wouldn't take that for granted. So, let me just ask you: Do you feel better off than you did 4 years ago?

Now, despite the strength of this expansion, there's one sure way to ruin it. Now, you'd have to be something of an expert to find it. But when it comes to bringing economic growth to a grinding halt, our opponents are experts. They want to raise your taxes. And if you let them, they'll do it again and again and again.

The President. Well, come November, the American people will get to vote on their coaches -- or on our coaches, and come November, I believe the American people will tell Coach Tax Hike to find another team.

With your support, we'll fight for enterprise zones to help Americans in disadvantaged areas get off unemployment and welfare and start climbing the economic ladder. And we'll keep government under control by enacting a line-item veto and a constitutional amendment mandating that government stop spending more than government takes in.

Now, I know that there are many proud Democrats in Wisconsin, people who cherish the memories of F.D.R. and Harry Truman and John Kennedy. These men were leaders who believed in strength abroad and self-reliance at home. And to all those Democrats who might be here today -- and I hope there are many -- who feel that the present leadership of the Democratic Party is out of step with the rank-and-file Democratic membership of that party, the patriotic Democrats who so many times in the past were supporting the same things that we believe in; they who know that the leadership today of that party no longer stands behind America's role in the world, that it no longer represents working men and women, that it is abandoning the decent, patriotic Democrats of the J.F.K. and F.D.R. and Harry Truman tradition. And we say to you if you are here: Come on, walk with us down the path of hope and opportunity. It can be bipartisan.

You know, as our economy grows, we'll need to go forward with the bedrock values that sustained those first immigrants to Milwaukee and that nourish our families today -- the values of faith; family; neighborhood; good, hard work. Together, we've already made an impressive start.

During the past 4 years, we've helped lead a grassroots revolution for excellence in our schools that will reach every child in our land. Just last week we learned that after nearly 2 years [decades]\1\ (FOOTNOTE)  of decline, scholastic aptitude test scores have gone up for the second year in a row. They increased a full 4 points. Now, that may not seem like very much, but it is the biggest increase in 21 years.

We must continue to crack down on crime. We say with no hesitation, yes, there are such things as right and wrong, and, yes, for hardened criminals preying on our society, punishment must be swift and certain. In 1980 our crime rate was rising. But last year, reported crime fell 7 percent, and that's the steepest drop since 1960.

But like all who visit that wall, I looked to the East. I saw the barbed wire and the guards, and understood, in a more powerful way, the value of human liberty. I pledge to you that in Europe we will do all in our power to defend the cause of freedom.

In Central America, we'll go on supporting the forces of democracy and economic growth. And I will tell Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko, when I meet with him at the White House on Friday, the United States seeks no territorial expansion. We make no attempts to impose our will on anyone, but we remain unshakable in our commitment to freedom. And we will never again allow America to let down its guard.

The American dream is a living thing, always growing, always presenting new vistas and challenges. In Old Heidelberg Park this afternoon -- indeed, throughout Milwaukee and throughout Wisconsin -- there are young couples saving to buy homes of their own; mothers and fathers who want to give their children a better education; men and women with dreams of making the good earth of this State still more fruitful, the good city of Milwaukee healthier and more prosperous, and America herself stronger and better still. My vision of America -- and I know it's one you share -- is of a land where all have the opportunity to work hard to make these dreams come true. My friends, together we can make America that shining land of opportunity and hope. And with you by our side, I know we will.

Prevention of Drug Abuse and Drug Trafficking. The Strategy establishes a comprehensive national plan of action which includes prevention of drug abuse through awareness and action, drug law enforcement, international cooperation to eliminate the production and trafficking of illegal drugs, and health-related treatment and research activities.

Most important is the widespread recognition that the situation is not hopeless; that drug abuse can be conquered. Our citizens have begun numerous grassroots efforts which are likely to accomplish far more in preventing drug abuse than the Federal government, working alone, could hope to achieve.

This request represents another essential step in what will be a multi-year effort to counter the threats posed by a growing scourge against humanity -- international terrorism. The Secretary of State is also forwarding separately a request for authorization of $366,278,000 for the next fiscal year. This first $110.2 million supplemental request is that portion of the total $366 million authorization that requires immediate appropriation. We would hope for prompt action on these proposals so that immediate steps can be taken and longer-term measures can be planned to better protect our diplomatic personnel and facilities abroad. In my FY - 86 budget, we will forward to the Congress the next increment of a five-year program of security enhancements for our overseas missions. This program is now in the final stages of review.

The five-year program of improved protection is being prepared as part of the intense government-wide analysis I directed immediately after the terrorist attack against our Marines in Lebanon last October. When the final review is completed, this detailed action plan, reinforced by new legislation now pending in the Congress and separate measures being taken with our allies, will add considerably to our ability to counter this menace to all mankind. As the tragic events in Beirut have shown, we must do more to protect our citizens who serve our country overseas.

The funds proposed in this request will help us move to implement this last step. Recent events underscore the urgency for proceeding rapidly with those measures which will improve security and protection.

International terrorism, by its very nature, is unpredictable and difficult to defend against -- particularly when the attacker intends to give his life in the attempt to assassinate others. As long as rogue governments use the brutality of terrorism in attempts to achieve their ends, we must take measures such as these to reduce our vulnerability. No one can be certain that such attacks will not occur again in the future. We can be certain, however, that the enhancements made possible in the request for appropriations I have forwarded today and the authorization request, transmitted by the Secretary of State, will make such attacks much more difficult.

I have today signed S. 38, the Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act Amendments of 1984. The last amendments to this act in 1972 expanded worker coverage and provided relatively high benefits which resulted in excessive costs. Today's legislation addresses these issues and makes important reforms in workers compensation for injured workers, who contributed so much to our nation's vital maritime industry, and their families.

This legislation is the result of the hard work and cooperative spirit of employers, unions, and the insurance industry. It passed the Congress with strong bipartisan support and with the endorsement of this administration.

I want to congratulate all the parties to this consensus legislation. Their efforts strike a balance between continuing to provide fair and necessary benefits for injured workers and their families and, at the same time, giving employers, insurers, and the Labor Department the means to control program costs more effectively. The bill will accomplish this by clarifying the act's coverage to exempt certain categories of workers whose work activities are on land, putting reasonable limits on benefits and increasing the penalties for fraud and abuse.

I would also like to take this opportunity to commend Congressman John Erlenborn who is retiring from the Congress this year after 20 years of outstanding and dedicated service. He has played a very significant role in shaping labor legislation during those 20 years, and it is fitting that he should be culminating his distinguished career in the Congress by playing a key role in the passage of this reform legislation.

President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act that are applicable to the committees listed in Sections 1 and 2 of this Order, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, shall be performed by the head of the department or agency designated after each committee, in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

This has been a busy week of diplomatic activity for America. I've addressed the United Nations and the International Monetary Fund and World Bank meetings and met with a dozen world leaders. Among them were the new leader of our neighbor to the north, Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney, and, as you know, Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko.

To the delegates at the U.N., I emphasized America's dedication to world peace through confident and stronger alliances and a constructive dialog with our adversaries. I told them of the importance we attached to seeking peaceful solutions to regional conflicts plaguing many nations and the need for democratic principles and human freedom as the foundation for a more prosperous, peaceful world.

At the IMF and World Bank, I reported that an American economic renaissance is underway, leading the rest of the world from the darkness of recession toward brighter days of renewed hope and global prosperity.

World economic growth today is nearly twice what it was 4 years ago, and inflation in the industrial countries is half of what it was. The growing economic interdependence of our world is creating a riple effect of good news for those countries committed to sensible policies -- policies which allow the magic of the marketplace to create opportunities for growth and progress, free from the dead weight of government interference and misguided protectionism.

Gromyko at the White House for a thorough exchange of views. I've said from the outset of my public life that a successful U.S. policy toward the Soviet Union must rest on realism, strength, and a willingness to negotiate.

Last January I spelled out clearly our goals for U.S.-Soviet relations: to reduce and eventually eliminate the threat and use of force in resolving disagreements; to reduce the vast stockpiles of armaments in the world, especially nuclear arms; and to establish a working relationship between our two countries marked by a greater understanding.

In our meeting yesterday, we covered all issues which separate us. And while I told Mr. Gromyko of our disappointment that his country walked out of the Geneva nuclear arms reduction talks last year, we remain ready to discuss the entire family of arms control issues as soon as they are. It's in both our interests that these talks commence promptly and that progress be made. Our two countries have no more solemn responsibility than to reduce the level of arms and to enhance understanding.

Mr. Gromyko and I also discussed major trouble spots in the world, and I told him that it's vital for us to exchange views and help find lasting solutions to these regional disputes. We didn't seek to gloss over the hard issues that divide our two countries. We were not looking to paper over these differences. Indeed, I made plain to Mr. Gromyko what it is about Soviet behavior that worries us and our allies.

But they were useful talks. I made it clear that we Americans have no hostile intentions toward his country and that we're not seeking military superiority over the U.S.S.R. I told him, ``If your government wants peace, then there will be peace.'' And I said that the United States is committed to move forward with the Soviet Union toward genuine progress in resolving outstanding issues.

I think one great change has taken place in the world over the last 4 years: The tide of freedom has begun to rise again. Four years ago, American influence and leadership were ebbing. Our defenses were neglected, our economy was collapsing, and other countries were being undermined by Communist-supported insurgencies. Today, our economy is vibrant, our strength is being restored, our alliances are solid, and peace is more secure.

Now the Soviets will return home to ponder our exchanges. And while they know they will not secure any advantages from inflexibility, they will get a fair deal if they seek the path of negotiation and peace.

As we celebrate the historic role of our nation's free labor movement, we are reminded that workers have contributed as much to America's social greatness as they have to our economic strength. Their dedication to humanitarian goals, conscientious craftsmanship and technical excellence have improved virtually every aspect of our lives -- from jobs and working conditions to education, national defense, housing, medical care and transportation. Because of the quality of the goods and services they produce, we enjoy one of the highest standards of living in the world.

But we must not slacken in our efforts to resolve the continuing problems facing those whose skills have become obsolete and young people seeking entry level jobs. Labor and management must also work hand in hand to improve the position of American products in foreign markets.

These challenges require the best efforts of all of us because we all have a stake in the success of these efforts. By shaping a better future for our workers, we can and will assure continued progress and even greater opportunity for all Americans.

Well, Governor Ashcroft and Mayor Potts, the distinguished guests here on the platform, and all of you ladies and gentlemen, thank you very much. It's wonderful to be in Independence, and I'm especially pleased to be here for the 13th annual Santa-Cali-Gon Days celebration. I was born in the Midwest, oh, sometime back -- [laughter] -- well, not that long ago. There's no truth to the rumor that I waved goodbye to the Donner party when they headed west. [Laughter] But the trails that we remember today were still being used up until around the turn of the century. And when I was born, stories of the pioneers and what they went through were still close to our experience. The spirit that won the West is still, in my opinion, very much with us in this country, and that's good. We have great challenges ahead of us, and we're going to need it.

Well, I want to talk about tax reform, and I wanted to be here with you, the men and women who work hard to support yourselves and your families with your weekly paychecks. You're always there when your neighbors need help, when the community needs help. It's the working men and women of America who pay the taxes, foot the bills, and make the sacrifices that keep this country going. And I'm here to talk to you about a long overdue change in our tax laws, a change that is aimed at benefiting you.

Now, tax reform has its enemies, especially among the people who have vested interests in the status quo. Status quo -- that's a Latin name for the mess that we're in with our present tax structure. Those vested interests just hate it when we talk about reform, and they loved it when they thought I was laid up and out of action. Well, I'm back and rarin' to go, up for the battle that's only just begun. In fact, when I think of all the good people who've pleaded with the Federal Government for years to clean up our tax structure, I'm reminded of a recent, very popular movie.

I've been thinking about ways to sum up exactly how disgusted I am by our current tax structure, and I read a little story Harry Truman once told when he rejected a bit of bad policy. He vetoed a bill, and in doing so he said: ``I intended to veto it all along. In fact, I feel like the blacksmith on the Missouri jury. The judge asked him if he was prejudiced against the defendant, and he said, `Oh, no, judge. We ought to give the bum a fair trial before we string him up.''' [Laughter] Well, let me tell you why we ought to take our current tax system out and string it up. It's been tried and found unfair, unworkable, and unproductive. It is a system that yields great amounts of revenues, but even greater amounts of discontent, disorder, and disobedience. It's a system that yields a lot of things that we have to have -- of course, that money -- but a lot of things we don't need at all.

It taxes you at such rapidly increasing rates when you work overtime that the harder you work, the smaller the share of your income that you take home. Our current tax law is antigrowth: It discourages enterprise, and it discourages productive investment. Our current tax law is unfair: It clobbers people who don't have a team of legal advisers and accountants to look after their interests. It's supposed to be progressive -- meaning the highest earners are supposed to pay a greater percentage of their earnings than, say, the typical mid-class family. But does it work out that way?

Treasury added it all up, and they found that 17,000 taxpayers whose income was anywhere from a quarter of a million dollars a year to millions of dollars a year paid taxes of less than $6,272 apiece. Now, the reason I used that figure, it just happens that $6,272 is just about the tax that is paid by a family of four with two workers in the family and an income of $45,000 a year. Now, undoubtedly some of these high-income people had legitimate losses from bad investments, or maybe there were cases of lawsuits and legal decisions that went against them. But for a great many, it was simply the opportunities provided in the present tax law, with all its complexities, its shelters to hide in, loopholes to get lost in -- the legal scams that are worked by people who don't want to pay their fair share. And the middle class gets stuck paying most of the bills.

Now, we all agree that the current system is bad, but we've never quite reformed it. Why? Well, one reason is a good, healthy skepticism on the part of our people. They've heard too many promises by too many politicians about how their lives are going to be made better. They have been hurt too many times by elected officials who promised better and delivered worse. Well, maybe another reason we haven't changed the tax structure is that in a democracy like ours, it's hard for us to get worked up and united over something unless it's truly dramatic, like, say, a very sensational murder. Well, our present tax code is not a sensational murder -- it's more like a daily mugging, and we've begun to get used to it. But another, and maybe the biggest, reason we haven't changed the tax structure is that change has been resisted at every point and is being resisted today by vested interests, those who profit from the status quo -- organizations that enjoy special tax advantages, special interests, and various professionals who are doing just fine, thank you, under the present, unfair system.

Then they say, ``I like it, but I don't like the capital gains part,'' or whatever other part it is they don't like. Well, all I can say to the I-like-it-buts is: Our tax reform bill isn't for special interests; it's for the general interest. And I'm here to declare to the special interests something they already know and something they hope you won't find out. Our fair share tax program is a good deal for the American people and a big step toward economic power for people who've been denied power for far too long.

We have just received a report from Congress, from the House of Representatives, which is controlled, as you know, by the Democratic Party. The House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families has called our tax plan the most profamily of all the tax proposals before Congress. Now, this congressional committee says it is fair to low-income working families, fair to large families, single-parent families, and average-income families. Now, that sounds like a pretty fair appraisal. And it doesn't come from the people in my own party; it's coming from the majority party, the Democrats. On this issue, I'm pleased to say that apparently we're not Republicans and Democrats on this; we're Americans, and we've got something to do for America.

Under our plan, middle-class earners will be helped by an increase in the personal exemption from the present $1,040 a year to a more reasonable $2,000. Take a family of four, that means $8,000 is untaxed because of exemptions, and another $4,000 is untaxed because of the standard deduction, which we're raising to $4,000. So, in all, that family of four will find the first $12,000 of earnings won't be taxed one penny. We're going to keep the itemized deductions that speak directly to how Americans live their lives -- the mortgage interest deduction on the house you live in and a deduction on charitable contributions and medical expenses. But silly or unproductive tax shelters will be eliminated in our tax reform.

A few minutes back I mentioned Americans' skepticism about politicians. And when I did, I have a hunch you said to yourself, ``Look who's talking.'' Well, it's true I've been in public office for more than a dozen years now, with roughly 3 years and 4 months to go, the Lord willing. And since the Constitution limits a President to only two terms, there are no more elections for me, and, therefore, no need for political considerations in any decision that I'm called on to make. So, like you, I'll be living the rest of my life with everything that we do in Washington in these next few years. And that's why I want tax reform for all of us.

Now, what can you do? Will you write your Congresswoman or Congressman? Will you write your Senators? Believe me, having been there a few years I can tell you they do read the mail -- they count the mail. [Laughter] And you do have an effect. They need to hear from you. Tell them to go for it. And if you do, I promise you we are going to win this time.

Well, thank you, and God bless you. And may I just add quickly here: As I said, I've been thinking a lot about Harry Truman. I remember when he took a step toward targeting tax reductions to help the poor and those in lower income groups. And I'm proud to be talking about this good deal in the home of the father of the Fair Deal. And I just figure we're taking another step toward independence in Independence. I think Harry would be very pleased.

We welcome General Secretary Gorbachev's statement that he is prepared to submit serious proposals at the meeting with President Reagan in November. For the United States, the President is taking a serious approach to the relationship, and he is willing to meet the Soviets halfway in an effort to solve problems. The President hopes that the meeting in Geneva will lay the groundwork to address the issues that face our two nations. Our views of the causes of present U.S.-Soviet tensions are quite different from that presented by Mr. Gorbachev, but we do not intend to enter into a debate in the media. Preparations for the meeting in Geneva are best conducted in confidential diplomatic channels.

We are pleased that Mr. Gorbachev was able to present his views to the American public. The interview is a prime example of the openness of the American system and the access the Soviets enjoy to the American media. If President Reagan had a comparable opportunity to present his views to the Soviet people through the Soviet media, this would doubtless improve our dialog and indicate Soviet willingness to accept a degree of reciprocity in an important aspect of improving our relations. Direct access for President Reagan to the Soviet people would go far in improving understanding between our people. The objective of such an exchange would not be to debate, but to make clear the views of each side.

Cyprus, Greece, and Turkey in July. He discussed the Cyprus issue with the two Cypriot parties and the Governments of Greece and Turkey and expressed our support for the Secretary General's initiative. We continue to urge flexibility by all parties and are encouraged that they continue to support a negotiated settlement under the Secretary General's good offices mandate.

Convention for the Protection of the Ozone Layer. The report of the Department of State, the final act of the conference that adopted the Convention, and an environmental assessment and finding of no significant impact are enclosed for the information of the Senate.

The Convention provides a foundation for global multilateral undertakings to protect the environment and public health from the potential adverse effects of depletion of stratospheric ozone. The Convention addresses this important environmental issue primarily by providing for international cooperation in research and exchange of information. It could also serve as a framework for the negotiation of possible protocols containing harmonized regulatory measures that might in the future be considered necessary to protect this critical global resource.

Environment Program (UNEP), will be an important step toward protecting and enhancing public health and the quality of the global environment. The United States played a leading role in the negotiation of the Convention. Expeditious ratification by the United States will demonstrate our continued commitment to progress on this significant environmental issue.

Helms, Congressmen Cobey, Broyhill, McMillan, and Coble, and Chancellor Poulton, all the members of the administration and the faculty, and you, the students, and my fraternity brothers. I think the first thing I'm going to do is pull rank. And I believe that I can dictate the uniform of the day, and out of sympathy for all these distinguished guests here on the platform, I'm changing the uniform of the day.

Well, it is great to be here with all of you at North Carolina State. Matter of fact, nothing could be finer than to be in Caro- lina in the morning. Last time that I was in North Carolina was about a year ago in the middle of the campaign. And may I tell you that my warmest and happiest memory of that campaign is of young people, college students like yourselves, who came to our campaign rallies. It wasn't always this way, and your generation is something special. You are the future of America. You're urging this country on toward a vision of optimism, hope, and prosperity. And I've come here today to seek your support, because with your support we can make that vision real.

We have before the Congress a plan that would completely overhaul our nation's tax code, knocking down the barriers to achievement and making America's future as big and open and bright as our dreams. It's a good plan, a fair plan that helps families and spurs economic growth. It will mean more jobs, bigger paychecks, and smaller taxes for those who now pay too much. And it will give America a powerful boost ahead in the world competition. Somehow, I just had a sneaky idea that you've been thinking a little bit about the America that you'll meet, diploma in hand, and figure an America with a fair tax plan that lets you keep a bigger share of what you earn is better than a legal shakedown by Big Brother.

Now, the biggest obstacle between America and the future she deserves is -- and I think you've already guessed it -- special interests. Everybody agrees that our proposal would be better than the current disgrace we call our tax system, but a lot of cynics in Washington are laying odds against getting our fair share tax plan. Our plan has too many enemies, they say, enemies among those with a vested interest in the status quo. Status quo -- that's Latin for the mess that we call our present tax system. [Laughter] Well, the special interests may think they have this one locked up tight, and we may be starting this battle for tax fairness as underdogs, but you students of North Carolina State know a thing or two about starting out as underdogs and going on to victory. You began the '83 basketball season near the bottom of the polls, but you never lost heart. You gave it all you had through that final second of play when a dunk shot won you the championship. Well, what I want to do is bring a little more of that Wolfpack spirit to Washington this fall and win one for America.

There in one box it tells you your gross pay. And then you have all those other little boxes with the taxes taken out. [Laughter] The Federal tax, the withholding, the State tax, the Social Security tax. The list seems endless. And the end of all of it is the figure for your net income. You may have wondered at that point whether you were working for yourself or the Government. And that's a good question, but what we need is a good answer.

The way our tax system is structured, the harder you work and the more you earn, the less you get to keep. One of the first priorities of our tax overhaul is to make sure that more of your hard-earned dollars end up where they belong -- in your wallets and not in Uncle Sam's pockets.

Now, letting you keep more of what you work for, that's one thing that fairness means. And that's one reason that America needs tax fairness before this semester's seniors graduate. We need America's tax plan this year, in 1985.

Fairness also means opportunity, and opportunity means a vital and growing economy. And that's another priority of our fair share tax plan: to keep our economy humming, creating jobs and opportunity, not only for you seniors but for the juniors, sophomores, and freshmen, too. Our first 25-percent across-the-board tax rate cut has helped give us 32 straight months of growth and helped create nearly 8 million new jobs. Well, on the theory that you can't have too much of a good thing, we're going to cut tax rates again. Our goal is a decade of economic expansion and 10 million more jobs in the next 4 years. And that's 10 million very good reasons why our nation simply can't afford a tax increase that would hurt economic growth. No matter what they call it, no matter how they disguise it, no tax increase will cross my desk without my writing a great big veto on it.

The economic misuse of the real estate provision of our tax code alone is mind-boggling. Many of our nation's business districts are beginning to look more like ghost towns, with huge see-through skyscrapers. They're built, but not finished -- no partitions. That's why they're called see-throughs.

They were constructed largely for tax reasons and never occupied. The return to the owners was in tax writeoffs, not in profit on an investment. The waste is in the multibillions, and we, the American people, must pay for it with higher taxes and lower economic growth. I say it is time we pulled our money out of tax shelters and invested it in America's future.

By closing loopholes and making sure that everybody pays their fair share, we can lower the tax rates for everybody. With lower personal and corporate rates and another cut in the capital gains tax, small and entrepreneurial businesses will take off. Americans will have an open field to test their dreams and challenge their imaginations, and the next decade will become known as the age of opportunity.

This means that a family of four with two wage earners will pay no tax on the first $12,000 of earnings. This summer I received a report card. The House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families graded all the different tax plans according to their effect on children and families.

Our fair share tax plan came out at the top of the class. That's better than I did when I was in college. And what's especially important, that report card came from the Democratically controlled House of Representatives, not from my own party. I believe that this can be one of those great moments when we stop being Democrats and Republicans and for a time are just Americans.

Fairness also means a fair deal for the poor. Our tax plan would immediately take the working poor or any of the blind or elderly Americans living at or below the poverty line off the Federal tax rolls with not one penny of tax to pay. The fact is, years of runaway government spending in the sixties and seventies produced an inflationary binge that threw millions of people into poverty.

Poverty. Well, poverty won. [Laughter] And then our first tax cut took effect and ignited one of the strongest economic expansions in history. Between 1983 and 1984, poverty dropped faster and farther than it had in over 10 years. Those figures proved conclusively that big government, big spending, and inflationary policies create poverty, and that tax cuts, less government, and a thriving private sector promote self-sufficiency and prosperity.

The President. Well now, wait a minute. No, no. They're -- nope -- there isn't any need for me to take political considerations into account. All I have to think about when I make a decision now is what's good for America. Because I, like so many of you and in about the same number of years, we'll be out there in the world. I'll be living out there with you and with what we've been able to accomplish in these next few years in Washington. And that's why I'm going all out for this simple tax reform, and will you help me?

The President. We can do it, but we're going to need your very strong and vocal support. The walls of Congress are pretty thick. You're going to have to speak up if you want them to hear you. Do we want a tax system that's fairer and simpler with lower tax rates for most Americans?

All too often the increased number of dollars pushed the worker into a higher bracket, leaving him or her with less purchasing power than before the pay raise. Of course, the Government got a raise, a tax increase without having to pass one. Well, we fixed that in our 1981 tax bill. Now the brackets are indexed according to the inflation rate. You don't go into a higher bracket unless you've gotten a real increase in purchasing power.

Today we're being called to a second American revolution of hope and opportunity. Our country has never been stronger or our economy so vital. We're at the dawn of a technological revolution which will soon be shining its light into every aspect of our lives. If I have one piece of advice for you: Dare to dream big dreams. Follow your star. Maybe some of you dream of striking out on your own some day as entrepreneurs, starting your own business, or joining a new start-up venture with exciting ideas. Well, there's never been a better time.

There'll always be the naysayers, people who tell you it can't be done. Let me just tell you about one. Just recently I met a young woman with her young husband. She was fairly recently out of college. She had aspired to a career as a classic pianist, and then, shortly after graduation, developed a tendonitis that made the career that she trained for and wanted impossible. She no longer could play. There she was at home; she didn't know what to do. Some of her relatives knew that she'd had a kind of personal recipe for brownies, and while she was there they said, ``Well, while you're waiting to see what you're going to do, why don't you make those brownies and sell them to the nearby grocery stores here and at least have a little spending money.'' So, she did. Last year her business, Nancy's Brownies, sold to gourmet restaurants, to delicatessens, to airlines, and so forth -- did $2\1/2\ million in business.

I met a couple of young fellows the other day who have an electrical business. They did a million dollars business last year as partners. They got together; they figured that a company with their names put together might just have a pretty good chance. Their names are Cain and Abel.

Well, when our administration sees some of these things, this is why we think what our biggest responsibility is wherever it's in your way -- to get government out of your way. Those naysayers that I mentioned a little while ago, those gloom artists, just remind them that this is America and that there are no limits except those that we put on ourselves. We're free to follow our imaginations into a future of abundant promise. Like the final line in that movie ``Back to the Future,'' where we're going, we don't need any roads, just an open heart and a trusting soul to map the way and those standard American qualities of hard work, determination, and faith in the loving God who has so blessed this land beyond any place else.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Marshall Jordan Breger to be Chairman of the Administrative Conference of the United States for the term of 5 years. He would succeed Loren A. Smith.

From the earliest days of our Republic the most important institution in American life has been the family. The bonds and values nurtured in the loving atmosphere of the family sustain and uplift us as a people. Although it is not often recognized, grandparents play a critical role in family life.

Grandparents give their grandchildren gifts no one else can give. From them grandchildren learn of times long before their own and of the values that can sustain one through the changes and challenges of a long, full life. Children can see in their grandparents the continuity of family life through the generations. Grandparents give to their grandchildren the same love and counsel, enriched by long experiences they gave to their own children a generation earlier.

The grandparent-grandchild relationship brings together the wisdom of maturity and the curiosity of youth in a special loving way. Many grandparents bring their special wisdom and love to the broader community in the many volunteer efforts of which we Americans are rightly proud. Such sharing deserves great praise, because it enriches the whole of society with the same loving generosity that binds our families together.

In recognition of the important role of grandparents in our families and communities, Congress has proclaimed the first Sunday after Labor Day as National Grandparents Day. Nancy joins me in urging all Americans to take time to honor their grandparents on September 8.

Well, I was delighted to learn the exciting news this morning that our unemployment rate has dropped to 6.9 percent, the lowest level in over 5 years. 332,000 more Americans were working last month, and today employment in the United States stands at an all-time high. And I believe that's not only in the amount of numbers but also in the percentage of the overall labor pool. It's interesting to note that this nation which believes in lower taxes and free and fair trade has created more than 8 million jobs now in 33 months. We're seeing the proof that America's economy is packing new power. We can keep driving our unemployment rate down; we can keep opening up opportunities for our future if all of us unite in working for an America where government doesn't grow, prosperity does.

In the days ahead, I urge the Congress to join with me with renewed energy in our shared responsibilities: to control all unnecessary spending; to work for a freer and fairer trading system; and to pass a new tax plan for America, a fair-share tax plan for all.

The President. No, and I didn't intend to say that. I did know that all the people that have been coming back here have been reporting to me on how widespread was this, and I'm sorry that I carelessly gave the impression that I believed that it had been totally eliminated. There are areas where it hasn't.

The President. I was not nearly as ill-informed as many of you have made it out that I was. I may have been careless in my language in that one thing, but I was talking about improvements that actually do exist there and have been made. But, as I say, I know that segregation has not been eliminated totally and in some areas there's been no improvement. But there has been a great improvement over what has ever existed before.

Thank you all very much. Welcome to the White House. It's always good to see some old friends, but to have a chance also to make some new ones. And it's always a pleasure to be joined by two of the most important women in my life, Nancy and Maureen. We don't often have lunch together.

They don't know whether we are going to break the record. The record is 7 straight days of this kind of a heat wave, and I think we're up to 5 now or maybe I haven't counted them all. But I remember, as a boy, a preacher in our church one Sunday, in the dog days of summer, told us that because of the heat he was going to preach the shortest sermon that we had ever heard. And he said just seven words: ``If you think it's hot now, wait.'' [Laughter] So, I am going to follow his example. I'll run a little bit over seven words, but I'll try to keep it short.

I'm sure you've heard of our plan to completely overhaul the Federal tax structure. This is the most burning issue facing the American people, I think, in this decade. I'm going to be out on the stump all fall bringing our case for tax fairness and economic growth to the American people and rallying their support. I'll be in many of your States, possibly many of your communities. And I'll be looking for your help, because it's at the grassroots level that our tax proposal will find the energy, determination, and willpower needed to topple the status quo. Now, I used that term because every place I've been going, like yesterday to the students of North Carolina State University, I explained status quo -- that that's a Latin term for the mess we're in. [Laughter] And the present system is a mess.

As State legislators, I'm not going to tell you about the pleadings of lobbyists. You're very familiar with that. The siren songs of special interests are heard in every legislative hall. But this time we can work for the special interests of all the American people to create a fair and equitable tax system, one which will be a double boon to the economy because it will both close wasteful loopholes and cut tax rates. It's time for Americans to take their money out of tax shelters and invest that money in America's future. Every day we live with the present tax code, we're slowing economic growth, sacrificing jobs that could've been created, and unfairly burdening families and perpetuating an unjust system that only breeds cynicism and resentment in the American people.

Carolina State, as I told you -- State University, and talking to those college students brought home the urgency of this issue. The room was just electrified with their hope and energy and enthusiasm. I just said at the table and will repeat -- the 21st century is going to be in good hands.

How unfair it would be to chain them to the failed policies of the past. One of our proudest accomplishments as Republicans is the way we've been able to draw more and more young people into our ranks. I've repeatedly said that I can remember back a time talking to Republican fundraisers, and so forth, when I'd come home and say the only young people present look like they couldn't join anything else. [Laughter] But not anymore.

We've swept aside the pessimism and the resignation that gripped the elected leadership of this country not too long ago, and we've opened up the doors to the future. Like the American people, we Republicans believe that America is still young, still vital, still strong. And what we have accomplished goes beyond just words. We've backed our words, I think, with decisive and dramatic action. Our 25-percent across-the-board tax reduction gave new life and substance to the American spirit of optimism. An entrepreneurial renaissance is spreading across our land. A powerful economic expansion is lifting America out of the devastation of a decade of high tax policies and enabling us to build on a solid base of noninflationary growth.

Now, here's a piece of good news you may not have heard about, but then, knowing some of the people on our team that have been talking to you so far today, maybe they mentioned it. The Democratically controlled House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families rated all the different tax plans that are floating around and found that ours was, by far, the most profamily of all of them. By raising the standard deduction to $4,000 for a married couple filing jointly and nearly doubling the personal exemption to $2,000, we'll make it so that a family of four doesn't pay one penny in Federal income tax on the first $12,000 of earnings. We're also giving nonwage-earning spouses equal access to the IRA's, those nontaxable savings accounts. And this, coupled with the pension reform that was passed in the last Congress, will go a long way toward alleviating poverty by allowing women the means to care for themselves in their retirement years.

State and local tax deduction has been getting a lot of flack from some quarters -- been talking about it here at this table. Well, it turns out that the New York State government has a study by its comptroller that found that taxpayers in New York would save $588 million a year in taxes under our proposal. And that's the point. If the individual taxpayers in your States benefit, your States and localities as a whole benefit. There's no logic to fighting tax fairness and fighting a plan that would increase economic growth, create jobs, give families a much-needed break, and take the working poor off the tax rolls all together.

Of course, we still have a job to do in Congress getting spending under control. In that connection, on the revenue side, I'd like it known that I could immediately deposit $1.2 billion in cash in the Treasury if Congress will support this administration's decision to sell Conrail back to the private sector, where it belongs, and get the Federal Government out of the business of owning a railroad. I was only a kid the last time the Government tried to run the railroads. That was in World War I. And it was a disaster for the country and for the railroads. Everett Dirksen might have said, ``A billion here, a billion there, and pretty soon it adds up.'' [Laughter] Well, some in Congress seem to think that they can proceed as usual, indiscriminately spending taxpayer dollars, and that sooner or later they'll be bailed out with a tax hike. Well, not for at least 3\1/2\ years they won't be bailed out with a tax hike. Using Navy terms, I'll say as many times as I have to, there will be no tax hike on my watch.

We Republicans have always looked for long-term solutions, and this tax plan is one of those which will be working long after we've left office. As State legislators, you know the programs closer to home are more cost-efficient, better planned, and offer more assistance. But the gluttonous Federal tax system has robbed you of the base for local programs. We must continue to move this wheel of government in the interest of what's right for America. And this is the time for which all of us have worked, the moment in which together we can build a partnership between the levels of government with a growing economy to give America the momentum for the next century.

In my last radio address, I discussed my decision not to impose quotas or tariffs on footwear imports. Protectionism, I said, costs consumers billions of dollars, damages the overall economy, and destroys jobs. Instead of closing down markets at home and throwing Americans out of work, we should be stepping up our efforts to open markets abroad and create American jobs by increasing exports. I instructed the United States Trade Representative to begin investigations of unfair trading practices on the part of our trading partners. We have the authority to counter unfair trading practices by initiating investigations, entering negotiations, and taking active countermeasures if those negotiations are unsuccessful.

Therefore, I'm directing the U.S. Trade Representative to start proceedings in three cases of unfair trade: one, against a Korean law that prohibits fair competition of U.S. life and fire insurance firms in the Korean market in direct contradiction of treaty obligations; two, against a Brazilian law that has restricted U.S. exports of computers and related products and squeezed out some American computer firms operating there; and three, against restrictive practices dealing with tobacco products in Japan that unfairly block U.S. entry into that market. I've also ordered acceleration of ongoing efforts to open up Japanese markets in leather and leather footwear and to challenge the European Community's subsidies on canned fruit. On these two cases we're setting a deadline of December 1, 1985. I have directed that a list be prepared of countermeasures which will be taken if these disputes are not resolved by then.

We will take countermeasures only as a last resort, but our trading partners should not doubt our determination to see international trade conducted fairly with the same rules applicable to all. I'm committed to and will continue to fight for fair trade. American exporters and American workers deserve a fair shake abroad, and we intend to see they get it. Our objective will always be to make world trading partnerships freer and fairer for all. So, while we will use our powers as a lever to open closed doors abroad, we will continue to resist protectionist measures that would only raise prices, lock out trade, and destroy the jobs and prosperity trade brings to all. There are no winners in a trade war, only losers.

As we take these important steps to make our trading system freer and fairer, let's also look at the subject of trade in its broader context. Some point to our trade deficit with alarm, but our share of world exports has not declined. In 1980 our share of world exports was just below 12 percent; in 1984 it was just over 12 percent. We have a trade deficit not because exports are declining but because imports are rising at a much more rapid pace. Why? Because our economy is, in a sense, out of balance with many of our trading partners. The strong growth of the U.S. economy has simply not been matched by many countries abroad.

Our tax cuts ignited a noninflationary economic expansion that has put over 8 million Americans to work in the last 33 months alone. In fact, numbers released yesterday showed a dramatic drop in overall unemployment to 6.9 percent, the lowest in 5 years. Contrast that to Europe where a mix of protectionist policies and continued high tax rates have produced economic anemia and where they've actually lost jobs overall in the last 10 years. And many developing countries with massive debts, high taxes, and low or negative growth find it difficult to afford U.S. exports; some look to our strong dollar as the culprit. And, yes, a strong dollar does make it harder for American firms to sell their products abroad, but the strong dollar is a reflection of America's economic strength. Low taxes and low inflation make America an attractive place to invest. We can either balance the trade deficit up by encouraging our trading partners to adopt the high-growth policies of tax cuts and open markets, or we can balance down by adopting the nogrowth policies of tax hikes and protectionism.

The choice is clear. Let's take the high road to prosperity by fighting for an open, free, and fair trading system with our economic partners and by encouraging them to adopt low tax, high employment growth policies. And let's keep our engines of growth humming here at home, too, by passing a new tax plan for America, a fair share tax plan for all.

The system of apartheid means deliberate, systematic, institutionalized racial discrimination, denying the black majority their God-given rights. America's view of apartheid is simple and straightforward: We believe it's wrong. We condemn it, and we're united in hoping for the day when apartheid will be no more.

Our influence over South African society is limited, but we do have some influence, and the question is how to use it. Many people of good will in this country have differing views. In my view, we must work for peaceful evolution and reform. Our aim cannot be to punish South Africa with economic sanctions that would injure the very people we're trying to help. I believe we must help all those who peacefully oppose apartheid, and we must recognize that the opponents of apartheid, using terrorism and violence, will bring not freedom and salvation, but greater suffering and more opportunities for expanded Soviet influence within South Africa and in the entire region.

What we see in South Africa is a beginning of a process of change. The changes in policy so far are inadequate, but ironically, they've been enough to raise expectations and stimulate demands for more far-reaching, immediate change. It's the growing economic power of the black majority that has put them in a position to insist on political change. South Africa is not a totalitarian society. There is a vigorous opposition press, and every day we see examples of outspoken protest and access to the international media that would never be possible in many parts of Africa or in the Soviet Union, for that matter.

But it is our active engagement, our willingness to try that gives us influence. Yes, we in America, because of what we are and what we stand for, have influence to do good. We also have immense potential to make things worse. Before taking fateful steps, we must ponder the key question: Are we helping to change the system? Or are we punishing the blacks, whom we seek to help?

American policy through several administrations has been to use our influence and our leverage against apartheid, not against innocent people who are the victims of apartheid. Being true to our heritage does not mean quitting, but reaching out, expanding our help for black education and community development, calling for political dialog, urging South Africans of all races to seize the opportunity for peaceful accommodation before it's too late.

I respect and share the goals that have motivated many in Congress to send a message of U.S. concern about apartheid. But in doing so we must not damage the economic well-being of millions of people in South and southern Africa. If we genuinely wish -- as I do -- to develop a bipartisan basis of consensus in support of U.S. policies, this is the basis on which to proceed.

Therefore, I'm signing today an Executive order that will put in place a set of measures designed and aimed against the machinery of apartheid without indiscriminately punishing the people who are victims of that system, measures that will disassociate the United States from apartheid but associate us positively with peaceful change.

These steps include a ban on all computer exports to agencies involved in the enforcement of apartheid and to the security forces; a prohibition on exports of nuclear goods or technology to South Africa, except as is required to implement nuclear proliferation safeguards of the International Atomic Energy Agency or those necessary for humanitarian reasons to protect health and safety; a ban on loans to the South African Government, except certain loans which improve economic opportunities or educational housing and health facilities that are open and accessible to South Africans of all races. I'm directing the Secretary of State and the United States Trade Representative to consult with our major trading partners regarding banning the importation of Krugerrands. I'm also instructing the Secretary of the Treasury to report to me within 60 days on the feasibility of minting an American gold coin which could provide an alternative to the Krugerrand for our coin collectors.

I want to encourage ongoing actions by our government and by private Americans to improve the living standards of South Africa's black majority. The Sullivan code, devised by a distinguished black minister from Philadelphia, the Reverend Leon Sullivan, has set the highest standards of labor practices for progressive employers throughout South Africa. I urge all American companies to participate in it, and I'm instructing the American Ambassador to South Africa to make every effort to get companies which have not adopted them -- the Sullivan principles -- to do so. In addition, my Executive order will ban U.S. Government export assistance to any American firm in South Africa employing more than 25 persons which does not adhere to the comprehensive fair employment principles stated in the order by the end of this year.

I'm also directing the Secretary of State to increase substantially the money we provide for scholarships to South Africans disadvantaged by apartheid and the money our Embassy uses to promote human rights programs in South Africa. Finally, I have directed Secretary Shultz to establish an advisory committee of distinguished Americans to provide recommendations on measures to encourage peaceful change in South Africa. The advisory committee shall provide its first report within 12 months.

I believe the measures I'm announcing here today will best advance our goals. If the Congress sends me the present bill as reported by the conference committee, I would have to veto it. That need not happen. I want to work with the Congress to advance bipartisan support for America's policy toward South Africa, and that's why I have put forward this Executive order today.

Three months ago I recalled our Ambassador in South Africa for consultations so that he could participate in the intensive review of the southern African situation that we've been engaged in. I have just said goodbye to him. I'm now sending him back with a message to State President Botha underlining our grave view of the current crisis and our assessment of what is needed to restore confidence abroad and move from confrontation to negotiation at home.

The problems of South Africa were not created overnight and will not be solved overnight, but there is no time to waste. To withdraw from this drama or to fan its flames will serve neither our interests nor those of the South African people. If all Americans join together behind a common program, we can have so much more influence for good. So, let us go forward with a clear vision and an open heart, working for justice and brotherhood and peace.

The President. Well, we happen to believe that negotiation is the thing that must take place, and we hope that maybe we can persuade them that they should -- with the responsible black leaders -- they should negotiate with regard to the solution of the problems.

The President. Well, that would be hard for me right now to say. I think you have to see the intent and see whether the steps are being taken in a forthright manner or whether there is some trying to give in here and there but still hold off from the ultimate results. So, let us wait and see what happens.

The President. I think the same kind that we've been using before. It is persuasion, but also indicating that the American people can get impatient with this, that we all feel very strongly about the changes that are needed in that society.

The President. Well, as I say, basically, let me just sum it up and say the actual economic provisions that we thought would have militated against the chance for prosperity and good living of the people we want to help. But now, I think I've taken enough here because George Shultz is waiting in the press room to take your questions and to brief you more thoroughly on this whole problem.

Q. Would you tell us, however, if you have discussed this matter with Congress and what kind of response you are going to get? Aren't you in effect stealing their thunder a bit here with what you are doing?

The President. Well, that we'll look at when that comes. But remember, we're talking about a sovereign nation, and there are limits to what another country can do. We can't give orders to South Africa. We're trying to be helpful to them, knowing that there is a large element in South Africa which also wants an answer to this problem.

Government of South Africa or to entities owned or controlled by that Government. This prohibition shall enter into force on November 11, 1985. It shall not apply to (i) any loan or extension of credit for any educational, housing, or health facility which is available to all persons on a nondiscriminatory basis and which is located in a geographic area accessible to all population groups without any legal or administrative restriction; or (ii) any loan or extension of credit for which an agreement is entered into before the date of this Order.

The Secretary of the Treasury is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out this subsection. The initial rules and regulations shall be issued within sixty days. The Secretary of the Treasury may, in consultation with the Secretary of State, permit exceptions to this prohibition only if the Secretary of the Treasury determines that the loan or extension of credit will improve the welfare or expand the economic opportunities of persons in South Africa disadvantaged by the apartheid system, provided that no exception may be made for any apartheid enforcing entity.

The Secretary of Commerce is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out this subsection and to implement a system of end use verification to ensure that any computers exported directly or indirectly to South Africa will not be used by any entity set forth in this subsection.

South Africa or of any manufacturing data for such articles. The Secretaries of State, Treasury, and Defense are hereby authorized to take such actions as may be necessary to carry out this subsection.

Sec. 2. (a) The majority of United States firms in South Africa have voluntarily adhered to fair labor principles which have benefitted those in South Africa who have been disadvantaged by the apartheid system. It is the policy of the United States to encourage strongly all United States firms in South Africa to follow this commendable example.

States carrying out activities in South Africa shall promptly take, to the extent permitted by law, the necessary steps to ensure that the labor practices described in section (2)(c) are applied to their South African employees.

States carrying out activities in South Africa shall, to the maximum extent practicable and to the extent permitted by law, in procuring goods or services in South Africa, make affirmative efforts to assist business enterprises having more than 50 percent beneficial ownership by persons in South Africa disadvantaged by the apartheid system.

Sec. 5. (a) The Secretary of State and the United States Trade Representative are directed to consult with other parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade with a view toward adopting a prohibition on the import of Krugerrands.

Assistance Act and related legislation to (a) increase the amount of internal scholarships provided to South Africans disadvantaged by the apartheid system up to $8 million from funds made available for Fiscal Year 1986, and (b) increase the amount allocated for South Africa from funds made available for Fiscal Year 1986 in the Human Rights Fund up to $1.5 million. At least one-third of the latter amount shall be used for legal assistance for South Africans. Appropriate increases in the amounts made available for these purposes will be considered in future fiscal years.

Sec. 9. This Order is intended to express and implement the foreign policy of the United States. It is not intended to create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party against the United States, its agencies, its officers, or any person.

In addition, I have directed (6) the Secretary of State and the United States Trade Representative to consult with other parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade with a view toward adopting a prohibition on the import of Krugerrands; (7) the Secretary of the Treasury to complete a study within 60 days regarding the feasibility of minting U.S. gold coins; and (8) the Secretary of State to take the steps necessary to increase the amounts provided for scholarships in South Africa for those disadvantaged by the system of apartheid and to increase the amounts allocated for South Africa in the Human Rights Fund; and (9) the Secretary of State to establish an Advisory Committee to provide recommendations on measures to encourage peaceful change in South Africa.

Under these circumstances, I believe that it is necessary for this Nation to recognize that our foreign policy of seeking change through peaceful means is seriously threatened. In order for this Nation successfully to influence events in that country, it is necessary for the United States to speak with one voice and to demonstrate our opposition to apartheid by taking certain actions directed specifically at key apartheid policies and agencies.

Century-Fox in 1971 - 1981. He joined Twentieth Century-Fox in 1969 as executive vice president for finance and as a member of the company's board of directors and executive committee. Previously he was vice president for finance at the Times Mirror Co., Los Angeles. He is chairman of the board of directors of KCET, public television for southern California; a trustee and member of the executive committee of the California Institute of Technology; and a member of the board of governors of the Performing Arts Council of the Music Center.

Mrs. Everett is president of Emil A. Kratzer Co., Inc., insurance, real estate, mutual funds, and other financial services, in Amherst, NY. She is a former supervisor and teacher of business management and accounting candidates at the University of Buffalo.

On September 10th the Conference on Disarmament in Europe will reconvene in Stockholm for its seventh session. The Stockholm Conference can contribute importantly to creating a more stable and secure Europe and to improving the East-West relationship. The coming months will determine whether the Conference will be successful in fulfilling its great potential as an instrument for enhancing peace in Europe. The issues before the Stockholm Conference are important and complex. They directly affect the vital security interests of the participants -- the United States, Canada, plus 33 European nations. If these issues are to be resolved and a meaningful agreement achieved in time for the review meeting next year of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE), serious and detailed negotiations on concrete confidence-building measures must begin very soon.

Towards this end, the members of the Atlantic alliance worked together in Stockholm to put forward six specific proposals which meet the mandate of the Conference to enact practical, concrete, militarily significant measures to reduce the risk of military confrontation and surprise attack in Europe. These Western proposals go well beyond the modest confidence-building measures enacted in Helsinki 10 years ago. They are aimed at increasing openness in relations among all the participating states, reducing the suspicion and mistrust which divide East from West, and lowering the risk of conflict arising from miscalculation, misunderstanding, or misinterpretation.

In preparing for this new round, the United States delegation has consulted closely with our allies to explore how best to advance the work of the Conference. The alliance remains flexible and open to constructive ideas from others. We are in close contact with the other participating states and look forward to continuing this substantive dialog in the upcoming round. The U.S. delegation to the Stockholm Conference continues to have the full support of my administration in its efforts to achieve an agreement which will promote the security of all.

The President. I would like to address those fears by telling them that we certainly have no plans whatsoever for ever landing military forces in Latin America. As a matter of fact, all our friends down there have told us, and repeatedly, they don't want our forces there to help them, although they want our help in training, in providing the weapons they need and do not have at the present for themselves. But the memories of the big Colossus of the North and that early gunboat diplomacy era are still so much in their minds that just politically they don't want it, and we agree with them.

Q. Mr. President, your tax reform drive has important implications for all of our futures, particularly young people. You've attacked special interests that are fighting to maintain the tax breaks they currently receive in the tax code, but some of your critics have accused your administration of bowing to certain special interests before the plan was submitted to Congress.

They note that between the time of the release of the first Treasury tax plan and the unveiling of your plan that larger breaks were reinstated for oil and gas interests, for capital gains, and for the restaurant industry's three-martini lunch. Is there a conflict between these changes and the image you've nurtured as the defender and protector of the little guy during the tax reform debate?

The President. No, not really, and the plan as it came from the Treasury Department contained a number of things which they themselves frankly knew were options. The idea of being able to reduce the rates sizably has to be based on the elimination of many deductions that have -- the so-called loopholes -- that have grown into situations where, without doing anything illegal, individuals and even corporations have been able to avoid their fair share of taxes through these so-called tax shelters. And, no, the things that we looked at and some of those options had to do with things that could have been inimical to our own economic recovery. We're a country that still has to, for example, import a large share of our oil -- fuel our industry and our transportation and all. And, so, we looked at some of those things and found that the supposed gains from them would not be enough to justify the setback we might be giving to businesses and to industries that were essential to our own welfare.

Now, listening to some of the talk shows on the weekend, on Sunday, I was a little upset to see some or hear some demagoguery from some individuals about how we were -- our tax program, they admitted, benefited the people at the lower end of the bracket, but in the middle bracket, we were penalizing those people to benefit the so-called rich, the people of the upper end. The truth of the matter is we're tying to cut from 14 tax brackets down to 3 -- a 15 percent, a 25 percent, and a 35 percent. In order to do that, we eliminate many of these cuts. We have found that the average tax cut in the lower bracket will be somewhere in the neighborhood of around 13 percent.

The average cut for the middle class will be 7-plus percent. The lowest cut will be in the upper bracket. So, they were misstating -- they just plain didn't know what they were talking about on the air with some of those people that were talking about what we're trying to do. We want a program that'll be revenue neutral.

Incidentally, with regard to capital gains, every time we have reduced the capital gains tax we have found that the Government's revenues from capital gains increases, that more people are then induced into using the capital gains or making investments and so forth. And the result is there's more activity and more tax even though the rate is lower. You have to recognize that a number of our trading partners in the world don't even have a capital gains tax. That's a kind of peculiarly American institution.

Q. Does the use of the capital gains tax and also the oil and gas tax break to produce domestic exploration conflict with the goal that you'd set, that the tax system should not be used to promote other social or economic purposes, that it should be a level playing field for all?

The President. I don't think that we violated that, except that when you talk about charitable deductions. Of course, that's something that I think all of us want to keep in our country. We're rather unique in the world in the amount of good that is done by private, voluntary contributions and voluntarism in various social affairs. But like, for example, the oil and gas thing, we did away with one great tax inducement that has existed for a long time. And that began originally to inspire the finding of oil and gas here in our own country. But the thing that we did retain, the break we did retain is for the smaller, the independent wildcatter and so forth out there. And we need that because most of our exploration is done by those independents.

The President. Well, I have one myself, and I've been trying to figure how it set me back. No, I'll tell you, I believe very much in it. I think it is the basis, and I deplore the tendency in some places, in some institutions, to go directly toward training for a trade or profession or something and ignoring the liberal arts. I think it is the foundation of education -- a good, round liberal arts training. And I think you'll find that in many great companies and corporations and institutions that many of them say that, rather than having someone that has tried to train themselves specifically for that line, whatever line of work they're hiring him to do, they believe in the broad, liberal arts education. Many employers will tell you that they believe they can do the training in their particular line of work or company themselves that needs to be done, but they would like to have a well-rounded, educated individual.

The President. Well, I majored in economics and sociology and then found that my careers in the bulk of my adult life came from my extracurricular activities. I always was -- you know, all the class plays and belonged to the drama club and loved that sort of thing. And my other love was football, mainly, but athletics in general. And I played football for 8 years in high school and college. So, the first two careers that I had were as a sports announcer and then as an actor. And finally I got around to a job, when I was talked into running for Governor, where I could use, maybe, the economics and sociology.

No, I think the thing is -- I've always believed that a lot of troubles would go away if people would talk to each other instead of about each other. And there's no question but that the people in the Soviet Union hear mainly what their government wants them to hear. And they have little impact on that government, unlike our own country and our people here. I think I would try the best I could to disabuse them from the idea that not only our own country but others of the capitalist world here in the Western World have designs on them and feel an enmity toward the people of Russia, but that their government policies, their expansionism, has led us to fear them.

And I would appeal for all of us to be able to get together and know each other and find out that we're the only two countries in the world, I think, that can start a world war. We're also the only two countries -- the Soviet Union and the United States -- that can preserve the peace.

Q. Mr. President, the presiding bishop of the Episcopal Church, John Morey Allen, said in a speech on September 7th that America in the 1980's in his view has come to be seen as ``a bully preoccupied with profits and self-protection and military power.'' How would you respond to this view, and how can the United States possibly improve its image for the future among allies and among developing nations particularly?

First of all, if we were a bully, if we had aggressive intent, when World War II was over, and we were the only major nation in the world whose industry had not been destroyed by bombings and so forth, and we were the only ones who had the ultimate weapon -- the nuclear weapon -- if we were a bully, that would've been our time. We could have dominated the world, and there wasn't anyone who could've stopped us. We didn't. What we did instead was a thing called the Marshall plan, in which we set out to not only rebuild our allies and reinstate them but our enemies as well.

But, also, in the whole world of helping the lesser developed countries, in opening ourselves up to trade to stimulate business and industry on their part so they can have an economy, we do as much as the rest of the world put together. In the feeding of the starving in Africa, again, we are the giver that equals or tops everything else that anyone is doing.

I had an interesting experience here at a dinner one night in the White House. I won't name the country, but an Ambassador's wife was one of my dinner partners. And I was talking about something and the voluntarism and what our people were doing here on their own in this country.

What is called the labor pool -- they aren't really all looking for jobs -- but it is everyone from 16 to 65, male and female in America, is known as the total potential labor pool. And ,as I say, the highest percentage of that pool that has ever been employed is employed. We have the greatest number of people employed today, and in the last 33 months we have created almost 8,000,000 new jobs. Last month alone -- when I hear some of the protectionist talk I think of this -- last month, the month of August, we put 332,000 more people to work in this country. So, we are making every effort to replace those who, through no fault of their own, find themselves unemployed.

The President. Well, it's a little bit like your question about what would I say if I had a few minutes on their television. I believe that, again, the thing that I said about the two countries, the two superpowers, that hold so much of the fate of the world in their hands -- that we've got to recognize that. Now, if the Soviet Union, in all of its talk that we represent a threat to them, that we're the aggressor and so forth -- if there is any element of real belief in that, if that isn't just propaganda, and they really believe that, then I would like, as I did here a moment ago, I would like to talk a little bit, well, or give them facts to try and show them by deed, not word, that we're not an aggressor.

Afghanistan. But, also, go back as far as you want to go, all the way to Lenin, and every Russian leader at some time or other -- the present one hasn't had time yet -- but every one of them has, over and over again, restated their goal of a one-world Socialist revolution, a one-world Communist state. And invariably, they have declared that the United States is the final enemy.

North Korea. And then they said, ``We will move into Latin America.'' And they said, ``Then we will not have to take the last bastion of capitalism, the United States. It will fall into our outstretched hand like overripe fruit.'' But since then, Brezhnev made a statement; he said that the Soviets had gained enough through detente that by the middle-eighties they would be able to have their way wherever in the world they wanted to. Well, in the last few years, with our buildup and our determination to not let that happen, they can't have their way wherever they want to.

And, so, I know that we have differences. We're not going to like their system. They're not going to like ours, but we're not out to change their system. If that's what they want, let them go forward with their foolishness -- but to convince them that it is in their best interest also to have peace. Right now, to maintain their armaments, they have reduced the standard of living for their people to a point that -- well, Mr. Gorbachev was talking great reforms to try and do something about reinstating their commerce, the consumer items that the people can't buy. Do you know that in Russia today, the average time spent by a Russian in line waiting to buy things is greater than the time they spend in working at their job?

So, I -- the only thing -- I think, for example, arms control and arms limitation, I don't think about that so much as a thing to take up in the summit as to eliminate the things that are preventing arms control.

Q. Is it realistic, though, to try to prevent them from thinking that we are not aggressive, when they, in fact, their main goal is expansionism? Isn't it kind of difficult to change their view on that?

The President. Well, the only thing that I think that I'd like to try is to prove to them that, or show them that, as I said earlier here, when we had an opportunity to be successfully aggressive, we weren't, but that they have created suspicion in all our minds. Now, if they really mean what they've said about -- be the last ones to start a war, that they don't want a war, maybe they don't.

Maybe they'd like to win what they want by threatening war, and then they could only do that if they were so far superior to us in armaments. Well, we're not going to let them have that superiority. But I'm hopeful that they'll just see -- if we can show them that -- well, the cartoon told it all. When we started building up our -- refurbishing our arms and our military -- when there was a cartoon of two Russian generals, and one of them was saying to the other, ``I liked the arms race better when we were the only ones in it.'' I don't know whether we can or not. I don't know whether they are so indoctrinated with their policy of expansionism that they won't listen, but at least they will know where we're coming from and how we view things and what our determination is.

First of all, with the arms talks -- maybe it might be impossible; I don't know, but I would like to see the end of nuclear weapons. I would like to envision the Soviet Union and the United States agreeing, and then verifiably eliminating those weapons, and then being able to turn to lesser nations, or other nations that maybe have some, and saying, ``Look, we've done this now. Come on, get in line. You do it, too. Let's rid the world of this nightmare and this threat.'' But that'll be something we'll continue to try to do.

But in these next 3 years, I would like to see us continue to where the Federal Government is finally back in the harness where it should be; that authority and autonomy that has been over the years seized by the Federal Government from States and local communities, that it is returned to them; that we return to them also the tax sources that have been preempted by the Federal Government. And I would like to see a start made -- this couldn't be accomplished -- but I would like to see us come to, with all of this, the elimination of the deficit, a balanced budget. Then an amendment down the road at the proper date that there will be no more deficit spending, and see this country embark, however modestly, on a program to start paying off the national debt. I don't think it's very much of a heritage for us to pass on to all of you.

The President. Well, no, you could do it in advance. Picture this: There's no way that you could balance the budget in 1 year. It is too far out of -- [inaudible]. And, remember, this unbalanced budget goes back a half a century. And there were many of us, over the years, who were complaining and saying this is wrong and someday it's going to get out of hand.

Now, the plan that has been proposed, and even the compromise that we approved, will show that as we increase in our growth, our estimates are that next year the deficit would be 4 percent of gross national product. The following year it would be 3 percent, maybe a fraction of a point above either one of those -- 3 percent. By 1988 it would be 2 percent. Now, if you envision that line of decline in the deficit, by 1990 it would be even. So, suppose you embarked on a plan right now that said 5 years to balance the budget and in 5 years the balance the budget amendment goes into effect -- and work toward that end.

The President. Well, for one thing, I'd like to see a lot of things changed. And some of them are being changed now, after we appointed, a few years ago, our Commission on Excellence in Education. And the States have jumped in with both feet and taken up many of the recommendations that commission made, and there is being an improvement all along the line. But I would like to see for teachers, merit pay. I would like to see where there is recognition of a good teacher or someone not so good -- that they could achieve and they could look and see where there was a possibility for increase instead of seeing a fixed income and that was that forevermore, like being on a pension early. I think that that would be one thing that could be done.

States, and -- either they're -- one or the other, but between them is where it should be done. The thing that we have turned around, and I'm very proud of this, is that Federal aid to education never amounted to more than 8 percent of the cost of education. But for that 8 percent, the Federal Government was usurping much of the authority that belonged back at the local and State level where it always has been in our educational system. And I wanted to get Uncle Sam out from the business of -- the redtape and pulling the strings and running things in return for its 8 percent, and much of that has been done.

Q. I'm curious. Don't you see it as the -- that the Federal Government is the means of ensuring that a poor child in Mississippi -- whatever, a poor section of Mississippi is going to get the same opportunity for an education as someone from, say, Shaker Heights, Ohio?

The President. Through all the many social programs that we have, that is taken care of. For example, starting school with a breakfast or a school lunch and so forth, aid to students, as we talked about earlier here, some $9 billion that we're spending now to aid, for secondary education.

No, there are some things, of course, the Federal Government under the Constitution has to see to certain equalities for all our citizens. But the actual running of schools -- when you get a bureaucracy back at the national level that tries to make rules that fit all of this country, that ignores the great diversity in this country, that our States aren't all alike. You can't set a figure, for example, that would be adequate for, let's say, the great metropolitan centers where costs are much higher and, at the same time then, have it be right for some States, more rural States where prices and cost-of-living standards and so forth are much lower. So, the best thing is to give this back -- the actual running back to those elements that are close at hand, and in a community where parents can be involved, and they know what they want for the education of their children.

We have done a lot of talking here, and your generation is subject to more information than any generation in history. It is coming at you through the airwaves. They have even fixed it so you can jog and hear it, and you get speakers on your campuses and in the schools and literature of all kinds. And I have been talking to you a lot, and I have been citing a lot of things that I have claimed are facts and figures and so forth. Let me just suggest one thing. Don't let me get away with it. Check me out, but check everybody else out. Don't just take it for granted because you read it someplace or because someone stood up in a lecture course and told you from a lecture platform. Check it out. Don't be the sucker generation. You are the brightest and the best, and make sure that you are hearing the facts, not just somebody's opinions. And as I say, that goes for me, too. Check me out.

Denmark is an old friend and an ally in NATO and an active trading partner; ties between our two countries run long and deep. Denmark recognized the United States as a free and independent nation shortly after our Declaration of Independence. Ever since that act of friendship, relations between the Danish and American people have continued to grow to our mutual benefit.

Minister, to discussing with you the need to strengthen and broaden the international trading system, perhaps through a new round of comprehensive trade negotiations. At a time when our countries are enjoying improving economic conditions, protectionism looms as a threat. Working together, we can see to it that our international markets stay open and that this avenue to progress and well-being is not blocked.

In the past century many Danes immigrated here to look for the American dream. With their hard work and good citizenship, they not only made that dream real, they helped build a great nation as well. So many Danes came here around the turn of the century; in fact, it's said that every Dane in Denmark has a relative in America. Whether that's true or not, clearly we are of the same family of free peoples. We're bound together by our common dedication to the principles of human liberty and our mutual commitment to the preservation of peace. Our countries have both recognized that the blessings of peace can only be secured by free peoples who are strong and stand together. This fundamental truth is at the heart of the NATO alliance in which Denmark has played an active role for nearly four decades. The collective deterrence of NATO has given Denmark and all of Europe 40 years of peace. We in the United States are proud to have played a role in preserving European peace and are grateful that Denmark has committed her moral weight and made a military contribution to the success of the Western alliance.

As we face new and complex challenges to our mutual security, it is ever more important that we reaffirm the trust and friendship which has served us so well. By strengthening our common defense and standing united in our efforts to achieve effective and verifiable arms reductions, we can make ours a safer planet. We can, must, and will have not just four decades of peace but a century of peace -- a more stable peace which is what we want most next to the preservation of our own freedom. And independence will not be secured by wishful thinking or public relations campaigns; free people must be mature, vigilant, and stand in solidarity.

We have already reached out in the cause of a safer world on numerous occasions, and we will continue to do so. We have offered to reduce the number of intermediate-range missiles in Europe to zero. We have offered major reductions in strategic and intermediate weapons as well as a lowering of the level of conventional forces. We look forward to the coming meeting in Geneva, not for an end of all that has been wrong between East and West, but a beginning point for better relations, a starting point for progress.

Mr. Prime Minister, I'm certain you agree with me that democratic governments are naturally inclined toward peace. Freedom brings people of diverse backgrounds together as friends. I hope that during the time you spend in the United States you'll feel, through our welcome to you, the warmth and friendship that Americans share for the Danish people.

Perhaps something that best exemplifies this is the unique Fourth of July celebration that takes place every year in Denmark. In the hills of Rebild, thousands of Danes and Americans celebrate together the birth of the United States and the values we share. The American and Danish flags fly together in honor of democracy and freedom. We had the wonderful pleasure -- Nancy and I -- of sharing that day in Denmark in 1972 when we personally participated in the Rebild Fourth of July festivities. And the warmth and friendship we felt that day reflected something between our two peoples that is very special, and we shall never forget it.

Relations between Denmark and the United States of America have always been close and friendly. When Denmark as early as in 1801 established diplomatic relations with the United States, we were among the very first countries to do so. Over the years, the dynamic creativity of the new nation tempted, as you mentioned, thousands of Danes looking for challenges and opportunities. The contribution by Danish immigrants to the building of America has been one of the pillars of Danish-American relations.

The American engagement in Europe in two world wars and American support for European recovery after World War II have become basic elements in our relationship in the second half of the 20th century. The presence of American troops in Europe is visible proof of the U.S. commitment to the Atlantic alliance, which for almost four decades now has protected its members against war and secured their freedom. The solidarity of the Atlantic alliance has also provided the necessary background for our endeavors to seek a more secure and confident relationship between East and West.

We wish that the upcoming meeting in November with General Secretary Gorbachev will lead to the beginning of a more constructive East-West relationship, benefiting the United States, the Soviet Union, the alliance, and the world. We all have, as you also expressed, Mr. President, one major goal in common -- survival. As free societies, we have always been able to discuss openly; a free and open debate serves mutual understanding and unity in cooperation.

It's been a pleasure to have you as our guests. As one would expect between close allies, our meeting today with the Prime Minister was straightforward, useful, and reflected the genuine friendship of our countrymen.

I was happy to have had the opportunity to congratulate you, Prime Minister Schluter, on the success that you've had in your country in putting in place economy-building measures, including a far-reaching tax reform program. [Laughter] I can well imagine how difficult that task has been.

When I talk about reforming the tax shelter -- or system, I should say, I can visualize a beautiful swan. All the special interests see is an ugly duckling. [Laughter] I think the national debate over tax reform reflects the strength and soul of our democracy. The outcome is still in doubt. Every citizen is free to participate in the decisionmaking process. All sides are going to the people to muster support, and once the issue has been voted on and settled, there will be no recriminations.

The losers won't be sent to some gulag. Everyone -- winners and losers -- will feel proud to live in a country committed to freedom of speech and press and dedicated to the principles of representative government.

This is what binds not just Americans but the free citizens of all lands, especially the people of our two countries. That bond is evident in so many ways. Perhaps the most impressive is in the magnificence of one of the resounding monuments to American freedom -- the great stone carvings on Mount Rushmore in South Dakota. There, the son of Danish immigrants, Gutzon Borglum, immortalized in granite the faces of Washington, Jefferson, Roosevelt, and Lincoln. He died before he saw the completion of his work, but his son carried on. And today it stands as a tribute to the flame of liberty that burns red hot in the soul of a man with roots in America and Denmark.

One of the greatest threats to freedom is that it will never be taken for granted -- or, pardon me, I should say, it will be taken for granted is the threat. It never should be. But there are many reasons for confidence. And a story I came across recently truly inspired me, and I'd like to share it with you. Ms. Drake is here in the audience, who brought this story to my attention. Natalia and Nels Mortensen, both in their eighties, live in a small town of Marstal on the island of Aero in Denmark. For the last 40 years, they have been tending the gravesite of a young man they never met. They dig the weeds out, they place flowers -- red, white, and blue ones -- on the grave, and always there is a small American flag, and when it gets too worn, they replace it with another.

Jack Wagner was a 19-year-old American from Snyder County, Pennsylvania. They'd never met him, yet the people of the small town -- thousands of miles from his home -- felt they knew him, because they said he was a young man who gave his life for their freedom. The Mortensens have tended his grave four decades now, just as if he were a member of the family. We invited them to be here tonight, but they wrote and told me that, at their age, they didn't believe that they could take on such a long trip. But Jack Wagner's sister is here tonight -- Mrs. Woll, would you stand for just a second and let us -- [applause]. She has been to Denmark to meet the Mortensens and to thank them for what they've done.

Let all of us learn from their devotion. After our meeting today and the heartfelt good will of this evening, I think we can all be certain that in the future our two peoples will continue to stand side by side as members of the same family -- the family of free people. Incidentally, I should have added that, with the age of the Mortensens, the village in which they live has already officially made it plain that when they can no longer care for the grave, the village will take it over as an official function of that village.

And the entire Nation watched with you as this disastrous storm made not one, but two passes at the Florida Gulf course. And I want to assure you that we in Washington -- did I say -- you know, gulf stream came out -- or gulf coast came out like a golf course -- [laughter] -- believe me, that was a Freudian slip. [Laughter] But I want to assure you that we in Washington will work closely with your State officials, with Senator Hawkins, and your congressional delegation to see that every resource of the Federal Government that's available under law is placed at your disposal.

You know, last fall I fought the last election of my political life, and for the rest of my time in this high office, there can be no doubt that all decisions will be guided by a single question: What's best for America? I've tried to do that all along, but no one really believes it of a politician. But now they can't doubt it because I am not going any place. [Laughter] My friends, in this regard you and I have a lot in common. We've lived out the great part of our lives. As we look to the past, our hearts are filled with gratitude for the blessings that this great nation has bestowed upon us. And as we look to the future, we want our children and grandchildren to know the same freedom and opportunity, the same greatness of spirit that we as Americans have cherished.

Of course, we intend to live the rest of our own lives to the fullest, but more and more, we do find ourselves asking what's best for the next generation? What's best for America? In this spirit, I'd like to talk to you about a subject of vital importance for the decades ahead. I know you have already heard some specifics about it -- tax reform -- and I'll hope that I won't replow ground that's already been plowed here today.

But today our administration, as you know, has before the Congress a plan for a dramatic tax reform. It's a reform that would make it easier for Americans to keep more of their own earnings; that would create new jobs by fostering economic growth; and that would make it easier for our children and grandchildren to raise families of their own. Any reform this major is bound to have its opponents, and our tax plan is no exception. The special interests have already dug in around Capitol Hill and are prepared to do battle. They want to preserve certain tax shelters and loopholes and make the rest of us pay for the special treatment that they and their big-money clients receive.

Well, if we're going to out-flank those special interests and get this tax reform passed, a certain senior citizen is going to need your help. He's a fellow named Ronald Reagan. So, with your permission, I'd like to present our case. I want you to know what's wrong with the present system, what our new plan would do, and how each of you can lend a hand. As I've traveled the country to talk about taxes, I've discovered that the American people have a few strong opinions of their own. Let me ask you here in Florida a question that I've asked elsewhere, and I wonder if you'd answer loud enough so all of those way back in Washington can hear you. My friends, don't you believe that our taxes are too high, too complicated, and utterly unfair?

The President. Thank you. Looks as though I came to the right place. [Laughter] The tax code we're saddled with today is the result of almost 75 years of political wheeling and dealing. When the income tax first became law back in 1913, the tax code amounted to just about 15 pages -- I may have been the only 2-year-old to read it cover to cover. [Laughter] Well, today the tax code runs to 4 volumes and more than 4,000 pages. And one standard interpretation of the code -- you know that isn't enough, just the code; you got to have it explained -- and that explanation includes 18 volumes, weighs 87 pounds, and takes up 6 feet of shelf space. Just think of it -- the Bible contains all the wisdom we need to lead our lives and is perhaps 2 inches thick. You know, the complete works of William Shakespeare -- plays and poetry that have enriched life in the English-speaking world for almost four centuries -- can be bound in a single volume. But just to explain the tax code to the United States -- 18 volumes and 6 feet of shelf space -- I think you'll agree it's not exactly a major contribution to Western civilization.

Some individuals go on so-called educational ocean cruises or purchase sky boxes at sports arenas and write them off as business expense. Now, I've been preaching the merits of free enterprise for years. Business people provide jobs and create wealth; I have nothing against them -- on the contrary, they have my heartfelt admiration. What I am against is a tax system that allows some to take perfectly legal deductions that by any standards of fairness are an outrage. I think you agree with that.

For individuals, the current system means you have to pay just too darned much. Maybe one of your grandchildren just got a job and showed you his or her paycheck. One box shows the actual salary -- not a bad figure. Then there are all the boxes that show taxes taken out -- Federal tax, State tax, and on and on and on. And when you get to the box that shows take-home pay, it's a mere fraction of the starting figure. It's like one of those horror movies from the 1950's -- ``The Incredible Shrinking Paycheck.'' [Laughter] And I'm sure your grandchild might wonder who he or she is working for -- for him or herself or the Government. I still remember -- the first one in my family -- a daughter, she'd been with that kind of campus liberalism at the time that was going around. Then she brought home her first paycheck. She was pale and horror stricken. And I tried to explain to her that's what her old man had been making speeches about all these years.

When it comes to families, the present system is shameful. The standard deduction for married couples and the exemption for dependents -- so crucial to household finances -- were never big to begin with. After the inflation of the seventies, they're downright puny. The tax code has, in effect, made it more and more expensive to care for older parents or to give children the good upbringing and education they deserve.

Today's tax system means that precious resources -- often scarce investment capital -- are spent on useless tax dodges. It means business districts that look like ghost towns, with huge, unfinished skyscrapers constructed largely for tax reasons -- they're called see-through buildings because they haven't finished them and put in the partitions. It means punishment instead of rewards for hard work and achievement; growing pressure on the American family; and high taxes for everybody who can't afford a lobbyist on Capitol Hill. Those see-through buildings -- I should have finished and pointed out -- they're not finished on purpose, because the purpose in building them were the tax deductions that were made available from that which far exceeded any reason for going after a profit.

You know, the tax code sort of reminds me of Jack Benny's old Maxwell car -- it puffs and wheezes and squeaks and squeals and gives everybody a lousy ride. I seem to remember one time when the Maxwell car on the Benny show ran out of gas and Jack Benny's line was, ``I don't understand. The gas gauge reads full.'' And then it was Rochester, his sidekick there on the show, who answered and says, ``Well, it's painted that way.'' [Laughter] Well, my friends, today we have a Maxwell car tax code. It's painted fair and simple, but in truth, it's unfair, unjust, and complicated to the point of absurdity. Isn't it time we junked that old heap and got ourselves a better model that's brand new? Now, our tax plan calls for us to close loopholes and make sure that everybody pays his fair share. But this, then, enables us to lower the rates across the board for everyone.

I been accused -- of wanting to tamper with Social Security more times than I've had birthdays, and that's getting to be a pretty big number. [Laughter] Well, it just ain't so. As long ago as the 1976 campaign -- I was saying then that correcting the problems of Social Security must be done without reducing the benefits for those who are receiving them. I mention this, first of all, because I think all of us would like to know that nothing in our tax plan will affect your Social Security checks in any way -- period.

Now, to return to our tax plan, the corporate tax rate will come down. The capital gains tax will come down, spurring new investment. On personal income taxes, we'll replace the present tangle of 14 brackets and a top rate of 50 percent with just 3 brackets at 15, 25, and 35 percent. And for the majority of Americans, personal taxes will not only be simpler but lower. With these lower personal, corporate, and capital gains tax rates, new jobs will be created, new technologies will be developed, and living standards will rise. Once again, our country will be a land of true opportunity. And, my friends, isn't that what we want for our children and grandchildren? For families, our plan will raise the standard deduction for married couples to $4,000 and nearly double the personal exemption of $2,000. And with these measures in place, a family of four won't pay one penny in Federal tax on the first $12,000 of its earnings. Won't it be good news when our tax code stops punishing families and starts giving them a helping hand?

Now, there are some earthier words, but balderdash will have to do. [Laughter] As I've said, we intend to cut personal income tax rates and raise deductions and exemptions for the family. This means that every group in America will be better off, and anybody who tells you otherwise just doesn't understand or deliberately doesn't want to understand.

Regarding our proposal to eliminate the deduction for State and local taxes, it turns out that there's an important new study by the comptroller of the State of New York, which ranks certainly near the top among States with regard to tax rates. That study concludes that under our proposal, taxpayers in that State would save $588 million a year. And that's the point. If individuals are better off, States are better off, and America is better off.

And our fair share tax plan includes relief for millions of the needy. Under our plan, the poor and all blind, elderly, or disabled Americans living in poverty or at that poverty level would be completely removed from the Federal tax rolls -- not one penny of tax to pay. The fact is that years of runaway government spending in the seventies produced an inflationary binge that threw millions into poverty. You remember the Government's War on Poverty? Well, sad to announce, poverty won. Then, our first tax cut took effect and ignited one of the strongest economic expansions in American history. Between 1983 and 1984, poverty dropped faster and farther than it had in more than a decade. Among us senior citizens alone, more than 400,000 have been lifted out of poverty. Now, this experience proves beyond all doubt that prosperity isn't created by big government. Prosperity is created by lower taxes, less government, and more economic growth.

America's tax plan. You know, you and I have lived a good part of the history of this nation. And many of you, no doubt, are the sons and daughters of immigrants who came to this country with nothing. Many, like me, were getting our first jobs during the hard times of the Great Depression -- began in '29 and in the early '30s, grew worse. All of us have seen what hard work and determination can accomplish. All of us know from firsthand experience just how much economic growth means to this nation.

To return to my original question of what's best for America, you and I know the answer. It's freedom and opportunity. And today we have a chance to give these precious gifts to the next generation, to our children and grandchildren. Let us work to give them the fair share tax. And together, my friends, I know that we can succeed.

This agreement is one of a series negotiated in accordance with the Act. It is the first such agreement to be concluded that incorporates the 1984 amendments to the Act, clearly establishing the relationship between a foreign nation's allocations requests and its contributions to the development of the U.S. fishery in which it is requesting allocations. This agreement will further the objectives of the Act and will serve to enhance relations between the United States and the People's Republic of China.

This agreement is one of a series negotiated in accordance with the Act. It is a renegotiated agreement that will allow the fisheries relationship between the United States and the Polish People's Republic to continue when the agreement currently in force expires on December 31, 1985. It incorporates the 1984 amendments to the Act that clearly establish the relationship between a foreign nation's allocations requests and its contributions to the development of the U.S. fishery in which it is requesting allocations. This agreement will further the objectives of the Act and will permit the fishing industries of the United States and the Polish People's Republic to continue without interruption the cooperative fishery arrangements that have developed since the first such agreement was signed with the Polish People's Republic in 1977.

This is the most sacred time of the year in the Jewish tradition, and it is also a time when we are reminded of the depth of our Nation's inheritance from that tradition. During this period, members of the Jewish community look both forward and back in a spirit of repentance. This theme of repentance is one that all Americans can understand because it is an inextricable part of America's oldest traditions. The Jewish High Holy Days provide us all with an opportunity to reflect on our responsibilities toward God and our fellowman and to resolve to do better in the future in meeting those responsibilities than we have done in the past.

This time of year also reminds us of the close and enduring relationship between the United States and Israel. Our two nations are joined not by the fragile strands of temporary interests but rather by the deep bonds of our common values. The Jewish High Holy Days remind us of the permanence and depth of those values. As the shofar's call ushers in the new year, let us all pray that the values of this season will be reflected in our own lives and in the creation of a world at peace.

This morning we have received more very encouraging news about our nation's economy. Retail sales for the month of August rose sharply, while our standard measure for inflation at the producer level actually declined. Sales for August rose a robust 1.9 percent. Much of that gain came from an impressive 7.8 percent increase in new car sales, and other sales categories also showed increases. In the midst of this healthy consumer activity, we also saw prices at the wholesale level for August fall 0.3 percent while industrial production in the manufacturing sector rose 0.5 percent, the largest increase in a year. Industrial production overall climbed 0.3 percent.

All of this good news follows a drop in our unemployment rate of three-tenths of 1 percent and the Census Bureau's announcement that 1.8 million fewer Americans are living in poverty. This is further evidence of the miraculous powers of American enterprise. If the Congress will help me to control domestic spending, to work for freer and fairer trade, and to reduce tax rates further by passing our fair share tax plan for all Americans, then we can reach our goal -- we can unleash a decade of growth and create 10 million new jobs in the next 4 years.

Ambassadors Max Kampelman, John Tower, and Maynard Glitman. I gave them my instructions for the third round of the negotiations, which begins on September 19, and discussed with them the prospects for progress in this round.

I reiterated to Ambassadors Kampelman, Tower, and Glitman my strong desire to move with renewed effort to reduce nuclear arms. Achieving real reductions in both strategic and intermediate nuclear forces is our overriding objective in Geneva. We have placed a number of positive and far-reaching proposals on the table for significant and verifiable reductions. Our negotiators have unprecedented authority for give and take in trying to reach these objectives.

There is no reason why a serious reduction process cannot begin promptly, as these nuclear arms exist today and are of considerable concern to both sides. At the same time, I have emphasized my desire to strengthen the dialog with the Soviets in Geneva on the full range of issues involving defense and space arms.

I am hopeful that we may indeed be able to move forward in this round. Soviet leaders have recently given public indications that they may be considering significant nuclear reductions, and we have encouraged them to translate this expression into concrete proposals at the negotiating table in Geneva. Now is the time for them to spell out their intentions; now is the time for both sides to move forward. Concrete Soviet proposals would get the talks moving and would make a positive contribution to the intensified U.S.-Soviet dialog which has been underway in recent months. I am looking forward to my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev in November.

Arms control will, of course, be one of the important parts of our agenda at that meeting, and progress at the negotiating table in Geneva in this round would provide a positive, additional stimulus to a productive discussion in November.

As I have stressed before, my administration is committed to bringing down dramatically the levels of nuclear arms through equitable and verifiable agreements. We have made serious proposals, we are patient, and we are ready for serious give and take. With a comparable Soviet attitude, much can be accomplished and soon.

Thank you, and good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's always good to see some old friends and have a chance to make new ones. And it's always a pleasure to be joined by two of the most important women in my life, Nancy and Maureen.

Well, it may be September, but here in Washington it's been plenty warm until just a couple of days ago. We turned this off just for this particular -- [laughter] -- gathering. And these past few weeks, I guess we broke the record here for the length of a hot spell just a few days ago, before the reduction in temperature, and it reminded me when I was a kid of our minister one hot summer Sunday morning. And he said that he was going to keep his sermon short, and he did -- just seven words. He said: ``If you think it's hot now, wait.'' [Laughter] Well, today I'll follow his example, though I may slip a few more in than seven.

But I'm sure you've heard of our plan to overhaul the Federal tax program. This is the most burning issue that's facing the American people, I think, in this decade. I'm going to be out on the stump all fall bringing our case for tax fairness and economic growth to the American people and rallying their support. I'll be in many of your States; indeed, in many of your communities. And I'll be looking for your help, because it's the grassroots level that our tax proposal will find the energy, determination, and willpower needed to topple the status quo. Status quo -- that's Latin for the mess we're in. [Laughter] And the present system is a mess.

As State legislators, you don't need to hear about the pleadings of lobbyists, and the siren songs of special interests are heard in every legislative hall from Capitol Hill out through all the 50 States.

But this time we can work for the special interests of all the American people to create a fair and equitable tax system, one which will be a double boon to the economy because it'll both close wasteful loopholes and, at the same time, cut tax rates. It's time for Americans to take their money out of tax shelters and invest the money in America's future. Every day we live with the present tax code, we're slowing down economic growth, sacrificing jobs that would have been created, unfairly burdening families, and perpetuating an unjust system that only breeds cynicism and resentment in the American people.

You know, last week I spoke about tax reform at North Carolina State University. And talking to those college students brought home to me the urgency of this issue. The room was electrified with their hope and energy and enthusiasm. Believe me, having served as a Governor during the time of the Vietnam riots and all, when, if I went to a campus, they'd burn down a building -- to see these young people today has just made me sure -- and I'm glad to tell you -- the 21st century's going to be in good hands. And one of our proudest accomplishments as Republicans is the way we've been able to draw more and more young people into our ranks.

We've swept aside the pessimism and resignation that gripped the elected leadership of this country not too long ago, and we've opened our doors to the future. Like the American people themselves, we Republicans believe that America is still young, still vital, and still strong. What we've accomplished together goes beyond words. We've backed our words with decisive and dramatic action. Our 25-percent across-the-board tax reduction gave new life and sustenance to a spirit of optimism. An entrepreneurial renaissance is spreading across our land. A powerful economic expansion is lifting America out of the devastation of a decade of high tax policies and enabling us to build on a solid base of noninflationary growth.

Here's a piece of especially good news. The Democratically controlled House Select Committee on Children, Youth, and Families rated all the different tax plans that are presently floating around up there on the Hill and found that ours was by far the most profamily of all of the tax proposals.

By raising the standard deduction to $4,000 for a married couple filing jointly and nearly doubling the personal exemption to $2,000, we'll make it so that a family of four doesn't pay one penny in Federal income tax on the first $12,000 of earnings. We're also giving nonwage-earning spouses equal access to IRA's, those tax deductible savings accounts. Someone's got to be very brave to suggest that a homemaker is not working. But alongside the pension reform passed in the last Congress, this will go a long way toward alleviating poverty by allowing women the means to care for themselves in retirement years.

We Republicans have always looked for the long-range solutions, and this tax plan is one of those which will be working long after we've left office. As State legislators, you know that programs closer to home are more cost-efficient, better planned, and offer more assistance. But the gluttonous Federal tax system has robbed you of the base for local programs. We must continue to move this wheel of government in the interest of what's right for America. And this is the time for which all of us have worked, the moment in which we can build a partnership between the levels of government with a growing economy to give America the momentum for the next century. And, my friends, I'm convinced that together we can succeed.

Mr. Descalzi. Mr. President, the major focus of your Presidency has been the reactivation of the economy, and many would, of course, arguably say that you've been very successful at that. So, the question now is: Why now with the project of tax reform?

The President. Well, what we've started with the economy and the growth that we've had -- the increase in prosperity here -- I think is only a beginning. I think there's further to go, and so the tax reform, I think, could contribute to economic growth. But the main thing is, even without that, our present tax system is unfair. It is so complicated that a great many people can't determine how much they owe the Government without getting expensive legal help. And we believe it's long overdue that we have a tax system that is more fair; that is simpler, more easily understood by the people; and that, at the same time, can lower the tax rates in the simplification, removing some of the loopholes that have led to unfair deductions by some, the use of tax shelters to avoid, legally, a fair share of tax.

Mr. Descalzi. Now, the question is: If through simplification and through the new tax system the average amount of money that the individual is going to contribute to the IRS is going to diminish, how, then, is the Government going to compensate for the diminishing tax returns that it will take?

The President. Well, we aren't going to diminish the total tax revenues the Government gets. It's true we'll lower the rates; it's true that individuals will pay less tax than they're presently paying.

The difference will be made up in part by what we think will be more growth in the economy, and the more the economy grows, the more tax revenues there'll be. But mainly it's because right now there are a great many people who have taken advantage of some well-intentioned tax loopholes, as we call them, to reduce their personal tax burden, and this has resulted in a great unfairness.

For example, we have people today who are paying a higher income tax as individuals than the great corporations they work for are paying as their total tax. So, once we change that, the difference will mainly be made up by those tax revenues that are being avoided by some, and that's where the fairness comes in. Everybody will be paying their fair share.

Mr. Descalzi. And we're also banking on the growth of the economy. Talking about the primary focus of this reform, many see the family as the main concern of yours, and I would like to ask you about which is the main focus of this project of yours.

The President. Well, we think it is aimed at the family, and we think that the family is the most important unit in our whole social structure. As the family goes, so goes the Nation. But what we are going to do in addition to lowering the rates, we are going to make the personal deduction for a wage earner $4,000. We are going to almost double the increase exemption -- or deduction for dependents to $2,000 because it hasn't nearly kept up with inflation over the years -- that deduction that used to be $600 and then came to $1,040. Well, now it's going to be $2,000 under our plan, and thus we feel particularly the families at the lower end of the earning scale -- we could see an average family of four that wouldn't have to pay a penny on the first $12,000 of earnings. Also we are going to see people that are near the poverty line that are going to be dropped from the tax rolls entirely.

Mr. Descalzi. Now, Mr. President, tax reform is a very serious and complex issue, and there have been many attempts in the past. There is opposition in Congress, and I would like to ask you, in here, which are the political angles of tax reform, or are there any political angles to it?

Mr. Descalzi. Well, among the Americans, we have Hispanic Americans, and, of course, as you know, most of Hispanic America -- not most, a large proportion of Hispanic America is in the modest-income category. You already talked a little bit about how people with a modest income would benefit, but talking specifically about Hispanic Americans, most of them in a modest-income category, how would modest-income and middle-income Americans benefit from this proposal?

The President. They would benefit most of all, particularly at the lower end of the earnings. Right now, you know, there are 14 tax brackets that people, based on their earnings, fall into. We're reducing that to 3 -- a 15-percent bracket, a 25-percent bracket, and a 35-percent bracket. But in reality, there's a fourth bracket -- zero. The people at the very lowest end and there around the poverty line will find they no longer have any taxes at all to pay. And elderly people that are in that particular bracket, some of the handicapped people, and then those that are just earning but around that location -- they won't have any tax to pay at all.

Mr. Descalzi. Mr. President, let me go to another major concern of your Presidency. I remember interviewing you in Los Angeles in 1980, and you mentioned as one of your big concerns the spread of communism in this hemisphere, in the Caribbean and Central America. Well, one of your most notable successes in foreign policy has been Grenada; however, we still have Nicaragua, and it continues unabated. My question now is: What can you tell us that will give us confidence that the problems presented now by the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua will be solved in the future?

The President. Well, I'm optimistic about what's going to happen there. Right now we have a totalitarian government -- the Sandinista government -- in Nicaragua. This came out of the revolution to overthrow the dictator, Somoza. But the people who are fighting as the contras against the Sandinista government now are mainly the people who were part of the revolution also against Somoza. They came together to overthrow that particular regime.

The promise was given that it was to have democracy, to have free labor unions, a free press, free speech -- all the things that we associate with democracy and government by and of and for the people. And then the revolution was over. Well, the Sandinistas were probably the most organized. They had been a pro-Communist organization for years back. They ousted from the revolution those who had fought with them. Some of the leaders had to flee into exile; some of them were imprisoned; some of them, I'm afraid, were executed.

And we have this totalitarian government. It is literally a satellite of Cuba, the Communist regime in Cuba, and that means it's indirectly a satellite of the Soviet Union. It has made it plain that its revolution knows no borders, that it is going to be the centerpiece here in the Western Hemisphere for spreading that kind of Communist regime throughout the hemisphere. Their military has been furnished, and their weapons -- well, they're furnishing weapons to the guerrillas in their neighboring country, El Salvador, where there is a democratic government. So, we think that in helping, as we have been trying to help, the contras -- and we've seen them grow as the dissatisfaction in Nicaragua with the Sandinistas spread among the people; the forces of the contras have grown to around 20,000 in number. They're getting stronger. Deserters from the Nicaraguan Army, the Sandinista army, are turning up and volunteering as contras.

So, we think that those people who were simply striving for the original promises of the revolution to be kept should have our help. That does not mean, however, military forces from the United States. All of our friends in Latin America have made it plain to us -- maybe with some memories of a far distant past -- that, no, they have the manpower; they don't need American manpower. They do need our help in supplies and weapons and training and so forth, and that we're giving them. And, so, I know that the contras have progressed to the point that they have several times offered to lay down their arms and negotiate a settlement with the Sandinistas, their former allies in the revolution, and the Sandinistas have repeatedly refused. But we think they deserve our help.

Mr. Descalzi. Well, you say that we are giving them help, and, yes, we are; however, Congress has wavered constantly on this issue. It's teeter-tottered between the Boland amendment and no aid to the contras. And right now there is limited humanitarian aid. Has Congress been playing politics with the security of this hemisphere?

The President. Well, I hesitate to say that. Some may; I don't know. I think maybe the rest were well intentioned, and they're suffering from something I call the Vietnam syndrome. I think too many of them, still remembering our entanglement there 10,000 miles away from our own land, in that that this might lead to our military involvement. And, so, they have been cautious about what we can do. As I've already explained, we have no intention of military involvement nor do I think it is needed. And I think as more of them come to see that, and also as more of them have come to realize the real nature of the Sandinista government -- that it is a totalitarian, Communist government -- that that opposition is lessening.

Mr. Descalzi. Mr. President, another very important issue for Hispanic Americans is that of immigration. As you know, there have been attempts in the past at immigration reform. This is the third time that Senator Simpson is pushing his own version of immigration reform through Congress -- and Congressmen Rodino and Mazzoli in the House -- do you support this? Are you behind this attempt? Would you sign into law a Simpson-Rodino-Mazzoli bill if it comes to be?

The President. I have to say that, beginning back in 1981, I supported the principle of reform in our immigration laws because we, in a way, have lost control of our borders. Right now, I have to say with regard to the Simpson bill that -- and we've informed of this -- that we support generally his bill, but there are some amendments that we think are necessary. For one, we very much need in any immigration bill -- we need protection for people who are in this country and who have not become citizens, for example, that they are protected and legitimized and given permanent residency here. And we want to see some things of that kind added to the immigration bill.

The President. Well, yes, I do. Our whole country is made up of people who came here from someplace else, either the individuals themselves or, like myself -- in my case it was grandparents, others it's their parents -- but we represent the cultures and the diversity of the whole world. And we've come together in what some people called a melting pot and created a whole new breed of human being called an American. And I have to say, I think America's great success in the world has been the result of this diversity and this understanding and coming together of such diverse peoples. And I just have to say that our Hispanic Americans -- their contribution to America is not surpassed by that of any other people. They have brought a great warmth, and they have brought great traditions of family. In our wars, they have brought great service and great heroism and loyalty to this country. And all I would like to say to them is, God bless them all, and vaya con Dios.

Recent economic reports confirm our economy is moving smartly ahead with solid expansion in the job market and inflation being held down. Our future looks good, but one group is still having difficulty. Far too many farmers are seeing hard times. Prices for corn, wheat, and soybeans have been weak and getting weaker. Demand for exports has dropped as production here and in other countries has steadily increased, and foreign suppliers have filled markets that once were ours.

Our great success in bringing down inflation has helped farmers by ending double-digit price increases for fuel, fertilizer, and other supplies, but there's been a down side. Many farmers took out loans in the late seventies when inflation was soaring, assuming the value of the land they were pledging as collateral would keep on rising. Unfortunately, the opposite happened. When inflation plunged, land values plunged, too. And when inflation stayed down, defying the experts' predictions, those loans farmers were carrying became more and more difficult to finance. How can we not open our hearts to these people in distress who mean so much and give so much to America? We know that, while farmers account for only 3 percent of the work force, farming and related industries generate $660 billion a year or almost 18 percent of our gross national product.

We know that these industries are responsible for 21 million workers, nearly 20 percent of the work force. We can be thankful that agriculture, one of the few industries with a strong, positive trade balance, provides employment for 630,000 nonfarm workers through its yearly exports.

These facts and figures are convincing in their own right. Yet facts and figures don't tell the whole story. They don't convey the strength and nobility of values, the deep faith in God, and love of freedom and independence, the many years of hard work and caring for friends and neighbors that began on the farm and made America the greatest Nation on Earth. Farming is hard work, maybe the hardest. The strength of our farmers has always been the strength of their dreams for the future -- dreams that a son or a daughter working the fields, tending the herds, might decide to stay on that farm and be able to make a go of it. There is no price tag on traditions like these, only the stark realization that to lose our farmers would be to lose the best part of ourselves, the heart and soul of America. Well, we cannot let that happen. We cannot permit the dreams of our farmers to die. We must have compassion for these men, women, and their families, so important to all of us.

I'm asking Congress to join me in planting fresh seeds of hope for America's farmers. We might begin by seeing and avoiding the one threat that could make today's problems far worse. Some 300 protectionist bills await action in Congress. To enact them would be to invite certain retaliation against our farm exports, heightening the risk of a farm catastrophe which would send shock waves throughout our economy. Believe me, protectionism is farmers' enemy number one, and that enemy is stalking our gate. Let us work aggressively for freer and fairer markets. But more than that, let us have the courage to urge that more countries start doing what America has begun doing so well. Go for growth by adopting low-tax, free-market policies that will increase jobs, raise their people's standard of living, thereby strengthening demand for our products.

We do not dream of protecting America from others' success; we seek to include everyone in the success of the American dream. I'm asking Congress to unite with me for intelligent policies that provide farmers needed help, without doing harm to the budget limitations adopted by Congress, and greater freedom for them to grow and sell their crops in the marketplaces of the world. By working in this spirit, we can avoid budget-busting legislation which repeats the mistakes of the past, legislation I would not hesitate to veto. We must meet our responsibility to America's farmers and pass a farm bill that provides hope, not measured doses of despair.

One of the greatest strengths of our Nation is its rich mixture of people from various cultural backgrounds. Americans of Hispanic heritage have made an immense and unique contribution. In thousands of communities across the land, Hispanics are a vital element in fostering America's achievements in fields as diverse as the arts and industry, agriculture and education, religion and business, science and politics.

Previously he was chairman of the board of the First National City Bank of Minneapolis. He serves as chairman of the board and director of Compucom Development Corp.; director of Merchants National Bank & Trust Co.; director of Merchants National Corp.; and director of Park Fletcher, Inc. He is vice chairman of the capital fund for the Indianapolis Ballet League and honorary chairman of the capital fund for the Indianapolis Art League.

Nancy and I recently returned from our summer vacation. My horse and I got reacquainted, and I had time to reflect once again on the old truth inherited from the cavalry that there's nothing so good for the inside of a man as the outside of a horse. Now, fall is nearly here, and the Nation's begun another season of work and achievement. I can't think of a better way to begin the new season here at the White House than by speaking to you, the representatives of newspapers and television and radio stations out there in the real America, and through you, I hope, to the communities that you serve.

Today our country's at peace, and our economy is in good health. The inflation rate, which was in double digits when we first took office, is under 4 percent, sizably so. Interest rates have dropped dramatically and are still easing down. And already this year we've seen the creation, this year, so far of more than 900,000 jobs. And last month the Census Bureau reported that between 1983 and '84, the poverty rate in America showed the sharpest drop in 16 years. In all, more than 1,800,000 Americans were lifted out of poverty. Gains were shared by virtually every major group, including children, the elderly, and blacks. Income among Hispanic families rose by a remarkable 6.8 percent, and that was more than double the percent for the rest of us. It all goes to show that the answer to poverty is not more government programs and redistribution. The answer to poverty is economic growth through greater freedom.

And despite all this good news, we can do even better. And I'd like to spend just a moment on our historic new initiative. I'm sure you've heard about it -- tax reform. When the income tax first became law back in 1913, the tax code amounted to just 15 pages. Today it runs four volumes, and the complexity alone is staggering. But worse is the unfairness, the simple injustice that the complexity engenders. You just know that with a tax code that complicated, there are going to be accountants and lawyers who know how to make it work to their clients' advantage and that ordinary Americans who can't afford such high-paid advice will end up paying for it with higher taxes.

Today some individuals are able to take so-called educational cruises, ocean luxury liners, to buy sky boxes at sports arenas, and write it all off as business expense. Many Americans pay more in Federal income taxes each year than the giant corporations they work for. Now, I've been preaching the gospel of the enterprise system for more years than I can remember. Business people are the ones who provide many of our jobs, create much of America's wealth, and they have my enduring admiration. What I am against is the unfair tax system that allows some businesses to take perfectly legal deductions that by any standards of fairness are ridiculous.

Q. Mr. President, you have repeatedly warned Congress that you will veto any budget-busting farm bill. A lot of farmers in Minnesota are concerned as to what price to farmers does this administration intend to hold the line on farm spending? And will you, at some point, be forced to either rescue the Farm Credit System or approve a farm bill that exceeds budgetary limits?

The President. First, let me just say that more has been spent since our administration's been here on farm programs than ever in the history of our country. And what we have right now -- we believe, incidentally, that the Government programs are the cause of much of the farmers' problem. And we believe that we can't pull the rug out from under an industry that has gotten used to this government participation. That wouldn't be right. But we have an obligation to not only correct what is wrong but to do it in such a way as to not penalize the farmers.

We have a short-term problem -- or answer. We're going to do something with regard to those farmers who borrowed -- and under the double-digit inflation the land prices were high. Now they've come down with the corraling of inflation, left many farmers out on a limb. We're going to have a short-term program of loans and financial aid for those farmers.

But we want to embark -- and this is what we want to work with Congress on -- is to have a long-term program that will be pointing to a date certain down the line where we can say to the farmers, as of that point, we're going to phase these programs out, these regulations, and so forth and have you out in the free marketplace as of such and such a year. And we think that this can work, because the two-thirds of farming that is not and never has been included in the Government programs is not part of the great crisis today and is not having the trouble. They have known a consistent increase in the per capita consumption of their produce, where the rest of farming has known a per capita decrease in that consumption.

The President. Well, I don't say that I -- or I wouldn't talk if I did have anything about a specific thing that we would do. But I thought that Honduras behaved nobly and was well within their rights, because Honduras responded against that battery that, as I understand it, caused casualties on their side of the border with an aerial strike and took it out. We have been supportive of Honduras and Costa Rica and Guatemala, the other Central American countries. There's no question but all of them have, to a certain extent, been preyed upon by the Sandinista government.

We are, as you know -- continue to be supportive of the contras, and they are gaining in strength every day. They now number some 20,000. Their goal is to restore the true revolution. The Sandinista government is a totalitarian, Communist government here in the mainland of the Americas, and we feel that all of us have a stake in seeing that they're not allowed to export that revolution to other Latin American countries.

I think there's more of a support and an agreement between the countries of Latin America and the United States than we've known in many years. And we'll do what we can. We have no plans for military action of our own in any Latin American country nor do we think it's necessary; in fact, it isn't wanted by our friends down there. And we're continuing to support the Contadora process and its 21 goals.

Q. Mr. President, your administration has tried to bring business practices to government to make it run more like a business. The guiding principle of many successful businesses is to treat employees like winners and problemsolvers. Yet as President, many times you've gone on television in speeches around the country and blamed the bureaucrats for the Government's problems that may have been caused by past Presidents or past Congresses. How do you feel about the Federal employee, and what message do you have for them?

The President. I think there are thousands and thousands of Federal employees that are performing a great service for this country and for their fellow citizens, and they're doing a great job. On the other hand, there are some ills of bureaucracy that cannot be overlooked, that programs many times that are started by government in the best of intentions -- and then the bureaucracy that is created to manage that program, its first priority becomes to preserve the bureaucracy. And we have to be ready to deal with that. But that isn't to overlook the fact, as I say, of the great service performed by so many government employees. We have reduced the number of government employees, without any loss of service to the people, by -- I guess it's around a hundred thousand by now. And we feel that the elected representatives of government have got to determine the policy of government, not the permanent structure.

Communist is a Communist? That is to say, whether it's Mr. Gorbachev or anybody else, essentially it is dealing with the Communists. And also do you take or seek Mr. Nixon's advice in the upcoming summit?

The President. I have frequently talked with President Nixon. He had great experience and I think is most knowledgeable on international affairs. And certainly he had a number of -- well, he had a leader that was there while he was there and had a number of meetings, both in this country and there, with that leader. My problem for the first few years was they kept dying on me.

No, I feel, though, that there's one thing that you have to recognize: There are great differences between our two systems. And they're not going to like ours, and we don't like theirs, but we have to live in the world together. And I think one line recently written by former President Nixon was very true. He said of our country, we want peace; he said the Soviet Union needs peace. And they do, with this great, massive buildup, the greatest the world has ever seen in military might.

We have augmented our forces and, I think, have given them reason to believe that we're not going to allow them to get such a superiority in weapons that they can someday lay down an ultimatum. But I think the thing of the summit and what we would hope to do is to make them recognize that we both have to live in the world together, and it doesn't mean that we have to love each other or that we have to change each other's system, but that we can -- there are areas where we can -- we're the only two nations in the world, I think, that could start another world war.

The President. I'm glad you asked that question. No, they aren't. There are some there, some that were formerly connected with the National Guard, but there are also a great many who were part of the revolution. What the Sandinistas did -- that wasn't their revolution alone, they were just one factor in it of the groups that had come together to oust Somoza. But once they got in, they do what the Communists have traditionally done. Now, their idea of a consensus government is for them to run it. And they ousted other revolutionary leaders; they took over for themselves. Some were exiled; some, I think, were executed; some were imprisoned.

And you have many of the former revolutionaries that are now in the contras. And what they're after is reinstituting the goals. Remember that the revolutionaries, 1979, went to the Organization of American States. And they asked the Organization to appeal to Somoza to step down and let the killing end. And the Organization asked, what are the goals of your revolution, and they were given. And the goals were: pluralistic society, democracy, freedom of speech, free labor unions, freedom of press -- all the things that go with a democracy. They have never kept one of those promises. As I say, they ousted the rest, and it became the -- well, the Sandinista government was a pro-Communist organization before there was a revolution. So, this is what we're trying to bring about, and it isn't just a case of the Somozistas trying to get back in at all.

Q. Mr. President, according to figures from the Massachusetts Department of Revenue, when you take Social Security tax increases, only the very wealthy will actually be getting decreases according to your tax plan. Now, granted that those Social Security tax increases were passed before you came into office, still, it doesn't seem consistent with your goal of fairness.

The President. The Social Security tax, of course, is -- and as you say, has been increased at a time when it looked like -- when we came here, we gave Social Security until July of '83 -- then it would be broke. And then after using the issue in '82 politically, our opponents, shortly after the election, came to us and said, now, what are we going to do about Social Security. They denied it had any problems. And we had a bipartisan commission that reorganized Social Security and has put it on a sound financial footing. The Social Security tax, there's no question many people are paying a higher tax there than they are in the income tax. But there will be a sizable decrease in the overall tax because while they'll still be paying that, they'll be paying much less in their income tax.

Right now our estimate is that between $15,000 and $20,000 a year incomes, the individuals will be getting about a 13\1/2\ percent average decrease in taxes. From 20 to 30,000, that will drop to a little under 9 percent, 8.7 percent by our estimates. And as you go up in the income tax brackets -- actually the average deduction or cut in taxes is going to get less. So, we think that this is fair from top to bottom. We talked about 3 instead of 14 brackets -- 15, 25, and 35. There is a fourth bracket -- zero -- because those people who are down at or near the poverty line are going to be off the tax rolls all together and not pay any tax at all. So, we think there's no way they can distort the figures. The other day, with all the campaign that's being waged in New York with regard to the one feature of the program -- tax, State and local tax deduction -- the comptroller of New York has done a study and has estimated that New Yorkers will get $588 million a year in tax cuts. So, I think that we can stand on ours that it is going to be fair and it is going to result in individual as well as a certain business tax decrease. Where we're going to remain revenue neutral is we're going to have some people paying taxes that are not now paying their fair share.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Mr. President, everybody believes you're going to veto the textile import after it comes to your desk. Let me ask you, sir, are you going to veto it if it does, and what would you say to textile workers in places like the Carolinas and Virginia who believe that their jobs depend on a bill which would limit foreign imports?

The President. I should have taken one of the -- [laughter]. Well, first of all, let me say, I have a rule. I never say veto or not veto until something reaches my desk, because what started out be an apple might arrive there an orange. So, I'll wait till that to answer that part of your question.

But now, let me say one thing about this whole idea of protectionism. And, with regard to those employees in industries where they think their -- the possibility of losing their jobs, we have a program and we're supporting a program of providing funds for retraining and relocation of people who lose their jobs because of industries of this kind. Remember, also, that we have a lot of people losing their jobs, not because of this, but in other industries because of change in the industries -- modern technology that has now made the industry use fewer employees; some things that are just out of date, but other new industries have come along. The truth of the matter is, with regard to jobs, we have the highest percentage of the labor pool employed that we've ever had in the history of our country, the labor pool being everyone in the country, male and female, from 16 to 65 -- highest percentage of those. Last month 332,000 people found jobs. In the last 33 months, new jobs have been created for more than 8 million people.

So, yes, this can happen. But with protectionism to favor one industry over another, no one ever looks over their shoulder at the retaliation that, then, throws people out of work in other jobs. So, let me say this one thing about protectionism: that it's good to be old enough to remember the Great Depression, which I do. I was looking for my first job in 1932. The Smoot-Hawley tariff was passed, a great protectionist measure. It spread the Depression worldwide; it prolonged it and kept it in existence until World War II after about 10 years -- was the only thing that ended the Great Depression. More than a thousand economists appealed to Herbert Hoover to veto the Smoot-Hawley tariff. But there was a classic example of protectionism, overall protectionism, and its result.

Now, I'd like to say a word or two about it. Looking at these last 33 months, 8 million new jobs without the protectionist things that we're asking. And I'd like to point out that this, in coupling with the trade deficit, that has so many people concerned -- it'd be nice if we didn't have one, but we're the biggest exporters it is in the world. In these 33 months, we've had this great trade deficit. And I hear this linked to people losing jobs, but we gained 8 million new jobs. In the Great Depression -- every one of those 10 years of the Great Depression -- we had a trade balance that was in surplus on our side, and yet we had the greatest depression we've ever had in this country.

But protectionism -- we want to do, as I say -- we will try to help the people that, through no fault of their own, are -- if there is a cutback and are going to lose jobs. But, at the same time, we want fair trade, and we've already announced the things we're going to do to try and see that the world can be out there in the free marketplace competing on even ground. We'll do all those things. We will take actions against countries that are unfairly militating against us, keeping us out of their markets or whatever. But there's no way that you can go for protectionism without having it a two-way street and retaliation. And the retaliation will be against others in other industries.

The American farmer knows that most of all -- there was a farm question. The American farmer knows -- he's one of our biggest exporters now -- and he knows that the easiest way to retaliate is against farm exports. So, we're just going to continue to try for free and fair markets and believe that that's the answer that we should have.

Americans are called on to renew and deepen their appreciation of the unique and precious heritage passed on to us by our Founding Fathers. This heritage finds its most sustained and formal expression in the United States Constitution. It is truly a marvel that a group of people assembled from a small population could develop a document capable of guiding the course of this Nation through nearly 200 years of growth to become the greatest on earth. The wisdom and foresight of the architects of the Constitution is manifest in the fact that this dynamic document has required so few amendments over the 198 years of its existence, and has remained a powerful governing tool throughout.

The kind of society our Constitution has created -- free and fair and reformable -- helps to explain the desire of many foreign nationals to become United States citizens. Last year, over a quarter of a million people, more than ever before in a single year, took the oath of United States citizenship.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Dr. Morris is the Gouverneur Morris professor emeritus of history at Columbia University. Prior to teaching at Columbia, he was a professor at City University. He was a visiting professor at the University of Hawaii and Princeton University; a distinguished professor at the Free University of Berlin; and a Fulbright research scholar at the Sorbonne. He has served as president of the American Historical Association and of the Society of American Historians. He received a New York State special citation for historic preservation in 1982.

We've been pleased to see mounting evidence of new strength in our economy. By following policies of lower taxes and free and fair trade, America has led the world with 33 straight months of growth and more than 8 million new jobs. Inflation has been held under 4 percent. And, meanwhile, nations clinging to high taxes and protectionist policies have not only failed to match our performance, they've lost jobs and seen their investment flow to the United States.

Opportunity is our engine of progress. So, I'm asking Congress to work with me and not against me to control Federal spending, to pass our fair share tax plan lowering rates further, open up closed markets overseas, and urge other nations to cut their high tax rates to strengthen their economies and ability to buy American products. We need stronger growth not just at home but throughout the world. And we must have free and fair trade for all. This is the path of cooperation and success that will make our people more productive and that can lead to a decade of growth and 10 million new jobs in the next 4 years.

But there's another path that can only lead away from opportunity and progress: A mindless stampede toward protectionism will be a one-way trip to economic disaster. That's the lesson of the Smoot-Hawley tariff in 1930, which helped to trigger a worldwide trade war that spread, deepened, and prolonged the worst depression in history. And I know; I lived through that period.

I've seen and felt the agony this nation endured because of that dreadful legislation. If we repeat that same mistake, we'll pay a price again. Americans whose jobs depend upon exports of machinery, commercial aircraft, high-tech electronics, and chemical products could well be the first targets of retaliation. Agriculture and industry, already in great difficulty, would be even more vulnerable. Protectionist tariffs would invite retaliation that could enliven a -- or deliver, I should say, an economic death blow to literally tens of thousands of American family farms.

We've begun doing many good things for America these last 4\1/2\ years. Much remains to be done and can be done. So, let us not place all that progress, all our hopes for the future at risk by starting down on a slippery slope of impulsive acts and imprudent judgment. And this is a time for cool heads and clear vision, and now my vision says that I should call on you, Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International].

Q. Mr. President, as you head toward the summit, one of the big questions is whether you would be willing to explore the possibility of a tradeoff on the space weapons or big cuts in the Soviet arsenal. And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen, no, we're talking about the Strategic Defense Initiative now. I'm sorry that anyone ever used the appellation Star Wars for it because it isn't that. It is purely to see if we can find a defensive weapon so that we can get rid of the idea that our deterrence should be the threat of retaliation, whether from the Russians toward us or us toward them, of the slaughter of millions of people by way of nuclear weapons. And rather than that kind of negotiation, I think at this summit meeting what we should take up is the matter of turning toward defensive weapons as an alternative to this just plain naked nuclear threat of each side saying we can blow up the other.

And I would hope that if such a weapon proves practical, that then we can realistically eliminate these horrible offensive weapons -- nuclear weapons -- entirely. And I also have to point out that with regard to whether that would be a bargaining chip -- which I don't see it as that at all -- is the fact that the Soviet Union is already ahead of us in this same kind of research. They have been doing it much longer than us, seeking a defensive weapon also.

Q. And you're really saying, then, that you are not going to negotiate and that you really want to test just to see if it's practical. But aren't you really paving the way toward a militarization of the heavens, because the Soviets are bound to build up a weapon -- offensive to counter the Star Wars.

The President. No, the strategic defense that we're seeking is something that can, just as an antiaircraft gun once could protect you against bombers, could be used against these offensive weapons -- the missiles. And it doesn't mean no negotiation at all. As a matter of fact, the side that has not been negotiating -- with all of our months and months of meetings in Geneva and the arms talks -- is the Soviet Union. We have offered at least six versions of a possible reduction and six different ways to enlist their interest in negotiating with us in a reduction of warheads. They have come back with nothing. They simply won't discuss it or negotiate.

Q. Mr. President, the Nation's best-known AIDS scientist says the time has come now to boost existing research into what he called a minor moonshot program to attack this AIDS epidemic that has struck fear into the Nation's health workers and even its schoolchildren. Would you support a massive government research program against AIDS like the one that President Nixon launched against cancer?

The President. I have been supporting it for more than 4 years now. It's been one of the top priorities with us, and over the last 4 years, and including what we have in the budget for '86, it will amount to over a half a billion dollars that we have provided for research on AIDS in addition to what I'm sure other medical groups are doing. And we have $100 million in the budget this year; it'll be 126 million next year. So, this is a top priority with us. Yes, there's no question about the seriousness of this and the need to find an answer.

Government, is in the National Cancer Institute. He was referring to your program and the increase that you proposed as being not nearly enough at this stage to go forward and really attack the problem.

Q. Mr. President, why has the United States consistently played down expectations of what will happen at the summit meeting when you meet with Mr. Gorbachev in November, even as the Soviet Union has insisted that summit meetings are for grand and important decisions and sought to raise our expectations. And I'd like to follow up, sir.

The President. Well, it worries me a little bit that they go out of their way to try and raise expectations, in view of summits in the past and what has come of them. Maybe we were overly concerned, but we were worried that there might build up a euphoria and that people would be expecting something of a near miracle to come out of that summit. But I don't mind saying right now, we take this summit very seriously. And we're going to try to get into real discussions that we would hope could lead to a change in the relationship between the two countries -- not that we'll learn to love each other; we won't -- but a change in which we can remove this threat of possible war or nuclear attack from between us and that we can recognize that, while we don't like their system and they don't like ours, we have to live in the world together and that we can live there together in peace. And we're going to be very serious about that.

Q. Mr. President, the United States has just had its first successful test of an antisatellite weapons system. We showed the Soviet Union that we could do it. Would this not be an ideal time to stop further ASAT tests and negotiate a ban on such weapons?

The President. Well, here again, this is going to take a lot of verification if you're going to try to do that, because, here again, we were playing catch-up. They already have deployed an antisatellite missile. They can knock down and have knocked down satellites that have been sent up in their testing, and they've completed all of that testing. And this was our test, and I don't know whether others are necessary to complete the thing, but we couldn't stand by and allow them to have a monopoly on the ability to shoot down satellites when we are so dependent on them for communication, even weather and so forth.

The President. No, because they have a great flexibility, and I sent them back with the same thing that we sent them in in the first place, and that is that we are to be flexible. We know that there is a difference in the Soviet Union's -- the emphasis they place on various weapons systems. They have all the same ones we do -- airborne, submarine launched, and so forth. Theirs is a little different strategy than ours. So, we said that we proposed a number of warheads as an opener for discussion, that we would reduce to a certain number. As I said earlier, we have presented at least six different ways in which that could be done, and we have made it plain that we're willing to meet whatever are their specific problems with regard to their mix of weapons, that we would find ways to accommodate the differences between us in our strategies.

And so far, they have not made a single comment or proposed a different number. They have just been there. And I don't know how much more flexible we can be, but we're there waiting for them to say, ``Well, that number's wrong; let's try another number,'' or make a proposal of their own.

And in spite of the language that's been used in some of the international broadcasts recently by leaders in the Kremlin, none of those proposals, nothing of that kind has ever come to the table for negotiations.

Q. Mr. President, we did conduct an antisatellite weapons test the other day, and the Soviets said that that showed you were not serious about curbing the space race and that it complicated the summit. Why was it necessary to make that test now? Couldn't it have waited until after the summit, sir?

The President. No, I don't think so, because, as I said, we're playing catch-up. We're behind, and this was on the schedule that we hoped that we could keep with regard to the development of this weapon. And it wasn't done either because of or with the summit in mind at all. It was simply time for the test. They've been doing it, and we didn't call them any names.

The President. Well, I wasn't going to give him a friendship ring or anything. [Laughter] No, seriously, I believe this. I think she made an observation out of this, and our own people who've been over there -- our recent group of Senators who met with him found him a personable individual. I'm sure I will, too. It isn't necessary that we love or even like each other. It's only necessary that we are willing to recognize that for the good of the people we represent, on this side of the ocean and over there, that everyone will be better off if we can come to some decisions about the threat of war. We're the only two nations in the world, I believe, that can start a world war. And we're the only two that can prevent it. And I think that's a great responsibility to all of mankind, and we'd better take it seriously.

Q. Some people believe that the Soviets are winning the propaganda war leading up to the summit, that Mr. Gorbachev, in recent days, has made a number of proposals for test moratoria, for a chemical free zone in Europe, while the U.S. is testing an antisatellite weapon and, we learned today, a test of a component of SDI. With them talking peace while we're testing weapons of war, is Mr. Gorbachev beating you at your own game?

The President. Well, I've not engaged in a propaganda game. I'm getting ready to go to the meeting and take up some things I think should be discussed. I do think that this is a continuation of a long-time campaign aimed mainly at our allies in Europe and in an effort to build an impression that we may be the villains in the peace and that they're the good guys. I don't think it has registered with our allies, and I'm not going to take it seriously at all. He can practice whatever tactics he wants to. We're going to meet, and we're seriously going to discuss the matters that I've just mentioned here.

The President. I'm saying that the research to see if such a weapon is feasible is not in violation of any treaty. It's going to continue. That will one day involve, if it reaches that point, testing. On the other hand, I stop short of deployment because, as I said then, I'm willing to talk to our allies, talk to them, and talk to the Soviets -- to anyone about the meaning of it, if it could be used in such a way as to rid the world of the nuclear threat.

The President. I think that's a legitimate part of research, and, yes, I would rule that out. I don't mind saying here -- and normally I don't talk about -- as you said, what's going to be your strategy in negotiations. But in this, this is too important to the world to have us be willing to trade that off for a different number of nuclear missiles when there are already more than enough to blow both countries out of the world.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. You won reelection in an unprecedented landslide, and your personal popularity is standing at an all-time high, yet members of your own party in Congress have failed to follow your leadership on two key policies -- South Africa and trade. How do you account for the difference between your popularity and the willingness of the members of your own party to follow your lead, sir?

The President. Oh, I don't think that that's unusual. You're dealing with a Congress and 535 people up there on the Hill who also have their own ideas. I think we're getting along pretty well right now, and we've had meetings on most of these subjects. I made my position clear on the matters that you mentioned -- trade and South Africa and all. And as a matter of fact, I thought that our own side, the Republicans, rallied around pretty well when one of the authors of the sanction bill gave that up and heartily approved of my proposed Executive order. So, I don't anticipate too much friction.

Q. May I follow up, Mr. President? On both those issues, you seem to have moved closer to the position of those in Congress. Are you afraid of losing your leadership at a key point in what you call your fall offensive?

The President. No, I'm not afraid of that. And, no, I saw in that bill things that I could say to them, ``If that bill came down without this and this and this, but with these things, I could happily sign it.'' And then it occurred to me that I could also prove that by writing an Executive order that included those things plus a few of our own, and they seemed to accept it.

Q. Mr. President, your sanctions against South Africa seem to have drawn criticism from many sides. Bishop Tutu called you a racist; President Botha says they will impede U.S. efforts to help in the region, and many in Congress are still pressing for stronger measures. What is your answer to these charges, and do you plan to appoint a special envoy to the region as you have in Central America?

Q.  --  -- looking so well. But I have a question. For the first time in 70 years, we have become a deficit nation -- since 1914. Does this disturb you? Throughout your political life, you have decried deficit spending and our secondary posture in the world of trade. Do you have a solution for this?

The President. Are we? I think this false impression that's being given that a trade imbalance means debtor nation. This isn't our government that is expending more than it is for imports than it is getting back in exports. These are the people of our country and the businesses and the corporations and the individual entrepreneurs. On one hand, the American people are buying more than the American people are selling. Incidentally, those figures of export and import have some failings in them, some weak spots. They don't include on exports anything that we're getting back for services. There's a lot of technical things I won't get into, because they get too complicated here, about the difference in the two figures.

But let me point something out about this. The deficit that I'm concerned about, that is the most important, and that can be the biggest problem for us and that must be solved, is the deficit in Federal spending -- here, our domestic spending. This is the threat to everything that we hold dear.

This recovery, the greatest one we've known in decades, has been done with this same trade imbalance. Now, in the 1930's, in that depression that I mentioned earlier in my remarks, in that depression, 25-percent unemployment -- the worst depression the world has ever known -- we had a trade surplus every one of those 10 years until World War II ended the depression.

So, I think this has been exaggerated, and it isn't a case of us being a debtor nation. Another thing we don't count is that from abroad, that is not counted in our export figures are the billions of dollars of foreign capital that has been invested in the United States, invested in our private industries, invested in our government bonds, if you will, things of this kind, because we are the best and safest investment in the world today.

The President. I'm glad I'm not faced with that problem today. And I can well understand the plight of the parents and how they feel about it. I also have compassion, as I think we all do, for the child that has this and doesn't know and can't have it explained to him why somehow he is now an outcast and can no longer associate with his playmates and schoolmates. On the other hand, I can understand the problem with the parents. It is true that some medical sources had said that this cannot be communicated in any way other than the ones we already know and which would not involve a child being in the school. And yet medicine has not come forth unequivocally and said, ``This we know for a fact, that it is safe.'' And until they do, I think we just have to do the best we can with this problem. I can understand both sides of it.

Q. Mr. President, why couldn't all the weapons and all the technology that are currently under rubric of the Strategic Defense Initiative be used offensively as well as defensively and thereby defeat your rationale for a strategic defense? Why couldn't lasers and electronic beam weapons be used offensively and defeat the purpose of the program?

The President. Well, I'm sure there must have been some research in things of that kind, but we're definitely seeking a defensive weapon. And one of the things that I believe should be taken up at the summit is to make it plain that we're both willing to look at certainly a mix and see if we can't place more dependence on defensive weapons, rather than on destructive weapons that could wipe out populations.

Q. But, sir, isn't it fair to assume that the Russians, out of their own sense of military security, are bound to consider the possibility that weapons developed under SDI could be used offensively as well as defensively?

The President. Well, I'm not a scientist enough to know about what that would take to make them that way. That isn't what we are researching on or what we're trying to accomplish. And at the moment I have to say the United States -- in spite of some of the misinformation that has been spread around -- the United States is still well behind the Soviet Union in literally every kind of offensive weapon, both conventional and in the strategic weapons. And we think that we have enough of a deterrent, however, that the retaliation would be more than anyone would want to accept.

So, for 40 years we've maintained the peace, but we've got more years to go, and this threat hangs over all of us worldwide, and some day there may come along a madman in the world someplace -- everybody knows how to make them anymore -- that could make use of these. It's like when we met in 1925, after the horror of World War I, and in Geneva decided against poison gas anymore as a weapon in war. And we went through World War II and down to the defeat of our enemies without anyone using it, because they knew that everyone had it. But they also knew something else. We outlawed poison gas in 1925, but everybody kept their gas masks. I think of this weapon as kind of the gas mask.

The President. Well, all I know is that for some time now there has been an indication that he, who had gone so far over to the other camp, was having second thoughts. We just think it's worthwhile to show him another side of the coin, and we think it's worth a try to let him see what our system is and see that he might be welcome in the Western World. And that's why I'm meeting with him.

The President. Well, we've always been aware of the fact that the Soviets had, undoubtedly, more agents in this country than any personnel that we had in theirs; this has been very much on our minds. I don't know just how you can evaluate what might have been compromised. The Walker case somehow doesn't seem to look as big as it did a short time ago now with what we've seen happening in the other countries. I think that if there has been damage, it's been done already with what they could have conveyed both ways in this. You know, England, at the same time, has got the defectioners from the KGB that have now come to them with information that certainly must make a lot of agents throughout the world wonder when they're going to feel a tap on their shoulder. And we just have to play with this the best we can and hope that, together and between us all, we can establish some means of identifying better those who are loyal.

Q. Can I follow up on that and ask again the first part of the question, and that is whether you feel that now, given these defections in West Germany, that perhaps it's time for us to reevaluate just how much information we share with some of our allies in Europe?

Q. Yes, Mr. President, just returning to trade specifically for a minute. Members of Congress who support the so-called Textile and Apparel Protection Act claim that the U.S. adherence to free trade and our allies' adherence to unfair trade practices has not only cost the jobs of 300,000 workers since 1980 but forced companies here to close down even the newest, most efficient plants in the world. Now, if the shoe were on the other foot, Mr. President, and you represented a textile apparel producing State, how would you explain the President's reluctance to support a bill that seems to be the last, best hope for those industries and also for the 2 million remaining workers in those industries?

The President. Well, again, protectionism is a two-way street. And there is no way that you can try to protect and shield one industry that seems to be having these competitive problems without exposing others. No one ever looks over their shoulder to see who lost their job because of protectionism. We do know the history of the Smoot-Hawley tariff and what it did. There were over a thousand economists that sought the President out at the time and begged him to veto that bill. But in this one with a single industry, if there is an unfairness -- and we've already made that plain and made it evident -- we are going to, if they're taking advantage in some way in another country, competing unfairly with us -- we're going to take action on those items. For almost 2 years now, I have been begging our allies and trading partners in the GATT, the general tariff program, to join with us in another round of trade talks to again eliminate whatever holdovers there are of discrimination against someone else's products getting into their country or subsidizing sale at less than production cost in other countries. These things we'll do and we'll do vigorously.

But just plain protectionism -- let me point out another problem that no one has considered. You take one product -- that kind -- and you look at the list of countries, and then you find out we're the biggest exporter in the world. Then you find out that in some of these countries, if we punish them for that one product, we happen to have a trade surplus in that country. How can they stand by on the one thing they're exporting successfully and then say, ``But we're buying more from you than we're selling to you in your country.'' So, there just is no excuse for protectionism that is simply based on legitimate competition and curbing that competition.

Q. May I follow up, Mr. President? If the current bills which are on the Hill now seeking sweeping trade protectionism were enacted, do you foresee somewhat of a, might say, reenactment of Smoot-Hawley which led to the Depression or certainly deepened it? Do you feel there is a cause and effect there?

The President. Well, and already I've met someone from my hometown, Dixon, Illinois. Thank all of you. It is wonderful to have you visit here in the Rose Garden, where you can still see a little of the summer's crop is left.

American communities. And I commend all of you individually for your wonderful work in helping our rural communities. It's gratifying to me to see young people like yourselves volunteering your time to keep these communities strong. And everything you've done, including OPERATION: Care and Share and working with local churches and various groups and other private sector initiatives, is indispensable to the future of our farm communities.

I want you to know that I've been thinking about the problems of the farm these past few years. In fact, we're, all of us here in this big house, constantly concerned about the challenges faced by American farmers during these difficult days. We're a farming nation. We always have been. The American farmer not only feeds this country that is 238 million strong, the American farmer feeds the world. And so when we contemplate the problems farmers are facing these days, we realize that we are dealing with a problem that speaks to the heart of how America lives and what America is.

A while back I received a letter from a daughter of a farmer in Louisiana. She wrote of how she remembered her father -- up at last light, no time for breakfast, out milking the cows, gathering eggs, feeding the dogs. She spoke of how always in a farmer's day something will break down, and her father would have to fix it. And then he would hit the fields with the tractor and the earth tiller, and he wouldn't mind because ``a farmer is part of the ground he works.'' But she ended it with these words addressed to all: ``Don't you think it is time to say thanks to the farmer? After all, you stick your feet under his table every day.'' Well, those are wonderful words, and they shine with truth. But we do thank the farmer. And when you go home, will you tell your parents how we feel?

We've been trying to encourage a national farm bill that will help the farmer and ensure that you have a future in farming by making American agriculture more competitive. We want to put the agriculture industry on a firm and sound basis once and for all so that by the time you're ready to own and work a farm, you can count on being part of a strong and vibrant industry. And my great hope for you, for those of you who do aspire to farm for a living, is that you will be as wonderful as your parents are -- those people who are feeding a great nation and the world. They are the mainstay, the backbone of a great country. And I've got a little special place in my heart that's devoted to them alone.

It's been wonderful to have you here, and I thank you all for coming. I'd like to just add something here. You know, about 135 years ago a Frenchman came to this country because this country had already become the great economic powerhouse that it has continued to be. His name was Alexis de Tocqueville, and he toured all over this country, as he said, looking for the secret of our greatness. And he told some wonderful things. We are pretty unique in all the world with things like you, yourselves, are doing -- volunteer programs where people set out to help others, to help their neighbors. It's pretty traditionally American. And he described it as how, he said, a man would see a problem, and he wouldn't call the Government. He'd cross the street and talk to a friend, and pretty soon a committee would be formed. And, he said, they would solve the problem. And then in his book to his own countrymen in France, he said, and you won't believe this, but there wouldn't be a bureaucracy involved at any time in solving that problem. But he found the secret of America, and he also put this in his book. He said he had looked in the busy harbors; he'd looked in our industrial cities; he'd looked all over for the secret of our greatness.

South Lawn in just a few minutes and head off for New Hampshire with some of our people and talk to the people up there. And you are all invited to go on over there and -- you girls, it will kind of blow your hairdos a little bit when we take off. [Laughter] We'll shortly be taking off in Marine One, as it's called, out to get on Air Force One.

Mr. Meredith. Mr. President, you have long been recognized as having a tremendous desire to serve both education and agriculture, a desire reflected by the appointment of Secretaries Bennett and Block to serve this nation. As young people preparing for careers in the agriculture industry, and as part of a vocational education program in agriculture, we're excited about our futures. In particular, we are pleased to have you as a part of this national FFA conference on community development and would like to present you with this special gift from the Future Farmers of America and R.J. Reynolds Industries, Incorporated, and invite you to attend the 58th National FFA Convention, with over 22,000 members in attendance, November 14 through the 16th, in Kansas City, Missouri. Thank you.

The President. Well, thank you all very much. I am very proud and pleased to have this. I have to tell you that there have been times when I hear a ticking I worry a little bit. [Laughter] In this case I figure it must be all right. But thank you all very much, and this will see that I get on the helicopter on time, as well as everyplace else. Thank you all.

It's a great pleasure to be with so many old friends. New Hampshire has a special place in my heart. I came here, as the Governor told you, in 1980 asking for your help. I know that many of you were active in that campaign, and together we started something that has changed the face of the Nation. And I'm going to continue trying to keep that change going until the Federal Government looks a little bit more like New Hampshire. Let me just take this opportunity to express to you my heartfelt appreciation. Thank you, New Hampshire.

Well, I hope that, unlike that farmer, the American people are beginning to enjoy the fruits of what we set out to do. There was a monster loose in our land back in 1980; inflation was running at double digits for 2 years in a row. It was destroying the economic well-being of our people and tearing at the fabric of our free society. But we've put that monster in a cage and brought inflation under control. The latest figures have it running something well under 4 percent, and we're not going to stop until there isn't any inflation at all. Have we made a difference? You bet we have.

Our economy was in serious trouble, and today we've enjoyed 33 straight months of economic growth. Retail sales are up; personal income is up; overall unemployment is down to 6.9 percent, and more Americans are working than ever before in our history. And if someone cynically says, ``Well, that's because there are more Americans today'' -- no, the employment pool is considered to be everyone, male and female, between the ages of 16 and 65 are part of the employment pool.

I think there's reason for optimism on the trade front as well. American industry has become vastly more efficient in the last few years. There's been a jump in worker productivity, and our tax rate reductions have stimulated heavy investment in new technology. This is the way to a more competitive America and lasting progress. What we can't be nor do is be stampeded into the dark hole of protectionism, igniting a trade war that will undercut everything we've accomplished and, in the long run, throw millions of Americans out of work. The last trade war we fought was back in the 1930's. We brought it on ourselves with the Smoot-Hawley tariff. It was called the Great Depression. I was looking for my first job in that Great Depression. What we must do, and what we're committed to do, is to see to it that there is free and fair and open trade on both sides of the ocean.

We have created more than 8 million new jobs since this recovery began 33 months ago. Many of those jobs flowed from a tidal wave of new small business activity. Well over a million businesses were incorporated in the last 2 years, most of them small operations, each the entrepreneurial dream of one individual. The grassroots free enterprise can keep America number one. On November 22d there will be a meeting of the White House Conference on Small Business here in Concord to get New Hampshire's input on how to further expand the opportunities on Main Street America. I urge you to participate and to make your voices heard.

New Hampshire already has a strong voice in Washington, and I want to thank you for sending one of the best delegations of any State to Washington. Senators Humphrey and Rudman and Representatives Smith and Gregg are doing a terrific job in your behalf and in behalf of America.

The way to progress is not, as some in the Nation's Capital would have us believe, to harness the energy of the American people by centrally directing it from Washington. Do any of you want to be harnessed by the Government planners?

The President. The way to a better life for all Americans is to free the energy of our citizens, to let you the people make decisions with your own lives, and to do that by getting the Government out of your way. That's the plan for a more prosperous future. With freedom and the profit motive, there's nothing we can't do. It's frightening to think of where we would be now had we permitted government policies of the last decade, with their disastrous economic consequences, to continue.

One of the accomplishments of which I am most proud is the turnaround that we've seen in poverty. When I campaigned here and throughout the country back in 1980, I said, and still firmly believe, the best cure for poverty is a strong and growing economy. The answer to helping those in need is not more welfare, government programs, and dependency; the answer is growth, jobs, and opportunity. Well, after years of progress, the number of poor people in America surged sharply upward in 1979, as the tax, tax, spend, and spend philosophy of the previous administration came on line. Well, it took time to put our program in place, time to reverse previous trends, but as our program began to take hold in 1983, when it was finally fully in place -- contrary to certain news accounts -- that increase in poverty, which had continued since 1979 and increased, ground to a halt. And last year we witnessed one of the largest reductions in the number of people living in poverty in history -- 1.8 million people lifted into new lives of progress and hope.

One of the cornerstones of our economic program was a 25-percent across-the-board reduction in the tax rates. In the years before we got to Washington, taxes had been skyrocketing. The Federal tax take doubled just between 1976 and 1981, siphoning off strength and resources from the private sector and undermining any chance for economic growth. Our economy was being bled dry, and the liberals acted surprised when they found the patient was barely breathing. Well, we put a stop to the tax spiral by offsetting tax increases built into the system. Without our changes, an average family of four with two earners in America would have paid $2,544 more in taxes in these last few years. I'm sure that being able to keep $2,544 more of your money has been good for you and for your family. Offsetting the built-in tax increases was a good start, and it's paid off with more investment, more jobs, and better times for everyone.

Well, that was step one; now it's time to finish the job. Taxes are still too high. The system is unfair and too complicated. It encourages people to channel their resources into tax shelters rather than job-creating investment. It's a boon to the tax experts and accountants and a drag on just about everyone else. There are politicians in Washington -- some of the same ones who constructed this tax code monstrosity -- who say that you, the American people, are not interested in tax reform. Well, that's why I came here. I want to simplify the system and overhaul it from top to bottom. I want to bring down the rates and close up the loopholes. Are those politicians right when they say you don't care?

Virtually everyone will be paying at a lower rate. At the same time, we'll be closing loopholes that distort economic choices, do nothing to improve our economy, and are downright unfair. Now, let's not blame those who are using legal but unfair loopholes and writeoffs. Let's just change the system so all of us are treated the same.

Now, one of the writeoffs we're talking about concerns State taxes. Less than 40 percent of all taxpayers -- usually the more well-to-do -- use this writeoff. The majority use the short form and don't itemize; so you don't get advantage of that as a deduction. So, even for the people within the same State and within the same community, it is unfair. It is even more unjust for those who live, as you do, in low-tax States. Thanks to the responsible leadership of Governors like John Sununu and his predecessors, New Hampshire is, as I said, one of the low-tax States. So, in effect, the current system rewards rich States with big budgets and high taxes. You people who've been responsible and kept your budgets low don't receive an equal benefit, and that's no way to run a Federal tax system.

What we want is a tax system that encourages prudent management of resources, a system that rewards those who work by permitting them to keep more if they produce more. We want the ingenuity and creative talents of the American people channeled into beating the competition instead of focusing on beating the tax collector with schemes and maneuvers. We want a system that's good for the American family. We want a new tax system for all Americans, a fair share tax plan for everyone. So, we propose raising the standard deduction for the American family to $4,000 and nearly doubling the personal exemption to $2,000. The political establishment back in Washington says you don't care about these things. Well, I say the Washington establishment is out of touch with the American people. America wants tax reform, and America deserves tax reform, and if we stand together, America is going to get tax reform.

You know, one cannot come to this spot without remembering what New Hampshire has meant to America. The tranquility of your countryside, your lakes and forests, the majesty of your wooded hills and mountains gave birth to a new breed of people -- people respectful of God, fiercely independent, and unafraid to stand up and be counted. In 1976, and then again in 1980, I traveled through your beautiful State, speaking at city halls and school gymnasiums and town meeting halls. And if anyone doubts that democracy is alive and well, let them come to New Hampshire. ``Live free or die'' is more than a motto. It's more than a motto; it's a way of life that we're bound and determined to preserve. And you know something? I don't think you'd be unhappy if a lot more of the other 49 neighboring States would adopt that same motto and we'd adopt it in Washington.

George underestimated how much the people cared about this issue. Don't you think it's time for a second American revolution? And we'll win this one, too, together. We'll overhaul our tax structure. We'll continue building a society where people are free and opportunity is unlimited -- one nation under God, with liberty and justice for all.

And now, before I thank you for letting me be here today, I just have a little news note. There has been some information already that has leaked out about it. And I can tell the press that they're supposed to wait around because you're going to get a briefing from some others. I'm pleased to inform you, if you haven't heard, that Reverend Benjamin Weir, who was held hostage for 18 months in Lebanon, has now been released. I talked with Reverend Weir on Air Force One this morning. And I'm happy for him and his family. But I will not be satisfied and will not cease our efforts until all the hostages, the other six, are released.

America, safe with his family, I wasn't going to say anything because we were going to make the announcement from Washington at 12:30 p.m. And then when I saw that someplace along the line some information had leaked and that I would be here until about 12:20 p.m., I thought, well, I'll just jump the gun on the fellows in Washington and tell you about it. So, we were trying to keep it so quiet because we don't want to do anything that endangers the chances of the other six.

We are pleased to inform you that Reverend Benjamin Weir has been released 18 months after he was taken hostage in Lebanon. We are obviously happy for Reverend Weir and his family and friends, but we will not be satisfied and will not cease our efforts until all hostages -- American, French, and British -- have been released. This is top priority for the Reagan administration. Since the first American was seized, the President has been directly engaged in intensive efforts to liberate our citizens. He will remain involved until all of our citizens have been liberated.

This morning the President spoke to Reverend Weir, expressing relief at his release and determination to see the others freed. While there was no linkage between the release of the Atlit prisoners and the freeing of our hostages, we have hoped that repatriation of the Atlit prisoners would improve the atmosphere in the region. We, therefore, intensified our efforts when the Atlit release occurred. Thus far, these efforts have resulted in the liberation of Reverend Weir, for which we are grateful. Our efforts are continuing in order to obtain the release of the other six hostages. I am not going into any further detail on the release of Reverend Weir or what measures we are taking to obtain the release of the others because it might interfere with these efforts.

The Vice President plans to meet with the families of the six remaining hostages on Friday, when they will be in Washington. He will review for them what can be shared on our efforts to obtain release of the remaining hostages and to assure them of the administration's determination to continue these efforts.

That's why I always enjoy these get-togethers with Congress. Rest of the year we have our differences, but times like these allow us just a moment to stop being Republicans and Democrats and just eat -- [laughter] -- and enjoy.

So, again, I just want to say that, because although the executive branch may complain about the legislative branch a lot and vice versa, the U.S. Congress remains the greatest invention in self-government this world has ever seen, and all of you in the Senate and the House do it proud.

Maybe it's natural that in the heat of legislative combat we focus on our differences, but this season let's also try to remember how much we have in common -- the great love we have for this blessed land of ours and our desire that comes before all else to do what's best for America. As I said, we've got a lot of work to do this fall.

Speaking for Nancy and myself, let me just say again what a great pleasure it is to have all of you here. And now, once again, and I think speaking for all of you -- and this time you won't mind if I speak for you -- and that is, Mickey and all of your talented artists here, God bless you, and thank you very much for the generous and warm way you've entertained us.

President underscores the determination of the United States to continue playing an active and constructive role in this volatile portion of the globe. The United States prides itself as a force for freedom and progress and stability, and this is true in southern Africa, as in other parts of the world. We seek to encourage the development of democratic government in all the nations of southern Africa. Democracy and the respect for fundamental human liberties are not only consistent with our values as a free people but are also the surest pathway to economic progress, internal reconciliation, and international peace.

President Machel, you have already taken a step toward peace. And because of your personal foresight and courage, cross-border violence in the region has been reduced and a more constructive relationship with South Africa has begun. These efforts already have proven to be a great boon to the well-being of your people. We know that economic recovery and development will require the restoration of peace, a process which will call upon all the statesmanship of Mozambique's leaders.

Mozambique has suffered greatly in the last decade from drought, domestic violence, and economic dislocation. I was impressed today with President Machel's sincere desire to improve the lot of his people. The United States, as is true in other African countries, is doing what it can to alleviate the worst effects of the drought. We are now also involving ourselves in a major effort to rebuild Mozambique's shattered economy. We welcome Mozambique's decision to cooperate with the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank to design a program of economic stabilization and development. Encouraging Western investment and strengthening Mozambique's private sector is a formula for economic advancement and improving the quality of life. We know you will find, President Machel, that the freer people are in the arena of economics, the more enterprising they become and the more benefits are enjoyed by the society as a whole.

I was glad to have had this opportunity today to express personally to President Machel America's good will toward the people of his country. We look forward to the success of his economic initiatives and movement toward national unity. Thank you, President Machel, for your visit to the United States.

President Machel. Thank you very much. We have come here on an official visit at the invitation of President Ronald Reagan. We say a sincere thank you for this friendly gesture. Our aim in this visit is to strengthen existing bilateral relations and define a basis for the long-term development of these relations. I have just had a very positive, fruitful, and constructive meeting with President Ronald Reagan. I had the opportunity to express our appreciation for the food and development aid that the United States of America has granted us.

We are proud of our independence. We are intransigent in the defense of our national interest. We firmly believe that, like ourselves, each people must determine the destiny of its own country. Our chief concern is to solve the basic problems of our people and to make the region where we live one of peace, stability, good-neighborliness, cooperation, and development.

In this context, we signed with the Republic of South Africa the Nkomati agreement, an essential condition for peace and development. The People's Republic of Mozambique has strictly complied with the Nkomati agreement. The need for the urgent elimination of apartheid is a matter of common concern. Mozambique took a positive view of the efforts of the international community, including the United States, in this regard. We hope that such efforts continue and that they lead to the independence of Namibia, to peace and stability for the whole of southern Africa.

Mozambique is still a backward and underdeveloped country, but one with vast potential and natural resources. We seek the participation of the United States and of its private sector in putting those resources at the service of our economic and social development. I am convinced that the meeting I have just had with President Ronald Reagan has established a solid basis for long-term cooperation in all fields between Mozambique and the United States. With mutual respect and reciprocal advantages, we shall develop the friendship which we all seek. So, thank you very much, Mr. President.

The President. You know, I've been asked that, and I guess I have to say, I've never thought that far ahead. I'm so busy thinking about what we want to accomplish. I guess maybe just that I helped perpetuate this great American dream.

The President. There are so many things. I would like to get us definitely on the pattern of reducing the deficit so that the balanced budget is in view. I would like to have, then, going into effect at that time a balanced budget amendment so we could never again go a half a century, as we have, of regularly deficit spending each year. And I would like to see us also have some plan for beginning installments to start reducing the national debt, as we have done many times in the past. There are a number of things that I would like to see -- resolve the problem of prayer in schools and have us on the road, a good solid road that could make us optimistic about the chances for peace.

Mr. Robertson. On the budget deficit, it seems as if members of your own party are not totally in accord with you. The Congress hasn't supported you. Are you optimistic? David Stockman said maybe this is the last chance, but you're optimistic about the future?

This budget, over the years, has been structurally built into our budgeting process. And the difficulty, of course, is getting agreement not on the need to reduce it -- everyone seems to agree on that -- but then trying to get them to agree on, well, where do you apply the tourniquet and shut off that hemorrhage of funds. But I think that we're on the beginning of a track where we can see a progression of reducing the deficit as a percentage of gross national product.

Mr. Robertson. I spoke to an influential Republican Senator on Sunday who felt that, possibly, the tax reform measure might be diverting attention away from deficit reduction. Do you see that as a complement to it or possibly a stimulant for it?

The President. Actually, a stimulant for it in a way, because if you look back, not just in our administration and what we did in 1981 when we implemented -- or began implementing our tax cuts, but go back to President Kennedy's across-the-board tax cut, before that to President Coolidge and the tax cuts that he implemented -- in every instance the economic growth has resulted in the Government getting more revenues at the lower rates than it was getting at the higher rates. So, I think this tax reform very definitely would help. It isn't aimed at being a part of that, but it would help in that it would stimulate economic growth and I think would actually, thus, result in increased revenues.

The President. Well, let's start right off with someone down there at the lower end of the earning scale. One of the features of this is that the personal exemption is increased to $4,000 and then the deduction for dependents is almost doubled to $2,000 apiece instead of the present 1,040. So, you take a family of four, you've got $8,000 of nontaxable income to begin with right there. And that plus the reduced rates -- we believe that -- and first of all, so many of our people can't and don't take advantage of many of the loopholes that others have been able to use to reduce their fair share of the tax burden. So, it is very definitely aimed at families and that was sort of proven the other day when the Democratic majority in the House of Representatives -- so, I'm not just citing a Republican measure -- in the Committee on Children, Youth, and Family have made a study of this tax proposal plus all the others that are before the Congress and said flatly this one is the most profamily of all of the tax proposals.

Republicans, any objection to those figures. There have been some of the loopholes or deductions, other areas that people have thought should be retained, and there's been argument about that. But I haven't heard anyone raise a complaint about these personal exemptions.

Mr. Robertson. One oblique question. I read that the reason that you and Franklin Roosevelt were so tremendously popular is because you gave the American people hope. Looking down the road, what cause do you have for hope?

The President. Well, I'm an eternal optimist, I know; but I can't help but have hope. Just a few years ago, we were seeing our streets torn up with rioting and demonstrations of various kinds, but we also were seeing a lack of hope. We were hearing talk that we were no longer a nation of growth and so forth; that we must begin to limit ourselves in our expectations, and our government itself was telling that to the people. And here, today, in these few short years, double-digit inflation is down to less than 4 percent and still on its way down; interest rates, the prime rate had reached 21\1/2\ percent, and it is down to far less than a half of that now, and still, I believe, they're going down. In the last 33 months, we have created more than 8 million new jobs. And today -- you know what is referred to as the employment pool is everyone in the United States -- male and female between the age of 16 and 65 are known as the potential labor pool -- that if all of them sought work -- they're all employable. The highest percentage of that labor pool is employed now than has ever been employed before in our history. And the growth in the recovery has been the greatest that we've known in any recovery from any previous recession or depression.

But even more than that, there is something out there -- you get out on the road and talk to the people. There is a spirit. Our young people, who once were, as you know, totally disillusioned with government and so forth over the Vietnam war -- the resurgence of patriotism among them.

Mr. Robertson. I ask you a question for the women viewers in our audience. You've just gone through a very critical medical problem, and we know how close you and your wife Nancy are. It is almost a fabled love affair -- better than Hollywood could do it. What was her reaction? How did she handle this crisis?

The President. Well, she is very courageous, and once upon a time when she was younger she was one of those -- what did they call them -- those nurses aides that -- during war time and all. So, that part, she was on the job. But she also is a very great worrier, and let me put it this way: I've recovered quicker than she did.

Mr. Robertson. It was a terrible crisis. This is the second one. Some of your very close friends from California have gone back into private enterprise or gone back home. Are you turning more to your wife for counsel? She's a very wise lady.

The President. Oh, listen, we have always talked over everything together. I couldn't imagine it being otherwise. But as to the people leaving the administration, I've expected that. I had 8 years experience in California. And I made it plain from the beginning that these people -- I would take them even if it was only for a year or 2 years and then find someone else if and when they had to return to their own careers. And I think it should be that way if you're going to get -- well, I always put it this way. I wanted people in government that really didn't want a job in government, but that were willing to come and serve rather than those that were seeking government jobs. And the result is, you know that they will have to go back to their own careers sooner or later.

The President. Well, I can't really talk about what we are doing, because I don't want to do anything that will endanger the prospects of the others being freed. I can only say that we have explored every avenue. We've been working for this for all the time since the first one, Mr.

Buckley, was kidnaped. And I know that some of the families have grown impatient, because if they don't see things in the paper, they don't think we're doing anything. But going public and being in the paper is not the way to get a Reverend Weir back or any of the others.

The President. I have to remain cautiously optimistic. And we are continuing the efforts that -- and we've explored and been trying in every avenue that is open to us. But, again, it's something I can't talk about because, as I say, there is a risk in all of this for them.

Mr. Robertson. You're getting ready for the summit. Is the American press -- and a free press is so important in our nation -- but is it from time to time being manipulated by the Soviet Union to sort of stack the deck against you in this summit meeting?

The President.  --  -- by the color of the hat. I think what should be better understood by our people -- and this isn't any criticism of our press -- the Soviet Union has a worldwide disinformation network, and it's very effective. And they can get many things published and broadcast and so forth to suit their ends and in their drives, for example, to try to create some friction among us and our allies. And I don't think we have anything comparable to that.

The President. I'll have to. That's one of the advantages of being my age. I was looking for work in the Great Depression, and I know what the Smoot-Hawley bill did, the world trade war that it created. There is no way that that can win -- protectionism for, say, a particular industry -- no one ever looks over their shoulder to see how many people in other industries lost their jobs -- because it's a two-way street, and retaliation sets in. We are still the greatest exporter in the world. And even though there is a great trade imbalance right now, that we're importing far more than we're exporting, that is not because we have reduced our exports, as big as they ever were.

We have increased our imports because of the value of our dollar and the fact that our trading partners have not had the economic recovery we've had, so their prices are low. And you can't blame people for picking up a bargain.

The President. Exactly. As a matter of fact, they themselves admit that in their systems there are so many rigidities in labor laws and everything else that have been built in that they have not had the recovery. Indeed, when I was at the recent economic summit, the last summit in May, they called to my face, they called what we have is the miracle of America. So, we've tried to pass on to them information that we think would help them have some miracles.

The President. Well, thank you very much, and, in saying that, let me tell you, when you asked about the future and why I was optimistic and all, I am convinced this is a nation under God and as long as we recognize that, believe that, I think he'll help us.

This week I will meet President Mubarak of Egypt; next week with King Hussein of Jordan. In both meetings, one item will dominate the agenda -- peace between Israel and her neighbors. King Hussein has made clear his wish for a peaceful solution to the Arab-Israeli conflict which has plagued the Middle East and the world for so long. He foresees a peace negotiated directly between Israel and a Jordanian-Palestinian delegation and is committed to begin those negotiations, if possible, by the end of the year. We're doing all we can to support the efforts to make this vision a reality. Egypt, President Mubarak's nation, has already proven that peace between the Israelis and Arabs is possible and now faces other problems -- a troubled economy at home and danger on some of its borders. We're doing all we can to help Egypt meet these challenges because we know that a secure and prosperous Egypt is the cornerstone of peace and stability in that region.

King Hussein, President Mubarak, and I will also discuss the war between Iran and Iraq. America and other nations have worked for years now to bring this war to an end -- so far, to no avail. Yet if we cannot end the fighting, we and close friends like Egypt and Jordan can keep it from spreading. In particular, we're determined to preserve the free shipment of oil through the Persian Gulf.

Next Friday I'll meet the new Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze. He and I will discuss human rights, regional conflicts such as the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, bilateral issues such as trade between our two countries, and security matters including our efforts to achieve genuine, verifiable reductions in nuclear arms. As Mr. Shevardnadze and I meet, it will be 6 months since Mr. Gorbachev became the new Soviet leader, and this will give our meeting special significance.

As you know, the Soviet Union frequently has been bent upon expansion. Indeed, since the 1970's the Soviet Union has been engaged in a military buildup which far exceeds any rational definition of its defensive needs. These policies have inflicted bitter costs upon the Soviet peoples. Every week Russian soldiers are dying in Afghanistan, while their standard of living has suffered accordingly. Mr. Gorbachev can change this; he can set in train a policy of arms reductions and lasting peace. By shifting resources from armaments to people, he can enable his nation to enjoy far more economic growth. Given the nature of the Soviet system and its ideology, we must not raise false hopes, but during my meeting with Mr. Shevardnadze, I will express the good will of the United States and search for signs of a Soviet willingness to engage in genuine give and take.

Gorbachev. Again, with regard to this meeting, we must not raise false hopes. The differences between communism and democracy are profound. There will inevitably be competition between us, but it's the central responsibility of the leaders of the United States and the U.S.S.R. to ensure that this competition is peaceful. In these meetings, we will make clear to the Soviet leaders that we are determined to protect Western interests, but willing at the same time to do our part to improve American-Soviet relations. If there's comparable seriousness and flexibility on the Soviet part, cooperation between our two great nations will be enhanced. Already many in our administration are toiling on preparations. On Friday I will tell Mr. Shevardnadze how genuinely we wish this meeting to bear fruit.

Turning from foreign affairs to international trade, in recent weeks there has been sentiment growing in the Congress for some form of protectionism -- legislation which would make it difficult or impossible for us to exchange whole categories of goods with our trading partners. On Monday I'll address our absolute commitment to trade that is both free and fair. For now, let me simply state that the answer to our trade problems isn't antitrade legislation; it's more economic growth worldwide.

My friends, the dangers to world peace and prosperity are ever present. But I believe that with your support, during the next 10 days, we'll be able to promote peace and advance the cause of free and fair international trade.

Now, in closing, I want to talk about the tragedy of the Mexican earthquake, which has brought a great outpouring of sympathy and offers of assistance from the American people. We greatly admire the bravery and resolve of the Mexican people to dedicate all their resources to overcome this calamitous event. A tragedy like this reminds us that the desire to be a good neighbor is basic to the American character and to our foreign policy. We have already provided some technical assistance, as requested by the Mexican Government, and stand ready to help in every way in the days and months ahead. To aid in that effort, Nancy will go to Mexico within the next few days to express the support of the American people for our courageous friends in Mexico and to explore how we can lend a hand in this ordeal.

Thank you very much, and welcome to the White House. I'm pleased to have this opportunity to be with you to address the pressing question of America's trade challenge for the eighties and beyond. And let me say at the outset that our trade policy rests firmly on the foundation of free and open markets -- free trade. I, like you, recognize the inescapable conclusion that all of history has taught: The freer the flow of world trade, the stronger the tides for human progress and peace among nations.

I certainly don't have to explain the benefits of free and open markets to you. They produce more jobs, a more productive use of our nation's resources, more rapid innovation, and a higher standard of living. They strengthen our national security because our economy, the bedrock of our defense, is stronger. I'm pleased that the United States has played the critical role of ensuring and promoting an open trading system since World War II. And I know that if we ever faltered in the defense and promotion of the worldwide free trading system, that system will collapse, to the detriment of all.

But our role does not absolve our trading partners from their major responsibility: to support us in seeking a more open trading system. No nation, even one as large and as powerful as the United States, can, by itself, ensure a free trading system. All that we and others have done to provide for the free flow of goods and services and capital is based on cooperation. And our trading partners must join us in working to improve the system of trade that has contributed so much to economic growth and the security of our allies and of ourselves.

States is stronger than ever. You know, sometimes in Washington, there are some who seem to forget what the economy is all about. They give me reports saying the economy does this and the economy will do that, but they never talk about business. And somewhere along the way, these folks in Washington have forgotten that the economy is business. Business creates new products and new services; business creates jobs; business creates prosperity for our communities and our nation as a whole. And business is the people that make it work, from the CEO to the workers in the factories. I know, too, that American business has never been afraid to compete. I know that when a trading system follows the rules of free trade, when there is equal opportunity to compete, American business is as innovative, efficient, and competitive as any in the world. I also know that the American worker is as good and productive as any in the world.

And that's why to make the international trading system work, all must abide by the rules. All must work to guarantee open markets. Above all else, free trade is, by definition, fair trade. When domestic markets are closed to the exports of others, it is no longer free trade. When governments subsidize their manufacturers and farmers so that they can dump goods in other markets, it is no longer free trade. When governments permit counterfeiting or copying of American products, it is stealing our future, and it is no longer free trade. When governments assist their exporters in ways that violate international laws, then the playing field is no longer level, and there is no longer free trade. When governments subsidize industries for commercial advantage and underwrite costs, placing an unfair burden on competitors, that is not free trade.

I have worked for 4 years at Versailles and Williamsburg and London and last at Bonn to get our trading partners to dismantle their trade barriers, eliminate their subsidies and other unfair trade practices, enter into negotiations to open markets even further, and strengthen GATT, the international accord that governs worldwide trade. I will continue to do these things. But I also want the American people and our trading partners to know that we will take all the action that is necessary to pursue our rights and interests in international commerce under our laws and the GATT to see that other nations live up to their obligations and their trade agreements with us. I believe that if trade is not fair for all, then trade is free in name only. I will not stand by and watch American businesses fail because of unfair trading practices abroad. I will not stand by and watch American workers lose their jobs because other nations do not play by the rules.

Just since 1980 manufacturing production has increased 17 percent. But I'm not unmindful that within this prosperity, some industries and workers face difficulties. To the workers who have been displaced by industrial shifts within our society, we are committed to help. To those industries that are victims of unfair trade, we will work unceasingly to have those practices eliminated.

Just a few weeks ago, I asked the United States Trade Representative to initiate unfair trade practice investigations. It's the first time a President has done this. And, as you know, we have self-initiated three such cases that will investigate a Korean law that prohibits fair competition for U.S. insurance firms, a Brazilian law restricting the sale of U.S. high technology products, and Japanese restrictions on the sale of U.S. tobacco products. I have also ordered the United States Trade Representative to accelerate the ongoing cases of Common Market restrictions of canned fruit and Japanese prohibitions on imports of our leather and leather footwear.

Ambassador Yeutter to maintain a constant watch and to take action in those instances of unfair trade that will disadvantage American businesses and workers. I have directed the Secretary of the Treasury to work with the Congress to establish a $300 million fund that will support up to a billion dollars in mixed-credit loans. These funds will counter our loss of business to trading partners who use what, in effect, are subsidies to deprive U.S. companies of fair access to world markets. And I've asked that these initiatives be continued until unfair credit subsidies by our trading partners are eliminated through negotiations with them. I have further instructed Treasury Secretary Jim Baker to inform the participants at the International Monetary Fund and World Bank conferences in Seoul that we will take into consideration the trading practices of other nations in our deliberations and decisionmaking.

A major factor in the growth of our trade deficit has been the combination of our very strong economic performance and the weak economic performance of our major trading partners over the last 4 years. This has limited our exports and contributed to the weakening of other currencies relative to the dollar, thereby encouraging additional imports by the United States and discouraging our exports. Yesterday I authorized Treasury Secretary Baker to join his counterparts from other major industrial countries to announce measures to promote stronger and more balanced growth in our economies and thereby the strengthening of foreign currencies. This will provide better markets for U.S. products and improve the competitive position of our industry, agriculture, and labor.

I have ordered the Secretary of State to seek time limits on negotiations underway to open up markets in specific product areas in Japan. I have instructed the United States Trade Representative to accelerate negotiations with any and all countries where the counterfeiting and piracy of U.S. goods has occurred to bring these practices to a quick end. And I look forward to working with the Congress to increase efforts to protect patents, copyrights, trademarks, and other intellectual property rights. And finally, I am today directing that a strike force be established among the relevant agencies in our government whose task it will be to uncover unfair trading practices used against us and develop and execute strategies and programs to promptly counter and eliminate them.

I'm also looking forward to working with the Congress to put into place any necessary legislation that would help us promote free and fair trade and secure jobs for American workers. Among the topics that we should jointly consider are authority to support our new trade negotiating initiatives that would, among other things, reduce tariffs and attempt to dismantle all other trade barriers; to protect intellectual property rights, including trade in articles that infringe U.S. process patents, longer terms for agricultural chemicals, and eliminating Freedom of Information Act abuses that will help our businesses protect their proprietary property; to improve our antidumping and countervailing duty laws so that a predictable pricing test covers nonmarket economies, enabling our companies to have protection against unfair dumping from those countries. We should also improve these laws so that business can have full and rapid protection in receiving help against unfair imports -- to amend our trade laws to put a deadline on dispute settlement and to conduct a fast-track procedure for perishable items. We should no longer tolerate 16-year cases and settlements so costly and time consuming that any assistance is ineffective.

I am also directing the Secretary of Labor to explore ways of assisting workers who lose jobs to find gainful employment in other industries, and I look forward to working with Congress in this vital task. Additionally, I welcome the suggestions of the Members of Congress on other potential legislation that has as its object the promotion of free and fair trade. I will work with them to see that good legislation is passed. Conversely, I will strongly oppose and will veto measures that I believe will harm economic growth, cause loss of jobs, and diminish international trade.

But I do not want to let this discussion pass without reminding all of our ultimate purpose: the expansion of free and open markets everywhere. There are some, well-meaning in motive, who have proposed bills and programs that are purely protectionist in nature. These proposals would raise the costs of the goods and services that American consumers across the land would have to pay. They would invite retaliation by our trading partners abroad; would in turn lose jobs for those American workers in industries that would be the victims of such retaliation; would rekindle inflation; would strain international relations; and would impair the stability of the international financial and trading systems. The net result of these counterproductive proposals would not be to protect consumers or workers or farmers or businesses. In fact, just the reverse would happen.

To reduce the impediments to free markets, we will accelerate our efforts to launch a new GATT negotiating round with our trading partners. And we hope that the GATT members will see fit to reduce barriers for trade in agricultural products, services, technologies, investments, and in mature industries. We will seek effective dispute settlement techniques in these areas. But if these negotiations are not initiated or if insignificant progress is made, I'm instructing our trade negotiators to explore regional and bilateral agreements with other nations.

Here at home, we will continue our efforts to reduce excessive government spending and to promote our tax reform proposal that is essential to strengthening our own economy and making U.S. business more competitive in international markets. Further, we will encourage our trading partners, as agreed upon at the Bonn summit, to accelerate their own economic growth by removing rigidities and imbalances in their economies. And we will encourage them to provide sound fiscal and monetary policies to have them fully participate in the growth potential that is there for all. We will seek to strengthen and improve the operation of the international monetary system. And we will encourage the debt burdened, less-developed countries of the world to reduce and eliminate impediments to investments and eliminate internal restrictions that discourage their own economic growth.

Let me summarize: Our commitment to free trade is undiminished. We will vigorously pursue our policy of promoting free and open markets in this country and around the world. We will insist that all nations face up to their responsibilities of preserving and enhancing free trade everywhere.

But let no one mistake our resolve to oppose any and all unfair trading practices. It is wrong for the American worker and American businessman to continue to bear the burden imposed by those who abuse the world trading system. We do not want a trade war with other nations; we want other nations to join us in enlarging and enhancing the world trading system for the benefit of all.

We do not want to stop other nations from selling goods in the United States; we want to sell more of our goods to other nations. We do not dream of protecting America from others' success; we seek to include everyone in the success of the American dream.

It was Nancy's strong desire to travel to Mexico to let your people know of our respect and admiration for Mexico's vigorous response in meeting its great human needs. The resiliency of your citizens is truly extraordinary.

You can be sure that the United States will accelerate our efforts in providing appropriate assistance, as identified by the Mexican Government. We stand ready to assist you and the Mexican people as you undertake this heroic effort to relieve the misery wrought by the earthquake. And, beyond your immediate needs, as you formulate your longer term reconstruction plans, we will want to consult with you about how we and other members of the international community can be of help.

Governor Alexander couldn't make it today; I'll miss him because he's been one of the staunchest and most eloquent supporters of America's fair share tax plan. Right now he's on his way to the East looking for opportunities to expand Tennessee's links to the Asian market. He pointed out to me that Tennessee has a significant concentration of Japanese capital investment and that the future of this State, as well as every other State in our nation, is dependent on an open, free, and fair trading system. And that's why he's abroad right now aggressively promoting Tennessee's interests. He's trying to increase world trade, not block it out. I'm glad to see Governor Alexander taking this positive approach to prosperity through free trade.

When I was in Tennessee last year, the Governor and Senator Baker briefed me on the proposals for a high-tech corridor in Knoxville. They talked about soon competing with Silicon Valley. And when I see the impressive strides Tennessee has made in just the last few years, all I know -- they weren't just whistling Dixie. [Laughter] As all of you know so well, advances in technology are almost synonymous with advances in knowledge, and that's one reason why improving America's educational system must be a high priority for our nation.

Last year scholastic aptitude test scores rose four points nationwide. And this year we have even better news to report; yesterday we learned that the SAT scores were up nine points over a year ago. I like that trend; that's the biggest single jump since 1963. We're making a powerful comeback from the two decades of educational decline that began in the 1960's, but we have more to do if we're going to fully prepare our nation to lead the world into the 21st century. So, let's keep up the good work.

Now, I've really come here today to listen to you. I can't wait to hear about your plans and the progress that you've made, and afterward I may say a few words about how America's fair share tax plan will promote high-tech investment and -- [laughter] -- and the prosperity that it brings here in Knoxville.

Well, first of all, I am fascinated by what I've heard, and at the same time, here we've all heard concrete examples that explain some of the statistics about which I like to speak now and then, such as how we could, since 1979, lose 1,600,000 manufacturing jobs. And in one of the talk shows over the weekend there was someone from government that was making quite a point of this -- neglected to answer why at the same time, since 1979, we have added more than 9 million new jobs to transportation industries, to service industries, and so forth. And I've seen here the examples of what we're talking about.

When I was young, which was quite a while ago everybody reminds me -- [laughter] -- high technology then probably referred to a Model T that could make it up a hill. But we've come a long way. I think we're standing at the beginning of a new era of technological revolution that will transform all our lives for the better. And it's more than just the personal computers that have found a place in so many of our homes and offices. Every facet of industry, as has been evidenced here at this table today -- the manufacturing, agriculture, science, health care -- is being improved, made more efficient and productive by technology. Our healthy increases in productivity are in great part attributable to the efficiencies that technology brings. And technology also strengthens our national security and has given us the hope that within the next generation the human race can strengthen and ensure for the long term our ability to deter nuclear war with nonnuclear defense systems that would allow us to protect against missiles without threatening innocent civilians.

But while we celebrate the beginning of this new era, we should remember that misguided tax policies in the late sixties and seventies almost destroyed America's position as the leader of the high-tech revolution. Not just the tax policies -- I know that you were sure you were going to hear me say something about that -- but when I first became a part of government, I did so imbued with the feeling that, among other things, government had developed a kind of adversarial relationship with its own business community, where government and its business community should be partners, and not with government being the senior partner, by any means. And I say -- we'd almost wiped out the venture capital markets in this country with tax rates, plus the high rate of inflation. Entrepreneurs were forced to look abroad for financing.

You gave an example of someone who couldn't find what was needed here. There was a fellow named Gene Amdahl, the inventor of what many consider the most successful computer that was ever built. And back in the seventies, he was going to start his own company. He couldn't find the venture capital that he needed in this country, and he was forced to go to Japan to a large, high-tech competitor. And they gave him the money all right -- in exchange for his ideas.

Cutting the tax rates has opened the floodgates on entrepreneurship in our country. That's why, on the theory that you can't have too much of a good thing, we're going to propose more tax cuts in our fair share tax plan, and we're going to cut the capital gains tax rate again to encourage more venture capital and fuel the fires of technological innovation. Equally important for entrepreneurs in small business, though, we're bringing down the top personal tax rate to 35 percent, and that's just half of what it was 5 years ago. We're going to close wasteful loopholes.

And we'll be able to lower tax rates on America's businesses. We think it's time that America pulled its money out of tax shelters and started investing in the future. This tax cutting has given the economy new blood and new life. And in the last 33 months, we have created 8 million new jobs alone. And I believe that this tax plan that I'm out on the road talking about -- and will be talking about it in Athens in a little while -- will give us a decade of economic expansion, and we foresee creating 10 million more new jobs in the next 4 years. Now, I'll bet you anything a whole bunch of those jobs are going to be created right here in Tennessee. Incidentally, I had the privilege of driving the prototype of the new car that is going to be built here. I don't get to do that very often -- only drive the Jeep when I'm up at the ranch and -- [laughter] -- 8 years as Governor, when we finally left the Governor's office and went home, I remember one night Nancy and I were invited out to dinner. We went out and got in the back seat of the car and waited for somebody to get in and drive us. [Laughter] But driving that Saturn, I must say, was an experience. [Laughter] Having driven for a lot of years -- you're really going to be making something very remarkable here.

Well, the best way, I think, to stay number one is to lower tax rates further and give all of our business community and our people a chance. You can feel the excitement, and I felt it here at this table down here in Tennessee; it's the excitement of progress. Your Congressman here, John Duncan and his colleagues Jimmy Quillen and Harold Ford and I are not going to let Washington obstruct the road to the future. So, you let these people know how you feel, and we'll pass this tax bill in this year of 1985 and open the future to hope and opportunity.

This whole idea of your partnership here -- it's government, education, private sector -- I've had some experience with that. When I became Governor of California, I invited what had to be the top industrialists and business and labor people -- well, the leadership of the State of California to a luncheon. The room wasn't much bigger than this one and probably no more people than are here today. And I suggested to them an idea, and that was would they volunteer their services to be formed into task forces to go into every agency and department of the State government and come back and tell us how modern business practices could be put to work to make it more efficient, more economic -- and to a man and woman, they volunteered. And for the next period of virtually a year, these busy people gave an average of more than 3 days a week to this task.

They appointed among themselves an executive committee to put things together, and they delivered to us 1,200 specific recommendations. And by the time I had left the governorship, we had implemented more than 800 of those for a visible savings of billions of dollars to government, and it vastly reduced the size of the government, while the population of California was increasing faster than any other State.

It's possible that some of the deterioration of our technology and all that has been mentioned here, maybe that was a result of World War II, where everything of ours remained intact and the rest of the world -- our industrial partners and neighbors -- had theirs virtually destroyed in the war, and then we set out to help them rebuild. And they rebuilt in a different period of time and with all the newer things that were available.

Well, we don't have to bomb everything here to catch up with them, just do what several of you here have been suggesting that you have been doing. And I see my job, and that of John's and the others here in government, to get out of your way, to be a partner but not a senior partner, and to have policies that we are sure are not going to hinder the practice of the free economy. I think we've discovered in this land more than anyplace else, freedom really works.

The President. Thank you very much, and thank you, Congressman Duncan. Believe me, it is wonderful to be here. You know, I always wanted to speak on democracy and good government in Athens. Now, it is absolutely not true that I taught Plato all he knew. [Laughter] So, I thank you for this opportunity. It's good to see my friends, Senator Baker and Congressman Quillen and Congressman Ford and Mayor Brakebill. Governor Alexander wanted to be here, but he's off finding new business opportunities for Tennessee. And I suspect that he will have the same success on this trip as he did in recent dealings with a company in Detroit.

But I want to speak to you today about changing our tax system. I'm going to speak briefly so I don't hold you up too much from your day, but I'm going to -- you know, I learned once a very important lesson about the importance of brevity in a speech. I was making a speech, and in the audience was a minister from Oklahoma, Bill Alexander, who had been quite well known around the country. And Bill told me, after I had spoken, about his first sermon, and I've always thought there was a connection between my speech and his story.

Well, to start with, the whole struggle for tax reform in our country is a kind of drama, with good guys and bad guys and even a damsel in distress. But like all dramas, it occurs in a certain context, and here's ours: Our economy, the American economy, has never been stronger, never been bigger, and never been better. Since the economic recovery began, we've created over 8 million new jobs. Well over a million new businesses were incorporated in the last 2 years alone. The American standard of living has increased. Our tax cuts put more money back in the American wallet. Interest rates are down from 21\1/2\ percent to 9\1/2\ percent; so we can build houses and make big purchases again. And most important, in the past 5 years, we chased inflation. We caught it; we wrestled it to the ground and stopped it from robbing the American consumer.

American life that's been a mess for years now. I'm talking about our current tax system. Now, I sometimes do an informal poll about what the people think about taxes, and if you'll cooperate -- do you love our current tax system?

The President. Well, I'm with you. [Laughter] A system that penalizes people for working overtime, a system that allows some to unfairly shelter their income from taxation -- well, that's a system that just doesn't deserve to survive. What we want to put in its place is a tax system that, to begin with, will reduce the 14 tax brackets we have now down to 3. We want to simplify the system and make it loophole-free. We want to see that everyone pays their fair share, but no one pays more than that.

Well, one of the keys to our tax proposal is that we went in with the clear intent to try to lower the personal income taxes faced by the American people. So, we devised a system in which a full 79 percent of the taxpayers of our country would either get a tax cut or see their taxes for now remain unchanged. Barely 20 percent would face a tax increase, and they are mostly the folks who've been using shelters and loopholes and such to avoid paying their fair share. By the way, there's been a little inaccurate information provided by some of our opponents on this. They say that under our plan the rich will benefit the most; they have it exactly backward. Under our proposal, those who make $20,000 a year or less will enjoy the biggest tax cut. It will average about 18 percent. The second biggest tax cut goes for those who earn from $20,000 to $50,000 a year, and they will get a cut that averages 7 percent. And the smallest cut, but still a cut, nonetheless, goes to those who make $50,000 a year or more, and their tax cut averages a little less than 6 percent.

And I want to be very clear on why we think it's important to keep trying, to keep striving to get your tax bills lower. I want you to think about the cash that you've got in your pocket right now, in your wallet or your purse. The money that is in there you earned. The less of it the Government takes from you, the more freedom you will have. You can take that money and spend it and give a boost to retail sales and encourage Miller's and Proffitt's to hire more workers. [Laughter] You can take it and save it and add to the capital available for all kinds of investment. Or you can take it and ultimately invest it in a business or a new firm or a new idea of your own. But whatever you do -- spend, save, or invest -- you'll be making a wonderful contribution to the quality of life of your fellow citizens; you'll be creating jobs.

You may have heard that our Council of Economic Advisers has just done a study of the expected economic impact of our tax plan. They said the economic growth it will inspire should create the equivalent of almost 4 million new full-time jobs. They found that the personal economic gain for each household will be about $600 a year for every household in America. And they came up with something else that was pretty interesting. There are some people who go around saying the American people are undertaxed and we can't give them a break now because it will lower the amount of revenues coming into the Government. And I know that people are concerned about the deficit, and we are. And we are going to do something about it. But what we are going to do something about is -- or the something we are going to do is reduce government spending, not increasing taxes.

Now, the funny thing is that our tax plan, by reducing individuals and businesses -- their taxes -- will ultimately bring a lot more money into the Government. With the rates lower, the revenues become greater because of economic growth and increased prosperity. One reason is that every time we cut tax rates in one area, say on capital gains, we bring in more capital gains revenues because the cut in rates stimulates economic activity. When we cut, in 1981, the top tax rate of 70 percent down to 50 percent, actually the people paying in that bracket ended up paying more money to government at 50 percent than they had been at 70, because there was an incentive now for them to go out and do better and earn more and not try to find ways just to evade their taxes, but to pay them because they got to keep more of the share of the dollar. There's another element that figures in here. Our plan closes unproductive loopholes and eliminates the welter of shelters, and that will cut down on legal tax avoidance.

A few minutes ago I said that tax reform is a drama with heroes and villains and a damsel in distress. Well, the heroes are the citizens across this country who are asking for tax justice. The villains are the special interests, ``the I-got-mine gang,'' and the damsel in distress, well, that's a lass named endless economic growth, and she's tied to the tracks and struggling to break free.

I want to mention something that is kind of funny, and I hope you can help me with it. I've been going all over the country talking about tax reform, and wherever I go the people tell me they are frustrated by the current system, and they back our plan, and then they ask me what can they do to help? Well, it's up to us together. Now, maybe you can help me and Congressmen Duncan and Quillen and Ford. Maybe we can make Washington listen. Do you want a fairer tax system?

Jackson started here -- that couldn't have been me [referring to a noise on the public address system]. Andrew Jackson started here, and he was a President who cared about the average American. He knew you weren't so average. And this great town, Athens, the friendly city, you have a history of standing up to special interests. I guess you just can't stop Athens and McMinn County from backing justice and fairness.

I'll tell you what you've done here today -- and with these Congressmen here to carry the message back to Washington in person, even if some of them didn't hear you way back there, I'm sure they tried. I've heard from so many up on the Hill that said: ``Well, we just haven't heard anything from the people yet about tax reform. We don't know whether they're very interested or not.'' Well, everyplace I've gone it's been just like this: You are interested, and you want what tax reform means -- a reduction of the rates, making it simpler so that you don't have to hire an expert to tell you how to pay your tax, making it simpler and making it fairer -- all of this. And we can go back to Washington now and tell them that out here, in the real America, we found out the people do want something done about this hodgepodge tax system that's been growing like a jerry-built something or other for the last several decades.

Well, your support means a lot to me; I know it means a lot to them. And we're going to do everything we can to see if we can't get this passed this year so you'll know in a hurry that Aprils from here on are going to be a little happier around the 15th than they've been.

The President. Well, just saw a sign -- I love you, too. Somebody had a sign up. Yes. Thank you for letting me come here, and thank you for listening to me. God bless you all, and God bless Tennessee. Thank you very much.

The President. I have already seen some items that suggest to me that I was misunderstood in trying to call an answer over here. First of all, we have received no proposal officially of a 40-percent cut as I was asked about, and when I made a remark that I wish it were more if he had done it, I was doing that in the context of the fact that both Mr. Gorbachev and myself said that we would both like to see the missile done away with entirely. But I was not turning down any offer; we've received no offer, either here or our negotiators in Geneva have received no proposals.

The President. I told you, our goal, if we could make it, would be total elimination, but we are perfectly prepared to take whatever mutual reduction we can get with the idea of eventually getting there to zero.

The President. I'm sorry, but our negotiators there have had numbers out on the table that we have put there as to a reduction in weapons, and there have been no counteroffers as yet to those other numbers suggested or any thing of the kind. There has been no negotiating position presented by the Soviets.

The President. As far as I know they have unless something has been done since I have talked to our people. Our people have never had any numeral count suggested to them either agreeing or suggesting a difference from the figures we've presented.

Since 1939 Mr. Hartley has been employed by the Union Oil Co. of California (Unocal Corp.) as an engineering trainee at the San Francisco refinery. He has remained in the employ of the Union Oil Co. of California progressing through many job assignments to his present title of chairman and president. Among numerous memberships he is presently also chairman of the American Petroleum Institute, trustee of the California Institute of Technology, and a member of the British-North American Committee. Mr. Hartley was appointed earlier this year as Commissioner General of the United States Exhibition for the International Exposition in Vancouver by Director Wick of the United States Information Agency.

Today in Vienna members of NATO and the Warsaw Pact will resume their efforts to negotiate reductions and limitations on conventional forces in central Europe. The Vienna talks are an important part of the United States commitment to achieve concrete progress in arms reductions on a broad front -- in the areas of conventional, chemical, and nuclear forces.

In Geneva U.S. negotiators are striving to reduce the risk of nuclear war through significant reductions of nuclear weapons that will create a more stable deterrence. Also in Geneva, the American negotiators continue our effort to achieve a comprehensive, global, and verifiable ban on chemical weapons, as we proposed last year at the 40-nation Conference on Disarmament.

The U.S. and its NATO allies in Vienna will actively pursue every avenue of possible agreement in the upcoming negotiating round in order to achieve a verifiable agreement that reduces conventional forces in central Europe in an equitable manner. The U.S. delegation will give close scrutiny to proposals on the table as part of its on-going search for mutually acceptable solutions to the difficult issues that underlie the talks. We hope for a similar approach from the Warsaw Pact. Ambassador Robert Blackwill, our representative to these negotiations, can count on my support and keen interest in reaching a meaningful agreement that will add to the security of both sides.

Q. There was a question I wanted to ask, Mr. President, which is: At a time when everybody would love to retire, how is it that you still feel you've got to run the biggest country in the world and the enormous burden that it represents?

The President. Well, I only sought this job because I thought there were some things that needed to be done and that maybe I could help bring them about, and I just don't want to leave the job unfinished.

Q. What time in your career, which has been a long -- political career, I mean, did you feel that you could run for the White House if it possibly was offered to you and that you would win in the end?

The President. Well, I've always said that you don't decide, the people tell you. The truth is I never sought or thought I ever would seek public office. I, as a performer, as an entertainer, I always thought that you kind of pay your way; so, I supported causes and candidates that I approved of. And, being an entertainer, I could attract an audience and so forth and, therefore, be useful at a fundraiser -- things of that kind.

Never did I ever dream in my wildest time that I would ever even want to be in public life. And then, at a time in our country when our party was greatly divided -- and all the friction, there was a group that came to me. And my first reply was a refusal. This group that came wanted me to seek the governorship. And finally, they convinced me I had an obligation, I should do it and that I could win, and so, I ran. And I found out after I had won and was in the office that where I had thought that I was giving up a career, which I did love -- in the other business -- and that I'd find this very dull, I found out it wasn't at all. And then, subsequent to 8 years in the Governor's office, there were people that came and, on that basis, said that I should try for this. So, I did.

Constitution which limits the President to two terms and see if they don't feel that they have taken something away from democracy. After all, if the people -- as they did in this country the one time for Roosevelt -- want someone to serve them, they should have the right to vote for them.

Q. Mr. President, before going to Geneva, Mikhail Gorbachev will visit Paris on October 2. You have often denounced the Soviet attempts to seduce Western Europe. Do you think, nevertheless, that the results of this trip can be useful to your November meeting or, on the contrary, that it represents a threat for the NATO alliance?

Gorbachev realize that our alliance stands strong and that the Soviet Union has to do its part -- as we are ready to do ours -- in a serious, honest effort to build more constructive relations. I am sure this will be made clear to the General Secretary during his visit to France. I know from my many meetings with President Mitterrand that he is a very forceful advocate of his views; that he favors a strong, united, and secure West; and that he has no illusions about the Soviet system.

The Soviet Union has long sought to divide the Western allies from each other and the people from their governments. They have never succeeded because the Western democracies have a partnership based on equality, common values, and a shared vision of the future. These ties have kept us strong, united, and determined to defend our mutual interests. We and our allies want to establish a more stable relationship, but we cannot be lulled into a illusory peace that masks or ignores the real causes of tension between us. What we want is a just and secure peace.

I will be looking with great interest at General Secretary Gorbachev's visit to France. This will be his first trip to the West as a leader of the Soviet Union, and I'll be interested in President Mitterrand's impressions. And, of course, I look forward to hearing what the General Secretary will have to say on all the issues between East and West, including nuclear arms reductions. I have read often in the press that General Secretary Gorbachev is a new style of Soviet leader. I very much hope that, if true, then, he will pursue policies which will lead to a more constructive East-West relationship.

The President. Of course, I welcome President Mitterrand's views as well as the views of our other allies. This is an important part of the preparations for my meeting with the General Secretary. We are prepared to listen to any positive, concrete proposals the Soviets may have, and we want to engage in a dialog on the full scope of the U.S.-Soviet relationship. My meeting with the General Secretary in November, and President Mitterrand's next week, are important steps in a process that all of us in the West have been pursuing for a number of years -- to build a more constructive relationship with the Soviet Union and a more secure future. We have not come as far as I would have liked, and we should ask why that is.

But I also hope that, even before then, we can make as much progress as possible in all areas of our relations: human rights, regional issues such as Afghanistan, bilateral questions, and arms control. Arms control is, understandably, one of the central issues between us, but it is not the only one. We need to look hard at the fundamental sources of tension in our relationship if we are to be true to our responsibilities to the peoples of our countries and the world.

Q. From the point of view that the setting of a nuclear shield in the United States seems to put in question the principle of linkage, do you foresee a defense of Europe by conventional means? In your opinion, if there were to be a threat to European security and integrity, what would be the role of the French deterrent?

The President. Let me make clear that there is no thought whatever of calling into question the principle of linkage between the U.S. and its European allies. The U.S. remains fully committed to the defense of its European allies, and our research under the Strategic Defense Initiative seeks to strengthen that unalterable commitment. It will be years before we can make a judgment about the feasibility of defensive technologies. Meanwhile, we must continue to rely on our existing deterrent forces. NATO's strategy of flexible response remains as valid today as when it was first adopted.

The Strategic Defense Initiative does not replace the current energetic efforts to improve the conventional defenses of the alliance. Moreover, by countering ballistic missile threats against all members of the alliance, including the United States, strategic defenses would strengthen the credibility of U.S. extended deterrence and NATO's flexible response doctrine by reducing the vulnerability of United States reinforcements to Europe. Finally, the United States fully supports the independent French nuclear deterrent force, and the Strategic Defense Initiative does not weaken or call into question that support.

The President. Research into new technologies which could provide effective defenses against nuclear attack is both prudent and necessary. Indeed, defensive systems are consistent with a policy of deterrence, both historically and in practical terms. Moreover, the Soviet Union clearly believes in defenses. They continue to improve their ballistic missile defense system in place around Moscow. Their activities have violated the ABM treaty and raise even more serious questions about their future intentions. They have an extensive and longstanding strategic defense research program which is exploring many of the areas in which the United States is interested, and they have a sizable headstart. Thus, the question should be, can we afford not to pursue this research? Effective defenses against ballistic missiles have the potential for enhancing deterrence by increasing an aggressor's uncertainties and helping reduce or eliminate the apparent military value of nuclear attack to an aggressor. The U.S. will continue its close consultations with our allies regarding SDI research. We would ultimately make a decision on whether to deploy strategic defense systems only after consultations with our allies and negotiations with the Soviet Union, as envisioned by the ABM treaty.

Q. Is the Strategic Defense Initiative, to which you intend to associate your European allies, only an update of the ABM system, or does it further mean a revision by the United States of its commitment to a nuclear protection of Europe?

The President. The Strategic Defense Initiative is a research program to pursue vigorously important new technologies that may be used to create a defense against ballistic missiles, which could strengthen deterrence and increase the security not only of the United States but of our allies as well. The prevention of war through deterrence is fundamental to U.S. and NATO defense policy. If our research bears fruit, increasing reliance on defensive systems which threaten no one would be fully compatible with that objective. In our SDI research, we seek to reduce the incentives -- now and in the future -- for Soviet aggression and thereby to ensure effective deterrence for the long term. This represents a reaffirmation, not a revision, of the U.S. commitment to the protection of Europe.

Defensive technologies, should they prove feasible, would counter the threat posed by the massive growth of Soviet offensive nuclear forces during a period in which the United States exercised considerable restraint. For it is a fact that while the United States significantly reduced the number of weapons in our nuclear arsenal, the Soviet Union was continually adding to its arsenal. SDI also responds to the Soviets' longstanding and extensive strategic defense efforts. In the near term, then, SDI is a direct response to the Soviet efforts, which include longstanding advanced research in many of the areas we are now exploring, as well as the world's only deployed antiballistic missile (ABM) system. Our program provides a powerful deterrent to any Soviet decision to break out of the ABM treaty, which in fact the Soviets are already violating. Our SDI research, however, is fully compatible with the terms of the ABM treaty.

SDI program is not confining itself solely to an examination of technologies with the potential to defend against intercontinental ballistic missiles, but it is also carefully examining promising technologies with potential against shorter range ballistic missiles as well. An effective defense against short-range ballistic missiles would have a significant impact on deterring aggression against Europe. By reducing or eliminating the military effectiveness of such ballistic missiles, defensive systems have the potential for enhancing deterrence against both nuclear and conventional attacks on any members of our alliance.

Q. Would the fact that France has clearly shown its doubts towards this project, despite your administration's approval of the Eureka program, mean that its scientists and firms will be excluded from this trans-Atlantic cooperation?

The President. No, certainly not. The United States has made very clear that we do not see any competition between SDI research and the Eureka program. We welcome participation in SDI research by allied, including French, institutions and companies.

The President. Although the United States welcomes the participation of its allies in the various stages of SDI research, it is a decision for each ally. We have invited such participation and are convinced that such participation will bring real benefits for participating allies, for the research program itself, and for the security of the alliance as a whole.

The President. In the hearts of the American people, France has always had a special place, with profound ties of affection and respect. France was America's first ally, joining us in the fight for independence. Our two constitutions stand on a shared foundation of liberty and democracy, and our peoples are bound by common political and cultural traditions. Among the traditions which we both hold dear are respect for individual human rights and equality of all peoples. We share and respect these values, and they link us more strongly than any political agreement can. Since the days of Lafayette and through two world wars, Frenchmen and Americans have fought side by side in defense of our values. I was poignantly reminded of that bond two summers ago when I visited the Normandy beaches where so many Frenchmen and Americans gave their lives as brothers-in-arms. Today our two countries and peoples still stand together, both in the Atlantic alliance and around the world, and I have every confidence that we will continue to do so in the years to come.

The Pacific nations are indeed growing in importance in political, security, and especially economic terms, but our strengthened relations with Asia have not diminished our traditional ties to Europe. Indeed, a major foreign policy accomplishment of this administration is its success in encouraging the industrialized democracies in Europe, Asia, and North America to cooperate in developing global, not parochial, solutions to our common economic and security problems. The United States has sought not merely to strengthen our bilateral ties with Asia and Europe but to encourage greater interaction among all members of the community of advanced industrialized democracies. This new and more cohesive allied consensus has been in evidence in the economic summit meetings, where the leaders of the seven largest industrialized democracies of North America, Europe, and Asia meet to discuss a vast range of political, economic, and security problems.

Q. Commercial relations between the United States and the European Community are marked, and have been marked, by tensions and their quota of mutual accusations, but Congress is more and more pressing for measures against what it thinks are unfair practices. Do you think you would be able to reduce its appetite for protectionism?

We remain dedicated to free trade; however, to remain free, trade must also be fair. Many of our industries face unfair trade practices by other nations. Unless our trading partners stop these practices, support in the United States for free trade will be undercut. I recently outlined a series of initiatives which my administration is going to take to eliminate such practices. We mean business on this question of fairness; it is fundamental to freedom and to avoiding the disastrous mistake of protectionism. I anticipate that the Congress and the administration will be working together on this problem.

The President. The GATT has been the linchpin of the postwar trade system. It hasn't worked perfectly, but until recently it has kept the world trade system working relatively well. Now, we and our trading partners need to take a fresh look at the GATT and the new kinds of barriers that have been raised against trade. Early launching of a new GATT trade round is needed to shore up the open trading system. We think some parts of the GATT, for example the dispute settlement process, can be improved. Now, I know that improving the system won't solve all our trade problems, but I think it will help. There are many other things to negotiate in a new round as well, such as establishing rules for trade in services, breaking barriers to agricultural trade, improved protection of intellectual property rights, and the elimination of many nontariff barriers. I don't expect the new round to end all the trade disputes between the United States and Europe or Japan, but we will all be better off negotiating than closing our markets to one another in frustration over outdated and ineffective rules.

The President spoke by telephone with Prime Minister Mulroney on September 26, 1985, and warmly welcomed the offer from the Prime Minister to explore the scope and prospects for bilateral trade negotiations between our two countries. The President is firmly committed to the pursuit of free and fair trade. The Canadian offer could provide opportunities for both countries to facilitate trade and investment flows.

Canada is our largest trading partner with two-way trade in 1984 exceeding $110 billion. Canada takes nearly one-fifth of our total exports, accounting for close to $45 billion in U.S. exports. The Canadian expression of interest is in keeping with the desire expressed by the President and Prime Minister at the Quebec summit to explore ways to reduce and eliminate all existing barriers to trade between our two countries.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Robert L. Barry, of New Hampshire, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, Class of Career Minister, for the rank of Ambassador during the tenure of his service as United States Representative to the Conference on Confidence and Security Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe. He would succeed James E. Goodby.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Francis S.M. Hodsoll to be Chairman of the National Endowment for the Arts, National Foundation on the Arts and the Humanities, for a term of 4 years. This is a reappointment.

The sewing industry annually honors approximately fifty million people who sew at home and approximately forty million people who sew at least part of their wardrobes. Their initiative, creativity, and self-reliance are characteristic of the people of our Nation.

The home sewing industry generates an estimated $3,500,000,000 annually for the economy of the United States. Home sewing also has enhanced career opportunities for many Americans in fields such as fashion, retail merchandising, design, patternmaking, and textiles. Learning the art of sewing in the home or in elementary school home economics classes started many on careers in these fields.

The people of this Nation are striving to help older Americans to avoid being institutionalized unnecessarily and to remain independent in their homes. The rapid growth of adult day care centers is a reflection of the increasing interest in the development of long-term community care alternatives for the elderly. These centers offer comprehensive personal, medical, and therapeutic assistance to older people and to the handicapped, thus helping them to maintain a great degree of independence. The centers also offer support for families who are willing to care for their loved ones at home, but who welcome the opportunities the centers afford for wider human contacts among people often consigned to loneliness.

The one hundred and two historically black colleges and universities in the United States have contributed substantially to the growth and enrichment of the Nation. These institutions have a rich heritage and tradition of providing high quality academic and professional training, and their graduates have made countless contributions to the progress of our complex technological society.

The provision of these defensive arms to Jordan is essential for two reasons: first, it conveys in the near term a powerful message of U.S. political support for King Hussein's efforts to bring about a comprehensive, lasting peace settlement between Israel and the Arab world; and second, in the longer term, it will meet Jordan's most pressing military deficiency; namely, its ability to provide adequate air defense against an external attack and military intimidation by the adversaries of peace. It will not directly counter the cruel acts of the terrorists, whose bombs and assassination attempts are even now trying to turn Hussein from his quest for peace.

Nevertheless, as firm evidence of America's support, this package will strengthen Jordan as a force for stability and moderation in the Middle East. By giving Jordan's small armed forces the ability to deter the threat of conventional attack, we provide King Hussein the flexibility and confidence he needs to continue toward negotiations with Israel.

For the past 15 years, Jordan has successfully denied the use of its own territory to terrorists from abroad seeking to attack Israeli targets across the Jordan River. More recently, King Hussein has renewed diplomatic relations with Egypt, the first Arab state to do so; he has enlisted the Palestinians in his peace initiative in order to dissuade them from their earlier policies of confrontation and hostility toward Israel; and he has publicly recognized Israel's right to exist and stated his desire to commence peace talks this year.

I remain totally committed to helping Israel to ensure its security, survival, and well-being and to maintaining its decisive advantage over any combination of potential adversaries. The arms transfer which I am proposing for Jordan does not jeopardize this policy. Indeed, a strong, stable Jordan able to defend itself against radical pressures is in Israel's interests, as well as our own. I am convinced that this support by the United States is an absolute necessity if we are ultimately to achieve the peace which we all so fervently desire.

President Reagan has issued guidance to the various agencies of the Federal Government which outlines procedures concerning the releasability of scientific, technical, and engineering information generated as a result of federally funded fundamental research in universities, colleges, and laboratories. This policy addresses a widespread concern that efforts to reduce the flow of sensitive technologies to potential adversaries could restrain free and open exchange of fundamental scientific information. It is included in a directive to the heads of executive branch departments and agencies.

The new policy states that: It is the policy of this administration that, to the maximum extent possible, the products of fundamental research remain unrestricted. It is also the policy of this administration that, where the national security requires control, the mechanism for control of information generated during federally funded fundamental research in science, technology, and engineering at colleges, universities, and laboratories is classification. Each Federal Government agency is responsible for: (a) determining whether classification is appropriate prior to the award of a research grant, contract, or cooperative agreement and, if so, controlling the research results through standard classification procedures; (b) periodically reviewing all research grants, contracts, or cooperative agreements for potential classification. No restrictions may be placed upon the conduct or reporting of federally funded fundamental research that has not received national security classification, except as provided in applicable U.S. statutes.

During the past week we've been working hard to advance the Middle East peace process and to try to improve U.S.-Soviet relations. I met with our good friend President Mubarak of Egypt, and I'll be holding discussions this coming week with another longtime friend of the United States, King Hussein of Jordan. I hope to talk to you more about the Middle East next week.

But today let me speak about our efforts to build a more constructive and stable long-term relationship with the Soviet Union. Both Secretary Shultz and I met with the new Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze this past week. These meetings covered a broad global agenda, including the four major areas of the U.S.-Soviet dialog: human rights, regional and bilateral issues, and security and arms control matters. They enabled us to discuss at the most senior levels the key issues facing our two nations. I told the Foreign Minister I'm hopeful about my upcoming meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev, and I put forward some new ideas as well as my plans and expectations for that meeting. The Soviet Foreign Minister indicated that Mr. Gorbachev also is looking forward to these discussions. Furthermore, we agreed to set up a series of senior level discussions between our experts in preparation for the Geneva meeting.

Let's be clear, however, that success will not come from one meeting. It must come from a genuine, long-term effort by the leadership of the Soviet Union as well as ourselves. The differences between us are fundamental in political systems, values, and ideology as well as in the way we conduct our relations with other countries. The United States must and will be forthright and firm in explaining and defending our interests and those of our allies. I went over with Mr.

Shevardnadze Soviet actions in various parts of the world which we feel undermine the prospects for a stable peace, and I discussed with him the need for the Soviet Union to work with us seriously to reduce offensive nuclear arms. These weapons exist today, and there's no reason why real reductions cannot begin promptly.

Finally, I emphasized the need for a more productive Soviet response to our efforts in Geneva to begin a U.S.-Soviet dialog now on how to fashion a more stable future for all humanity if the research in strategic defense technologies, which both the U.S. and the U.S.S.R. are conducting, bears fruit. Mr. Shevardnadze indicated that the Soviet negotiators will present a counterproposal in Geneva to the initiatives we've taken there. We welcome this. It is important that the counterproposal address our concerns about reductions and stability just as we've sought to address Soviet concerns. And we hope it'll be free of preconditions and other obstacles to progress. We're ready for tough but fair negotiating. You, the people, can distinguish diplomatic progress from mere propaganda designed to influence public opinion in the democracies.

All too often in the past, political and public opinion, and sometimes government policy as well, have taken on extreme views of the U.S.-Soviet relationship. We have witnessed sometimes a near euphoria over a supposed coming together, at other times a feeling that the U.S. and the U.S.S.R. may somehow be at the brink of conflict. By holding to the firm and steady course we set out on 5 years ago, we've shown that there is no longer any reason for such abrupt swings in assessing this relationship. Our differences are indeed profound, and it is inevitable that our two countries will have opposing views on many key issues. But we've intensified our bilateral dialog and taken measures, such as the recent upgrading of the crisis hotline, to ensure fast and reliable communications between our leaders at all times.

Above all, I emphasized to the Foreign Minister, and will do so with Mr. Gorbachev, that the overriding responsibility of the leaders of our two countries is to work for peaceful relations between us. So, what we're engaged in is a long-term process to solve problems where they're solvable, bridge differences where they can be bridged, and recognize those areas where there are no realistic solutions, and, where they're lacking, manage our differences in a way that protects Western freedoms and preserves the peace. The United States stands ready to accomplish this.

Much more must be done, but the process is underway, and we will take further steps to show our readiness to do our part. With equal determination by the Soviets, progress can be made. We will judge the results as Soviet actions unfold in each of the four key areas of our relations. And I will be reporting to you further as preparations for the November meeting proceed.

The President. I have just had a very productive meeting with King Hussein of Jordan. Jordan has been moving steadily and courageously forward in a search for a peaceful, negotiated settlement of the conflict in the Middle East. Jordan has not wavered from this course despite terrorist attacks against its diplomats and its interests abroad and the threat of worse to come. I told His Majesty in May that he could count on us for the economic and security assistance Jordan would need to address the risks that it is taking. Indeed, over the summer, the Congress improved an important package of economic aid for Jordan; but on Friday I notified the Congress that I would now be proposing a package of defensive arms. And these arms are important in meeting Jordan's proven defense needs and as evidence that those who seek peace will not be left at the mercy of those who oppose it.

But peace, not arms, has been the focus of our discussions with our Jordanian friends. And all of us -- Jordan, the United States, and Israel -- share the same realistic objective: direct negotiations under appropriate auspices before the end of this year. There are complex and sensitive issues which must be resolved before actual negotiations can begin, but I believe these issues can be resolved.

Israel and all its Arab neighbors. We'll do all that we can to maintain the momentum already achieved, much of it the result of King Hussein's personal courage and vision. The goal is peace and stability for Jordan, Israel, and all states in the Middle East. The way to that goal is through direct negotiations on the basis on U.N. Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338. The time to begin is now. I know that His Majesty shares this aim, and I am proud to work with him in this noble endeavor of peace.

The King. I wish to thank my dear and great friend, President Reagan, for his kind words. I value his friendship and the longstanding relations which happily exist between our two countries and which are based on our joint commitment to the common values and principles of liberty, freedom, equality, and human rights.

I have had a very useful meeting with the President. Our discussions were as frank and honest as our friendship dictates. I have reiterated to him Jordan's commitment to a negotiated settlement of the Arab-Israeli conflict within the context of an international conference to implement Security Council Resolution 242. I repeated to the President what I stated in my address to the United Nations 3 days ago; namely, Jordan's unwavering position and condemnation of terrorism, irrespective of its nature and source. Jordan condemns violence and is committed to a peaceful resolution of the Arab-Israeli conflict. We are prepared to join all parties in pursuing a negotiated settlement in an environment free of belligerent and hostile acts.

I have also expressed Jordan's satisfaction with the positive development of our bilateral relations, especially in the economic and military fields. We endeavor to strengthen our ties and hope to continue our close cooperation in all areas. I wish you, Mr. President, continued good health, happiness, and success. And may the Almighty God bless you and grant you strength to lead this bastion of democracy to ever greater heights.

General Vessey will be remembered for many things: as a battlefield hero -- you've heard today about North Africa, Monte Cassino, Anzio, and that grim night with the 2d Battalion in Vietnam; he'll be remembered as a man of patriotism and deep religious belief, an officer who brought character and credit to every billet he ever held; as a military leader who always spoke his mind to civilian authority, respectfully but candidly; as the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff who presided over the restoration of America's military strength and power at a moment critical to the fate of freedom and his country's security. In all these things, he bore the marks of greatness.

But there's one accomplishment that is not there in Jack Vessey's personnel file, yet it's an accomplishment that made the difference in the lives of so many GI's over so many years in so many places around the globe. Jack Vessey always remembered the soldiers in the ranks; he understood those soldiers are the backbone of any army. He noticed them, spoke to them, looked out for them. Jack Vessey never forgot what it was like to be an enlisted man, to be just a GI.

Fort Carson, a member of the drill team there. He said recently that after one drill team event, he was in his residence doing dishes -- before the volunteer army, way back when Jack and I enlisted, it seems to me they had another name for doing dishes. Anyway, Mark Neal was told the commanding general wanted to see him. He was scared, of course, but he found his meeting and friendly chat with the general something he would always remember. After that, Mark Neal followed General Vessey's career. Hearing about his retirement, he wrote to him recently: ``This short meeting made a lasting impression on me. It was amazing to me that you even knew I was on the premises . . . even more amazing that you would want to meet me. That moment of thoughtfulness for a lonely enlisted man back at Fort Carson proved the truth of your reputation as a real soldier's general.'' There were many Mark Neals in Jack Vessey's career, and Jack Vessey made their lives a little easier, a little less lonely. And he made them a little prouder to wear their country's uniform and defend freedom.

Jack, in the 5 years or so that I've been doing events like this, I've learned something about people like you. A career like yours, combining as it does heroism, patriotism, competence, wisdom, and kindness, doesn't need elaboration from commanders in chief or President; it speaks enough all by itself. And today I'll let history be your valedictorian, not me.

But what I can do today is thank you. On behalf of your friends here today who've had the honor of working with you and on behalf of some others who couldn't be here -- all your fellow Americans, if they had the chance to be here, they would express their gratitude to you for making their lives and the lives of their children safer and more secure. And then, there's that other group I'm standing in for today. I know all of them would want to be remembered to you. I'm talking, of course, about those young people who wore the uniform for Jack Vessey, had the privilege of having their own GI general. So, from all of us, Jack -- your friends, your fellow Americans, but especially the soldiers who stood a little taller because of you -- thanks, thanks from a great and grateful nation. May God bless you and give you and Avis many more rich, fruitful, and happy years together.

Today disabled men and women are entering the American labor force in unprecedented numbers, finding personal fulfillment and contributing to our society and our economy. The reasons for this welcome development are not hard to find: enhanced enforcement of laws that prohibit discrimination against the handicapped; actions by employers to provide more accessible work places and transportation; improved education and training; more innovative job accommodations; and better attitudes toward the disabled. The most important reason of all is the outstanding work record people with disabilities are achieving at their jobs.

All of us must constantly strive for full acceptance of disabled people, so that we begin to see people rather than disabilities. We must first learn, and then seek to inculcate in others, especially the young, a deep respect for the human person, whatever that person's handicaps. By doing so, we reaffirm the timeless American principle of equality of opportunity and help build a future in which the unique attributes of every citizen are recognized and allowed to develop for the good of all.

The poet who wrote that ``parting is such sweet sorrow'' never said whether leave-takings get any easier when they're done twice. The first time I accepted your resignation, in October 1983, it was with considerable regret, but at least I had the consolation of knowing that you would be near at hand at the Reagan-Bush '84 Committee if I ultimately decided to seek reelection to a second term. Having counted on your professional experience and wise counsel throughout my first years in office, I was reassured to know that our effort to get out a message of hope and opportunity to the American people would be under such capable direction.

As the adage goes, the rest is history. But I think our success, which in so many ways is your success, flowed from a quality that you have exemplified at every stage of your career. And that is a recognition that neither effective government nor successful campaigns really depend on the delivery of messages to the people. Rather they depend on their willingness to hear the message of the people, and to give voice to their deepest aspirations of freedom, dignity, and self-government. In those long hours of travel and strategy meetings, from great cities to the smallest plots of this good American earth, you helped us all keep in mind the fundamental principles that brought our team to office in 1981.

I'm not surprised, then, that a time should come when you would move on to the private sector where those principles can be practiced to the fullest. I know that your consummate skill and professionalism will serve you well in all your endeavors. But please don't expect that those endeavors will forever be to the exclusion of public life: I intend to call on you frequently in the months ahead for the advice, wisdom, wit and, most of all, friendship you've provided over the last five years.

After nearly five years in the White House and the campaign and 16 years of service at the local, state and federal levels of government, I've decided it's time to move on to the private sector and give Reaganomics a chance to work for me. As you have often said, if we start referring to the government as we, instead of them, then we've been here too long. I'm starting to think like ``them'' and obviously I've been here too long.

But most of all, Mr. President, your time in office will be viewed as a period when the Presidency worked. A period in which leadership and courage prevailed. Mr. President, you might not realize it but a whole generation of young Americans grew up in the last 20 years who never knew a successful Presidency. Now they know a successful two-term Presidency. That alone will help re-write history.

Mr. President, I can never thank you enough for the privilege of serving you over the last five years. I am honored that I was able to be a small part of your team during this time of choosing and this time of changing. I will always take pride in having been a member of your staff during this critical period when you made America -- Prouder, Stronger and Better -- for ourselves, our families and the future.

I urge the Congress to pass all the individual bills promptly within the levels assumed in the congressional budget resolution and to present to me bills that are consistent with both the need for restraint in domestic spending and support of the defense and international interests of the Nation. As we meet with the Soviets to discuss sensitive and important arms control issues, it is particularly important that we not be hindered by lack of congressional action on or inadequate support for our FY '86 national security programs.

If the Congress cannot hold spending at its own budget resolution guidelines, we will not have meaningful deficit reduction. The performance to date is not encouraging. Only two of the House-passed appropriations bills for domestic programs are within the guidelines of the budget resolution. We will be working with the Congress to achieve a more responsible outcome.

The failure of the South African Government to take adequate steps to eliminate apartheid, that Government's security practices, including the recent imposition of another state of emergency, and the persistence of widespread violence continue to endanger prospects for peaceful change in South Africa and threaten stability in the region as a whole. Under these circumstances, I have determined that it is necessary to continue in effect the national emergency with respect to South Africa after September 9, 1986, in order to deal with this unusual and extraordinary threat to the foreign policy and economy of the United States. Additional measures to deal with this threat will be considered upon the completion of consultations with key Allies on joint, effective measures to eliminate apartheid and encourage negotiations for peaceful change in South Africa.

Sunday, September 14, at 8 o'clock eastern time, the President and Mrs. Reagan will address the Nation from their living quarters at the White House on the subject of what we, the American family, can do to win the war on illegal drug use. This is an unprecedented event. The Reagans have never before participated in a joint television address, and I am not aware of any other President and First Lady TV address, either. They wanted to do it together, from their home to our homes, as parents and friends as well as the First Couple, to stress the importance of all segments of our society pulling together in a common, determined effort to get rid of drugs.

Throughout her campaign against drug abuse, Mrs. Reagan has stressed the need for every American to take a stand and do their part in this war. She has traveled the country from coast to coast and has even brought her message overseas. On Sunday night the President and Mrs. Reagan will bring that message into every home, every school, every college campus, every locker room, every corporate boardroom, every office, every studio. The Reagans will make it clear that their commitment to making ours a drug-free society is not some passing fancy; it is something which they take as seriously as anything on the national agenda and one which they are determined to win. But they know they cannot do it alone, and Sunday night they will appeal for the help of every citizen -- young and old, rich and poor, mothers and fathers, coaches and athletes, actors and producers, corporate board chairmen and mailroom clerks. The Reagans seek to mobilize this country as it has never been mobilized before. They want everyone to join in the effort to help their fellow citizen give up or stay away from drugs.

Our most powerful weapon in the war on drugs is a determined campaign of public education to warn Americans, and particularly our youth, of the dangers of illegal drug use. This is what Mrs. Reagan has been doing over the past few years, and this is what the Reagans' speech Sunday night will be. They hope it will be the day when people everywhere decide to make illegal drug use a thing of the past. When the chapter on how America won the war on drugs is written, the Reagans' speech is sure to be viewed as the turning point. The Reagans are making this address because there is a crisis -- nothing less -- in our country today, and it disturbs them deeply to see so many lives -- especially young lives -- ruined by drugs. The six-point Reagan program against illegal drug abuse is one which we believe can succeed and one which must succeed.

Drugs have no place in the workplace. The office cannot be the place where one goes to use drugs. Productivity suffers. Relationships suffer. Peoples' lives suffer. The Federal Government must and will set the example in terms of being sure those in sensitive positions are not using drugs and in developing a compassionate, effective way to help those who are.

We need more information on drugs, drug treatment, and drug testing. We know a lot now, but we need to know more. What we know about drugs is frightening. But every day brings more information, and we must keep our research going strong.

Drug treatment centers have made important and encouraging strides toward putting back together the shattered lives of drug users and their families and friends. And there are encouraging developments in the drug testing field: better ways for quicker and confidential testing.

International cooperation is a key element of the program. Drug abuse is not just an American problem; it is a world problem. And while the Reagans are taking the lead, they need to be joined by world leaders and world law enforcement agencies in shutting down drug smugglers. Drug smugglers must know that nowhere on this planet will their murderous activities be tolerated.

Together, the public and private sectors must expand public awareness of the dangers of illegal drugs. We must work with the private sector to create the attitude that any illegal substance use is wrong. The antidrug abuse campaign does not belong exclusively to the Government; it is a campaign of which all segments of our society must become a part. We must stand together as one in the war against drugs.

Reagans are writing this speech together -- in fact, they've already started. It will be a message which strikes at the very essence of what we as a society are all about. It will be candid, and it will be hopeful. It will be a message of concern and compassion. Sunday, September 14th, will truly be a special night for this country.

Grandparents have a vital role to play too in the encouragement they give to a warm and stable family life. Their experience is of immeasurable value to young married couples setting out on the long and often difficult journey of parenthood.

Grandparents are the backbone of voluntarism and charity in American society. There are no more dedicated or productive workers in the voluntary sector than older citizens who can dedicate themselves almost entirely to their family, their neighbors, and their community.

In recognition of the irreplaceable role of grandparents in families and in the broader society, Congress has proclaimed the first Sunday after Labor Day as National Grandparents Day. Nancy joins me in exhorting all Americans to give special honor to grandparents on that Sunday, September 7.

The hijacking of Pan American Airways flight 73 at Pakistan's Karachi International Airport was a cruel and sinister terrorist act. Our hearts are filled with sympathy for the families of those innocents killed and injured. The Government of Pakistan acted boldly and decisively to bring this nightmare to an end, and we applaud Pakistan's exemplary resolve in the handling of this incident. Pan American Airways should also be commended for their cool and professional competence in helping to ensure that this incident could be concluded where it started.

The terrorists conducted a despicable and cowardly crime by threatening, assaulting, and murdering innocent passengers of a crowded airliner -- men and women, young and old -- with machine guns and hand grenades. Nothing can justify such barbarism. We can think of no punishment too severe for the criminals responsible. We are confident that those who perpetrated this brutal act will be brought to justice. I thank God that this incident is now ended, with the safe deliverance of most of those who had to endure the ordeal inflicted on them -- and on all of civilized society. We express our condolences to the families of those killed and pray for the speedy recovery of those injured. We look forward to the safe and speedy reunion of the passengers with their families and loved ones.

America is blessed with a great wealth of natural resources -- magnificent land, water, fish, and wildlife -- as well as historic resources, places associated with the memories of great individuals, cultures, events, and structures of great historic or esthetic importance.

Many of our most prized natural and cultural resources are preserved as public sites for the benefit of all Americans. From national and State parks, forests, and shores to local playgrounds and urban open spaces, public lands provide recreational and educational opportunities for persons from every walk of life.

Although most people treat these treasured common possessions with the respect they deserve, some visitors to our public lands are thoughtless. Their litter, vandalism, theft, wildlife poaching, and other abuses are taking a toll on the legacy we will be passing on to future generations. With over 700 million acres of Federal public land and millions more of State and local public land, government cannot protect each acre without the support of the people who use these lands.

These voluntary cleanup and restoration activities have been conducted in cooperation with organizations such as Keep America Beautiful and Federal land managing agencies. Those who participate in this worthy endeavor have not only improved these lands and waters, but also have set an example for others to follow. Such stewardship embodies the spirit of commitment we hope to inspire with our ``Take Pride in America'' campaign, a partnership of Federal agencies, State and local governments, and private organizations to promote such voluntary efforts by individual Americans.

To celebrate and encourage these efforts on behalf of our public lands, the Congress, pursuant to Public Law 99 - 402, has designated the first Saturday after Labor Day of each year as ``Federal Lands Cleanup Day'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this occasion.

Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, do hereby proclaim September 6, 1986, and the first Saturday after Labor Day in each successive year as Federal Lands Cleanup Day and urge all Americans to observe this day with appropriate activities that reflect our continuing dedication to the wise use and loving preservation of our natural and cultural resources.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Day weekend is behind us, another summer is almost past, and soon the leaves will start turning colors. But perhaps the surest sign of fall is the sight of young people heading off for their first days of school. This fall I'm glad to say the schools that our children are returning to are in many ways the best they've been in years -- markedly better and still improving. Five years ago there was a widespread feeling in our country that our schools were not doing their job. That's why, in the first few months of this administration, we established a National Commission on Excellence in Education to assess the condition of American education.

Sure enough, the Commission reported back that the instincts of the American people were right: Our schools were in serious trouble. They were doing so poorly, the Commission said, that if a foreign nation had done to our schools what we'd stood by and let happen, we would have considered it an act of war. That warning touched off a wave of reforms that swept through nearly every town, school district, and State capital in the country -- a grassroots movement for education reform that generated more enthusiasm and more action than any amount of dollars or directives from Washington ever could have. And, as usually happens when the American people pull together, your efforts are paying off. Test scores show that students in 35 States have improved their educational performances -- progress, to be sure. And education reform is proceeding full speed ahead.

As our young people return to school this year, I'd like to close with a special message on something that is fundamental to success in school and throughout life -- and that is staying drug free. Over the summer, we've witnessed a growing national awareness of the waste and tragedy that always lies just one step behind drug use. When it comes to young people using drugs that tragedy is especially great. There's no better time than now -- and no better place than our schools -- for all Americans to stand up, get involved, and do something about drugs.

Later this month, Nancy and Secretary Bennett will introduce a handbook for communities to use to rid schools of drugs. Just as surely as it will require the diligence of parents, teachers, and principals, beating drugs in our schools will require the involvement of neighbors, community groups, law enforcement officials, churches, and synagogues. Everyone will have to get involved. But most importantly, beating drugs will require the courage and conviction of our young people themselves. To those students who are listening today, I'd like to offer a special message: It may be a while ago now, but I can remember how tough it is sometimes being young, and when I was a kid, we didn't have all the temptations and distractions of this modern society. I know that sometimes it takes all the courage you can muster to ``just say no,'' to go with your conscience, what you know is right, rather than with the pack. But that effort is worth it. Don't get caught up in drugs.

America has a big and exciting future, an open future of expanding possibilities your parents never even dreamt of -- and you can be a part of it. Like they said at the end of the movie ``Back to the Future'': ``Where we're going, we don't need roads,'' just an eager heart and a clear mind. America needs you open, alert, and drug free to help make that future happen. So, I'm going to ask you a favor: Say no to drugs, and tell your friends to say no, too. Saying no isn't just important for you, it's a great opportunity for you to do something for your country. Each time you say no to drugs, you'll be helping America beat one of the most serious challenges we've ever faced. And believe me, you'll be a hero in my book.

I'm proud to be here tonight with a member of our own team who has taken on a special mission, and that is to enlist the American people in a war against drugs. I don't want to sound like a doting husband -- I am -- [laughter] -- but I'm mighty proud of the work that Nancy is doing in that regard.

With us tonight are many of the real heroes of our Republican campaigns over the years. And I want to give special thanks to those of you who, through hard work, generosity, and grassroots organizing in communities and precincts throughout this State, have not only made a difference -- you've changed history. Twenty years ago, when many of us started out together, we were challenging all the policies of the reigning liberal establishment; yet we shared a vision of individual freedom, of building a creative society, and of unleashing the genius of the American spirit. And it was this dream that brought us together and carried us over the obstacles and through the rough times.

I wanted to mention all this because, despite the progress we made in those years, it wasn't long before liberals in Sacramento took our State back to the bad old days. And that's why I want to take this opportunity to express my admiration for an individual who has again brought California back into the light. We both have performed the unpleasant task of cleaning up after a Brown.

In the late seventies liberal power in our nation reached a zenith. They controlled much of State and local government, both Houses of Congress, the Presidency, and all the executive departments and agencies. As predicted, liberalism was about as good for America as Mrs. O'Leary's cow was for Chicago. [Laughter] Again, I turned to you, and together we mobilized the people. In 1980 we set out to fundamentally change the direction of American government. The election was just the first hurdle; together we've been turning our dream of a strong, vibrant, opportunity-filled America into reality.

It's fitting that as I head into the last, major campaign of my political career, the last campaign in which I will have a personal stake, that I'm here with you. In the November election the voters will decide who controls the United States Senate. It's a make-or-break election. Their decision will determine if everything we've worked for, everything we've struggled and sweated for, is to be given a chance or to be undermined by people who oppose everything we believe in. It all comes down to the Golden State. If we win this California Senate race, we will keep control of the United States Senate.

Control of the Senate will mean 2 more years of moving forward or 2 years of stalemate and retrogression. I didn't come to Washington to be a 6-year President. I didn't seek reelection just to protect the gains of our first term. Together, we can and will win the Senate and keep our country and our cause moving ahead.

So, here we are again getting ready to mobilize our strength and pull out all the stops to make certain California has the representation in the United States Senate that it deserves. And that means replacing one of the last vestiges of the failed past with a forward-looking leader of the future. Now, just so no one will get the wrong idea -- with a birthday cake that looks like a bonfire every year -- let me just say -- [laughter] -- it's not that California's senior Senator is too old, it's that his ideas are too old. The days of the big taxer and the big spender are over. The days of something for nothing and left-wing redistribution schemes are over. The days of blame America first are over. And the days when one of America's most strident liberal leftists can represent California are over.

And this year, when young people are looking to our party, our standard bearer for the United States Senate in California is an individual who exemplifies creativity, vision, and action -- an entrepreneur who is keenly aware of what is needed to keep America number one and leading the way. After teaching at Stanford and Harvard, Ed Zschau decided to put theory into practice. In 1968, with only $2,500, he started, in his living room, a company which makes discs for computers. Ed Zschau would have started his business in a garage, only he didn't have a garage.

Well, that cut in the capital gains tax, coupled with our income tax rate reductions and other reforms early in our administration, spurred America's economy and put us on the road to record-breaking growth and expansion. We've had 45 months of economic recovery.

Now, all of this as compared to an opponent who is a world-class champion at expanding government and centralizing power in Washington -- a man with a 100-percent rating with the left-wing ADA. California needs a Senator who will focus his energy and creativity on pushing back the frontiers of knowledge and technology, creating new alternatives and new opportunity, rather than maneuvering in the halls of power for bigger and more costly Federal programs.

And don't underestimate, or underrate, your ability -- talking to friends, neighbors, talking in the locker room, out at the club, talking to business associates. We learned once some years ago back in the motion picture industry that the greatest advertising the industry had was word of mouth -- neighbor talking to neighbor and asking them if they had seen the latest movie. Well, don't hesitate. Do all the things that you're doing, but then talk it up with everyone you can reach. We have to make certain that the voters of California recognize the difference between these two candidates by election day.

Having been in the profession I was in for many years, I know the importance of being recognized. As a matter of fact, it was brought home to me one day in New York. I'd made 50 movies. I was then several years into a TV series, and I was walking down 5th Avenue -- a typical crowded street and so forth. And about 30 or 40 feet ahead of me a man stopped coming my way.

And he pointed, and he yelled, and he said, ``I know you. I see you on the screen. I see you on the television all the time. I know you.'' And he started stalking me. And everybody, like they will in New York, just kind of went back and made a lane and stood there. [Laughter] I'm at one end, and he is coming at me. And he is reaching in his pocket for a pencil and paper it turned out to be. And all the way he was telling me how much he'd seen me and everything else, and he wanted my autograph -- Ray Milland.

But we're not only working to build an economically sound and growing America but a secure and safe country as well. And here, too, the choice is clear and the difference distinct. Ed Zschau is up against a man who has spent much of his career trying to weaken America's military strength and encourage retreat from our foreign policy responsibilities. Ed's opponent is a man who voted against an amendment declaring it American policy to oppose Cuban expansion in this hemisphere, who said the presence of Soviet troops in Cuba is not a threat, and who has blamed the arms race on the U.S. We are up against a man who has fought us every step of the way in our effort to rebuild America's defenses. You'd have to search long and hard to find a Senator who has opposed us as often in our attempts to do what is necessary to protect our national security and meet America's international obligations. We are succeeding despite him, but you could do America a big favor by replacing him with Ed Zschau.

And that's what we're doing this evening. Being here, I can't help but think of the dinner that we attended at this hotel shortly before the primary began in earnest. And I reminded all the candidates that after the primary battle, the party must again be united and focused on our common goals. Yes, we've got our differences. It's hard to recall now, but about this time in 1982 Pete Wilson's campaign was just getting underway, and there were some in the party who expressed misgivings and had some doubts. But now, needless to say, we know Pete Wilson has been doing one magnificent job in the United States Senate, and I know he's one of my strongest supporters. Now, all this suggests that any differences between us are trivial compared to our differences with the opposition and compared to what is at stake. We have a choice to vote for a candidate of the past who wants to turn the clock back or a candidate of the future who wants to complete our revolution.

Some people might think having a Democrat Senator and a Republican Senator is part of our system of checks and balances. It is no such thing. If you like what Pete Wilson is doing for California, does it make sense to send a Senator back to Washington who'll cancel Pete's vote every chance he gets? When we took office, Democrats had controlled both Houses of Congress for more than a quarter of a century. Now, for 5\1/2\ years we've had control of the House -- or of one House, I should say. No, we don't have the House, we have the one House -- the U.S.

Zschau will be a Senator you can all be proud of. The election of Ed Zschau and control of the United States Senate is absolutely critical to the future of this country. If there was ever a time for a maximum effort, that time is now. This election is special for us -- for you, for me, and for America. And I'm asking you to just win one more for the Gipper. [Laughter] There are a lot of us back in Washington counting on you, believe me, and waiting to welcome Ed Zschau to the United States Senate.

Ballroom at the Century Plaza Hotel. Prior to his remarks, the President attended separate receptions for prominent guests and major donors to Representative Zschau's campaign. The following morning, the President traveled to Denver, CO.

The dreadful murder of twenty-three Jewish worshippers, including an Israeli Rabbi, at the Neve Shalom Synagogue in Istanbul yesterday has deeply shocked and saddened all Americans. Our hearts cry out for those innocent people who died and for their families.

It's great to be on the campaign trail again, especially when I'm campaigning for somebody else -- in fact, several somebody elses. You know, on the way in, though, just a little while ago, we met a westbound plane, and I think it was the Raiders on their way back to California. I'm sure it was. It's the first time I've ever seen an airplane cry. [Laughter] Well now, in this election I'd like to count on you to do for our candidates what the Broncos did for all of Colorado yesterday. 1986 is a watershed year for Colorado Republicans. The people we elect this year will lead Colorado to its destiny in this decade and beyond. And you have some great candidates.

Well, we have great candidates for the United States Senate, a Lieutenant Governor, in each of the six congressional districts candidates who will help further our program for a strong and growing America. We have great candidates for the State legislature here and our constitutional offices and for each of the counties across the State. I understand from all that I've learned the Republican Party in Colorado is the strongest and the most unified that it has ever been. This will be one of the most important elections in the decade for Colorado and for America. This election will determine if America stays on the road of progress, committed to the opportunity society at home and strength abroad.

The present leader of the opposition would drag us back into the failed policies of the past, and our answer to that must be: ``No way!'' Let's move ahead into the future with Ted Strickland as Governor, Kathy Arnold as Lieutenant Governor, Ken Kramer in the Senate, and one of the best darned group of House candidates that I've ever seen. It's going to be a tough fight, but with your continued help we'll win. Vote for Ken Kramer so that we can have a Republican Senate that I can work with for these next 2\1/2\ years. And vote for Ted Strickland and Kathy Arnold so you can have the same kind of leadership in Denver that we've been trying to provide in Washington.

You know, one thing that makes our country unique in all the world is that we are a federation of sovereign States. Now, there are those in recent years who have been in charge in Washington, and some who are still there, who would like to change that. They would like to make the Federal Government all-powerful and make the States simply administrative districts of that Federal Government. Well, our strength comes from this system that was designed to keep authority and autonomy over our domestic affairs as close to the people as possible.

I know that Ken Kramer in the United States Senate and your A-Team of Colorado congressional candidates will work to preserve this present system that we have and that's been so good to us all these years in Washington, and Ted Strickland and Kathy Arnold will wisely and conscientiously administer the power here in Colorado.

I thank you very much. I know that I am due inside to speak to some other people that are waiting right now. I hate to leave, but then that's the way it always is. But God bless all of you. Thank you for coming out here, and send all these good people to Washington and to your State capital.

I begin my formal remarks today, let me first speak to a subject of great importance: The continuing Soviet detention of an innocent American is an outrage. Whatever the Soviet motive, whether it's to intimidate enterprising journalists or to trade him for one of their spies that we have caught redhanded, this action violates the standards of civilized international behavior. There will be no trade. Through several channels, we've made our position clear. The Soviet Union is aware of how serious the consequences will be for our relations if Nick Daniloff is not set free. I call upon the Soviet authorities to act responsibly and quickly so that our two countries can make progress on the many other issues on our agenda, solving existing problems instead of creating new ones. Otherwise, there will be no way to prevent this incident from becoming a major obstacle in our relations.

Now, flying in here and looking out the window at the mountains below, I knew what Dizzy Gillespie meant when he said of Colorado: ``If this ain't paradise, then heaven can wait.'' It's so beautiful here that Nancy and I wish we could stay longer. But as you know, Congress is coming back in session, and somebody's got to be there to keep an eye on them. [Laughter] It's great to be here and wonderful to see so many old friends and supporters: Bill Armstrong, one of the strongest voices in the United States Senate; Colorado's excellent team of Representatives, Mike Strang, Hank Brown, and Dan Schaefer. You've really struck gold with those guys. State Chairman Bo Callaway and the Colorado Republican leadership are doing a great job for the party in this State. And then there are congressional candidates Mike Norton, Joe Wood, and Joel Hefley. They're in the finest tradition of the GOP -- now in my book these letters stand for growth, opportunity, and patriotism. With candidates like these, I can't help but think the party of growth, opportunity, and patriotism is going to be making real gains in the House in '86. And we're going to go for it.

It's a real pleasure to be here in the Robert F. Six Operations Center. Bob Six and his wife, Audrey Meadows, have been good friends of Nancy's and mine for many years. And it's good to see dear old friends, Joe and Holly Coors, whose generosity and dedication to the cause have helped turn faith in the individual and freedom from a little pure mountain spring to the mainstream of political thought in this country. Joe and Holly, America is grateful.

You know, having been a Governor myself for some time, I think I recognize good material when I see it, and Ted Strickland is the best. He'll be a proud and independent chief executive for a proud and independent State. I would give him one little word here, if I might, in my own experience. When I became Governor of California, I inherited a situation that was just about as bad as the Nation was in 1980, and as the weeks went on and the language rose and rose and every day there seemed to be a new problem. One day I was on my way into the capitol, and I was listening to the car radio. A disc jockey came on, and he said something that won my heart. He said, ``Every man should take unto himself a wife, because sooner or later something is bound to happen that you can't blame on the Governor.'' [Laughter] But as I mentioned at the rally just a few minutes ago outside, this is a watershed year in Colorado. With Ted and Kathy Arnold, we offer the kind of strong leadership this State wants in the coming years, the kind of leadership that Colorado deserves.

And you know, the sweeping vistas of Colorado, I have been told, were the inspiration for the song ``America, the Beautiful.'' With leaders like these and the hard work and generosity of so many others of you here today, I know that Colorado will help inspire a great and beautiful future for America. But we're, all of us, here today because we know that we can't take that future for granted, because there are some who still want to put America full speed in reverse -- back to when big government, taxes, and inflation were destroying our economy and weakness abroad made America a punching bag for every penny-ante dictator. It's important to remember those days 5\1/2\ years ago, because the tax-and-spend crew is still lurking in the shadows, just waiting for a second chance.

The liberal leadership of the Democratic Party hasn't changed: They're still addicted to big government, high taxes, and inflation. Remember when they kept telling us a little inflation was good for us, that it kept us prosperous?

Well, they're just itching to repeal our tax cuts, to replace our opportunity society with a welfare state. And their foreign policy is still the same: If you need money, slash defense, and always, always blame America first. The Democratic leadership would chart the most dangerous course for a nation since the Egyptians tried to take a shortcut through the Red Sea. [Laughter] This election in 1986 will be a crucial moment of decision for our country: Will liberal policies return us to the days of malaise, or will America continue down the road of progress?

The answer to that question depends more than anything else on one thing: electing Senators who are progrowth, prodefense, and pro-America. It means sending Ken Kramer to Washington as United States Senator from the great State of Colorado. Ken Kramer has a proven record in Congress. He's been one of our frontline Congressmen in the battle to bring America back. And I've said it a few times before, but I think it's worth repeating: America is back! And with Ken's help in the United States Senate, we're going to keep her standing tall and proud and free.

During his years in Congress, Ken helped build the opportunity society, and he's been an untiring advocate of a strong America. Today America is once again united in hope and strong in purpose. We've squashed inflation, and we're keeping it squashed. For the last 12 months it's been running at about 1.6 percent, which is almost a tenth of what it was -- or a little more than a tenth of what it was 5\1/2\ years ago. And we're keeping the doors of that opportunity society open with tax reform. We're cutting tax rates further, making the tax system fairer and, as a result, spurring on the economic expansion that has already created over 11\1/2\ million new jobs.

Today employment, the percentage of Americans working, is at a record high. I don't know how many people are aware -- I had to learn it myself after I got to Washington -- that the entire employment pool in America is considered to be everyone, male and female, 16 years of age and up all the way. And today 61.2 percent of all those Americans I've just named are employed, and that is the highest percentage of that pool employed in the history of the United States. Just last Friday we were able to announce that there were 111,852 million Americans with jobs, and we're not going to stop there. We're going to keep this country growing until every American who wants a job has a job. We still have problems to solve in such areas as our natural resources industries, but with people like Ken, we have a proven team to solve them.

We're rebuilding our defenses, speaking out loudly and clearly for human liberty, and working around the world to restore freedom and democracy. Once again America has regained its rightful role as leader of the free world. You know, of all the things that go with this job -- many to be proud of -- I'm more proud of the young men and women in uniform in our country than anything else. They're all volunteers -- they weren't drafted -- and they have the highest level of education ever in the history of the military. There are more high school graduates and more of them in the top percentage bracket of intelligence in the Armed Forces than we have ever known, even back in the days of stress when we used the draft.

They're one fine group of young men and women. And let me say this: If we must ever ask our military personnel to put their lives on the line for us, we're not going to give them anything less than the top-quality equipment they need to get the job done.

Yes, we've come a long way from the days of malaise, but the next couple of years will decide whether all our progress since 1980 will be set in concrete or only written in the sand. Because if we don't keep control of the U.S. Senate, we're going to wake up one morning and find it all gone with the wind. The stakes couldn't be higher in this election, and Ken Kramer's race in Colorado is the key to our hopes. Because if we win here, we can be pretty positive of keeping control of the Senate, as he told you. And that means we can carry on America's second revolution of hope and opportunity, the revolution that couldn't have taken place in these last 5\1/2\ years without the slight majority that we have in that one House -- the Senate. Whether we keep control of the Senate will mean the difference between 2 more years of moving forward or 2 years of stalemate and retrogression. I didn't go to Washington to be a 6-year President. I didn't seek reelection just to protect the gains of the first term. There are too many exciting challenges still before America and too much business that still must be completed in these next 2 years, and I don't want my hands tied by a totally hostile Congress. Together, we can and will win the Senate and keep our cause and our country moving ahead.

Colorado has a choice between two candidates. As you've just been told, one represents the party of the past, of wornout ideas and failed policies. The other, Ken Kramer's party, is the party of the future, the party of new ideas, hope, and progress. I ask the people of Colorado when they go to the polls: Remember your vote will have enormous impact way beyond the Rockies and the plains of eastern Colorado. Your vote can keep America from sinking back into those days of malaise, as they were called by my predecessor. Your vote can keep us on track, moving forward into a better future. And that's why we must keep the Senate Republican. That's why we must elect Senators who will vote for America's future. And that's why we have to send Ken Kramer to the United States Senate.

Now, we all know we're up against an opponent who has a habit of outspending his rivals in a big way, and this campaign is no exception. And as we used to say in the old Death Valley Days: He's piled up enough money to burn a wet mule.

Ken has also been a leader in conservation with the ``sodbuster'' bill, and he's been out in front in the effort to keep America energy-independent. So, really the choice is for a man who does what he says and has a voting record in Congress to prove it.

And let me give you just one example of the difference that Ken could make in the Senate. The great majority of Coloradans favor a balanced budget amendment. Thanks to Ken Kramer, Colorado has one. Well, earlier this year the Federal balanced budget amendment lost by one vote in the Senate.

If you like what Bill is doing, why send someone to Washington who will just cancel his vote on things like that? Elect Ken Kramer so Colorado's interests can be promoted. Now, maybe you've noticed that I've been careful to refer to the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. And that's because I believe the liberals who've taken control of that once great party don't represent the vast majority of hard-working, patriotic Democrats that can be found throughout America.

You know, I had a little personal experience that kind of illustrates what happened to the Democratic Party -- and I was one. I was the drum major of a boys band, and we were leading the Decoration Day parade in a nearby city or town to our hometown. And the fellow on the white horse who was the grand marshal of the parade rode back down the parade to see if everything was coming along right. And we kept on playing, and I kept waving that baton and marching, and all of a sudden the music began to sound rather faint.

He'd come back up just in time to turn the band, and I was going down the street all alone, and the band had taken a turn to the right. Well, that's what happened to the Democratic Party. The leadership is still walking down the middle of the street alone. The party, the majority of them, have turned to the right. We must not mistake the rank and file of the Democrat Party for its liberal leadership. I'm grateful for all the help that some Democrats have given us these last few years. And I'm sure there must be some in this room. And some of them may be former Democrats as I am, and some maybe haven't made the change yet. We couldn't have been elected in 1980, we couldn't have brought America back, without your help, those of you who, perhaps, are former Democrats or still, but who have helped us. And you believe in the same values of family and faith and love of country.

This act of callous barbarity, like the hijacking of the Pan American aircraft in Karachi, underscores the need for cooperation amongst all civilized nations to combat international terrorism. Your government's prompt and firm denunciation of these terroristic acts stands as a noble example for other countries to follow. I join with you in mourning all who died in both of these terrible attacks.

I am pleased to submit to the Congress my fifth annual report on the state of small business. The State of Small Business report by the Small Business Administration, which follows this message, reconfirms the contribution that small business makes to our Nation's economy. In 1986 vigorous small business formation and job creation continues, reflecting the strength and perseverance of millions of men and women building better futures for themselves and for our country.

The freedom to choose a way of life and to build upon the strength of an idea is the cornerstone of American small business and the secret of small business success. Our job in Washington is to ensure that our actions do not stand in the way of small business opportunities; only the limits of entrepreneurs' own imaginations can hold them back.

A stable and growing economy is our most important goal to ensure small business opportunity. For business owners to contribute to that growth, our policies must be clear and government tampering with business decisions must be minimized.

Federal spending and the deficits it has produced compete with private spending including small business investment. They also hurt the ability of small firms to meet foreign competition. Similarly, a tax system that is needlessly complex and built around high tax rates hobbles the business owner's ability to grow and operate in response to the demands of markets. We will be better off when tax considerations do not determine whether a certain investment is worthwhile or profits from a firm should be reinvested in job creating opportunities.

Our efforts cannot stop here. Continued steps to reduce regulatory burdens are important to a healthier small business climate. I call on all Federal agencies to continue the fight to eliminate burdensome regulations and to look askance at proposals for solving every problem with a Federal regulation. The Regulatory Flexibility Act, an important tool for agencies in this effort, requires economic analysis of small business impacts and the consideration of less burdensome alternatives.

Businesses are handicapped by uncertain or limitless liability for injuries arising from their products or services. It is important that our legal system provide redress for those injured by the negligent acts of others and incentives for safe products. But a runaway liability system prevents many small business owners from obtaining or being able to afford liability insurance. The Administration supports legislation that would reform the legal system to provide adequate safety for American consumers, without unduly burdening American business.

These and other issues have been clear priorities of the preliminary meetings being held across the country and which are leading up to the National White House Conference on Small Business in August of this year. Meetings held in every State are serving as a forum for America's small business leaders to let their voices be heard on public policy issues vital to small business and to the Nation.

Few experiences are more unique to the American character than going into business for oneself. Ever since small business owners opened their doors they have had to cope with the changing marketplace. Using wit, hard work, and initiative, they have successfully demonstrated that American trait of adapting while thriving in the face of adversity.

These basic talents are found in abundance in America's small businesses and now, as in the past, help us to meet world commercial competition. While some nations have chosen controlled solutions to their economic problems, our answers lie in the freedom that allows small businesses to adapt to the world's changing economic climate.

A nation's wealth and commercial know-how is molded by its culture. Our society, made up of risk-takers from other nations and cultures, is by nature willing to change and make sacrifices. This willingness to take risks is essential to our creative energies: it is the foundation of American entrepreneurship. The continuing economic recovery is a vivid reminder of the pivotal role small business has been playing in recent years.

Convention is the first tax treaty applicable to Bermuda to be negotiated between the United States and the United Kingdom. It is not a comprehensive income tax treaty; rather it is limited to two issues: the taxation of insurance enterprises and mutual assistance in tax matters.

Since my last report to you, the United Nations Secretary General has continued his initiative. He has made clear his commitment to his good offices mission and to helping the two Cypriot sides move forward toward an overall solution. In this regard, he will be meeting with Mr. Denktash on September 16 and with President Kyprianou later in the month. We will give the Secretary General our full support and encourage the parties to cooperate with him and carry forward the work that has been accomplished since the inception of his initiative.

During that period, movement through the primary crossing point between north and south Cyprus was blocked by demonstrations on the Greek Cypriot side. On July 4 Turkish Cypriot authorities announced the closure of all crossing points on their side of the U.N. buffer zone and did not reopen them until July 12. We made clear to all concerned our view that actions that could exacerbate tensions and complicate the search for a peaceful settlement should be avoided.

The President. Barry, I'm honored to pay tribute to you this evening and to join with many of your friends in recognizing your outstanding service in the United States Senate. Thirty-five years ago you brought to the Senate a dedication to the ideas which have made our country great and an ability for leadership which has rarely been matched in our lifetimes. You've given so much for so many -- for your fellow Arizonians, for your party, for the Senate, and for all Americans -- and we're all grateful. One of your greatest achievements in the Senate is the outstanding work that you've done on behalf of a strong national defense, and I was moved by the many tributes from your colleagues during debate on the defense authorization bill.

On a personal note, Barry, let me just say how much I'll miss your friendship and guidance there in the Senate. You've been an inspiration to me and Nancy, and I wish you well. Nancy sends her love. And God bless you, and thank you for so many things.

Goldwater. And if I've had any luck in accomplishing anything, the fellow that's done most of the work is sitting next to me here, Sam Nunn. I wish I could have the same luck in making him a Republican that I've had with you-know-who.

These vicious murders were an attack on the values and standards of civilized men everywhere, and we are resolute in our determination to put an end to such horrors. In your sorrow and suffering, I hope it will be of some comfort to know that the people of the United States stand with you.

Brazil is a vast nation of hardy people, a country which shares with us a frontier heritage and a spirit of enterprise and independence. As was true for our country, people came to Brazil from many parts of the world to make a wilderness, to better their lives, and to live in freedom. And since the early days of both our nations, our countries have enjoyed bonds of commerce and friendship. I'm delighted today to have this opportunity to meet with President Sarney, to get to know him personally, and to discuss those issues which arise between great nations.

Sarney is leading Brazil during a time of great transition, political and economic. Its peaceful return to democracy, accomplished with the good will and cooperation of all segments of Brazilian society, has been a model which others throughout the world, but especially in this hemisphere, should follow. Indeed, freedom is the birthright of all Americans, and that means every soul from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego. President Sarney, we rejoice that Brazil has again joined the ranks of free nations. And from what we can see and hear, that joy is apparent in your country also. You described it when you said: ``Brazil has just emerged from a long night. Her eyes are not red from nightmares. On her lips she bears an open gesture of confidence and a song of love for liberty.'' Well, those words were well spoken, the words of a poet and a leader who loves his people and loves liberty. We're proud, Mr. President, to have such a man, and such a country as lovely as yours, as our friend.

Today democracy flourishes in Brazil. The rights of each individual are protected. Freedoms of expression, religion, and assembly are honored, and the franchise to vote in fair and direct elections has been expanded. And though a powerful nation, your country threatens no one. Brazil is at peace with itself and with its neighbors. And today Brazil is proving the fundamental relationship between human freedom and economic progress; they go hand in hand. Your countrymen are enjoying robust economic growth and an explosion of enterprise. The inflation rate is down dramatically, and it is estimated that 1\1/2\ million new jobs have been created in the past year. Your commerce with other nations is surging, and new confidence is apparent from the factory to the marketplace. Brazil has the eighth largest economy in the Western World and is gaining on number seven.

There can be little doubt that Brazil is emerging as a world power and is facing new challenges and responsibility as such. As two of the world's most energetic economies, we have a stake in strengthening the world trading system, protecting the viability of international monetary and financial institutions, and promoting growth and development, especially in the Third World. The world now has a stake in Brazil, and Brazil has a stake in the world. The free flow of commerce beween countries, for example, is a vital force for progress on this planet and is of utmost importance to the economic health of our two countries. It is up to us to do our best to keep those lines of commerce open. Trade must be free, and it must be fair. And the fight for free trade must start at home. No nation can expect to continue freely exporting to others if its own domestic markets are closed to foreign competition. Prosperity must be built not at the expense of others, but on the principle of mutual benefit.

I'm looking forward, Mr. President, to discussing this and other issues of great importance with you during our meetings today. We have just scratched the surface of cooperation between Brazil and the United States. Technology is opening potential as never imagined between the free peoples of the world. In a few years the world will not only enter a new decade but also a new century and, yes, a new millennium. Brazil and the United States stand on that threshold together, but this is nothing new. In 1876 the United States celebrated its centennial, and there to help us commemorate our first 100 years was Dom Pedro II of Brazil. Representing your people, he, alongside President Grant, inaugurated the celebration and helped send the United States off to meet its destiny.

Sarney. Mr. President, I thank you for your invitation and for your kind words which show the right regard you have for Brazil and its people. I'll talk with you about friendship and about many subjects, but my English is very broken. My effort in speaking your language is a marathon of good will. I use the word friendship again. It says everything -- Brazil, the United States, our peoples, our history, our old relationship. We worked together, side by side in peace and in the last war. We will build together the construction of the present and of the future. All Brazilians feel happy with your invitation. Our meeting reinforces democracy in Brazil and in Latin America -- so I see it. The only ideology of Brazil is democracy. It guides us, and it has permitted us to overcome the trials we had to face in the recent past. We are now back on our feet. We need friends like the United States. We need a partner to grow.

Reagan, we admire your performance, your strength, your tenacity, your statesmanship. Your qualities inspire confidence to the American people. You gave a decisive personal contribution to the relations between our two countries in a moment of a great deal of uncertainty.

Now almost 4 years after your visit, Brazil is a different country, a new country. Conciliation and changes helped us achieve a peaceful transition to a free, democratic government. We are growing fast again. We are meeting our obligations. Our people have more jobs and better wages. We believe, like you, in free enterprise as the basis for development. We know that political freedom cannot survive when economic freedom no longer exists.

You once said that Brazil was a force in favor of moderation and balance. We are proud of that record. We will dedicate all our efforts to continuing to be a force for stability and peace. Our meeting will mark a fresh start for our relations, relations that are based on common goals and the values earned on a mutual respect for our differences.

Mrs. Reagan, Marly and I wish to express our most friendly greetings, thanking her for the very warm welcome with which we are being distinguished. Mr. President, in Brazil we say that the man who has a friend has two souls. Brazil and the United States -- two souls on one single destiny, the destiny of friendship. Thank you.

President Reagan spoke at 10:10 a.m. at the South Portico of the White House, where President Sarney was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. Following the ceremony, the two Presidents met in the Oval Office.

Jose Sarney and Ronald Reagan, recognizing the important role of scientific research in sustaining economic growth and prosperity, agreed to undertake a special initiative for implementation of the U.S.-Brazil Agreement on Cooperation in Science and Technology. The Presidents decided to establish a high-level panel -- composed equally of eminent scientists, engineers, and governmental authorities from each country -- to present recommendations and suggestions of topics for bilateral cooperation in science and technology, focusing on selected priority areas of mutual strength and benefit. The binational panel will also suggest procedures to encourage and facilitate engagement of the private sectors of their countries. Cooperative projects would be financed jointly through resources to be allocated for this purpose by both countries.

Presidents agreed that the panel on science and technology should begin its work, following bilateral consultations, within 60 days. The panel's report and recommendations will constitute an initial agenda for convening the joint commission provided for under the U.S.-Brazil Bilateral Agreement on Cooperation in Science and Technology.

President today announced his intention to appoint Murray Friedman to be a member of the Commission on Civil Rights for the remainder of the 6-year term expiring December 5, 1989. He would succeed Morris B. Abram. Upon appointment he will be designated Vice Chairman.

As a Nation of immigrants founded on universal ideals, America's vision of freedom based on God-given rights embraces all the people of the world. Throughout our history, we have been fortunate in attracting to our shores immigrants from every part of the world. Their values, energies, and spirit have enriched America's culture and added to her dynamism and prosperity.

No part of our national mosaic better exemplifies this tradition than America's numerous citizens of Hispanic heritage. Their love of freedom is reflected daily in their abundant economic, cultural, and political vitality. Their profound religious faith nourishes the spirit of a Nation whose first principle is the God-given dignity of the human person. Through hard work Hispanics have done much to contribute to the betterment of their families and their communities. Many have played important roles as leaders in American society. Their ties to the nations of Latin America form an important part of the bond between America and its neighbors to the South, many of whom are enjoying a renaissance of freedom and democratic government. The roots of their culture bind us also to democratic Spain and its great cultural legacy. For all these reasons, we rejoice in the strength and inspiration America derives from its citizens of Hispanic heritage.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this tenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Systemic lupus erythematosus (also known as lupus or SLE) is an inflammatory disease of connective tissue, which can produce changes in the structure and function of the skin, joints, and internal organs. The exact cause of lupus is unknown, but evidence suggests that the disease may result from a disorder in the body's production of antibodies (proteins that fight invading organisms). In lupus, abnormal antibodies are produced that react against the patient's own tissue. More than 500,000 Americans have the disease.

As a result of advances from biomedical research, positive findings have emerged from such diverse projects as studies on defects in the immune system; research on genetic and environmental factors influencing the disease and its complications; studies aimed at developing improved treatment, including new drugs and techniques; and research in epidemiology and data systems.

In order for us to take advantage of the knowledge already gained, public awareness of the symptoms and treatment of lupus -- and of the need for continuing scientific research -- remains essential. The Federal government and private voluntary organizations have developed a strong and enduring partnership committed to research on lupus. Working together, our objective must be to uncover the cause and find a cure for this devastating disease.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1986 as Lupus Awareness Month. I urge the people of the United States and educational, philanthropic, scientific, medical, and health care organizations and professionals to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

During the past decade, our Nation has seen increased awareness of the capabilities of workers with disabilities. We have demonstrated a greater commitment to the principle of equal employment opportunity for all Americans.

This awareness has led to actions by people with disabilities, by business, by organized labor, and by government at all levels to encourage the full integration of workers with disabilities into the American work force.

This cooperative and unified action has enabled people with disabilities to forge ahead -- as leaders, as employers and employees, as team members, as vital members of American society. Medical and technological developments, coupled with new awareness of the capabilities of people with disabilities, can lead to greater and more fruitful participation of all Americans in our work force.

During these seven days, we emphasize our recognition of the changing roles of people with disabilities in America today. Their aspirations and demonstrated ability to meet challenges and make the most of opportunities have resulted in changing the way the Nation thinks about handicaps and disabilities. Let us recognize through our actions, as well as our words, that people with disabilities are first of all our fellow citizens, who happen to be disabled.

Reagan. President Sarney, distinguished guests, it's a pleasure to have you here tonight. Our meetings today were businesslike and productive. The spirit of amicability and good will that were so evident throughout our sessions bodes well for the future. One of the benefits of such meetings, as we had today, is that they provide the opportunity for leaders to get to know each other. And in this case it was a delight. President Sarney is the leader of a great nation, sophisticated in the ways of politics and economics, yet a person with the heart of a poet -- truly a Renaissance man.

Having been in the profession I was in for a good part of my life, it's an honor to have here this evening an individual whose interests lie not just with politics but also the arts. We believe in freedom not only because it reflects the most moral system of human interaction, not only because it leads to economic progress but also because it nourishes the artistic and creative spirit of man.

President Sarney has said, ``Literature and politics are inspired in the conscience of liberty.'' When one thinks of Brazil, it's difficult not to hear the sounds of music or the sight of joyous dance. Of course, Brazil is much more than that -- and the sounds of construction and building are clearly evident today.

Sarney, let us pledge that the American and Brazilian people will plant oaks for a better tomorrow, and that they will do it together. And now, would you all join me in a toast to President Sarney and the people of Brazil.

Sarney. Mr. President, Mrs. Nancy Reagan, as this will be our last opportunity on this trip to be together, I think it is a time for gratitude, a time to convey our thanks for the warmth, the hospitality, the kindness, and the spirit of friendship that has pervaded this stay. During dinner, the lady I was sitting next to told me of the American habit of making a wish when you see the first star. There is only one star that I can see up there in the sky tonight, so I think that we should all perhaps share the same wish -- the wish for a permanent friendship between our two countries.

We've had many proofs of the kindness of the President of the United States. But we did not expect his esteem and kindness to extend as far as providing us with this unforgettable evening and a sky with one star and no clouds. When arriving here this evening, Mrs. Reagan pointed to the Moon, and I thought to myself, I've seen that girl somewhere before. It was two evenings ago in Brasilia. And again, that is a symbol that we share. And I repeat what I said this morning -- two souls, one feeling.

I am deeply moved, Mr. President, by your kind remarks that reflect the spirit of friendship and cordiality of this memorable visit to Washington. And I think this reception this evening is the crowning achievement of this visit and this feeling of friendship and cooperation. I will never forget your words, I will never forget this evening -- the friendship of this memorable visit to the United States and Washington. I have brought word of a country, Brazil, a country in transition, setting out to answer its most noble historic calling -- to be a full democracy in which political freedom is reflected in the economic and social life of the nation. The United States is the land where freedom and the participation of the people have brought forth the most extraordinary material and social progress in history, an example to be always pursued. During our meeting with you, Mr. President, I found a partner willing to listen in an open and interested manner, and I'm quite certain that this will lead to further improvement in the longstanding and permanent friendship between our countries.

Your talent for imprinting your personal and decisive stamp on the form and substance of the Presidency and on the very history of the United States is surely an unmistakable demonstration of your statesmanship, which the people of the United States have overwhelmingly acclaimed. And I would say it in a far more eloquent fashion if I didn't have to lose so much time with the translation. [Laughter] This is a moment of friendly celebration marked by the warm hospitality extended us by our gracious American hosts. May I also, on behalf of Marly and on my own behalf, pay tribute in the name of the Brazilian people to Mrs. Nancy Reagan for her tireless work and efforts on behalf of the young. Mrs. Reagan has met with the admiration and the solidarity of the entire Brazilian people.

And since I have come to the United States, I have become more aware, perhaps, of another contribution given by Mrs. Reagan to all mankind -- the example she has set of love, as sharing of love as an expression of solidarity. The love of a wife for her husband is an example to all mankind.

As the Congress returns to an exceedingly heavy work schedule prior to sine die adjournment, I wanted to once again convey to you my grave concern about the situation in Central America and the urgency of completing final action on a compromise plan to provide assistance to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. This bipartisan proposition has passed the House and Senate and now awaits final conference action on the Military Construction Appropriations bill.

Nicaraguan freedom fighters cling to our promise of assistance. The affirmative votes of the House and Senate have confirmed congressional commitment to that goal. However, months have passed since House action and weeks have passed since the Senate reaffirmed its position. In the intervening time, supplies of food and medicine have been drained and the ability of the democratic resistance to defend itself has been significantly reduced. There has been no lack of resolve on the part of the Soviets or their proxies in arming and sustaining a regime that clearly seeks to destroy the hope of freedom for millions in Central America.

It is my hope that you will assist in expediting conference action on the Military Construction Appropriations bill in order that it might reach my desk for signature as quickly as possible. Time is short, and we must avoid further delay in order to sustain those in Central America who have committed themselves to democracy and freedom.

Well, thank you all very much, and, Rob, thank you for that kind introduction. I was hearing it through the other side of the door there. [Laughter] And welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. I'm delighted to be with you today and to have this opportunity to talk to you about our private sector initiatives program. And I want to extend special thanks to John Phelan, Bill Verity, and Rob Mosbacher, who in the best tradition of private giving have donated their time and considerable talents to making PSI the success that it is today.

Well, as the success of PSI shows, whether a bear is coming over the hill or not, you're in the contrast to that. Americans are sticking together, carrying on the tradition of neighbor helping neighbor that's made this country so great.

The four regional conferences which you've been hearing about this morning wouldn't be possible without the commitment of each and every one of you. Public-private partnerships have emerged as one of the most effective methods of providing service to our citizens. Innovative partnerships have been formed at the Federal, State, and local level dealing with such issues as child care, neighborhood revitalization, education, and even food distribution programs for the needy. And I just want to take this opportunity to thank you personally for all that you're doing.

Many of you've heard me talk about the International Conference on Private Sector Initiatives that will be taking place in Paris, France, this November. Well, I'm very pleased at the initiative that my Board of Advisors has demonstrated in hosting this unique conference, because this is a kind of an answer now, after a few years, to that Ambassador's wife. I'm proud of what we've been able to accomplish in the United States in promoting private sector activity. In fact, it's a subject that I've often enjoyed discussing with leaders from other countries. This conference will enable the key private sector leaders and government officials from seven nations to get together, share information on innovative new private sector programs from each of the countries.

And this international cooperative effort is the first of its type, and I'm optimistic about the many good things that can result from it. The planning of this unique conference has been a partnership in itself involving governments, corporations, and charitable groups from around the world. It seems that the more people hear about this, the more willing they are to become involved.

This Sunday Nancy and I will be addressing the Nation on TV with an urgent message: that now is the time to stand up, get involved, and do something about drugs. We must hold the sellers and users of illegal drugs accountable for their actions. We must seek ways to help users quit using and accept no excuses.

And we all know that the drug problem is an international one. I can assure you that we're working with other nations to curtail production, and we're developing better means to stop the flow of drugs over our borders. But we have to set our own house in order. Everyone will have to participate: business, private sector leaders foremost among them, not just making sure your own workplaces are drug free, but joining arms with the rest of America in this battle against this most insidious of all evils. None of us can rest while our children are still prey to pushers and a culture of license that encourages drug use, promising kicks, but delivering only despair and destruction. None of us can be content while so many millions -- the American dream is drowned in a nightmare of drug addiction.

This is a question that must burn on the national conscience until we all get involved, until we get the pushers behind bars and the drugs off the streets and out of the schoolyards, until we bring hope and joy back into so many lives ravaged by drug use. And in this issue, as in so many others, we'll be looking for leadership from you, the private sector. Let's turn the spirit of enterprise to work in getting America to ``Just Say No'' to drugs. I know we can count on you.

And already this is taking hold. Yesterday an annual event occurred in the Oval Office: A group of sponsors and those who helped fund the Boys' Clubs of America came in for their annual visit with the young man, a teenager, who has been chosen the first youth in America. He and his four companion runners-up were in there. And believe it or not, this young fellow from Pittsfield, Massachusetts -- he turned around and held up a plaque that was a pledge to me that he was presenting: The Boys' Clubs of America, supported by those private enterprise people who are keeping the Boys' Clubs alive, are pledging that at next year's meeting they will bring in a million signed pledges from young people in America -- that they are going to get to sign those pledges -- rejecting drugs. And I think they'll make it.

And this international meeting that I mentioned, again, is just an example that once the word gets around -- and there's another thing that's happened, thanks to people like yourselves all over this country. You know, we've gone through a period of a big buildup of the welfare state, and that government was the answer to all the problems. And I don't know how many of you were aware that in many instances, government, with those programs, literally competed private efforts that were dealing with the same problems out of existence, that this was government's province.

And the reverse is now true. Today there is a growing partnership. Wherever government has a legitimate hand in, government now is working with private groups, not putting the private groups out of business.

I think before we get into the brief remarks that I have here, in case you have been away from the news disseminating forces in this last hour or so, I should tell you that as of now our hostage in Moscow, Mr. Daniloff, has been transferred to the custody of our Ambassador and will be in the Embassy there. The Soviet spy in our custody will be transferred to the care -- pending his trial -- of his Ambassador here in the United States. But we are so relieved and happy that Mr. Daniloff is out of the 8- by 10-foot cell, which he was sharing with someone we think was an informant, and that he won't be subjected to 4 hours of interrogation every day.

But now we'll get back to, well, some good news that I want to mention before we get into the great job that your schools have been doing. Today there is every indication that our country's waking up to a problem that has been ignored and denied and buried away for too long. Last month a Gallup Poll found that for the first time Americans now consider drugs the number one problem in our schools. And in a recent survey conducted by Weekly Reader, elementary schoolchildren said the very same thing.

There are those who might be dismayed by these poll results. No one likes to hear about problems such as drug use. But what these polls suggest to me is that at long last we're ready to face a major challenge to our society. You know better than anyone else what drugs can do to our children's minds, bodies, and lives.

Well, America is mobilizing and, together as a people, we're going to expel drugs from our schools and free our young people from this evil. In a couple of days, for example, the Department of Education will be issuing a handbook, ``Schools Without Drugs.'' It's designed to help teachers, principals, and parents, and anyone else interested in children, get and keep drugs out of the schools. The American people are ready to make a policy statement and make it stick: Drugs and education don't mix.

I'll be addressing the Nation on this issue. Nancy will be joining me and having some remarks to make. But today I'd like to take this opportunity to call on teachers across America to take the pledge to take no drugs themselves and to do the best they can to keep all drugs out of schools. We owe our children nothing less than a good example and a good environment. Education is too vital to our country's future to let it be corrupted by drugs, and it's also too important not to strive for the best.

Fostering excellence in education, of course, is the purpose behind our school recognition program. Hearing about what you've accomplished is enough to give anyone confidence in the future; that's how significant the job you're doing is to America. And that's why the 1985 - 86 school year was declared the Year of the Elementary School.

By recognizing schools like yours, we're underscoring the critical nature of those first few years of a child's education. Elementary school is where the skills of reading and writing are learned and where children can gain a fundamental knowledge of our country and our common heritage. It was a great shock the other day to see that study that revealed how many high school juniors could not, on a map, point out where England, France, or Germany are. And it all begins with what you are doing -- and now doing so well. It's where they develop the habits and values and demeanor that will make them not only successful students but, eventually, successful mothers, fathers, workers, neighbors, and citizens.

I'd suggest that, next to the family, elementary schools are the most influential institutions in our children's lives. Why is it that at this advanced point in my life, I can still remember pretty clearly that first grade at the school in Galesburg, Illinois, where I first started. And by that token, it would be hard to find a group of 272 institutions in this country that are more significant than the group that we're honoring here today.

As many of you are aware, Secretary Bennett last week issued a report he wrote called ``First Lessons.'' It's a report on the state of elementary education in America, and it's the first one we've had since 1953. He found that our elementary schools are, overall, in pretty good shape. By some measures, they're doing better now than they have in years, and I'd say that's terrific news. Some areas, though, need improvement.

With television and movies so prevalent, it's difficult to teach reading. Yet every single child in this country needs this fundamental skill. A better job could be done in the teaching of science to our youngest children. Our Yankee ingenuity won't mean much in the future without a knowledge and appreciation of science and technology. And finally, a better job could be done in teaching our youngest children about history and geography and civics. By the time our students leave elementary school, they should know the essential facts, the central institutions, and the fundamental principles of the United States and Western civilization.

I realize all of you are on the frontlines in the battle to accomplish the things I just spoke about. In fact, you're heroes in that battle. Every American, for example, can be proud of schools like the Futures Academy in Buffalo, where students have been preparing for citizenship by conducting trials and class elections; and Caloosa Elementary in Cape Coral, Florida, where students recently wrote books in English class and then bound them in art class; and Johnson Elementary in Bridgeport, West Virginia, where 90 percent of the students read at or above grade level and 99 percent are at or above grade level in math. We're proud of you, and we want the rest of the country, especially your peers, to know of your accomplishments. If every elementary school would just aim for the heights that you have already achieved, education in this country would be taking one giant step forward.

One thing more, before we get to your story. It is evident that if our youngest children are nurtured and educated, in our families and in our schools, then a great number of social ills can be averted before they arise.

Having Washington usurp local authority or announcing a slew of Federal guidelines or edicts isn't going to accomplish anything. In fact, that approach has had a negative impact. If progress is to be made, parents, teachers, and the entire community must get together and get personally involved in education. If parents and teachers make certain a child can read and has a respect for hard work by the time he leaves elementary school, they've done more to ensure that child's future than any Federal program can ever hope to do. In the end, parents and schools are the heart and soul of the process by which we raise successful, responsible citizens. Nobody else can really replace you, and that's why this country salutes you today.

The spirit of America was celebrated this summer at the Statue of Liberty celebration. Let us all take the opportunity provided by the 1986 - 1987 Combined Federal Campaign to demonstrate once again the American spirit of voluntary giving. As leaders in the Federal government, it is important that we take visible leadership roles in the Campaigns in our agencies.

Brock by personally serving as Chairman of the Campaign in your agency and appointing a top official as your Vice Chairman. Please advise Secretary Brock of your willingness to serve and the name of the person you designate.

Through the 25 years of the Combined Federal Campaign, Federal civilian employees and members of the Armed Forces have shown their concern for those less fortunate in the United States and around the world by contributing generously through the Campaign.

Board. There is hereby established a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

President announced today the creation of Presidential Emergency Board No. 212 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of a continuing unresolved dispute between the Long Island Rail Road (LIRR) and certain labor organizations representing its employees.

Earlier, on May 16, 1986, the President invoked the emergency board procedures of the Railway Labor Act applicable to commuter railroads and created Emergency Board No. 210 to investigate and report on the same disputes. Emergency Board No. 210 investigated the issues and prepared a report and recommendations for settlement of the disputes. Following the release of the report and recommendations by Emergency Board No. 210, the parties unsuccessfully continued their attempts to resolve their differences.

Emergency Board No. 212 was created in response to such a request by a proper party pursuant to Section 9A(e) of the Railway Labor Act. The parties will now submit their final offers to the Board within 30 days, and the Board will report its selection of the most reasonable offer within 30 days thereafter. From the time a request to establish a board is made until 60 days after the Board makes its report, no change, except by agreement, may be made by the parties in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

Our country, since the close of the Second World War, has been a champion of free commerce between nations. Free trade has served us well, fueling economic growth and job creation across our land. However, as we've spoken about before, it's imperative that trade between nations be fair as well as free. At a time when our trade deficit is far too high, we can no longer tolerate one-sided trade relationships.

In the last year we've been moving aggressively on a number of different fronts to meet the trade deficit challenge. We've worked to pry open the closed and sheltered markets of our trading partners, bringing unfair trading actions when called for. Progress has been made on this front. We've also worked to restore a value to the dollar that reflects economic and competitive realities and that will enable American businessmen and farmers to compete more effectively in world markets. Here, too, we've made considerable progress, as the substantial adjustment of the dollar against the Japanese yen, the German mark, and other European currencies indicates.

Finally, we agreed last May at the Tokyo summit to improve economic policy coordination. In that spirit, we've been urging others, especially those with large trade surpluses, to adopt growth-oriented policies at home, enabling their citizens to buy more American products and other imports. The answer to our trade balance problem is not to close our markets, cut imports, or collapse trade. Millions of American jobs are tied to imports.

The way to a better life is to open markets now closed, improve trading conditions, and to expand our exports. We learned that lesson half a century ago when we tried to balance the trade deficit by erecting a tariff wall around the United States. The Smoot-Hawley tariff ignited an international trade war and helped sink our country into the Great Depression.

Today we're taking a positive approach. We're working with all our trading partners to improve the situation and, at the same time, keep international commerce flowing. That's why you and I and every American have a stake in the new round of global trade talks taking place this week in Punta del Este, Uruguay. Our Trade Representative, Clayton Yeutter, as well as Secretary of Agriculture Richard Lyng and Secretary of Commerce Malcolm Baldrige will be there fighting hard to open markets which are now closed to our goods. One of our major priorities at the talks will be addressing the mutually destructive practice of subsidizing agricultural exports. Friendly nations, trying to help domestic producers, are undermining the well-being of farmers all over the world; and American farmers are some of the hardest hit. The situation is intolerable, and we expect to have it corrected.

Too many countries turn a blind eye when their citizens violate patent and copyright laws designed to protect intellectual property rights. If we permit the product of our best minds to be stolen, we will pay the price in ingenuity, vision, and creativity -- the core of all human progress. Here again, we expect tangible changes to be made to straighten this matter out. Another unavoidable issue at the trade talks is the barriers countries erect to interfere with trade in services, such as banking, telecommunications, and insurance. The service end of our economy is growing dramatically, and in this modern age there is no reason to cordon off a vital arena of economic activity from international competition. Most governments that restrict economic activity do so out of the mistaken notion that they're serving the interests of their people. Some governments go to enormous lengths to discourage foreign investment. The end result of this absurdity is industrial stagnation: no new factories, no new development, and no new jobs. We want to see a freer flow of investment resources between countries.

Finally, our representatives at the trade talks will be trying to improve procedures for settling disputes in international commerce. Our position is clear: The playing field should be level, the ground rules should be set, and all players should stick to the rules. When a dispute arises, it should be settled, not ignored.

We're attempting at Punta del Este to lay the foundation for the next decade of world trade, a decade that will carry the United States and the world into an unparalleled era of growth and prosperity. We must make certain that all mankind benefits from a healthy and robust international trading system, one that is both free and fair. That's what we're aiming at.

Executive order that I'm signing will implement new procedures that will work to ensure a drug-free Federal workplace. And the legislation, the Drug-Free America Act, addresses the need to get drugs out of the workplace, schools, and our neighborhoods; it helps the States with drug treatment; and it cracks down on drug traffickers.

This is the Federal Government's way of ``just saying no'' to drugs. We're getting tough on drugs, and we mean business. To those who are thinking of using drugs, we say: Stop. And to those who are pushing drugs, we say: Beware. I hope all Americans will join in this important effort and make America drug free.

The President. No one on our side has blinked, and I didn't blink. I wasn't going to take any question on either subject. When you asked that -- I heard some of the shows Sunday, and I don't know where they get that idea. No, we have not blinked. He is a hostage, as George Shultz said. The individual that we're holding is an accused spy, and there can be no trade between those two; nor does Mr. Daniloff believe that there should be such a trade. But, no, we haven't blinked. From the very first I have felt that it was absolutely essential that we get Daniloff out of their hands and out of that cell which he occupied with what was obviously a Soviet aide -- and 4-hours-a-day interrogation.

The head of each Executive agency shall develop a plan for achieving the objective of a drug-free workplace with due consideration of the rights of the government, the employee, and the general public.

The head of each Executive agency shall establish a program to test for the use of illegal drugs by employees in sensitive positions. The extent to which such employees are tested and the criteria for such testing shall be determined by the head of each agency, based upon the nature of the agency's mission and its employees' duties, the efficient use of agency resources, and the danger to the public health and safety or national security that could result from the failure of an employee adequately to discharge his or her position.

Sixty days prior to the implementation of a drug testing program pursuant to this Order, agencies shall notify employees that testing for use of illegal drugs is to be conducted and that they may seek counseling and rehabilitation and inform them of the procedures for obtaining such assistance through the agency's Employee Assistance Program. Agency drug testing programs already ongoing are exempted from the 60-day notice requirement. Agencies may take action under section 3(c) of this Order without reference to the 60-day notice period.

Drug testing programs shall contain procedures for timely submission of requests for retention of records and specimens; procedures for retesting; and procedures, consistent with applicable law, to protect the confidentiality of test results and related medical and rehabilitation records. Procedures for providing urine specimens must allow individual privacy, unless the agency has reason to believe that a particular individual may alter or substitute the specimen to be provided.

The Secretary of Health and Human Services is authorized to promulgate scientific and technical guidelines for drug testing programs, and agencies shall conduct their drug testing programs in accordance with these guidelines once promulgated.

Agencies shall, in addition to any appropriate personnel actions, refer any employee who is found to use illegal drugs to an Employee Assistance Program for assessment, counseling, and referral for treatment or rehabilitation as appropriate.

Agencies shall not allow any employee to remain on duty in a sensitive position who is found to use illegal drugs, prior to successful completion of rehabilitation through an Employee Assistance Program. However, as part of a rehabilitation or counseling program, the head of an Executive agency may, in his or her discretion, allow an employee to return to duty in a sensitive position if it is determined that this action would not pose a danger to public health or safety or the national security.

The results of a drug test and information developed by the agency in the course of the drug testing of the employee may be considered in processing any adverse action against the employee or for other administrative purposes.

Preliminary test results may not be used in an administrative proceeding unless they are confirmed by a second analysis of the same sample or unless the employee confirms the accuracy of the initial test by admitting the use of illegal drugs.

The determination of an agency that an employee uses illegal drugs can be made on the basis of any appropriate evidence, including direct observation, a criminal conviction, administrative inquiry, or the results of an authorized testing program. Positive drug test results may be rebutted by other evidence that an employee has not used illegal drugs.

Any action to discipline an employee who is using illegal drugs (including removal from the service, if appropriate) shall be taken in compliance with otherwise applicable procedures, including the Civil Service Reform Act.

Drug testing shall not be conducted pursuant to this Order for the purpose of gathering evidence for use in criminal proceedings. Agencies are not required to report to the Attorney General for investigation or prosecution any information, allegation, or evidence relating to violations of Title 21 of the United States Code received as a result of the operation of drug testing programs established pursuant to this Order.

The Attorney General shall render legal advice regarding the implementation of this Order and shall be consulted with regard to all guidelines, regulations, and policies proposed to be adopted pursuant to this Order.

Nothing in this Order shall be deemed to limit the authorities of the Director of Central Intelligence under the National Security Act of 1947, as amended, or the statutory authorities of the National Security Agency or the Defense Intelligence Agency. Implementation of this Order within the Intelligence Community, as defined in Executive Order No. 12333, shall be subject to the approval of the head of the affected agency.

For purposes of this Order, the term ``illegal drugs'' means a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II, as defined by section 802(6) of Title 21 of the United States Code, the possession of which is unlawful under chapter 13 of that Title. The term ``illegal drugs'' does not mean the use of a controlled substance pursuant to a valid prescription or other uses authorized by law.

Other positions that the agency head determines involve law enforcement, national security, the protection of life and property, public health or safety, or other functions requiring a high degree of trust and confidence.

For purposes of this Order, the term ``Employee Assistance Program'' means agency-based counseling programs that offer assessment, short-term counseling, and referral services to employees for a wide range of drug, alcohol, and mental health programs that affect employee job performance. Employee Assistance Programs are responsible for referring drug-using employees for rehabilitation and for monitoring employees' progress while in treatment.

Drugs are menacing our Nation. When Nancy and I spoke to the Nation last evening about what we Americans can do to win the fight against illegal drugs, we said that it is time to pull together. All Americans -- in our schools, our jobs, our neighborhoods -- must work together. No one level of government, no single institution, no lone group of citizens can eliminate the horror of drug abuse.

From the beginning of my Administration, I pledged to make the fight against drug abuse one of my highest priorities. We have taken strong steps to turn the tide against illegal drugs. To reduce the supply of drugs available in our country, we moved aggressively against the growers, producers, transporters, smugglers, and traffickers. Our spending for drug law enforcement has nearly tripled since 1981. To reduce demand, we plotted a course to encourage those who use drugs to stop and those who do not, never to begin. I am especially pleased at the success that the military has experienced, reducing drug usage by over 67 percent among our Armed Forces. And as a direct result of Nancy's leadership and commitment, over 10,000 ``Just Say No'' clubs have been formed throughout the United States over the past few years to discourage drug use among our youth.

I am announcing a set of initiatives that will build upon what we have already accomplished. This set of initiatives, totaling almost $900 million in Fiscal Year 1987 in additional resources targeted to ridding our society of drugs, brings our total Federal contribution for fighting drugs to over $3 billion.

Our initiatives are composed of several separate budget amendments; a six-title bill seeking stronger authority for our law enforcement personnel, both at home and abroad, increased penalties for taking part in the sale of illegal drugs, and establishing a new program to help our schools reach our youngsters before drugs reach them; and an Executive order setting the example for our Nation's workplaces by achieving a drug-free Federal work force.

Through separate budget amendments that I will soon transmit, I will request $100 million for State grants to enhance our capacity in this country to treat drug users. We must put a stop to the tragedy of a drug user who seeks help and cannot get urgently needed treatment. I will request $34 million for increased research into the most successful rehabilitation and treatment methods. Our expanded research will include a focus on better ways to intervene with high-risk children and adolescents. I will also request $69 million for grants to communities that show they can pull together to fight the scourge in their neighborhoods. Federal matching funds will be made available to help these communities to increase education, prevention, and rehabilitation efforts.

Our law enforcement and interdiction efforts must be increased as well. I will propose substantial increased funding -- approximately $400 million in 1987 -- for a major new enforcement initiative along our southwest border. A similar initiative will be proposed for our southeast border, involving at least $100 million in added funds.

I will be proposing shortly appropriate budget amendments to ensure that these necessary funds are made available. At the same time, other activities will be scaled back in order not to add to the Federal deficit.

The legislation I transmit today, the ``Drug-Free America Act of 1986,'' is the second component of the greatly increased anti-drug abuse effort to which I have pledged my Administration. This legislation is a six-titled measure that, when enacted, will be the cornerstone of our efforts.

I, the ``Drug-Free Federal Workplace Act of 1986,'' enables the Federal government, as the Nation's largest employer, to set an example in ensuring a drug-free workplace. The enactment of this title will make clear that the use of illegal drugs by current or prospective Federal employees will not be tolerated.

III, the ``Substance Abuse Services Amendments of 1986,'' responds to the grave health threat that the use of illegal drugs presents. It extends, from Fiscal Year 1988 through Fiscal Year 1992, the block grant under which funds are made available to the States for alcohol and drug abuse and mental health programs, and eliminates several unnecessary restrictions contained in current law that limit the flexibility of the States in putting these funds to work where they are most needed.

IV, the ``Drug Interdiction and International Cooperation Act of 1986,'' emphasizes the need for increased and better international cooperation in the fight against drugs. This important set of proposals improves the procedures used in seizing the proceeds of narcotics-related crimes committed in other countries, facilitates the participation of United States law enforcment personnel in drug enforcement operations abroad, and ensures that aliens in this country who are convicted of illegal drug offenses can be deported.

V, the ``Anti-Drug Enforcement Act of 1986,'' contains several measures that make available the necessary tools to our law enforcement personnel and our courts to ensure that those convicted of illegal drug offenses are both suitably punished and deprived of the fruits of their unlawful labors. This title also substantially increases penalties for drug trafficking and establishes additional penalties for persons who take advantage of and employ juveniles in drug trafficking. This title provides the tools to go after the manufacturers of ``designer drugs,'' and hits drug traffickers in their pocketbooks by cracking down hard on money laundering, a practice widely used to conceal the illegal origin of large amounts of cash.

I applaud the Congress for grappling with the drug abuse problem on a timely basis, and I urge speedy consideration of these proposals. But I do not for a moment suggest that enactment of these legislative proposals will result, by itself, in the elimination of illegal drugs in America. This can only happen when all Americans join together in the fight against drugs. Prompt enactment by the Congress of this package of our legislative proposals is an essential step in our plan to eliminate drug abuse.

Administration's anti-drug initiative, an Executive order that supports the objectives contained in Title I of the proposed legislation. The Executive Order puts in place the policy that the use of drugs by Federal employees, either on duty or off duty, will not be tolerated. I am directing the head of each Federal agency to develop a plan to achieve a drug-free workplace and authorizing drug testing for applicants for all Federal jobs and for employees in certain sensitive positions. I am directing that programs to counsel, treat, and rehabilitate employees found to be using illegal drugs be expanded.

Over the years, our country has never hesitated to defend itself against the attack of any enemy, however formidable and whatever the odds. In many ways, the enemy facing us now -- illegal drugs -- is as formidable as any we have ever encountered. As a result of the combined actions of all Americans we will achieve the goal we all seek -- a drug-free America for ourselves and for our children.

President today announced his intention to nominate Everett E. Bierman, of Virginia, as Ambassador to Papua New Guinea, and to serve concurrently and without additional compensation as Ambassador to the Solomon Islands. He would succeed Paul Fisher Gardner.

The President. Well, it has been a great pleasure for me to welcome, again, Shimon Peres to the White House. He's a valued friend, a statesman and a spokesman for peace, and a leader of the Government of Israel, a country with whom the United States has deep and special ties. Our meeting today reflected the close dialog that Israel and the United States enjoy as friends and partners.

Item number one was our commitment to continuing the search for a negotiated peace between Israel and all of its Arab neighbors. We noted favorable trends in the Middle East, not just the longing for peace by the Israeli and Arab peoples but constructive actions taken by leaders in the region to breathe new life into the peace process. No one has done more than Prime Minister Peres to that end. His vision, his statesmanship, and his tenacity are greatly appreciated here.

In this connection, we have just witnessed an auspicious event: the meeting between Prime Minister Peres and President Mubarak of Egypt following successful negotiations on a formula for resolving the Taba dispute. Egypt and Israel have once again demonstrated that Arab-Israeli differences can best be resolved through direct negotiations. We're also heartened by the continued efforts of King Hussein of Jordan as well as the historic meeting between King Hassan of Morocco and Prime Minister Peres. There is reason for optimism and hope.

Prime Minister Peres and I have agreed that a steady, determined effort is needed by all if the remaining obstacles to direct negotiations are to be surmounted. So, our two governments today reiterate our pledge to keep pushing toward a lasting peace.

In our discussions we also reviewed many aspects of the close and mutually beneficial relations between our countries, including the need to maintain a strong and secure Israel. To this end, not only is military strength essential but also a vigorous, growing Israeli economy.

Prime Minister Peres and his colleagues in Israel's national unity government have achieved remarkable success in stabilizing their economy. They are now turning their attention to growth, with our full encouragement and support.

I emphasized to Prime Minister Peres that the United States Government remains deeply concerned about the plight of Soviet Jewry and that this subject will continue to be an important part of our dialog with the Soviet Union. We also discussed the scourge of terrorism and our revulsion over the recent murder of the innocent in Istanbul and Karachi. The lives of Jews, Moslems, Hindus, and Christians were taken in this attack on civilization.

Israelis and Americans can be proud of the relationship between our two countries. The common values and interests that bring us together sustain us both, and the many levels of cooperation between us provide a rich substance to our ties. We look forward to building on the good will and trust so evident between our governments and peoples. And so, again, I say it's been a pleasure having Prime Minister Peres here.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, it is with satisfaction that I join you at a conclusion of yet another most productive meeting where your dedication to peace in the Middle East and your long-recognized friendship to the people of Israel -- may I say, to the Jewish people all over the world -- found one small, concrete expression.

When we met 2 years ago, we laid out policies and strategies for peace, security, and economic development. These were mostly accomplished, much, due to your friendship and determination. Today we look at the future. I am certain that what we have planned will be implemented with equal imagination, dedication, and resolve.

On the peace front, we have prepared the ground for a new drive. The end of the war in Lebanon, the beginning of what President Mubarak termed a new era in the Israeli-Egyptian relations, a policy that keeps doors open for coexistence and peaceful relations on the West Bank and Gaza, the search for a Jordanian-Palestinian platform for progress -- all pave the ground for the next phase. There is always a difference between uprooting a tree and making a forest grow. Confrontation is by definition a single event. Peacemaking is a process which requires constant patience, cultivation. I am certain that together we can sail to new shores of understanding in pacifying our region.

We are for, clearly, direct negotiation on a bilateral ground between each of the parties concerned. And international support can provide the parties with an opportunity of an opening occasion, but negotiations should remain between the parties concerned. For the international participation, we shall accept only parties that respect peace and human rights, and we shall not compromise on it. Small as we may be, we are not going to depart from conviction and principles that should be respected by all, small and large at the same time.

I would like to thank you for the depth of your understanding, for the empathy, enjoying the basic rights, the basic rights of a people under your leadership, Mr. President. The free world has made real progress toward democracy, toward freedom, toward security, and toward prosperity. And all of us, wherever we may be, have enjoyed this very imaginative and determined leadership. I would like to thank you for a wind of hope and optimism that you have added to the life of the free world and to our own country and our own people. Thank you very much.

Nosocomial (hospital-associated) infections directly cause more than twenty thousand deaths annually. They contribute indirectly to an additional sixty thousand deaths every year. Approximately one-third of all such infections, according to public health experts, are preventable. While doctors have long been aware of this problem in hospitals, there is new and growing concern about the spread of infection in day care centers. There is no way of reckoning the human cost of these infectious diseases. But we do know that the days lost from school and work as a result of these diseases and the cost of treating them create a great financial burden for the American public.

Scientific evidence has shown that improved health practices, such as proper hand-washing in health care and educational facilities, can significantly reduce the spread of infections, especially staphylococcal infections, which are a threat to hospital patients, and meningitis and diarrheal diseases, which can be contracted in day care centers that neglect proper hygienic practices.

Health Service investigators are continuing vital research. They are optimistic that new discoveries will lead to the development of improved techniques for diagnosing, treating, and preventing the spread of infectious diseases.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President. U.S. support for the democratic process has been and continues to be the foundation of our Philippine policy. During the last years of the administration of former President Marcos, our specific policy goals, goals which enjoyed wide bipartisan support in Congress, were: to support Filipino efforts to reform and strengthen their political institutions; to encourage free-market reforms aimed at dismantling monopoly structures and reducing government intervention in the economy; and to support military reform aimed, particularly, at restoring military professionalism and ending military abuses of individual and human rights.

The culmination of our policy was the support and encouragement the United States gave to Filipino efforts to ensure that the February Presidential elections were free, fair, and credible. As you know, the United States support included sending an official delegation to observe those elections. Clearly, those elections were not conducted in a manner credible to the Filipino people. The events of February leading to the peaceful transition to a popular new government were a tribute to the deeply felt Filipino commitment to democracy.

The President. President Aquino's government has undertaken significant initial measures to revive the economy, whose previous decline had been one key contributing factor to the insurgency's growth. We hope these efforts will continue and that once the macroeconomic policies are in place additional measures targeted on the rural economy will be considered. Her government has also taken important steps to restore professionalism and capabilities to the Armed Forces. The ongoing efforts to explore the possibility of a cease-fire and amnesty with the Communist insurgents deserve a chance to be tested. At the same time, President Aquino has made clear from the outset that if her efforts to find a peaceful solution are rejected she will take appropriate measures, including whatever military action is necessary.

As for the nature of U.S. aid, we are in full agreement with President Aquino that priority must be given to economic aid to assist in economic recovery and equitable growth. This does not imply that military aid is not also required. U.S. Government officials, including the Secretary of State, have consulted closely with the Philippine Government on the need for continued military assistance to enhance the Philippine military's capacity to meet the threat posed by the Communist insurgency.

The President. The United States and the Philippines share the same interest in the preservation of freedom and democracy in the Pacific region. For this reason, I am confident that we will continue to enjoy a strong mutal defense relationship for the foreseeable future.

President Aquino has pledged publicly to respect the military bases agreement through its current term. We understand and respect her position. We will discuss the future of our defense relations during the next scheduled review of these commitments in 1988.

The President. The Philippine people must be the judge of the government they want in the Philippines. Given the Philippine people's deep and demonstrated commitment to democracy, I find it unlikely they would accept a government which included individuals whose goals are the very antithesis of democracy.

The President. I prefer not to deal with hypothetical situations. The United States policy is that we will neither confirm nor deny the presence of nuclear weapons aboard ships, aircraft, or stored in any facilities.

Do you support President Aquino's economic recovery plan and her efforts to reduce the Philippines $26 billion debt vis-a-vis the private banks, the multilateral lending agencies, and in the Paris Club; and will the Baker plan benefit the Philippines?

The President. We strongly support the important actions that President Aquino and her government have taken to promote economic recovery in the Philippines. The government's tax reform program and the moves undertaken to break up the monopolies which have controlled the markets for certain commodities are vital steps toward restoration of a vigorous, growth-oriented, free-market economy. Significant steps are also being taken to liberalize existing trade restrictions and to bring public sector spending down to healthier levels. We anticipate continued progress in these essential areas as well.

Over the next few years, as the Philippine economy emerges from recession and begins to recognize its enormous potential, further Paris Club and private bank debt reschedulings may be necessary. This temporary adjustment period will give the Philippine Government the opportunity it needs to reestablish a solid basis for economic growth in the 1990's and beyond. The program for sustained growth proposed by Secretary [of the Treasury] Baker last year calls for the sort of structural economic reform now being initiated by the Philippines. Reforms such as these may be eligible for the lending support of the multilateral development banks.

The President. The aid package my administration has developed to assist the new Philippine Government in its economic recovery efforts includes and goes beyond the aid committed under the bases-related ``best efforts'' pledge. The major elements of the package include: an additional grant of $100 million in Economic Support Funds (ESF) during fiscal year 1986, recently appropriated by the Congress and which will soon be made available; the provision of $200 million of previous year ESF as direct support to the Philippine Government budget; conversion of $100 million of development assistance from loan to grant; and a supplemental grant of $50 million of military assistance in fiscal year 1986. The United States is increasing ``people-to-people'' assistance, such as feeding programs for infants and school children and health programs to reduce infant and child mortality. These programs are generally administered by private voluntary organizations.

The President. We are working hard to increase both trade with and investment in the Philippines. We believe that these are the real keys to the restoration of economic growth. In June Secretary [of State] Shultz gave a speech in New York to a group of U.S. business and banking executives in which he described the real potential for economic recovery in the Philippines and encouraged U.S. investors to participate. Businessmen, of course, will make their decisions on the basis of their own calculations of the Philippines economic potential. We believe the Philippine economy is on the road to recovery. We also believe businessmen will make a similar assessment.

The President. The activities of the supporters of former President Marcos are not a real threat to the stability of the Philippine Government. The new Government enjoys the widespread support of the Filipino people and of the major sectors of Philippine society. Filipinos are now working at building new, democratically elected political institutions.

The supporters of former President Marcos can best serve their country by working to strengthen Philippine democracy by participating in a constructive manner in the process of institution building. Clearly, the real threat to Philippine democracy is the threat posed by the Communist insurgency.

Daniloff matter is an issue of continuing and increasing concern to the United States. Until Nick Daniloff is free the U.S.-Soviet relationship will be businesslike, but it will not be business as usual. We will, in every forum, raise the Daniloff matter and continue to raise it until Nick Daniloff is free. We will examine each of our contacts and arrangements with the Soviets in light of the Daniloff case.

Shevardnadze, and we will raise the issue as the first item on the agenda. In addition, we will be continuing to raise it in our talks on nuclear testing at Geneva, as the sixth session of the nuclear space talks resumes Thursday in Geneva; at the Chautauqua Conference; and, as I say, at the Shultz-Shevardnadze meeting. The longer Nick Daniloff is held in the Soviet Union, the more it will affect our relationship with the Soviets.

Whitman, a man who looked deeply into the meaning of things, penned those words long before so many Americans of Hispanic descent, with courage above and beyond the call of duty, distinguished themselves in battle defending our liberty. He penned those words when there was considerable discrimination against Hispanics. And yet he saw what I consider one of the most admirable of all Hispanic traits: the resolve to maintain dignity even in times of great adversity.

Never was that brought home to me more clearly than when I was Governor of California and I visited the site of a tragic mudslide. You know, in California if the ground isn't shaking you or the rain isn't flooding you or the drought isn't drying everything up, why, you'll find that the hillsides can, under a rain, start coming down. And this had happened. It was near Santa Barbara. And I went equipped with knee boots, because we were out deep in the mud that had come down into a very nice and lovely little settlement of homes there close to the highway. And one elderly gentleman invited me into his house, and we went in, standing knee-deep in that sloppy mud. And it was apparent that he had evidently just newly furnished this house, and the furniture -- there it was, standing -- or sitting in all of that mud. And as we stood there in the living room, he said to me, ``Mi casa es su casa,'' with all the dignity, as if there was no mud and he had invited me in for just a friendly visit. I've never forgotten him.

One of the major goals of our administration has been to expand opportunity to all Americans. And if I read the Hispanic community right, that's all that's expected. I've always found it strange that the idea that people should work hard to support their families and improve their well-being is labeled the ``Protestant work ethic.'' From everything I know, it could be called the Hispanic work ethic. One need only look to an individual with us today to understand what I mean. I'm referring to Hector Barreto, a man who early in his life picked potatoes for a living. With freedom and opportunity available to him, with hard work and a commitment to excellence, he is today a successful businessman and president of the United States Hispanic Chamber of Commerce. Hector, I understand that the Hispanic Chamber's convention will open tomorrow in Denver. Well, I hope you'll convey my best wishes.

And that's one of the reasons during this last campaign I pushed so hard for tax reform. It took a while for the idea to catch on. The critics claimed it was a nothing issue, but we kept pushing. Only 6 months ago the naysayers said it was dead, but we didn't give up. And let me assure all of you, when I sign tax reform into law, which I expect to do shortly, I'm going to remind every young person in the country not to give up just because someone tells them something can't be done. I know before I became Governor there was a great deal of criticism about the fact that I'd had no previous experience in that job. You know, I found that that wasn't all a disadvantage. It's wonderful, sometimes, to not know the things you can't do -- and then you find out you can do them.

Well, our tax program will be a major boon to working people. It simplifies the system, reducing the number of tax brackets from 14 to 2 -- 15 percent and 28 percent. And I should say there will be 3 brackets, because many lower income people -- 6 million, we estimate -- will be taken off the rolls altogether.

Their bracket will be 0, so that's a third bracket -- 0, 15, and 28. This bill, which we fought so hard to get through the system, makes our code more fair and represents a tax reduction for most Americans.

There's been some talk that once our tax reform is in place the rates will be raised to pay for more spending. That would be an intolerable breach of faith with the American people. We didn't achieve this historic tax reform to have it undermined by the big taxers. I pledge today to oppose any effort to raise the tax rates and negate the hard-fought progress that we've made. In addition, I call on all Members of Congress to take the same pledge: Ask them to take my pledge on tax rates -- 15, 28, and, for corporations, 34.

We are a richly diverse nation, and it's our dream of opportunity and freedom that unites all Americans of every descent. Today it's my pleasure to join my fellow Americans in honoring our friends, neighbors, and colleagues who are of Hispanic descent. So, thank all of you for being here today. God bless you all.

The nuclear and space talks (NST) resume tomorrow with the opening of round six in Geneva. This could prove to be a very important phase in the strong effort being made by the United States to get Soviet agreement to deep reductions in nuclear arms. If the Soviets are as determined as we are, there is a real chance for such reductions.

United States is fully committed to achieving genuine arms reductions -- and soon. It is in this spirit that I wrote to General Secretary Gorbachev in July, further amplifying our positions on the full range of arms control issues. In this letter I specifically sought areas of common ground where we and the Soviet Union could most productively focus our efforts to reach agreement. My letter dealt with expressed Soviet concerns and identified immediate, practical steps that can move us in the direction of our ultimate goal: the total elimination of nuclear arms. We are now awaiting a constructive Soviet response. Our ideas offer a solid basis for negotiations toward agreements beneficial to both sides. If the Soviets offer a serious response, we can look forward to a productive round.

In the weeks leading up to Friday's meeting between Secretary [of State] Shultz and [Soviet] Foreign Minister Shevardnadze, the United States has undertaken expert-level discussions with the Soviets in the four key areas of the U.S.-Soviet agenda. This includes human rights, regional, bilateral, and arms control issues. We hope that these discussions have helped to facilitate progress in some areas, including the nuclear and space talks.

Our goals in the nuclear and space talks, and in arms control in general, remain constant. We seek to strengthen strategic stability and truly diminish the risk of nuclear war. This means removing the capability and incentive for the Soviet Union to conduct a disarming first strike. It means preserving the ability to deter war at the lowest possible level of forces. Therefore, our overriding priority in these talks is the achievement of agreements which will bring about deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the nuclear arsenals of both the United States and the Soviet Union.

Of course, if the benefits of such agreements are to be realized, they must be fully complied with by both sides. The Soviet Union has continued to violate key provisions of existing arms control agreements, and this pattern of violations threatens to undermine the entire arms control process. We therefore will continue to press the Soviets to correct their noncompliance, and thereby strengthen the prospects for achieving real arms reductions. We also will insist that verification be a key feature of any new agreement.

In my July letter to Mr. Gorbachev I expanded upon these American proposals and offered some new ideas. In Geneva our negotiators will be able to offer concrete new details in all three areas. In addition, Secretary Shultz is prepared to discuss these issues -- along with our human rights, regional, and bilateral concerns -- with Foreign Minister Shevardnadze. These discussions can help to lay the groundwork for a second summit meeting between Mr. Gorbachev and myself in the United States later this year, as agreed at our first summit meeting in Geneva.

I want to emphasize, however, that the Soviet treatment of American journalist Nicholas Daniloff continues to limit severely what is achievable in our bilateral relations. I therefore urge the Soviet Union to resolve this case promptly before it does even more damage to the relationship between our two countries.

The time has come for practical achievements in all areas of our relations. As far as the Geneva negotiations are concerned, the United States has demonstrated that we are doing our part to bring about meaningful arms reductions. This round should tell us whether the Soviet Union is similarly dedicated.

I was privileged to receive today, from Chief Justice Warren E. Burger in his capacity as Chairman, the second report of the Commission on the Bicentennial of the United States Constitution. Since this is the 199th anniversary of the signing of the Constitution, the Commission's report is particularly timely.

The Commission's report demonstrates considerable progress thus far, and much of the credit must go to Chief Justice Burger for his special, personal commitment to the Commission's important work. In retiring as Chief Justice of the United States and dedicating himself to serve as the Commission's Chairman, he has ensured that the Constitution will be honored on its bicentennial in a manner the Nation deserves. I expect to take an active role in the celebration of our Constitution's bicentennial as it proceeds, and I call upon all Americans to support the Commission's work.

Corazon Aquino. Her courage and her commitment to democracy, mirroring those same qualities in the Filipino people, have inspired the world, and it's been an honor to have her as our guest. President Aquino and I discussed her strenuous efforts to bolster the democratic institutions of her country and to ensure its security and strengthen its economy. And I assured her that all America wants the Philippine democracy to succeed and to prosper and that we'll do what we can to help.

These have been trying times in the Philippines. President Aquino has been overseeing an historic transition. In the coming months a new constitution will be submitted which will pave the way for strong, democratically elected local and national governments. In the meantime, President Aquino has been doing her level best to unite her richly diverse people under a banner of freedom and opportunity. Her efforts to reconcile all elements of her society and bring them into the democratic process are applauded here. I might add that her personal bravery in this heroic endeavor to diffuse conflict has won the hearts and imagination of the people everywhere.

It includes attacking the root political, economic, and social problems that feed insurgencies. The second half of the formula is building the Philippine military into a professional, properly armed and trained force that is capable of dealing with any threat. The United States stands ready to assist President Aquino in her quest to create a stable and secure land as well as in her commitment to invigorate the Philippine economy.

During our discussion today, President Aquino reaffirmed her belief that free enterprise is the surest path to development, the surest method of opening the door of opportunity and advancement to all her people.

Her government stands for free trade and is encouraging private investment. She knows in the long run nothing would better serve the Filipino people than unleashing the entrepreneurial spirit and putting the creative and economy-building power of the marketplace to work. As one might surmise, after hearing this, I'm bullish on the Philippines. I would hope American as well as foreign investors take notice of this incredible opportunity to help build a country. For our part, we will mold our efforts to encourage development in the Philippines. Today, for example, we discussed the idea of increasing Philippine exports to the United States, including improved treatment under our generalized system of preferences.

We also considered ways in which the Philippines can provide a larger share of the goods and services consumed by the U.S. military facilities within that country. And just a side note, when talking about those bases, our two countries share common interests in the peace and stability of the Pacific region. I'm confident that we will continue to enjoy a strong mutual defense relationship for the foreseeable future.

President Aquino reaffirmed today that the military bases agreement will be respected through its current term. I understand and am comfortable with her position. The next review of our defense relations is scheduled in 1988, and that gives us and the people of the Philippines plenty of time to think about it.

In the meantime, I will continue to ask Congress for appropriate levels of economic and military assistance above and beyond existing U.S. base-related commitments. The latest installment of our current aid effort -- a $100 million grant of economic support funds, which I'm pleased to announce will be signed by our respective Cabinet members in a few moments, a $50 million grant of military assistance, along with a $20 million package of medical supplies and services -- has been approved. In the future, to the largest extent possible, future U.S. aid will be designed to provide the greatest benefit without exacerbating the country's debt burden.

And one last thought: Today governments, businesses, financial institutions, and individuals are dealing with a new kind of government in the Philippines. We're dealing with a noble and honest people -- people with ideals, people we can trust. And we place a high value on character and hope everyone appreciates this and takes it into account. A great Filipino hero, Dr. Jose Rizal, once wrote, ``God is justice: He cannot abandon His cause, the cause of liberty, without which no justice is possible.'' Well, Jose Rizal, like President Aquino's husband, died for freedom and inspired his nation.

Aquino and I reaffirmed the commitment of our two peoples to the ideals which so many Americans and Filipinos have given their lives, and we also reaffirm the bonds of friendship and affection between the United States and the Philippines. It was truly an honor to have her here. Thank you, and God bless you.

Aquino. Thank you, President Reagan. This has been an opportunity to get to know each other, to explore common issues together. Above all, though, I can say that for my part the most important aspect has been the chance to meet each other.

We are both politicians who set great store on face-to-face encounters. Government-to-government contacts have their proper place, yet when the leadership of a country changes in such a dramatic fashion, as happened in the Philippines, it is only right that the Presidents of two such close allies meet and get to know each other. Issues do not generate of their own accord the decisions that will resolve them. In the end, decisions will be made by the people who have the responsibility to make them.

From this meeting today both our governments will go out with a clear sense of priorities, with a recognition that we must both work hard to strengthen the bonds between us. I hope we have set the tone and direction for a new relationship. By recovering our democracy, we Filipinos have recovered our self-confidence and pride and hence our ability to deal with our major ally on an equal footing. This is the only basis for a relationship between friends, and I think we were able to start on that agenda today. I was able to explain to President Reagan the problems we have inherited, all of them rooted in a devastated economy. I was also able to outline to him what we are doing to set things right. I am gratified that President Reagan understands and supports what we are trying to do.

As you know, we have placed our faith in the private sector as the stimulus of growth. I also briefed the President on the wide range of reforms we have embarked on to resolve our difficulties. A new constitution is in the final stages of drafting. There will be a referendum on it followed by elections early next year. We are carrying out a long-overdue program of military reform.

Within this context of an economic reconstruction, political rebuilding, and military reform, we can combat our remaining problem: the insurgency. As you know, we are pursuing a political approach, but this is backed by the military option. In all these areas of rebuilding, I hope we can count on American support and understanding.

But most important, reform is being done in a new environment of freedom, human rights, and democracy. So, as today's discussions showed, we have a lot of values in common again. We admire freedom and hard work in just the way you do.

For two countries who have a faith in God, in freedom, in the family, and in democratic values, we should allow nothing to come in the way of an ever-growing friendship. Today was a good beginning, and I thank you all for it.

William Rehnquist has served with great distinction as an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court for the last 15 years. Known as an extraordinary legal mind from his early years in law, Justice Rehnquist earned renown in the Court for the brilliance of his reason and the clarity and craftsmanship of his opinions.

I have no doubt that William Rehnquist will prove to be a Chief Justice of historic stature. Judge Scalia is also widely regarded in his profession as a first-class intellect, a persuasive jurist, and a warm, caring person. He will make a superb addition to the Court.

This vote in the full Senate is a bipartisan rejection of the political posturing that marred the confirmation hearings. It's clear to all now that the extraordinary controversy surrounding the hearings had little to do with Justice Rehnquist's record or character -- both are unassailable and unimpeachable. The attacks came from those whose ideology runs contrary to his profound and unshakable belief in the proper constitutional role of the judiciary in this country. Justice Rehnquist believes, as I do, that our Founding Fathers did not create the Supreme Court as a kind of supralegislature; that judges should interpret the law, not make it; and that victims of crime are due at least as much consideration from our judicial system as criminal offenders. Both Chief Justice Rehnquist and Associate Justice Scalia will be strong and eloquent voices for the proper role of the judiciary and the rights of victims, and I am confident that they will both serve the Court and their country very well indeed.

In this coming year, as we celebrate the 200th anniversary of the signing of the Constitution of the United States, all Americans should reflect upon the precious heritage of liberty under law passed on to us by our Founding Fathers.

Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, call upon appropriate government officials to display the flag of the United States on all government buildings on Citizenship Day, September 17, 1986. I urge Federal, State, and local officials, as well as leaders of civic, educational, and religious organizations to conduct ceremonies and programs that day to commemorate the occasion.

I proclaim the week beginning September 17 and ending September 23, 1986, as Constitution Week, and I urge all Americans to observe that week with appropriate ceremonies and activities in their schools, churches, and other suitable places.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Thank you. And thank you, Henson. You know, they tell me that with my job goes the title of Commander in Chief. And I know that in the military the top commanders can dictate the uniform. And right now I'm dictating the uniform.

As I was leaving this morning, Nancy asked me to pass on to you her message. You heard it from us both Sunday night: that when it comes to drugs, please -- for yourselves, your families, for your community and for your country -- just say no. [Applause] Well, thank you, and -- all of you students being here firsthand to learn about our democratic process -- and that's the most important lesson there is to learn in this free country of ours.

Henson told us, it is time for a new day to dawn in Louisiana. And like the sun coming up over the horizon, I see a new Senator for this State -- a fighter for Louisiana, a strong, effective leader, with a reputation for integrity. And I'm talking about our friend Henson Moore, the next United States Senator from the great State of Louisiana. I've seen this man work in Washington, and believe me, there is none better. Henson Moore has a proven record in the Congress.

He's been in the vanguard of the battle to bring America back with pride and patriotism. And with his help in the Senate, we're going to keep America standing tall and proud and free. You know, Henson tells me about when he was a boy growing up in Hackberry, in the southwestern part of Louisiana, and how when he and his friends used to go swimming out in the bayous they'd always have one fellow stay in the boat, keeping a lookout for alligators. Well, I think you'll know what I'm talking about when I say that's why America needs Henson Moore in Washington -- keeping a lookout for Louisiana's interests and keeping America out of the clutches of the liberal tax and spenders.

Now, it's no secret that there are still some folks in Washington who want to put America full speed in reverse -- back to the days when big government, taxes, and inflation were destroying our economy, and military weakness made America a punching bag for every fanatic and two-bit dictator around the world. America used to have a sign around its neck that said, ``Kick Me.'' We threw that sign away, and now it says, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' It's important to remember those days 5\1/2\ years ago, because like gators in the marsh grass, the tax-and-spend crew is still lurking in the shadows, just waiting for a second chance to slash our military and to raise your taxes. We're not going to let them, are we?

The President. The liberal leadership of the Democratic Party hasn't changed; they're still addicted to high taxes and inflation. They're just itching to repeal our tax cuts, to replace our opportunity society with big government policies. And their foreign policy is still the same: slash defense and always, always blame America first.

You know, the liberal tax-and-spenders keep saying: Give us another try. And that reminds me of a story of the farmer who took his son duck hunting. They were sitting there in the blind when a mallard came down, landed on the water right in front of them. Well, the father raised up his gun and fired, and the mallard just kept on sitting there peaceful as could be. He took a second shot, and when the smoke cleared, the mallard was still there, so he tried a third time. And this time the mallard took off and flew away. And the father turned to his son and said, ``Son, you have just witnessed a miracle. You've just seen a dead duck fly.'' [Laughter] Well, those old, wornout policies have about as much chance of flying as a dead duck. It seems that the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party will never change their ways. Still, as I've often said, you don't have to make them see the light -- just make them feel the heat.

So, let's turn up the heat on September 27th. Let's get out that vote, because I'm convinced the bigger the turnout the better Henson will do -- and the better Henson does, the better for Louisiana and for America. It's time for some people to realize the party is over. It's morning and it's time to get back to work. The old politics are out. Louisiana is looking to a bold, new future, and Henson Moore is going to take us there.

You can be proud of Henson Moore. He's earned a reputation in Washington as an effective leader, someone who gets things done for Louisiana, but never at the expense of principle or integrity. He would never put personal ambition above what's good for Louisiana. This State doesn't need a part-time Representative in Washington like Henson's opponent who, as a Congressman, missed over 1,000 votes -- that's the equivalent of 2 whole years of work. Louisiana needs an effective advocate in Washington, and believe me, there is no better leader to take Louisiana into a new day than Henson Moore. During his years in Congress, he's been an untiring advocate of a strong America. Due in great part to Henson's effectiveness in the Congress, America is rebuilding its defenses and has once again regained its rightful role as leader of the free world.

I'm down here to tell you today that Henson Moore is one of those builders and dreamers and visionaries. Under his leadership, and with some help from his friends in the administration, it's going to be comeback time for Louisiana. With Henson's help, we cut our tax rates, squashed inflation, spurring an economic expansion that has already created over 11\1/2\ million new jobs. Today employment, the percentage of Americans working, is at a record high. Not many people know that the potential employment pool is officially considered to be everyone in America, male and female, from 16 years of age up. And today 61.2 percent of that pool of Americans is employed, which is the highest percentage in the history of this country. But we're not going to stop there. We're going to keep this country growing until every State and every sector of the economy joins in America's prosperity, until every American, every Louisianan, who wants a job has a job.

Believe me, Louisiana isn't the only place where the total domination by one party has led to stagnation, arrogance, and the abuse of power. Back in 1980 we faced the same situation in Washington until we ended over 30 years of one-party control in the Senate, breaking the logjam and putting America back on the road to prosperity. We did bring America back. And it's time to break that one-party logjam in this State and bring Louisiana back, too. And Henson Moore is the man to do it. America has slain some mighty dragons in the last 6 years, but Henson and I both know we've got a lot more to slay. I know and you know that a strong energy industry is essential to our national security. And that's why we're working to deregulate natural gas, we're fighting to repeal the windfall profits tax and the fuel use act, and why we're increasing the strategic petroleum reserve. And at the urging of Henson Moore and others, we will undertake a high-level review of America's energy-related national security concerns. America must never again be left dependent upon unreliable foreign sources of oil. And talk about an effective advocate for your State: Henson came to the Oval Office and we agreed on a resolution to the 8G issue on the division of offshore oil revenue -- meaning more than $600 million for Louisiana this year. And that's what I call real leadership. Congratulations, Henson.

And to help our struggling farmers, we've been the most aggressive administration on record in opening up foreign markets for our agricultural products. We've worked effectively to increase exports for cotton and rice farmers, because we know that farmers don't need more government programs, they need more profits.

I didn't seek reelection to be a 6-year President. There are too many critical challenges still before America and too much business to be completed, and I can't have my hands tied by a totally hostile Congress.

I hope that you've noticed that I've been careful to refer to the liberal leadership, the leadership of the Democratic Party. And that's because I believe that the liberals who've taken control of that once great party don't represent the vast majority of hard-working, patriotic Democrats. I know I couldn't face a throng this large without knowing that many of you are Democrats and many of you also were Democrats and changed, including me -- I was one, too.

You know, it reminds me -- a little example of what happened some years ago and has kept on, something that happened to me when I was the drum major of the YMCA boys band in Dixon, Illinois. We were in a nearby town marching in their Declaration Day parade. And the parade marshal, on a big white horse, turned -- he was leading us -- and turned and went back down the parade route to see if everything was coming along all right. I'm now out in front leading the parade with my baton. And all of a sudden the music began to sound like it was getting faint, and I looked over my shoulder. Well, the marshal had ridden back just in time to get the band to turn a corner. And I was walking down the street all by myself. [Laughter] Well, that's exactly what's happened to the Democratic Party. The leadership is still walking down a street alone -- the Democratic rank and file turned to the right a long time ago.

I can sympathize with the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party, having walked down a street alone for a while. I know how tough it can be to break with tradition. As I told you, I was one once, and I know how tough it can be to change parties. But I remember what Winston Churchill said when, in the British Parliament, he changed parties and was criticized for this. He said, ``Some men change party for principle'' -- I mean, ``Some men change principle for party, and some change party for principle.'' And he had done the latter. So, I want all of Louisiana to know: The door is wide open; come on in and make yourself at home.

Well, it's wonderful to be here in New Orleans. We just had a humdinger of a rally out there in Jefferson Parish, as you've been told. And as I said there, it's great to be back on the campaign trail again. It feels almost like 1980 again. And the way they were cheering Henson Moore, it sounded like a homecoming game for the LSU Tigers. With the kind of enthusiasm that I've been seeing here today, I can tell the people of this State want someone representing them in Washington who's got a reputation for integrity -- someone who is progrowth, prodefense, and pro-America. And I can tell that pretty soon you're going to be sending Henson Moore to Washington as the next United States Senator from the great State of Louisiana.

All that, as they say, is history. More and more, the people of this State are rejecting the old politics as usual. As I said in Lafreniere Park, it's time for a new day to dawn in Louisiana. The party is over, and it's time to get back to work. There's a lot of work that still needs to be done to build the kind of future Louisiana deserves, and Henson Moore is the one to do it.

He's been a leader in the Congress in our fight to bring America back -- to build her strong with pride and patriotism. He's someone who gets things done for Louisiana, but never at the expense of principles or integrity. Louisiana doesn't need a part-time Representative in Washington, you need a Senator who speaks the same language as the majority and the President. I remember when Henson came to the Oval Office and we agreed on a resolution of the 8G issue in the division of offshore oil revenue -- meaning more than $600 million for Louisiana this year. And that's what I call leadership, and that's what Louisiana will get from Henson Moore.

But, you know, Henson's election will have reverberations way beyond the borders of Louisiana. His election would mean the difference between keeping control of the Senate or losing it to the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. And that's the difference between 2 more years of progress or 2 years of paralysis. I didn't seek reelection to be a 6-year President. There are too many exciting challenges still before America, too much business that still must be completed. I cannot and will not have my hands tied by a totally hostile Congress. Together, we can win the Senate. Together, we can send Henson Moore to Washington and keep America moving forward. You know, my name will never be on the ballot again, but don't think you can't vote for me. In a way, if you would like to vote for me again, vote for Henson Moore so that we can have a Republican Senate that'll work with me instead of against me and be around after I'm gone.

We can't stop until America's growing prosperity reaches into every corner of this country. We're making dramatic progress, but in some sectors we've still got a ways to go. It just doesn't seem fair that Louisiana is being held back from joining in America's prosperity by the old-style politics as usual. Believe me, Louisiana isn't the only place where the total domination of one party has led to arrogance and an abuse of power. Back in 1980 we faced the same situation in Washington until we ended over 30 years of one-party control in the Senate, breaking the logjam and putting America back on the road to prosperity. And we did bring America back. It's time to break the one-party logjam in this State and bring Louisiana back, too. And Henson Moore is the man that can do it.

Now, maybe you've noticed that I was careful before to say that I was talking about the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. And that's because I believe the liberals who've taken control of that once great party don't represent the vast majority of hard-working, patriotic Democrats all across this country.

And, no, I don't mistake the rank and file of the Democratic Party for its liberal leadership. And I'm grateful for all the help that these honest Democrats have given us these last few years. I'm sure there must be a number in this room who are and a number also who were and changed. Some of them may be former Democrats as I am; some haven't made the change. But we couldn't have been elected in 1980, we couldn't have brought America back, without the help of those Democrats. Because like us, they believe in the values of family and faith and love of country. Our Democratic allies deserve a vote of thanks, a real round of applause for all they're doing for America.

You know, a while ago, Richard Baker, the excellent candidate who's running for Henson Moore's seat, came up to visit me at the White House. And I've had many of your fine State and local officials over, too. You know, all of them were lifelong Democrats who switched to the Republican Party. And they said to me that the proud Democratic Party of their fathers' day and their grandfathers' day was no more. It had been captured by the liberal wing and dragged way over to the fringes on the left.

It is tough to change. But it's important to remember what Winston Churchill said about changing parties, ``Some men change principle for party, and some change party for principle.'' You know, one of the first to ever see what was happening in that party was many years ago, and long enough ago that I could say I was a young man then. [Laughter] And it was Mr.

Democrat, himself, in the north -- Al Smith -- who'd been candidate of the party for President. And Al Smith went out of his way to get time on nationwide radio -- no TV in those days -- and on nationwide radio he made a speech that was really an unusual thing. He told that the leadership of his party must have been in swimming and somebody else stole their clothes and became the leadership. And then, he said -- while he was a Democrat and always had been -- he said, ``I'm taking a walk.'' And that speech and that line of his -- I'm taking a walk -- was the forerunner of what so many more of us have come to know.

I know that it's kind of cliche to say, well, I didn't leave the party, the party left me. The funny thing is: It not only did that, but the party's changed. When I cast my first Democratic vote -- 21 years old -- for Roosevelt, the Democratic Party platform called for a 25-percent reduction in the cost of government; the return of authority and autonomy to the States and local communities that had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government; and the elimination of useless agencies, bureaus, and commissions in the Federal Government. Which party today could run on that platform? But as the time went on -- and even, as I say, the party that I later joined had undergone a change.

The Republicans, then, were the party of high tariff. The Democrats were the party of low tariff and nonprotectionism. And today that has turned around. So, in reality, anyone who believes in the Democratic Party of the past and the party of your fathers and before that -- you have no reason in the world not to change, because the two parties changed. And now you can do what you believe.

So, the door to the party of opportunity is wide open. And we're just hoping that on September 27 everyone in Louisiana, whether they're registered as a Democrat or Republican, will come out to vote for a man who has dedicated his life to building America strong and proud and free -- Henson Moore.

America's greatness doesn't reside in Washington, but in people like you whose hard work, dedication, and generosity keep America strong and keep our future free. So, I think I've taken too much of your time already. I just want to thank you again from the bottom of my heart. And you send this -- I called this team of yours -- your Congressman and Bob and Henson Moore and all -- the Louisiana A-Team. [Laughter] Send them up there to Washington. Believe me, we need them.

Thank you, Senator Denton, and thank all of you. I want you to know that the fellow you see standing before you considers himself one lucky man. You see, since becoming President, I've been able to visit Alabama not once or twice, but six times. I've been to this great State so often I've been thinking of having Air Force One wired to play ``Sweet Home Alabama.'' And it's especially good to be here with your mayor and my old friend, Emory Folmer.

But it's great to be here in Montgomery and great to get away from Washington and out among the people. Unfortunately, I can't stay too long. As Bill Dickinson, Sonny Callahan, and Jerry Denton know, Congress is still in session, and there's no telling what they're up to while the four of us are away. [Laughter] But I've come here today on serious business -- business that concerns all the people of Alabama and, indeed, all the people of the United States. Because what happens in this State on election day will have a direct effect on your lives and those of all Americans -- on the jobs you can get, on the taxes you pay, on the kinds of schools that your children are going to go to.

I have a feeling that you're tired of old-fashioned, out-of-touch politicians playing games with the democratic process. Am I right? [Applause] Well, this election will give you the chance to vote for candidates of integrity, candidates who'll put the people first and politics second. And I have the honor today to share this platform with candidates who can make that difference.

He's a man of decency and a man of honor. And there's no Member of the House that I've relied on more in rebuilding our nation's defenses. The people of Montgomery can be proud that their Representative in Washington -- for no less than 22 years -- has been this good man, Bill Dickinson, and I'd like to ask you to send Bill back.

Your candidate for Governor, Guy Hunt, has a long history of service to Alabama and the Nation. A dozen years as county probate judge, twice my Alabama campaign chairman, 5 years working for America's farmers in a position that I appointed him to in the Department of Agriculture -- again and again, Guy has demonstrated his willingness to serve. Guy believes in cutting government waste, not the family budget; in raising economic growth, not taxes.

At a time when political shenanigans have sullied the electoral process, when the bad, old politics have besmirched the system, I know that Alabamians value Jerry Denton more than ever. He's a Senator second to none, a leader you can trust, a man who would never put personal considerations above principle and fair play. To my mind, Senator Denton is nothing less than a national treasure.

Now that Jerry Denton is in the Senate, courage and patriotism continue to distinguish all that he does. Jerry has become one of the preeminent leaders on Capitol Hill, a spokesman for Alabama and a statesman for America. And, by the way, I've seen Jerry's mother's TV testimony -- [laughter] -- and I want to add that, as Mrs. Denton knows, Jerry's always stood firm for Social Security. [Laughter] But Jerry and I were elected in the same year, and we've worked together to revive our country's economy, rebuild the national defenses, and restore the American spirit. Let me tell you a little bit about all that we've accomplished together.

Back in 1980, you'll remember, the American economy was in the worst mess since the Great Depression. Government was everywhere: running up taxes, causing inflation, raising interest rates, and taking bigger and bigger shares of your earnings. To get big government off your backs and out of your pockets, we slowed government growth, slashed needless regulations, and enacted an across-the-board personal income tax cut of nearly 25 percent. Then we indexed taxes, making it impossible for inflation to push you into higher and higher tax brackets anymore -- which inflation had been doing -- and those in Washington were getting a tax increase every year without having to pass any legislation.

In the midst of this expansion, it's true, certain sectors of our economy have lagged behind -- for instance, natural resource industries like farming. But I pledge to you today that I'll not rest -- and I know Jerry won't rest -- until every region of our country and every sector of our economy shares in the national prosperity. Already, Jerry and I have worked to help Alabama farmers affected by this year's drought. Indeed, I've recently directed Secretary of Agriculture Lyng to provide emergency assistance to Alabama farmers all over the State. And last year Jerry won a long fight to create jobs at Tuscaloosa Steel through his effective leadership in Congress.

Perhaps most important, with his help we've worked to promote economic growth by giving our nation comprehensive tax reform, a tax reform that would make our entire tax system simpler and fairer and enable some 8 out of 10 Americans to pay Federal income taxes of 15 percent or less. That's right -- 15 percent or less, because several million at the lowest brackets of earnings in this country will be removed from the tax rolls entirely. Now, that sounds kind of like darn good news. Now, there's been some talk that once our tax reform program is in place, the rates will be raised to pay for more spending. Well, that would be an intolerable breach of faith with the American people. We didn't achieve this historic tax reform to have it undermined by the big taxers.

And I pledge today to oppose any effort to raise the tax rates and negate the hard-fought progress we've made, and I'm calling on all Members of the Congress to take that same pledge. Ask them to do something I know Jerry's more than happy to do himself: Ask them to take that pledge on tax rates -- that they'll be held at 15 percent, 28 percent, and 34 percent for the corporations.

I was now going to ask you something, but I don't have to ask. You've made it plain already. Yes, we should keep Jerry in the Senate, where he can keep right on giving. And if I could interject something here, it occurred to me as we landed today at Maxwell Air Force Base that you here in Alabama have always treated our armed services with esteem, even when some in other parts of the country thought it was somehow unstylish or old fashioned. No, the people of Alabama have never been ashamed of the flag, and isn't it good to have the rest of the country join you in treating our men and women in uniform with respect?

It's still a difficult and dangerous world out there, but with Jerry's help we've made ourselves stronger and better prepared to deal with it. And something else, I just have to believe that with Jeremiah Denton chairing the Senate Subcommittee on Security and Terrorism every nickel-and-dime fanatic and dictator knows that if he chooses to tangle with the United States of America, he'll have to pay a price.

Restored prosperity at home, renewed strength and self-assurance abroad -- this is the story of the past 6 years and the story in which Jerry Denton has played such an important part. Now, I know that Jerry's the first Republican Senator from Alabama in this century, and that with a lot of Democrats in Alabama -- good, hard-working, patriotic people -- that still just doesn't seem to, well, sit right. But to those Alabaman Democrats -- I used to be one myself, not an Alabaman, a Democrat -- [laughter] -- I must tell you from my heart that Jerry Denton represents -- those of you who are Democrats or were Democrats -- he represents your views far better than the liberals who run the Democratic Party in Washington and right here in Alabama.

We must never mistake the rank and file of the Democratic Party for the liberals who lead that party, the liberals who want to betray everyday Democrats by going back to the failed, old tax policies of tax and tax and spend and spend.

So, I ask all Alabama Democrats to consider whether, just maybe, they ought to join the Republican Party as I did and as Alabamians like Sonny Callahan did. I know it isn't easy, but as Winston Churchill said, ``Some men change principle for party, and some men change party for principle.'' And even if you can't quite bring yourself to change parties, well, you can still send the liberals a message by voting for Jerry Denton, Bill Dickinson, Guy Hunt, and Sonny Callahan.

This election here in Alabama could determine which party controls the United States Senate. It could determine whether in the remaining time of my Presidency I see 2 more years of moving forward or 2 years of backsliding and stalemate. My friends, I don't believe you elected me because you wanted me to go forward for 6 years and stand still for 2. I believe you elected me because you wanted me to work with people like Jerry Denton to get America moving again and keep her moving for all 8 years.

You know, earlier today we were in Louisiana, and not long before that I spoke in California and Colorado. And everywhere I've gone, I've seen something that touched me, something that gives heart to all those who can still remember the self-doubt and the weakness abroad and at home that marked so much of the sixties and seventies. Today, here in Montgomery, I see it again. Call it confidence, self-assurance, what you will. It's a renewed understanding that, for all our faults, ours is a nation of goodness and greatness; that despite our mistakes in the world we've stood for human freedom with greater consistency and courage than any other nation in history; that if only we have faith, if only we look not to government, but to ourselves to create a new and lasting era of prosperity.

Come to think of it, what I've seen has a name, and it's what sustained Jerry Denton through all those long years of imprisonment and torture. And it's called love of country. This new confidence and self-respect, this love of country, this is what Senator Jeremiah Denton stands for. And so it is that I ask you to cast a vote that will help me to be the President you want me to be. But even more, I ask you to cast a vote for yourselves, for your children, and for your children's children. My friends, I ask you to send Jeremiah Denton back to the United States Senate.

You know, I can't quit without telling you something that I told those people over in Louisiana before I left. Every time I think about the leadership of the Democratic Party, marching down the road alone, not realizing that the rank-and-file members of the Democratic Party had turned to the right a long time ago. [Laughter] But when I think of them, I think of that little story about the three fellows that came out one day to get in their car and found that they were locked out and the keys were inside. And one of them said, ``Well, let's get a wire coathanger.

Americans are blessed with nature's bounty. As children, our first prayers teach us to give thanks for the abundance we enjoy. We take for granted our full tables and the peace and security in which we enjoy them.

But, unfortunately, many do not share in our abundance. Hunger stemming from poverty and famine retains its cruel grip in many parts of the world, especially in Africa. This year, hunger is not as widespread as it was in 1985, in part because of the humanitarian spirit of Americans and other donors. No nation has been more generous to those less fortunate. We have sent billions of dollars to help other countries rebuild after war or disaster strikes. We have sent billions of tons of food to feed the hungry. And, we have sent our sons and daughters to work alongside our neighbors to help them help themselves.

The nobility of our purpose was made manifest in the great outpouring of aid Americans gave spontaneously to the victims of the African famine. Our help, both public and private, saved hundreds of thousands of lives. Last year, rain returned to Africa, and famine subsided.

The world is making progress in ending hunger, albeit slowly. In some countries, civil strife and socialist policies continue to fuel famine. We must continue to work towards peace and incentive policies if we are to eliminate famine caused by poverty, drought, environmental decline, and inappropriate economic policies. Many governments throughout the world have recognized that the health of their nations and their people depends on a strong agriculture, based on free enterprise and competitive markets. To this end, my Administration has encouraged policy reform efforts throughout the world, through our economic assistance programs as well as a new Food for Progress program, under which we provide grants of U.S. food to countries adopting sound agricultural policies.

Since its birth as a nation, the United States has relied on the twin pillars of individual freedom and individual enterprise as the foundations of its national economy. Political and economic freedoms cannot be separated; together, they foster a sense of social, economic, and political responsibility that sustains individual growth and fuels economic development. Without self-reliant, creative citizens, no nation can be self-sufficient politically or economically, nor can it provide sufficient food and fulfill the basic human needs of its people. Free market policies can promote economic growth based on social justice, self-reliance, and the skills of the people.

I ask that the American people use this day to reaffirm their commitment to ending world hunger. Ending hunger throughout the world will require a long-term commitment of the public and the private sectors, of people and their governments, and of developing and donor countries. The technological solutions to end world hunger are known to man; now we must demonstrate that we have the will to eliminate hunger and its primary source, poverty.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

In both long-range planning and in day-to-day decisions, our forest managers and scientists must strive for judicious balance among: the needs of this and future generations of Americans for the various benefits obtainable from our nation's forest lands; the need for protection of unspoiled wilderness lands and the need for harvesting timber and forage and recovering minerals to sustain a growing national economy; the need to produce direct economic benefits for our people and the need to produce benefits that do not have a specific dollar return such as outdoor recreation opportunities and wildlife habitat; the need to invest in the national forests and the need to meet the other demands on the Federal budget each year; and the share of the costs of the system to be paid by the general taxpayers and the share to be paid by the specific users of our national forests.

Achieving the balance we seek is not an easy process. Because we as individuals and as interest groups may place widely divergent values on a particular potential management action, and because our society encourages active participation by the public in governmental decisions, our major choices are often preceded by conflict and followed by dissent. Nevertheless, we have a responsibility to make the choices and decisions necessary to manage our forest resources, and we must make them judiciously.

During my administration the number of designated wilderness areas managed by the Forest Service has doubled -- to 329 areas comprising over 32 million acres, while the remaining 159 million acres, managed under the principles of multiple use and sustained yield, have produced 11 billion board feet of timber harvest annually, and 225 million recreation visitor days annually, as well as productive wildlife habitat and oil, gas, and other minerals to sustain our economy. Capability on non-Federal lands has grown as well, as has our store of new technology to accomplish these output levels in a way that carefully preserves environmental and economic values. Where conflict in the management of these resources was inevitable, we have sought the judicious balance.

Secretary of Agriculture's recommended program for the Forest Service, called for by the Resources Planning Act, sets forth a plan within which we can achieve the balance we seek. It identifies a reasonable range of management directions, outputs, costs, and goals for the long-term future. It provides the Congress and the public with a valuable information base on which to continue their informed participation in the decisions affecting our national forests.

President noted that this historic legislation will significantly improve our ability to counter the scourge of international terrorism. The President reiterated his commitment to ensure the safety of our diplomats, servicemen, and citizens wherever they may be. The $2.44 billion in this act provides the organization and authority necessary to increase the effectiveness of our physical security program. Another important part of this act provides for the care and welfare of the victims of terrorism and their families.

The President restated his commitment to seek further international cooperation in the struggle against terrorism. In this regard the President remains convinced that we must confront this criminal behavior in every way possible -- diplomatically, economically, through the legal system, and when necessary, with force.

Along with an improved organization and better physical security, first-rate intelligence remains the key element in our ability to confront terrorism. We must continue to improve our ability to predict, prevent, and respond to the terrorist threat. This includes continued support for a research and development program to counter the evergrowing sophistication of weapons and methods in the terrorist arsenal.

President recognizes that this legislation in and of itself will not bring an end to terrorism; however, we must continue on all fronts with all of our resolve to meet the challenge international terrorism poses to democracy and our way of life. Freedom-loving people of every nation reject these criminal acts and support an unwavering policy never acquiescing to or accepting this outlaw behavior.

Paul Huray, for putting this conference together. I'm looking forward to receiving a copy of your final report. It's a pleasure to be here today with the presidents and supporters of colleges and universities that has meant so much to American life.

From the day the first black college, Cheyney University, opened its doors in 1837, the institutions that you represent and support have been an important and irreplaceable pillar in both higher education and the struggle against injustice in our country. At the time Cheyney admitted its first student, it was actually against the law in parts of the country to teach black children to read and write. From that time to this, education has been the spark to light the torch of hope and opportunity for black Americans.

That's why men like Frederick Douglass, Booker T. Washington, and Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., understood and stressed the importance of education. As Frederick Douglass once said, ``A little learning, indeed, may be a dangerous thing, but the want of learning is a calamity to any people.'' Today your schools award some 40 percent of all degrees that are earned by black students in the United States. Eighty-five percent of black physicians, 60 percent of black pharmacists, 40 percent of black attorneys, 50 percent of black engineers and 75 percent of black military officers, and 80 percent of black judges are graduates of America's 101 historically black colleges and universities.

You know, mentioning military officers, Martin Luther King used to remind us that black Americans are among our greatest patriots. And I take special pride in mentioning this because I remember during the war I narrated a film about a group of such patriots, pilots being trained at Tuskegee -- including one who would go on to become a great general and a national hero, Chappie James. And even though I was only a member of the horse cavalry, I can't tell you how proud I am that they made me an honorary member of the Tuskegee Airmen.

When we first came to Washington, our administration recognized the vital role that historically black colleges and universities continue to play in American life. Now, that's why 5 years ago this week I signed Executive Order 12320. Since then, Federal funding to your institutions has increased from $545 million in 1981 to $629 million in 1985. In the past 5 years, we've helped rescue from financial collapse several prestigious historical black schools, including Fisk University and Meharry Medical College. We also helped to improve the administrative infrastructure of many historically black colleges, and that's helped them make more of what they have. And, of course, our work continues.

And in a goal that I believe is particularly important, we've encouraged greater private participation in your colleges and universities. It's part of our whole approach, really. For too long, well-meaning Government programs had lured too many Americans into the deep, dark caverns of dependency. We want to help free them to climb out and walk in the sunlight of pride and independence. So, we're working to create enterprise zones and establish a youth employment opportunity wage. We established the Job Training Partnership Act. We cut taxes for all Americans, and with tax reform -- perhaps the greatest antipoverty program in history -- we'll take 6 million lower income Americans off the rolls entirely.

And we've also said that helping ensure the health and independence of your schools was, is, and will be one of the most important steps we can take in making ours truly an opportunity society for all Americans. So, that's why we're here today, to recognize some of the partnerships between business and historically black colleges in the fields of science and technology. And I understand that in the past 2 days you've talked about how to encourage more of those partnerships.

America today is pioneering a new industrial revolution -- a revolution that's creating new jobs, new technologies, new businesses, and new opportunities and changing the way we think and work; a revolution in which America is the world leader; a revolution so profound that some believe that it is only compatible with free societies and that once it pierces the walls of the Communist world, those walls may begin to crumble and fall. Many graduates of your schools have helped lead our nation in this revolution; for example, an American hero, Dr. Ronald McNair, who was a graduate of North Carolina A&T State University and a member of the Challenger shuttle crew. We need more young men and women of genius and courage like Dr. McNair if we're to continue to lead this revolution.

This week, I'm told, you've discussed such imaginative proposals as tapping the vast array of talent and experience in America's community of retired scientists, technologists, and engineers. With the help of corporate research departments, private foundations, and professional societies, you will recruit retirees to serve as visiting faculty members, scholars, or researchers. You've also discussed a new partnership for science with business. Companies would adopt a department or an entire school and make a long-term commitment to its development. Foundations would join with the corporate community. Already our award winners today have blazed the trail. Partnerships, such as those of Atlanta University, those between the Texas Experiment Station and Prairie View A&M University, and those between Lawrence Berkley Laboratory and Jackson State University, have shown the way to the future.

Nearly two-thirds of high school seniors use an illegal drug at least once before graduating. Forty percent of high school seniors have used drugs in addition to marijuana. At least 17 percent of the class of 1985 tried cocaine, the highest level ever, and it's going up in all groups -- urban and rural, college-bound and not, male and female -- everyone. And it doesn't stop with high school.

Well, that's what Nancy and I are calling on all Americans to do. I'd like to interject something. This morning I turned on the set real quick because I knew she'd been taped and was appearing in an interview on the air, and she was asked a question about -- but where, you know, how far down does this begin?

And I had forgotten this answer that she had learned on one of her trips -- the various treatment centers. A lad 8 years of age, not only a user but a pusher, and he carried one of those beeper things, sitting in class. If he got the signal on the beeper he excused himself and went out because the beeper meant he had a customer outside waiting to buy. That's how early and that's why, as she said, their names, our children's names, are the ones that are written on it.

Nancy and I are calling, as I say, on all Americans to do -- it won't be the campaign against drugs won with more police, although that will help. It won't be won just with tighter control on our borders, although that will help. And it won't be won just in schools, although that's important. It won't be won just in the fraternities, or sororities, or dormitories -- and that's important. It won't be won just in our workplaces, no matter how important they are. It won't be won just in our homes, although they're very important, too.

Well, this is how America will win the crusade against drugs -- the way we've met every other great challenge, the way we've overcome every other great obstacle: not by making excuses but by each of us doing our part, by pulling together. Nancy and I are saying it's time for all of us to join together to kick drugs and drug dealers out of our schools, off of our campuses, out of our homes, out of our communities, and out of our country. You college and university presidents are leading in so many areas of education. I ask you to lead in this way, too. And now, I think we have a few awards to hand out.

It's autumn in Washington, and as children here and around the country return to school, Congress has returned to complete its work -- most importantly, the final passage of our historic tax reform bill.

You may remember what the Washington pundits said at the time. We heard that there was no way that a simple and fair tax bill could survive the beating it would get as it ran the gauntlet of Washington lobbyists and insiders.

Well, there's one thing about Washington: There are always plenty of people around to tell you why something can't be done. But what those people always forget is that there's a force in our nation more powerful than all the lobbyists and insiders put together. And that force is the people -- you, your neighbors and friends, and people like you across America.

And so, because of you and your support, in the last few months we've seen develop in Congress a broad, bipartisan backing for tax reform. And now, thanks to the leadership of Senator Bob Packwood and Congressman Dan Rostenkowski, the Senate and House are preparing to vote on the final bill. Passage of that bill will mean that for most of you taxes will come down. But even as I'm speaking to you, the special interests are launching their last-ditch offensive. You're going to be hearing a lot from them in the next few days. So, before they get started, let's just set the record straight.

First, let's be clear about what tax reform means to you and your family. One of our important goals in tax reform has been making the tax system better for American families. Well, if you're like 80 percent of Americans, enactment of this bill will mean that your top tax rate will be no more than 15 percent.

Your standard deduction will go way up and your personal exemption will almost double to a full $2,000 by 1989. And no one's income will be taxed more than 28 percent. All this means that if yours is like the typical family, when everything is added up, you'll end up with $500 to $800 more a year. Not bad for starters. And tax reform means even more to lower income Americans. This bill is perhaps the greatest antipoverty program in history. It will take 6 million poor people off the income tax rolls entirely.

But what will it do for the economy as a whole? The short answer is: more jobs -- 2 to 3 million more in the next decade, according to the Treasury Department. The first reason for that is you. You'll have more money, and whether you spend it or invest it, you'll be helping to create more jobs.

But that's not all. We're taking the shelter out of tax shelters. No longer will there be fancy schemes and fast angles that produce nothing but tax breaks. Lawyers, accountants, and businessmen will spend more time looking at the reality of supply and demand and less time exploring the never-never land of the tax code. They'll be looking for investments that create real products, real income, and real jobs.

I've said all along that the final tax reform bill had to keep the incentives for American industry to invest in jobs and the future. And that's what this Senate-House tax reform bill does. It keeps the most important incentives for business investment that we won in 1981 -- our tax bill. And while making sure every business pays a fair-share minimum tax, it brings down the overall corporate tax rate to 34 percent. The other industrial countries of the world know what this means. In almost every one, voices are now saying that the new American tax system will make U.S. businesses more competitive and that maybe they'd better get busy and lower their own tax rates, or lose out to us.

Five-and-a-half years ago, all of us began a long journey to restoring America's strength and greatness. We brought down inflation from some of the highest levels in our history to where it is today, the lowest level in over 20 years. Then we cut tax rates and saw the beginning of the strongest economic growth in 33 years.

Since the recovery began, we've created more new jobs than Europe and Japan combined. Today we have a greater percentage of our people employed than ever before in our history, and never before have so many Americans held jobs.

Tax reform will help us continue that growth. I hope you will support our effort to defeat the special interests and win one for the hard-working taxpayers of this country. If your Congressmen and Senators cast their votes for America's future and enact the Senate-House tax reform bill, we can do just that.

Our Nation has been greatly favored by the presence here of peoples from many lands and races and cultures. Each group has made a unique contribution to the rich fabric of American society. Our Nation's historically Black colleges and universities have played a special role in America's growth and development. These institutions have a proud heritage and tradition of providing opportunities for individuals to develop to their fullest potential and to utilize their talents to the utmost for the benefit of our society.

For more than one hundred twenty-five years, historically Black colleges and universities have helped students, many from underprivileged backgrounds, to obtain the advantage of a higher education. Today, as in the past, the majority of our Nation's black citizens in the fields of medicine, law, engineering, business, education, and the military have received their degrees from these institutions.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The social context in which American children live is changing rapidly as the traditional balance between work and family life is being realigned. More mothers with children are entering the work force. Two-thirds of all mothers with school-age children are now working; three-fourths of our single parents are in the labor force.

Americans are a unique people, a colorful tapestry of traditions and cultures woven into one vibrant society. The motto graven on our coins -- E Pluribus Unum -- reflects the rich diversity from which America draws its strength and vitality.

Since the founding of our Republic more than 200 years ago, millions of immigrants have made the journey of freedom to our shores. America has drawn the stoutest hearts from every corner of the globe, from every Nation on earth. Some came to escape the chains of religious persecution, others to flee the bonds of political oppression, and still others came seeking a land of opportunity, the chance to begin life anew. Some of the most recent have scaled walls and crawled under barbed wire and through mine fields, while others risked their lives in makeshift boats on perilous seas.

No matter how they came, today they are all Americans who take pride in the traditions of their ancestral homeland while at the same time dedicating themselves wholeheartedly to the principles for which our Nation stands. They now are taking their full and rightful place in America's social and political life. Their contributions are legion in every area of endeavor: science, the arts, medicine, business, government, sports, religion, and the media. The efforts of ethnic Americans in bolstering the values of faith, freedom, family, work, and country have served to strengthen the fabric of our national life and have made America a culturally richer and more vibrant land in which to live.

Today in Stockholm, the United States and 34 other governments adopted an accord that will, if faithfully implemented, reduce the risk of war in Europe, where there is the greatest concentration of military forces of the East and the West. I welcome this positive outcome at the CDE Conference. It will contribute to greater security in Europe and to improved East-West relations. This accord also sends messages that should be welcomed by people throughout the world. It demonstrates that East and West, with seriousness of purpose and hard work, can establish common ground on which to build a more secure future. It also demonstrates that the nations of the West, around whose proposals the Stockholm accord was built, constitute a powerful force for peace.

The set of militarily significant and verifiable measures adopted by the Stockholm CDE Conference marks a substantial advance over those in the Helsinki Final Act. These measures will make military activities more predictable and inhibit opportunities for political intimidation. In particular, the Stockholm accord commits the 35 nations to notify one another of military activities above certain levels, to invite observers, to forecast activities a year in advance, and to allow inspectors to verify compliance with those commitments. This is the first East-West accord in which the Soviet Union has agreed to inspection of military activities on its territory. Although these inspection provisions are very different from those we would require to verify agreements which reduced or limited forces, they are appropriate to the Stockholm confidence- and security-building measures and offer us the opportunity to gain experience in conducting inspections.

Stockholm document, of course, must become more than promises on paper. Implementation of its commitments will be the true measure of its contribution to European security. For its part the United States will meet its commitments fully. Soviet compliance, especially with the verification provisions, will be an important gauge of the possibilities for future progress in conventional arms control.

By advancing the principle of openness in the military-security field, this CDE accord can also contribute to progress in the broader Helsinki CSCE [Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe] process. The accord achieved at Stockholm on security issues makes all the more imperative balanced progress on human rights and fundamental freedoms. At the Vienna CSCE followup meeting, which begins in November, the United States delegation will press for fulfillment of all CSCE commitments and for balanced progress across the full CSCE agenda. These accomplishments are also a testimony to the skill, dedication, and energy of our negotiators. I want to congratulate Ambassador Robert L. Barry and his negotiating team on a job well done.

Today in almost every American community, the blue and orange emergency medical vehicle and the 911 emergency telephone number are instantly recognized reminders that we are now saving lives in ways unheard of by earlier generations. They remind us of those dedicated emergency medical teams -- physicians, nurses, emergency medical technicians, paramedics, educators, administrators, and volunteers -- who have cut in half the death rate for medical emergencies from accident or disease over the past two decades.

Across the Nation, emergency medical services teams are working to cut the death rate from medical emergencies still further. They are working to advance and adapt their skills and training as new methods of emergency treatment are developed.

And they are working to educate every American on what each of us can do to cooperate with and to improve the emergency medical services in our own communities. It is also appropriate that we as a Nation should recognize the value and importance of emergency medical services teams. We owe them a great debt of gratitude.

America's strength has been one of our administration's highest goals. When we took office, we found that we had ships that couldn't leave port, planes that couldn't fly -- both for lack of trained men and women and adequate supplies of spare parts. We found that for years the United States sat on its hands while the Soviet Union engaged in a military buildup, the likes of which the world had never seen. The American nuclear deterrent, upon which world peace depends, had been allowed to slide toward obsolescence. And across the Earth, Soviet-sponsored regimes had been imposed in countries as diverse as Angola, Afghanistan, and Nicaragua.

And let me just say that around the world and here at home, I've met many of our young men and women in uniform over the last several years. It does something to you when you're standing up there on the demilitarized zone in Korea and a young fellow standing there in uniform says, ``Sir, we're on the frontier of freedom.'' Everyone who works with them will confirm what I've said about them. And those serving today are the best darn bunch who've ever served our country. I'm proud of all of them.

In the last 5\1/2\ years, we've begun the necessary modernization of our nuclear deterrent. We've begun research on strategic defense, the one great hope that we might some day rid the world of the prison of mutual nuclear terror. As I told the United Nations General Assembly yesterday, we're prepared right now to enter an agreement with the Soviet Union on research, development, testing, and deployment of strategic defense. In pursuit of a safer world, we're determined to move toward a future of greater and greater reliance on strategic defense. The only question for the Soviets is, do we move toward strategic defense together or alone?

In the last 5\1/2\ years, America has also taken a stand with embattled defenders of freedom around the world. In Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, and Nicaragua, we've said that we stand with those who would turn back the night of totalitarian tyranny. And in this I wish I could say that we had united backing in the Congress. But you know the truth is different, particularly regarding our support of freedom fighters in this hemisphere. Even though both Houses of Congress have approved critically needed military assistance for the freedom fighters, this bill has been deliberately stalled on Capitol Hill. Freedom fighters will pay with their lives for this ``politics of obstructionism.'' We're determined to bring their barricades down, to let the light of hope through to the Nicaraguan people. And we will.

But all in all, in the last 5\1/2\ years, we've come a long way. You saw this when Mr. Gorbachev and I met in Geneva last November. As I said yesterday at the U.N., despite differences, we resolved at that meeting to work together for real reductions in nuclear arms, as well as progress in other areas. The Soviets are still relentless adversaries, as their totally unwarranted arrest of an innocent American reporter 3 weeks ago demonstrates -- an action which jeopardizes all areas of our relationship. But at the arms reduction table they now appear to treat meetings as more than just another propaganda forum. This, I believe, is because of the new will the United States has shown for the last 5\1/2\ years. The Soviets have been convinced that we're serious about rebuilding our strength.

But all this progress has now been placed in jeopardy by actions taken in the House of Representatives, actions just as serious as the attempt to block aid to the freedom fighters. If permitted to stand, these actions would pull the rug out from under our arms negotiators in Geneva and imperil our national security. The House voted to ban tests of antisatellite systems, even though the Soviets have a system in operation, and we don't. They voted to stop us from producing a deterrent to modern [Soviet] chemical weapons. They voted to slash our request for the strategic defense research, an initiative that helped bring the Soviets back to the bargaining table in Geneva. They voted to deny funds to move beyond the limits of SALT II, a treaty that couldn't be ratified and that would've expired by now if it had been ratified and that the Soviets have repeatedly violated. And finally, the House would prohibit essentially all testing of nuclear weapons. Well, all of this is bad for our national security and for arms reduction talks.

And if the defense budget arrives on my desk looking anything like that, I'll veto it. All of these issues -- [applause]. Thank you, you make vetoing even more pleasant than I find it. [Laughter] But all of these issues are important. Each House action undermines our peace and security. But I'd like to use my time today -- what's left of it -- to discuss one area that I touched on yesterday that I believe needs more attention. With the Soviets orchestrating a major propaganda campaign to get us to declare a moratorium on nuclear testing, it's time to set the record straight on why we need that test. There are four important reasons.

First, nuclear testing is essential to guarantee that our weapons -- the key to deterring nuclear aggression -- actually work. We insist on the most rigorous field tests for nonnuclear weapons like airplanes, tanks, and guns. But nuclear weapons are far more complex, and they, too, must be tested. Some time ago, for example, we found that the safety on the warhead for the Polaris missile wouldn't release. Without the testing that helped us fix that, most of our sea-based deterrent would have been ineffective. Without testing we couldn't reduce the size and improve the effectiveness of our warheads and make them safer, as we have. So, until we can negotiate the elimination of nuclear weapons with the Soviets, we must have tests to make sure that our deterrent works and that it is safe.

Second, we use nuclear tests to design nonnuclear weapons and equipment -- for example, satellites, ships, tanks, and sensors -- so that they can better withstand a Soviet nuclear attack. This increases the chances that our military can survive and still fight, which reduces the Soviet incentive to attack us and our allies in the first place.

And, fourth, testing ensures that the Soviets won't surprise us with breakthroughs that might alter the strategic balance. The Soviets have raced for years to modernize and expand their weapons systems. We're still playing catchup, and this imbalance is a threat to world peace.

Even if we were to agree to a moratorium or a test ban, we cannot be sure the Soviets would honor it or that it could be verified. In the early sixties the Soviets broke out of a 3-year moratorium, that they had agreed to, with the most intensive series of nuclear tests in history. They had been planning all during the moratorium for the testing they were going to do. And when they were ready, they just violated the moratorium. We, on the other hand, had abated. And so, it took us more than a year to restore our testing facilities to their condition before the moratorium, so we could begin to try and catch up. Any agreement to limit testing must be verifiable. We've made a number of proposals to improve verification of current treaties. The Soviets should accept these proposals or make one of their own and stop playing propaganda games.

Our highest arms control priority is to get the Soviets to agree to deep arms reductions in the U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. Soviet emphasis on the testing issue is a diversion from this urgent task. The House's ban on testing, on the other hand, is a back door to a nuclear freeze, which would make arms reductions almost impossible. Some Congressmen seem to believe that peace and American weakness mean the same thing. Didn't it ever occur to anyone what the Soviets must be thinking?

So, this is what we're up against and why I'm so grateful to all of you for what you are doing. Now, I don't dare look at the gentleman sitting right over here, because I've been telling a story the last couple of days, in some speeches, that I like to tell that illustrates the attitude of those in Congress that are bringing this about.

It has to do with three fellows that came out to get in their car and found they'd locked themselves out. And one of them said, ``Get a wire coathanger and we can straighten it out and manage to get in.'' And the other one says, ``We can't do that. Somebody would think we're stealing the car.'' And the third one said, ``Well, we'd better do something pretty quick.

Because of the NIH's biomedical research, deaths from illnesses common to children -- diarrhea and infectious diseases -- have been markedly reduced in this country and throughout the world. Many youngsters with chronic disorders, like diabetes and asthma, are leading nearly normal lives, thanks to research advances that have provided new medications and new therapeutic techniques. Childhood cancers, once inevitably and invariably fatal, are now yielding to treatment. Some are being cured. Infant mortality has shown a dramatic decrease in recent years, due in large part to a better understanding of the nutritional needs and environmental support systems needed to assure the survival of low-weight and premature infants.

Their willingness to give freely and unselfishly of themselves, even their lives, in defense of our democratic principles has given our great country the security we enjoy today. From Valley Forge to Vietnam, through war and peace, valiant, patriotic Americans have answered the call, serving with honor and fidelity.

Let us reflect on the great achievements of those whose sacrifices preserved our freedom and our way of life. With a spirit of pride and gratitude, let us recall their heroic accomplishments and thank them for their unselfish devotion to duty. They are indeed worthy of the solemn tribute of a grateful Nation.

November 11, 1986, as Veterans Day. I urge all Americans to recognize the valor and sacrifice of our veterans through appropriate public ceremonies and private prayers. I also call upon Federal, State, and local government officials to display the flag of the United States and to encourage and participate in patriotic activities throughout the country. I invite the business community, churches, schools, unions, civic and fraternal organizations, and the media to support this national observance with suitable commemorative expressions and programs.

The President. Thank you all, and welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. It's great to be here with some of the staunchest supporters of tax reform. We've come a long way since that day, nearly a year-and-half ago, when I asked Congress to take up the task of reforming our antiquated tax code.

The first thing we heard was a chorus of voices saying it couldn't be done. There was no way a simple, fair, and progrowth tax reform could survive the treacherous jungles of special interest politics. And they said that the wishes and hopes of the American people counted for very little in this city on the Potomac; what counted was pressure groups, lobbyists, and deals cut behind the scenes. Well, they forgot one thing: America didn't become great by being pessimistic and cynical. We didn't become the leader of the free world and the mightiest economic force on this planet by shrinking from challenges.

As I said, we're on the threshold -- we're not quite there yet. We should remember, as the great seer and sayer Yogi Berra once said, ``The game isn't over 'til it's over.'' The special interests have massed for a last-ditch effort to kill tax reform before it becomes the tax law of the land.

You know, tax reform has been declared dead so many times by the pundits that I'd be worrying if they weren't predicting trouble ahead. But we can't afford to become complacent. This is the decisive battle, and this is where all we've fought for finally will be won or lost. The special interests realize it's their last chance to stop the bill, because it's the best chance for the American people to get the fair, progrowth tax reform they deserve. In the days ahead, we're going to give it a 100-percent effort -- one final all-out push over that goal line.

Over 80 percent of all Americans will pay the lower rate of only 15 percent or will pay no taxes at all. The top rate will be slashed to 28 percent, the lowest in over 50 years. And we're keeping tax brackets indexed to make sure that inflation never again gives the tax-and-spend crew in Congress a free ride by automatically pushing Americans into higher tax brackets.

One of our primary goals has been fairness for families, and that's why the standard deduction will go way up. And the personal exemption -- the one that taxpayers deduct for themselves and each one of the dependents -- that exemption will almost double to a full $2,000 by 1989. That means that, when everything is added up, the typical family will end up with at least $200 more in tax savings every year. At the same time, some 6 million working poor will be dropped off the tax rolls altogether, making this one of the best antipoverty programs this country's ever seen.

I've said all along that the final tax reform bill had to keep incentives for American industry to invest in jobs and the future -- and this bill does. It keeps important incentives for business investment. And while making sure every business pays a fair-share minimum tax, it brings the corporate rate down to 34 percent. By closing loopholes and lowering rates, we're going to bring America's investment money out from under the shelters and back into the productive economy where it belongs.

With tax reform, America will have the lowest marginal rates and the most modern tax code in the industrialized world -- one that encourages risk-taking, innovation, and that old American spirit of enterprise. We'll be refueling the American growth economy with the kind of incentives that have helped create record numbers of new businesses and 11\1/2\ million new jobs in 45 months. The Treasury Department estimates that the greater growth, spurred on by tax reform, will create 2 to 3 million more jobs in the next decade. I'll bet Jim Baker told you that already.

But tax reform could have an even more profound and important effect on world growth. A British news magazine, the Economist, has described it as the beginning of a ``tax revolution'' that will ``stalk through the West,'' as our industrialized partners cut tax rates in their own countries in order to remain competitive with the American dynamo.

Most economists agree that America won't be able to grow and prosper indefinitely if the rest of the world economy is sagging behind. We have already seen the slowing effects of our economy, of sluggish world growth.

Without faster growth, other countries simply can't afford to buy as many of our goods and services, and that hurts American workers. Tax reform is one of our best chances to convince the other industrialized nations to join us on the growth path, to carry this revolution of hope and opportunity around the world and to create a strong, sound, and growing world economy.

Either we go the way of fairness and jobs, opportunity and growth, or slink back along the path of politics as usual. Congress should have no doubts, the American people are watching closely. They are counting on us, and we dare not betray their just hopes for a better future. If we let them down, they will never forgive us, and we'll never forgive ourselves. I want to send a message to all the Members of Congress, for this vote especially: Vote your conscience, vote to give the American people the fair-share tax reform they want, deserve, and expect.

I'd just like to just close with a couple of little historic notes. When the income tax, way back in 1913, was being debated in the Congress, one man very eloquently got up, and plumping for that tax -- the income tax -- and said, ``We must have this tax not for government's needs, but for government's wants.'' And government wanted a lot. There was one Senator who argued against the measure and was literally ridiculed out of office at the next election.

When he, in his debate, made a statement that if that bill were passed -- that amendment to the Constitution became law -- it was possible, in the future, that someday we might even be taking 10 percent of a man's earnings. So, government had more wants than -- he shouldn't have been laughed out of Congress. They should have listened to him.

Wholesaler Distributors. It's my privilege to be here this afternoon on behalf of the more than 1 million members of the Tax Reform Action Coalition -- and by extension, the millions of American citizens which you referred to a moment ago.

We are on the verge of a historic event for this country in terms of economic policy and indeed, I think, social policy, because this legislation is major deregulation. It would not have occurred as Secretary Baker and Mr. Regan mentioned in their remarks, clearly, without your leadership, your visionary leadership, your commitment. We would not be standing here today were it not for that. You have been the quarterback of tax reform. You are, indeed, the most valuable player of tax reform. And in recognition of that, we in the Tax Reform Action Coalition would like to present you with this football jersey commemorating -- [laughter] -- you as the most valuable player of tax reform.

Well, I want to thank you very much. Having played in the line in all my football years -- guard, right guard, that is -- [laughter] -- I was like every other lineman. We all really thought that the backfielder's job was easy and that we could do it better or as well. And now, at last, I've made quarterback.

George Hearn, the president of Eureka, and thank you, everyone here tonight and all of you who are doing so much. We're here for something that Nancy and I hold close to our hearts -- Eureka's Reagan scholarships.

I learned a lot at Eureka, and not just about economics, which was my major. I think the principal thing I learned about economics as a major was that if you could place all the economists end to end, they'd never reach a conclusion. [Laughter] That's a lesson that serves me well in my current occupation as an embarrasser of economists.

But one thing I'll always cherish about Eureka besides lessons in football and humility is that the college took a chance on me. Now, my family couldn't pay for the schooling. We didn't live on the wrong side of the tracks, but we lived close enough that we could hear the whistles. [Laughter] But what I couldn't earn in summers -- and I did work every summer and saved every dollar that I earned in order to help -- why, the college made up with a scholarship, jobs, and, yes, letting me defer part of my tuition until after graduation. And I wasn't alone in that. They did that for a number of other students. And this was in the depths of the Great Depression. And incidentally, one of those jobs -- washing dishes -- was one of the better jobs I've ever had. [Laughter] I performed it in a girls dormitory.

But seriously, in that time of such great strain -- and when you can imagine what happened to the endowment of a small college like that in that great crash and the Great Depression, and you went to class every day and knew that the professors who were teaching you, and without any grumble or complaint, had not been paid for weeks and weeks and weeks -- and that the townspeople and the merchants and the grocers and so forth carried them on the books -- just with the knowledge that somehow things would turn out all right. Those were Depression years, and I'm so happy about the scholarship program that you've done me the honor of giving in my name. It gives the students the opportunity to work for their schooling, and it also gives them something else I was lucky enough to have -- a mentor. That's a part of the program -- someone who will take an interest in them and their future.

Now, in my case it was a fellow from Kansas City named Sid Aultschuler. Sid was a businessman there. And my summer job for 7 years -- part in high school and then through college -- was at a beach, a river beach on the beautiful Rock River in a natural forest park called Lowell Park, named for James Russell Lowell, whose family had given it to the city. And there was a lodge there, and people would come out from the cities, like Kansas City and Chicago and so forth, with their families. And it was one of those things -- I don't know whether it still goes on today -- in which they had come there with their parents as children, and now they came as parents with their children. And I'd teach their kids to swim.

And finally, I was there for that last summer after I'd graduated, because I had to get enough money to try to go out and find a job -- 1932, the lowest year of the Great Depression. And many of those men during the summers had said to me that when I got out of college, come see them. And I had sort of relied on that. But by 1932 many of those weren't coming back to the lodge anymore. They had their own problems, and they weren't saying that anymore. But Sid Aultschuler was there, and I taught his two small daughters to swim that same summer. And then Sid, out of all them, said to me: ``If you can tell me what you really want to do and what you want to get into,'' he said, ``I think I have some connections that, if it touches on any of those, that I can help, even in these hard times.'' But he said, ``You're going to have to tell me what you want to do.'' Well, there I was with my degree in economics, a graduate with a bachelor of arts degree, and it hadn't occurred to me really what I wanted to do or anything except get a job of some kind or other. It was those kind of times. But he had laid it on me.

Sid Aultschuler isn't here, but two mentors for those scholars are -- Al Haig and Selwa Roosevelt. And I just want to say thanks to them, and let me also say thanks to someone who isn't a part of the mentor program, but who I know has taken a special interest in one of our scholars -- Strom Thurmond. This young man who's here is an intern in Strom's office. And I thank all of you, and the kind of generosity that you're showing this evening is the kind that built not just Eureka College but America itself.

And could I just take a minute, because maybe some of you who are being so kind don't know very much about that little school out there on the prairie. Well, in the first place, it is the oldest coeducational college west of the Alleghenies. And it was started by some people who arrived there in that part of Illinois in a wagon train from the East. And a man named Ben Major, whose family still lives there in the college town, his descendants, decided that this is where they would stay. He was the leader. He sank an ax in a stump, and he said, ``Here's where we will build our school.'' And they built their school before they built their homes.

And it became Walnut Grove Academy. And then, when it graduated above that, it became Eureka College. But this little school, so rich with tradition and that has contributed so much, and people like myself who went there -- you were never too poor, but what, if they could, they could make it possible for you to get that education.

But as I say, tradition that is so rich, and as you've been told, the wonderful thing about a small liberal arts college of that kind is not only that you get a good education, but you can't hide. You can't just go to class and back to your quarters again as you could in some of the great universities. I've been a regent of the 9-campus University of California, by way of being Governor. I was a member of the board of the 23-college, State college system of California. As a sports announcer I saw the inside of a great many of the great universities.

Everybody is needed, whether it's for glee club or student officers or athletics or whatever it may be. They grab you, and they bring you in, and you find out talents and abilities that you never knew you had.

I just want you to know how deeply grateful I am and that what you have done and what you are doing for this institution is for something that is very worthwhile. And maybe there aren't as many of them left in the country as there should be, but I pray to God there will always be a Eureka College, there in the heart of Illinois.

President, I did not go to Eureka College, and I have long lost a sense of priorities. May I present the spouse of our honorary cochairman and the Chief of Staff, the Honorable Donald Regan -- who, by the way, is a distinguished Harvard alumnus.

There is also another thing that I'd like to say. Three years ago we met the President in the White House, in 1983. And at that time we were all clustered around the President and Mrs. Reagan. And I said to Mrs. Reagan then, I said, ``Thanks for what you have done in the fight against drugs, because there could be a lot of people here right now, a lot of people in college on scholarships if it wasn't for drugs.'' This lady hasn't jumped on the bandwagon; she's been a bandwagon. I just want to thank Mrs. Reagan.

As you could tell, the President loves Eureka College. We love him there. He has been a supporter, not since he has been in office but ever since he graduated. He came back and was the honorary chairman of pumpkin parades.

Gould. He won a national honor for his role presentation there. He was also on the football team. He was a big part of Eureka College then. He still is. But when he graduated, he never received a class ring. So, on behalf of the students of Eureka College, the alumni of Eureka College, and also the Ronald W.

Intercontinental Hotel. Roy Pfautch was a donor to the scholarship fund; and Rodney T. Gould, a Reagan scholarship recipient, was the student body president. Prior to his remarks, the President attended a fundraising reception at the hotel.

The President. Thank you, and thank you, Bill -- Governor Bill, if these people do what I think they're going to do. It's a pleasure, a great pleasure, to be here in Detroit, a city of industry and commerce; a city that exemplifies the energy, creativity, and enterprise of America; a city where so many dreams have come true for so many people.

I'll never forget that special dream that started here in 1980. America was in trouble, and the Republicans came here to kick off our campaign to put America back on track and reaching for the stars. And that's exactly what we've done. It wouldn't have happened without you, and if we stick together, nobody is turning us back.

It's been tough going at times, but I think there's every reason to be proud of what we've accomplished since those dark days of uncertainty and decline. When we met here for our convention in 1980, inflation was running at double digits for the second year in a row, interest rates were shooting through the roof, the ranks of the unemployed were swelling, and business was in decline. Let me ask you: Anybody want to go back to those dark old days?

The President. It took time to put our program in place and time for it to work its magic, but today America has enjoyed 45 months of economic growth. We've got the highest number of people working and the highest percentage of the work force employed on record. There's a figure that most people are not familiar with. It seems that those who do the statistics have declared that the potential workpool of America is everyone, male and female, from the age of 16 all the way and on up, including everyone -- the retired and everyone else. Well, today, for the first time in our history, 61.2 percent of that available pool is employed in this country. The interest rates are down. And let me add that we just did all of this and, at the same time, kept inflation at its lowest level in over 20 years. But we're not finished, and we won't be until inflation is at zero and every American who wants a job has a job.

Now, there are those who would tell you that everything we've accomplished has been a matter of luck, or just a part of an uncontrollable business cycle, or even the result of the celestial effects of Halley's Comet. [Laughter] But, my friends, America's progress can be traced not to personalities, not to chance, but to the dramatic change in philosophy we carried to Washington after the 1980 election -- and to you, the American people.

